Authors
Dustin Putman
Number of Reviews
404

Title
Review for Girl, Interrupted (1999)
Directed by James Mangold.
Cast: Winona Ryder, Angelina Jolie, Clea Duvall, Brittany Murphy, Elisabeth 
Moss, Whoopi Goldberg, Jared Leto, Jeffrey Tambor, Vanessa Redgrave, Joanna 
Kerns, Mary Kay Place.
1999 - 127 minutes
Rated R (for profanity and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, January 15, 2000.
"What exactly is crazy?" This is one of the provocative questions running 
throughout James Mangold's "Girl, Interrupted," based on Susanna Kaysen's 
1993 memoir about her experiences staying in a psychiatric ward in the late 
'60s. It has been documented that star Winona Ryder has been passionate about 
a film adaptation of Kaysen's intriguing story (despite her book not 
following any sort of narrative) for several years, and it was only until she 
found a home at Columbia Pictures and collaborated with director James 
Mangold (1996's "Heavy") that everything fell into place. The delays turn out 
to be well worth the wait, as the picture is one filled with sincerity, 
frankness, and perception, a highly respectable, realistic endeavor that 
treats Kaysen's story with the utmost respect.
Susanna (Winona Ryder) is an average 18-year-old who has just recently 
graduated from high school. Unlike most of her classmates, who are set on 
what college to go to and what to study, Susanna wants nothing more than to 
write, something that is often scoffed at by those she tells. After a 
half-hearted suicide attempt in which she downs vodka with a bottle of 
aspirin, Susanna's parents literally pack her bags and send her on her way to 
Claymoore, a psychiatric hospital in Massachusetts, where she is to stay 
until the doctor believes she is cured. She checks herself in without giving 
it a thought, but the unjust thing is that Susanna doesn't seem to belong 
there--the closest problem she has that resembles a disorder seems to be a 
bunch of teen angst built up inside.
At Claymoore, she, at first, is able to see she is dissimilar to most of the 
other residents, but the line between well and sick is gradually blurred when 
she sparks friendships with several of the other girls living there, 
including Georgina (Clea Duvall), her roommate, who is called a pathological 
liar and has a fondness for "The Wizard of Oz"; the sweet-natured Polly 
(Elisabeth Moss), who once lit half of her face on fire in an attempt to get 
rid of a rash; and the introverted Daisy (Brittany Murphy), who has an eating 
disorder involving only consuming her father's rotisserie chickens. Soon 
after Susanna has arrived, in waltzes Lisa (Angelina Jolie), a long-time 
patient and sociopath who has once again been caught after she attempted to 
escape. Susanna and Lisa are very different individuals, but they form a 
close bond, balancing each other's diverse personalities off of one another. 
Because Susanna is known to have slept with two men, her psychiatrist 
(Vanessa Redgrave) believes she is promiscuous, something that bothers 
Susanna because the standards are so altered between the sexes on who is 
labeled, more or less, a slut. Worrying her clueless parents, who clearly 
have more psychological problems than their daughter, Susanna is also 
diagnosed as having Borderline Personality Disorder. Claymoore is a 
discouraging place, as it becomes increasingly apparent, because the people 
with the major problems are the staff, not the patients, many of which were 
obviously stuck in the institution to get out of their wealthy family's hair.
As far as the story and developments in the characters go, "Girl, 
Interrupted" treads on overly familiar ground, and the film is almost never 
anything other than predictable. What the picture lacks in freshness, 
however, it more than makes up for it in the outstanding performances across 
the board, and in the sympathetic, but not sugarcoated, portrayal of the 
inmates. 
Despite the notices that Angelina Jolie has garnered for her performance here 
(including a Golden Globe nomination), Winona Ryder matches her in every way. 
Both are superb young actresses, but since Jolie's Lisa is the more outward 
and flashy character, she is inevitably the one whose talent jumps more 
quickly off the screen. In contrast, Ryder is subtle and quiet, but all the 
more genuinely real because of it, and the internal conflicts you sense she 
is going through are something many teenagers and twentysomethings will be 
able to identify with. Since Ryder is the one we follow throughout the story 
(she appears in every scene), without a captivating presence in the role, the 
film would have collapsed under its own weight, but she more than handles the 
responsibilities handed to her. 
In a smaller turn, Brittany Murphy is the clear standout, in a performance of 
almost insufferable pain, as Daisy, who is checked out of the hospital by her 
father and given an apartment to live in, despite her obviously not being 
prepared to face the outside world. In the most powerful sequence in the 
film, Susanna and Lisa run away from Claymoore and travel to stay with Daisy 
for the night, but things take a turn for the worse when Lisa second-guesses 
exactly who Daisy is--a depressed, frightened girl who is not well enough to 
be taking care of herself, and who is all set up for a very serious fall. The 
heartbreaking thing is, Lisa is right, and Daisy knows it. Murphy, usually 
appearing in comedic roles (1995's "Clueless," 1999's "Drop Dead Gorgeous"), 
successfully invades her memorably tragic character with equal measures of 
insecurity and despair.
Supporting parts are all impressive, as well, with Clea Duvall eliciting a 
sweetness to her ambivalent role as Georgina, and Elisabeth Moss affecting as 
the regretful Polly, who knows there is no chance of anyone falling in love 
with her because of her disfigured face. Whoopi Goldberg evokes an important 
amount of warmth as the most caring nurse in the wing, Valerie, while Jared 
Leto, as Susanna's past boyfriend, only makes a few fleeting appearances in 
an underwritten character, but is fine with what he is given.
The confrontational climax, set in the basement of the hospital, threatens to 
cross the line into melodrama, and it does very briefly, but is saved by the 
assurance of the actresses. Still, a less commotional, more refined finale 
might have been the wiser choice, as it would have been staying more in the 
spirit of what had succeeded it.
An improvement over his uneven 1997 drama, "Copland," James Mangold excels in 
the area of attracting notable talent and placing the principal cast in 
commendably juicy roles. But more than anything, "Girl, Interrupted" gains 
much of its footing from the way in which it loyally follows Susanna through 
the one year in her life which altered the way she viewed the world. The film 
persuasively argues that Susanna probably never had anything wrong with her 
in particular, as she was just going through a natural stage in her growing 
up process. Yet, in a strange way, that year at Claymoore changed her life 
all for the better, and, in a sense, aided in the self-discovery of who she 
really was. For as Susanna states in voice-over as she is looking back at 
what she was going through in the period of '67-'68, "maybe I was just a 
girl, interrupted."  

Title
Review for Remember the Titans (2000)
Directed by Boaz Yakin.
Cast: Denzel Washington, Will Patton, Ryan Hurst, Wood Harris, Hayden 
Panettiere, Ethan Suplee, Kip Pardue, Ryan Gosling, Craig Kirkwood, Donald 
Faison, Nicole Ari Parker, Kate Bosworth, Neal Ghant.
2000 - 113 minutes
Rated PG (for mild profanity and thematic elements).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, September 30, 2000.
While following the same basic formula as all movies of its genre, Boaz 
Yakin's "Remember the Titans" is a surprisingly well-made football dramedy 
that, thanks to the assured, non-stereotypical screenplay by Gregory Allen 
Howard, manages to genuinely entertain and excite, even when it is offering 
up a cliched moment or two. Simply put, it is the best sports film since 
1993's "Rudy."
Based on a true story set during the first year of integration between the 
black and white students at T.C. Williams High School in Alexandria, 
Virginia, circa 1971, "Remember the Titans" tells of the famed Titans 
football team, which was headed up that very same year by the team's first 
black coach, earnest family man Herman Boone (Denzel Washington). At first, 
previous head coach Bill Yoast (Will Patton) is upset to be downgraded to 
merely Boone's assistant, but just as Boone teaches his team how to get along 
and overcome their racial and prejudicial differences, Yoast begins to 
sympathize and deeply relate to Boone himself.
One of the pleasures in watching "Remember the Titans" is realizing how the 
movie is not so much about the Titans football team winning the state 
championship, as it is about the team players learning to respect each other 
and using the sport as a way of expressing their future goals and dreams in 
life. Too often sports films rely solely on the suspense of whether the 
hero's team will win "the big game," sacrificing character development for 
such a worn-out plotline, and thus, they fail because 9.9 times out of 10 it 
is a given which team will come out on top. "Remember the Titans" does things 
a bit different by exposing itself as not only a so-called "football movie," 
but also an intelligent, if somewhat commercialized, view of race relations 
in 1971's Northern Virginia.
The cast is top-flight, particularly the younger actors, who create distinct 
characters out of potentially one-dimensional supporting roles. Ryan Hurst 
(1998's "Saving Private Ryan") is an absolute standout as head white captain 
Gerry Bertier, while his nemesis-turned-close-friend Julius Campbell is, 
likewise, well-played by Wood Harris (2000's "Committed"). Of the other 
football player, other notables include newcomer Ryan Gosling's truly likable 
turn as Allan Bosley; Kip Pardue (2000's "Whatever It Takes") as the 
charming, peacemaking hippie Sunshine; and Ethan Suplee, effective as the 
overweight Lastik, who has no known future after graduation. As Gerry's 
caring, but prejudiced girlfriend, Kate Bosworth (1998's "The Horse 
Whisperer") makes a minor impression with her few touching scenes in the 
second half, and Hayden Panettiere (1999's "Message in a Bottle"), as 
Assistant Coach Yoast's determined and precocious 9-year-old daughter, 
Cheryl, who narrates the picture as an adult, is appropriately precocious, 
delicately balancing her childish innocence with a wise-beyond-her-years 
dedication to her father's profession.
As the two central figures, Denzel Washington (1999's "The Hurricane") can do 
no wrong, and his portrayal of the rough-edged Boone, who often hides his 
warmer, more caring side, is right on the mark. Meanwhile, Will Patton 
(2000's "Gone in Sixty Seconds"), too often underutilized in films, brings a 
heartfelt realism to his fully written role of Yoast.
Overlooking a decidedly unnecessary wraparound sequence set in 1981, ten 
years after the central action, "Remember the Titans" is a motion picture 
that, for the first time in several years, producer Jerry Bruckheimer (1998's 
"Armageddon," 2000's "Coyote Ugly") can be proud of. With very little 
objectionable material, it is the rarest of PG-rated films that hold the 
ability of entertaining both adults and children, who may even learn a thing 
or two in the process about the importance of character and morals within 
each given individual. "Remember the Titans" is a veritable winner.

Title
Review for St. Elmo's Fire (1985)
Directed by Joel Schumacher.
Cast: Andrew McCarthy, Ally Sheedy, Judd Nelson, Mare Winningham, Rob 
Lowe, Emilio Estevez, Demi Moore, Andie McDowell, Martin Balsam, Jenny 
Wright, Joyce Van Patten, Jon Cutler, Blake Clark, Anna Maria Horsford, 
Martin Laurance.
1985 - 110 minutes.
Rated R (for profanity and sexual situations).
Reviewed November 1, 1998.
"St. Elmo's Fire" has often been compared to as a cross between, "The 
Breakfast Club," and, "The Big Chill," but there is one noticably large 
difference. While those two films were about relatively mature, 
intelligent people, "St. Elmo's Fire," features seven characters that 
are, for the most part, obnoxious and bratty. I guess that's why the 
cast of this movie was routinely labeled, "The Brat Pack."
As already noted, "St. Elmo's Fire," follows seven close friends in 
Georgetown, following graduation from college. Alec (Judd Nelson), who 
has become an assistant of a senator, desperately wants to marry his 
live-in girlfriend, Leslie (All Sheedy), even though he can't help but 
constantly cheat on her. Kevin (Andrew McCarthy), a cynical, 
chain-smoking writer, is totally against love, and secretly holds a 
secret affection for a certain someone. Wendy (Mare Winningham), the 
virgin of the group, still lives with her overbearing parents, and 
against the wishes of her parents, loves Billy (Rob Lowe), a rebellious 
guy who is already married and has a child. Jules (Demi Moore) is the 
wild one, a secretary who says she is sleeping with her boss, and starts 
to have a cocaine problem. And Kirby (Emilio Estevez) holds an almost 
obsessive love for a slightly older pre-med student (Andie McDowell). 
"St. Elmo's Fire," is one of those coming-of-age movies, where the 
characters are simply trying to come to terms with growing up, but it is 
far from being one of the better films in that genre. The main problem 
with the film is that the screenplay, by Joel Schumacher and Carl 
Kurlander, is very dumbed-down. Aside from maybe Mare Winningham and 
Emilio Estevez, the other five main characters are so annoying and 
self-involved that serious things occur in certain scenes, and yet the 
characters still remain only concerned with themselves. Sure, some 
people are like that in real life, but this film paints all young adults 
as basically immature little children.
Far more successful are some of the supporting characters, who are so 
much more smartly written that I longed for the film to have the 
secondary people switch places with the main characters. By far, the 
most successful subplot involves Estevez's deep love for Andie 
MacDowell, who gives the film's best, most natural performance. Their 
penultimate sequence together, set at a snowy cabin, is so full of 
magic, excitement, and spontaneity that it just goes to show how 
misguided the rest of the film really is. Also interesting in a 
supporting role is Anna Maria Horsford, as a prostitute who meets 
McCarthy. The film could have really made something of those few scenes 
involving them together, but it fails to do anything with it. 
Other subplots are either ill-advised, anti-climactic, or both. For 
example, the whole story involving the love triangle between Nelson, 
Sheedy, and McCarthy is beyond juvenile. And the film sets up Moore's 
drug problem, but it is never dealt with, and nothing is ever really 
solved or discussed.
"St. Elmo's Fire," is one of those films that feature a great deal of 
capable actors trapped within the confines of a stupid screenplay. 
Something could have certainly been done with this material, but again, 
the characters and situations are written at what seems to be a 
grade-school level, and therefore, everything collapses under its own 
weight. 
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Dustin Putman's
Film Haven >

Title
Review for Apt Pupil (1998)
Directed by Bryan Singer.
Cast: Brad Renfro, Ian McKellen, Bruce Davison, Ann Dowd, David 
Schwimmer, Elias Koteas, Joshua Jackson, Heather McComb.
1998 - 112 minutes.
Rated R (for violence, profanity, and brief nudity).
Reviewed October 25, 1998.
By Dustin Putman 
Dustin Putman's Film Reviews >
Bryan Singer made a big splash in 1995 with his surprising, 
critically-acclaimed, "The Usual Suspects," and after 
three years of hiatus, he is back with his sophomore effort, "Apt 
Pupil," based on a Stephen King novella, but I think his look has 
quickly run out.
The film is about an intelligent, but cold-hearted 16-year-old senior, 
Todd Bowden (Brad Renfro) who becomes interested in the Holocaust after 
he studies it in school, and discovers that a Nazi from the 
concentration camps in WWII is living in his own hometown under an alias 
name. That man is Kurt Dussander (Ian McKellen), whom Todd blackmails, 
telling him that he will turn him into the police if he does not do as 
he says. As Kurt begins to tell him horrific stories of killing the Jews 
and his experiences in the camps, Todd begins to become obsessed with 
it, starts to slack off in school, in which he was previously at the top 
of his class, and begins to look more and more likely of being capable 
of murder himself.
"Apt Pupil," has an intriguing story, and there are a few suspenseful 
moments that pop up every once in a while, but it is at the screenplay 
level that the film fails. There is no attempt at all to develop any of 
the supporting characters, and so they all come off as being underused 
and one-dimensional. Even Todd's parents, played by Bruce Davison and 
Ann Dowd, only appear in one scene in the first half, and the film would 
have you believe that Todd is practically living at Kurt's house. Todd's 
friend (Joshua Jackson) is also a wasted character, as is his potential 
girlfriend (Heather McComb). And so, because of this, what we have is 
basically a two-character film, which would be okay if there hadn't been 
so many open-ended subplots.
Renfro and McKellen are nothing short of spectacular in the film. Renfro 
especially could not have been any better, and he is thoroughly 
believable throughout, although his character is completely unlikable. 
They both work well together, and the dialogue between them is often 
well-written.
One subplot that I did kind of like, even though it also was not 
developed very well, concerns Todd's guidance counselor at school (David 
Shwimmer), that at first does not seem to be of much importance to the 
story until the climactic moments. Schwimmer usually plays the same 
character ("Friends," "The Pallbearer"), but here he is completely 
different, and shows that he is capable of actually having a lot of 
range as an actor.
But with all things considered, "Apt Pupil" just isn't a very well 
thought-out picture. The screenplay obviously should have went through a 
few more drafts, and it also should have decided what type of genre it 
wanted to fall into. Did it want to be a psychological drama, or a 
horror movie (as some scenes would have you believe, including a 
senseless murder in the last act)? Singer proved he was a talented 
director with "The Usual Suspects," but "Apt Pupil" is a highly inferior 
film in almost every way. 

Title
Review for At First Sight (1999)
 Directed by Irwin Winkler.
 Cast: Val Kilmer, Mira Sorvino, Kelly McGillis, Nathan Lane, Steven 
 Weber, Bruce Davison.
 1999 - 128 minutes.
 Rated PG-13 (for profanity and sexual situations).
 Reviewed January 22, 1999.
 Like the wonderful 1990 drama, "Awakenings," starring Robin Williams and 
 Robert De Niro, "At First Sight, " directed by Irwin Winkler, is 
 inspired by a true story documented by physicFirst Sight, " directed by 
 Irwin Winkler, is inspired by a true story documented by physician 
 Oliver Sacks. Since "Awakenings" was so very good, and made my top ten 
 list the year it was released, "At First Sight" is not quite as strong 
 since it is not directed with as sure a hand as Penny Marshall, but is still
 an intelligent and vibrantly-acted drama.
 The film begins as Amy (Mira Sorvino), a stressed-out New York 
 architect, decides to take some time off and travel upstate to the 
 country. At the hotel she is staying at, she makes a massage appointment 
 and after a long, soothing session which ends with her crying as a 
 release of emotions, she strikes up a conversation with the handsome 
 masseur Virgil (Val Kilmer), only to find out later that he is actually 
 blind. Amy doesn't really care if he has a handicap or not, and begins 
 to spend time with him more and more until they finally start to fall in 
 love. Once she has returned to New York, Amy begins to research on 
 Virgil's certain type of retinal blindness, which he has had since three 
 years of age, and out of a stroke of luck, comes into contact with a 
 doctor (Bruce Davison) who believes he can repair Virgil's sight, even 
 though there have only been thirty similar cases in history. At first 
 reluctant, Virgil finally travels with Amy to NYC and agrees to the 
 surgery, much to the hesitance of his overbearing, but loving older 
 sister (Kelly McGillis). Ultimately, the surgery is a success, but 
 problems arise since Virgil cannot relate to what he sees, since he has 
 never visually seen anything before, only touched objects. He moves into 
 Amy's apartment and she is eager to stand by him, but Virgil's 
 maladjustment begins to put a strain on their relationship.
 On the basis of the overall story, "At First Sight" is indeed a film 
 that has been done many times before, and owes a great deal to its 
 predecessor, "Awakenings." What will happen throughout the film can also 
 be easily telegraphed in advance. However, what helps "At First Sight" 
 rise above this predictability is in the mature and intelligent 
 relationship that develops between Virgil and Amy. Usually, romantic 
 pictures are of the shameless puppy-dog sort (the recent Tom Hanks/Meg 
 Ryan-starrer "You've Got Mail" immediately pops to mind), but with this 
 film, I grew to care more about the characters and their plight. 
 The film starts off noticably well as Amy travels up north and first 
 meets Virgil. The massaging sequences were strangely erotic, maybe even 
 more so than the later actual "love scenes," and as their romantic 
 involvement quickly developed, the film was both entertaining and sweet, 
 and there was clearly a lot of chemistry between the two. These joyous 
 moments early on balanced out well with the later scenes in which their 
 relationship is seriously tested due to a contrast in the life styles 
 that they have always known, with Virgil completely used to being blind 
 and having a comforting, peaceful life in the country to Amy's eventful 
 life in the "big city."
 The other major compliment that must be given to the film are the nearly 
 flawless performances across the board. Val Kilmer, usually cast in the 
 "macho" type of role, was always believable as a blind person, and 
 playing his character was probably a little more tricky than it appears. 
 It was up to Kilmer to not come off as someone to pity, but to 
 sympathize with, and he pulled it off. Mira Sorvino, who made a 
 spectacular debuting splash in 1995's hilarious Woody Allen comedy, 
 "Mighty Aphrodite," for which she won a well-deserved Oscar as a 
 kind-hearted, but ditzy hooker, is a standout here. Although she has 
 made some mediocre film choices since then (1997's "Mimic," 1998's "The 
 Replacement Killers"), she always has managed to come out unscathed, and 
 it is with "At First Sight" that she finally has another juicy role to 
 play. In a truthful climactic scene set in Amy's apartment between she 
 and Virgil, Sorvino proves to be one of the most gifted young actresses 
 around today, and has a flare for both comedic and dramatic pieces. 
 Kelly McGillis, who could have easily come off as the "bad," 
 one-dimensional sister, instead is also given an unexpectedly 
 multifaceted character to play as a woman who may be overly protective 
 but simply cares for her brother. Finally, Nathan Lane, who is usually a 
 little too over-the-top, is appropriately restrained as a vision 
 therapist.
 The one misstep of "At First Sight" is in its treatment of the medical 
 procedure done on Virgil. Very little is ever said or discussed 
 concerning it, and when the surgery occurs, it is so briefly glimpsed at 
 that it is impossible to see what is being done to his eyes. Perhaps the 
 reason this aspect of the film was not more in-depth was that the makers 
 were afraid it would gross out audiences, but I would personally take 
 realism, even if it is graphic, any day over simply giving the 
 explanation of the surgery the cold shoulder. In "Awakenings," the 
 patients and illness were far more satisfyingly portrayed.
 Because of how strong the screenplay, written by Steve Levitt, is in the 
 way it deals with the main relationship, and because of the fabulous 
 performances from Kilmer and Sorvino, the film's few problems can be 
 swept over to the side. The adult way that the romance is depicted by 
 director Irwin Winkler is, no doubt, in respect to the real-life couple 
 that the film was inspired by, who are still together after many years 
 (even though the setting of the film was changed to New York). Since 
 January is usually the time of year that is known as the dumping ground 
 from bad movies, "At First Sight" comes as a refreshing and 
 sophisticated change of pace.

Title
Review for Tarzan (1999)
Directed by Kevin Lima and Chris Buck.
Voices: Tony Goldwyn, Minnie Driver, Glenn Close, Lance Henriksen, Rosie 
O'Donnell, Wayne Knight, Nigel Hawthorne, Brian Blessed, Alex D. Linz.
1999 - 88 minutes
Rated G (if this were live-action, it would be at least PG for violence).
Reviewed June 18, 1999.
These past two years have not been kind to Disney's animated features, 
particularly their last two summer films--the mediocre "Hercules" and the 
arrantly forgettable "Mulan." With the same old story formula and 
increasingly dull music, not to mention unextraordinary animation, I was 
beginning to wonder if Disney had finally run out of steam. At least one 
thing was certain: they weren't making top-quality films like "The Little 
Mermaid" and "Beauty and the Beast" anymore. With that said, the writer of 
this review is going to have to eat his own words as the newest Disney 
feature, "Tarzan," is a rip-roaring, thoroughly entertaining, and emotional 
motion picture, one of Disney's better recent excursions. Fascinatingly, it 
is said that the books of Edgar Rice Burroughs, based on the human "ape-man," 
Tarzan, is one of the most consistently remade stories in history, second to 
only Bram Stoker's "Dracula." Since I was more or less unfamiliar with 
Tarzan, aside from the basic details, this new Disney-fied version of 
"Tarzan" came off as more original than it probably should have, and it was 
rather easy to get caught up in the joyful goings-on.
The stunning opening, played to the lyrical tune, "Two Worlds," by Phil 
Collins (who composed five songs specifically for the film), introduces us to 
a young couple in perilous danger, as they escape with their baby from a 
burning ship. Stranded in the jungles of Africa, the kindly ape, Kala (voiced 
by Glenn Close), grieving over the tragic death of her own child, finds the 
human baby in a cottage atop the trees, which also leaves traces of his own 
parents, who were killed by a leopard. Convincing her companion and leader, 
Kerchak (Lance Henriksen), to take the baby, whom she names Tarzan, into 
their ape community, Tarzan finally grows up into a buff young man who has 
learned ape-"speak" and is able to swing gracefully from vine to vine. He 
realizes that he looks different than his surrogate "mother," Kala, but has 
been able to get past this fact and has made two good friends, the 
loudmouthed ape, Terk (Rosie O'Donnell, who else?), and the elephant, Tantor 
(Wayne Knight). As luck would have it, one day Tarzan narrowly saves the 
good-natured, young British woman, Jane (Minnie Driver), who is on a gorilla 
expedition with her professor father (Nigel Hawthorne) and the smarmy, 
rifle-toting Clayton (Brian Blessed), from a pack of wild monkeys. 
Discovering for the first time that there are beings just like him, Tarzan 
grows a fondness for Jane, who teaches him English in exhange for Apish, and 
finds himself suddenly torn between two completely different worlds--the one 
he grew up in, and the one he is supposed to belong in.
Using a brand-new technique known as "deep canvas," which 
three-dimensionalizes the backgrounds, the animators of "Tarzan" have really 
outdone themselves this time. The film is constantly an enjoyable piece of 
eye candy, with the scenes of Tarzan swinging through the trees almost as 
exhilarating as riding a rollercoaster. In particular, the sequence in which 
Tarzan saves Jane from the monkeys is a definite runner-up for the most 
exciting action set-piece in any movie this year.
While the other recent animated pictures have had approximately the same 
exact running time as "Tarzan," they all have come off as oddly empty and 
seemingly much too short. This unfortunate fact most likely was due to the 
repetitive nature in which they were made, as the characters would break into 
a ho-hum song every ten minutes, thus taking away from actual character 
development. Wisely and refreshingly choosing to not be a musical this time 
around, with the Phil Collins songs simply playing in the background, 
"Tarzan" feels neither hollow nor too-brief, and Tarzan's plight was far more 
easy to get into. Continually, the relationship he forms with Jane is one of 
the sweeter romances seen in any animated film in, dare I say it, history. 
Their connection, and gradual love for one another, does not come off as a 
contrivance (as so many of them do in Disney movies), and it, like the the 
film as a whole, felt more adult-oriented, although children 5 or 6 and up 
will also fall in love with it.
Too often voice-over work isn't as effective as it should be, but once again, 
the Disney folks have hit jackpot, particularly in the form of Minnie Driver, 
who gives one of the most winning performances I've seen in 1999, animated or 
not. Driver brings a surprising sassiness and life to Jane, and gets the most 
unforced laughs in the film. Tony Goldwyn is also perfect as Tarzan, with the 
pitch-perfect deep voice and expressions (although I couldn't help but be 
reminded of Brendan Fraser throughout, no doubt due to the 1997 live-action 
"George of the Jungle"). Glenn Close is touching in the voice of Kala, and 
her sad character, coming-to-terms with her own child's death, even has a 
scene that almost stole some liquid from my tear ducts. Lance Henriksen, as 
the gruff Kerchak, who makes it clear to Kala that, "Tarzan will never be my 
son," also gives fine voice work. Even Rosie O'Donnell, who began to 
seriously grate on my nerves after her first few scenes, grew on me, and even 
had one opportunity to flex her dramatic muscles(!)
With "Tarzan," Disney has hinted at a possible, much-needed redemption for 
the studio. If their animated tentpole for next summer is also a winner, then 
their talent will be confirmed. Though nowhere near as masterful as 
Dreamworks' "The Prince of Egypt," "Tarzan" remains everything a quality 
animated feature should be: intelligent, accessible to both kids and adults, 
and most important, genuinely fun. If only Disney could improve their 
incessantly awful live-action attempts; well, we can always hope, can't we?
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Mickey Blue Eyes (1999)
Directed by Kelly Makin.
Cast: Hugh Grant, James Caan, Jeanne Tripplehorn, Burt Young, Joe Viterelli, 
James Fox, Maddie Corman.
1999 - 105 minutes.
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and violence).
Reviewed August 21, 1999.
"Mickey Blue Eyes," directed by Kelly Makin, comes only five months after the 
other, fairly similar mob comedy, "Analyze This," which starred Robert De 
Niro and Billy Crystal, but the basic premise rarely feels cliched or 
overused, due to the snappy, often rib-ticklingly funny screenplay, by Adam 
Scheinman and Robert Kuhn. If the romance at the forefront isn't particularly 
engaging (and for Grant, his other romantic comedy of the year, "Notting 
Hill," is stronger in this aspect) and the climax is predictable, what makes 
"Mickey Blues Eyes" entertaining and recommendable are the consistently big 
laughs that are generated in scene after scene, some of which had me smiling 
and giggling for several minutes after the comedic payoff.
Michael Felgate (Hugh Grant) is an English art dealer and auctioneer in 
Manhattan with a profession he enjoys and a girlfriend, Gina (Jeanne 
Tripplehorn), whom he loves. After Gina tearfully rejects his marriage 
proposal for unknown reasons, Michael makes his way down to her father's 
Italian restaurant to talk with him. Never meeting her father, Frank Vitale 
(James Caan), before, he quickly gets the hint that the reason Gina had been 
hiding him the whole time is because she was afraid to tell Michael that her 
family is involved in the big-time mob business. Frank instantly accepts 
Michael into the family, and after a heart-to-heart talk with Gina in which 
he lets her know that he cares and loves for her regardless, they become 
engaged. Complications ensue when Michael unwittingly becomes involved in the 
illegal family business, and soon finds himself guilty of extortion, money 
laundering, murder, and having to lie to Gina in fear that he may lose her. 
Worse yet, Michael is mistaken as Mickey Blue Eyes, another powerful mob 
boss, a particular problem since he has an English accent, and is just about 
as far away from being Italian as he could possibly be.
Since the romance between Michael and Gina is underwritten and never truly 
convincing, there are two major things going for "Mickey Blue Eyes," which 
are its attributes to being successful: Hugh Grant and the great big laughs. 
A person could argue that Grant almost always plays the same role in film 
after film, but I beg to differ. Although both English gentlemen, Grant's 
character in "Notting Hill" was more reserved and shy than his character 
here, even if both are likable and yearning for love, while in the past, he 
has played a wide range of roles, including a slimy stage director in 1995's 
"An Awfully Big Adventure." What Grant possesses is that vital "everyman" 
quality that you rarely find in Hollywood, and because of his average looks 
and good-willed personality, is instantly more accessible to an audience in 
order for them to root for him. Also, in "Mickey Blue Eyes," Grant puts his 
comic skills at work like never before and garners several sizable laughs, 
especially in a scene in which he is trying to use a mobster accent in a 
restaurant, and fails miserably at it.
On a comedic level, "Mickey Blue Eyes" ranks up there with "American Pie" and 
"Drop Dead Gorgeous" as being one of the funniest films of the year. Classic 
sequences and lines of dialgoue abound, including one scene set at a Chinese 
restaurant in which the owner of the place, shall we say, gets a bit forceful 
towards Gina to eat her fortune cookie, and ends up spitting out expletives 
at her. An on-going joke involving a talking, stuffed monkey also is comic 
gold, as is the charades involving a hearing-impaired old lady who 
desperately wants to buy a piece of artwork at the latest auction, as well as 
the clueless involvement of a kindly neighbor of Michael's who more or less 
witnesses a murder and thinks nothing about it.
Through complicated circumstances, "Mickey Blue Eyes" concludes at the 
wedding of Michael and Gina, in which a supposed-to-be-fake murder is to take 
place, and there are a few twists and turns that occur in the last ten 
minutes. The final curve in the plot is easily predicted from the second a 
key moment arises, and the happy ending is just a little too abrupt for my 
taste, but how could you not give a film at least a marginally positive 
review when it offers so many bright moments? The writing is congruously 
witty and smart, and the successful humor really is worth the price of 
admission. "Mickey Blue Eyes" is the film "Analyze This" only wishes it was, 
both in the enjoyment and comedic departments.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman.
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Outside Providence (1999)
Directed by Michael Corrente.
Written by Peter Farrelly, Bobby Farrelly, Michael Corrente.
Cast: Shawn Hatosy, Alec Baldwin, Amy Smart, Jack Ferver, Jon Abrahams, 
Gabriel Mann, Jonathan Brandis, George Wendt.
1999 - 90 minutes
Rated R (for profanity, drug use, and sexual situations).
Reviewed September 4, 1999.
"The outrageous new comedy from the guys who brought you 'There's Something 
About Mary,'" reads the tagline on the poster for "Outside Providence." Maybe 
in a fantasy world, but realistically speaking, nothing could possibly be 
further from the truth. True, Peter and Bobby Farrelly wrote "Outside 
Providence," but while "Mary" really was a raucous, un-PC comedic excursion, 
their latest scripting job is a sweet and earnest coming-of-age story that, 
yes, does have its fair share of big laughs sprinkled throughout. You won't, 
however, ever see a peculiar substance in the leading lady's hair here.
Depicting one year in the life of 17-year-old Timothy Dunphy (Shawn Hatosy), 
"Outside Providence" is supposedly semi-autobiographical of the Farrelly 
Brothers' own lives growing up, and I'd believe it, as the film is made up 
more out of individual moments, rather than one that follows a clear-cut plot 
from Point A to Point B. Tim lives in Pawtucket, Rhode Island, directly 
outside of Providence, and in the summer of 1974, he spends his days and 
nights hanging out with his stoner friends getting high. His gruff, 
blue-collar father (Alec Baldwin) has an embarrassing nickname for 
him--"Dildo"--and he has a close relationship with his wheelchair-bound 
younger brother. One night while driving around with his buddies, the 
overwhelming marijuana smoke in the car causes Tim to wreck into a parked 
police car, and he is promptly sent off to stay at the prestigious Cornwall 
Academy for his senior year of high school. Immediately realizing that he is 
far behind the rest of the students in his highly competitive classes, and 
instantly disliked by the unfair headmaster of the school, Tim's prospects 
suddenly brighten when he meets fellow student Jane (Amy Smart), apparently 
the only girl in the whole Academy (or so it seems). From there on, they 
start a relatively innocent and kind-hearted romance, the type that only can 
be found in a person's young adult years, before their views of the world 
become jaded. Meanwhile, Tim is struggling to piece together why his mother 
could have possibly committed suicide several years before, as well as his 
uneasy relationship with his father.
The two keys to the success of "Outside Providence" is in its on-target 
period flavor of the '70s, complete with many classic rock songs (The Who's 
timeless "Won't Get Fooled Again," Lynyrd Skynyrd's "Sweet Home Alabama") 
that perfectly walk hand-in-hand with the story, as well as in its sharp, 
winning performances from the whole cast. In the central role, Shawn Hatosy 
is a truly talented young actor (who, by the way, is from my hometown of 
Frederick, MD) with an almost blindingly-bright future ahead of him 
(tellingly, his next two movies also consist of the likes of Susan Sarandon, 
Natalie Portman, Sharon Stone, and Nick Nolte). Like Jason Biggs ("American 
Pie"), Hatosy has a sort of everybody look to him that only helps the viewer 
to more closely identify with him, and his charactor of Dunph, as his friends 
call him, is a likable and engaging protagonist.
In a stunning change-of-pace, Alec Baldwin is a standout (and possible Oscar 
nominee) as Old Man Dunphy, Tim's father, who is sometimes hard on his son, 
but only because he cares for him and wants him to make something out of his 
life. A stern figure at first, Baldwin especially shines late in the picture, 
particularly in a scene where he teaches Tim how to put on a tie, and another 
set outside of a bar when Tim questions him about why his mother killed 
herself.
Amy Smart, the highlight of last spring's otherwise mediocre "Varsity Blues," 
brings a surprising warmth and intelligence to her role of Jane, a bright 
girl who knows how to have a good time, but also takes pride in challenging 
herself with her school work, and encourages Tim to do the same. Smart exudes 
an overwhelming amount of beauty, dignity, and empathy, and it's doubtful any 
other young actress could have done a superior job.
While the screenplay is consistently well-written, gently mixing comedy and 
bittersweet drama together, it is often a given that some major editing was 
done before the film's release, judging from various subplots that are 
brought up and never really resolved. Two minor stories that come to mind is 
in the questionable sexual orientation of one of Old Man Dunphy's poker 
buddies (George Wendt, in a touching performance), and another concerning 
Tim's geeky roommate at Cornwall (Jack Ferver) who is thinking about calling 
up his ex-girlfriend to work out their problems. Since nothing more comes of 
these sideway plotlines, perhaps it would have been wise to cut them out 
completely, and maybe add a few more scenes with Tim and Jane.
Otherwise, "Outside Providence" is a more-than-amiable way to spend ninety 
minutes in a movie theater, and if you've already seen "The Sixth Sense" and 
"The Blair Witch Project," this is your best bet. Entertaining and charming, 
the film is one of the better, more accurate, "coming-of-age" films to be 
released in awhile, and as directed by Michael Corrente, gets far more things 
exactly right than wrong.

Title
Review for Back to the Beach (1987)
Directed by Lyndall Hobbs.
Cast: Frankie Avalon, Annette Funicello, Lori Loughlin, Demian Slade, 
Tommy Hinckley, Connie Stevens, David Bowie, Don Adams, Bob Denver, Pee 
Wee Herman, Barbara Billingsley, Tony Dow, Jerry Mathers, Alan Hale, Edd 
Byrnes, Dick Dale and the Del-Tones.
1987 - 92 minutes.
Rated PG (for mild profanity).
Reviewed October 14, 1998.
If you've heard of Frankie Avalon, Annette Funicello, and their old 
"beach party" movies from the 1960's, such as 65's "Beach Blanket 
Bingo," then you know the definition of the word corny. Those beach 
films may have been kinda fun and harmless, but they were also 
undeniably dumb. Then in 1987, Frankie Avalon and Annette Funicello 
returned to their "beach party" movies, and made the best film they 
could have possibly done.
"Back to the Beach" stars Avalon and Funicello, playing their screen 
images, as a married couple living in Ohio. Avalon seems to have lost 
his spontaneity and is now an uptight car dealer, while Funicello is a 
spunky housewife who has an obsession with peanut butter. Together, they 
have two kids, a daughter, Cindi (Lori Loughlin) in her early twenties 
living in Malibu, and a teenage son named Bobby (Demian Slade) who 
dresses like a punk. At the start of the film, they realize that they 
desperately need a vacation, so while on their way to Hawaii, they stop 
over in Malibu to see Cindi, not knowing that her fiance (Tommy 
Hinckley) is living with her on a pier at the beach. After they get 
there, Annette and Frankie get in a fight when he meets up with an old 
pal from the beach, Connie Stevens, and appears to be having more fun 
with her. Figuring into the story are various musical numbers, a surfing 
contest, and, yes, beach parties.
By hearing the premise, "Back to the Beach" may sound exactly like 
Funicello's and Avalon's old movies, but it is not at all. "Back to the 
Beach," in fact, is one of the most entertaining comedy musicals I have 
ever seen, and is one of those movies that can be watched over and over 
(and I've seen it many times, to be sure).
One of the biggest surprises of the film is that the movie is a little 
bit more edgy than expected. Funicello and Avalon are good sports, and 
actually satirize their images to humorous effect. Funicello, especially, is 
so purely good and sweet that she is absolutely entertaining to watch. 
Stealing the opening scenes of the film is Demian Slade, who is hilarious 
as their punk son. Remarking about his parent's dim-witted conversations, he
observes, "It's like a conversation at the Kissinger's."
The music in "Back to the Beach" is perhaps the main star of the 
picture, and every song is memorable and fun to listen to. The musical 
numbers are also well choreographed and they give off a lot of spark and 
joy. 
"Back to the Beach" is, by no means, a deep and thought-provoking motion 
picture. It knows that it is only a "beach" movie, and it makes the most 
of it by adding a winning, lightweight screenplay, charming performances 
by the whole cast, a delightful array of cameos (ranging from Barbara 
Billingsley to David Bowie to Pee Wee Herman), and some great music. And 
when you're dealing with Frankie and Annette, what more could you ask 
for?
       - Copyright 1998 by Dustin Putman
         Dustin
Putman's Film Reviews >

Title
Review for Matrix, The (1999)
Directed by Andy Wachowski and Larry Wachowski.
Cast: Keanu Reeves, Laurence Fishburne, Carrie-Anne Moss, Hugo Weaving, 
Joe Pantoliano.
1999 - 135 minutes
Rated R (for profanity and violence).
Reviewed April 3, 1999.
The Wachowski Brothers' sophomore directing debut (after 1996's fabulous 
"Bound"), "The Matrix," is a very clever sci-fi film, but perhaps not in 
the way you might expect. No, it isn't "clever" for its intelligence or 
startling imagination, but for the exact opposite of that. By throwing 
into the mix a highly convoluted and complicated storyline, frenetic 
action, and almost constantly stunning visuals, its ultimate master plan 
is to actually make you forget that it pretty much borrows ideas from 
almost every movie of its type ever made. Apparently, as hints of their 
desperation to brainwash its audience about its so-called inventiveness, 
or lack thereof, the Wachowski Brothers have actually decided to bombard 
us with cross references to other past works of film and literature 
(namely "Alice in Wonderland" and "The Wizard of Oz").
By the halfway point in "The Matrix," the film was tugging me in so many 
different directions as it miraculously would make up its own set of 
ground rules as it went along, only to contradict them later, I finally 
stopped caring or believing anything on the screen. And because of the 
fact that it is so complex (but in an empty, shallow way), it would be 
difficult to discuss the plot without giving away major plot points, but 
here goes. Neo (Keanu Reeves), living in New York circa 1999, is an 
office worker by day and computer hacker by night, who begins to get 
mysterious messages on his computer screen concerning something called 
"the matrix." Soon afterwards, to the warnings of an at-first unseen man 
named Morpheus (Laurence Fishburne), Neo is being hunted down by Agent 
Smith (annoyingly played by Hugo Weaving) and his group of henchman with 
suits and briefcases, because he is the "chosen one" that may obtain the 
ability to defeat them. Not only that, but it becomes clear that perhaps 
Neo's life really is just a facade for his upcoming actual life in a 
different time period, and world.
Confused? If you are, don't worry, because although the movie is 
slightly easier to understand than my extremely vague description, it 
nonetheless still adds up to very little in the long run. To start off 
with the positive aspects of "The Matrix," I'll make a brief list: (1) 
the visual effects and "look" of the film is constantly dazzling; (2) 
several of the action sequences in the second half, particularly one 
involving a helicopter, are exciting and stunningly executed (although 
the one mentioned is a clear rip-off of the ending of 1994's Arnold 
Schwarzeneggar vehicle, "True Lies"); (3) the film got off to a great 
start with its intriguing opening twenty minutes; and (4) 
well...um...Carrie-Anne Moss, as Trinity, a woman on Morpheus' team, 
shows a great deal of charisma when she isn't shoved into the 
background. To me, it was Moss who was the most intriguing character, 
not Neo, who is played by the wildly uneven Reeves (this is one of his 
weaker performances) and given such highly intellectual lines of 
dialogue like "Woah!"
Now for the bad stuff. Aside from the aforementioned direct references 
to "Alice in Wonderland" and "The Wizard of Oz," the movie also heavily 
borrows from "Brazil," "Alien," "Lost Highway," "Terminator 2," and even 
the direct-to-video "Puppet Master" series(!). One of the few actual 
witty moments came when, in one scene, "Night of the Lepus," a cheesy 
'70s movie about giant killer bunny rabbits, was playing on a television 
in the background.
I can just imagine the conversation the Wachowski Brothers had 
concerning this movie: 
Wachowski #1: "Sure, the movie is complete rubbish, but we'll make it 
look really flashy and visionary."
Wachowski #2: "But what if the more discriminating audience members are 
able to see right through that and immediately catch onto all of the 
film's obvious weaknesses?"
Wachowski #1: "Good point. I guess what we'll have to do is make the 
story have a lot of twists and turns, albeit shallow ones, and add some 
big action scenes."
Wachowski #2: "Good idea. We made the stylish and original movie 
"Bound," so it shouldn't be too difficult to come up with some things 
that haven't been seen before___"
Wachowski #1: "What are you talking about?! Why use our brains when we 
can just steal things from other movies?"
Wachowski #2: "Okay. Now that that's out of the way, don't you think we 
should at least set some ground rules in the story so that the audience 
will know what can and can't be done?"
Wachowski #1: "Huh? Why would we do that when all we are going to do is 
break those rules. That way, we can do whatever we want with the story, 
but it doesn't all have to necessarily make perfectly kosher sense."
Wachowski #2: "You're brilliant. And you know what else we should do? We 
should even steal a key plot point at the end from some Grimms fairy 
tales, like "Snow White" and "Sleeping Beauty!"
Wachowski #1: "Oh, I see what you're saying now! I agree that would make 
a touching, yet happy ending. And to make things even better, we'll add 
this ridiculous character called the Oracle, who is a psychic. That way, 
whatever she says has to happen, even if we have just killed a 
character. We can just bring the people back to life if that's what the 
Oracle says!"
Wachowski # 2: "How'd you get to be so smart, bro?"
Wachowski #1: "Well, you're smart too, and we got that way because of 
Hollywood! You see, when we made "Bound," we really had to try hard 
since it was a relatively low-budget film and needed a lot of critical 
raves to be a success. With "The Matrix," we have a much larger budget, 
so if we just throw various "bigger is better" ingredients into the pot 
and stir well, this one might very well be a box-office success and make 
back its budget."
Wachowski #2: "Yep. After all, look at last year's "Dark City." Now that 
movie really was original and a visionary achievement, but also a 
box-office bomb. Apparently, those unconventional films that stray from 
the confines of a basic Hollywood movie don't do so well. So maybe "The 
Matrix" will work better if we also create a visionary achievement, but 
in place of originality, we'll simply add violence and elaborate chases 
and shoot-outs and kung-fu!"
Wachowski #1: "You know, bro, we make a great team together!"
Wachowski #2: "I couldn't have said it better myself!"
       - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
         Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Shaft (2000)
Directed by John Singleton.
Cast: Samuel L. Jackson, Christian Bale, Jeffrey Wright, Vanessa Williams, 
Toni Collette, Dan Hedaya, Ruben Santiago-Hudson, Busta Rhymes, Richard 
Roundtree, Josef Sommer, Lynne Thigpen, Lee Tergesen, Daniel Von Bargen, 
Mekhi Phifer.
2000 - 98 minutes
Rated R (for profanity and violence).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, June 17, 2000.
Without having seen Richard Roundtree in 1971's blaxploitation hit, "Shaft," 
this updated version, starring Samuel L. Jackson and directed by John 
Singleton (1991's "Boyz N the Hood"), can safely stand on its own as a wildly 
diverting, if one-note, action-comedy-drama that moves at such a 
lickety-split pace, it's easy to get completely caught up in the happenings 
on screen, while they are happening. Once they are over, the film ultimately 
loses much of its novelty, but as an "in-the-moment" popcorn entertainment, 
it works wonders.
Following the fatal beating of a young black man outside a New York City 
nightclub, and the evidence pointing towards Walter Wade, Jr. (Christian 
Bale), a wealthy bigot, NYPD investigator John Shaft (Samuel L. Jackson), one 
of the biggest badasses to ever hit the silver screen, hops on the case. He 
is quickly discharged, however, after giving Wade a taste of his own medicine 
(i.e. punching him twice in the face for the wrong Shaft knows for certain he 
did). Due to the one potential witness in the case, Diane Palmieri (Toni 
Collette), disappearing, Wade is unjustifiably set a bale of only $1-million, 
and before everyone knows it, he has skipped the country, relocating to 
Switzerland.
Flash forward two years, John Shaft is now on the narcotics unit of the 
police force, with a fellow cop partner in Carmen (Vanessa Williams). When 
Shaft learns that Wade is making his grand return to the U.S., he makes sure 
to be there for the plane arrival, and this time, he is certain that he can 
put him behind bars for good. But first, Shaft must find Diane and persuade 
her to testify in court, and dodge the increasing number of people in his 
life who are working for Wade, including corrupt cops (Dan Hedaya, Ruben 
Santiago-Hudson) and the wisecracking, hotshot Dominican druglord, Peoples 
Hernandez (Jeffrey Wright).
Like the title character, "Shaft" wastes no time in drawing the viewer into 
its derivative, yet engrossing, storyline. Nothing at all would matter, 
though, if Shaft were not portrayed with the correct measures of sleek 
coolness, attitude, and an at least somewhat tongue-in-cheek tone. In Samuel 
L. Jackson, director Singleton has found the perfect actor, and in "Shaft," 
the clearly talented Jackson has found what is possibly his most outstanding 
role, to date. The acting abilities of Jackson have never been doubted, but 
he also has never jumped so vibrantly off the screen as he does here, playing 
the character he was born to play. In short, he is funny, likable, oh-so-kewl,
 and projects a distinct joy of performing.
Supporting Jackson is a top-notch cast, not all of whom are used to their 
highest potential, but who are fine, all the same. Christian Bale, in a role 
that is virtually identical to the one he played in "American Psycho," is 
fabulous and appropriately chilling, turning his one-dimensional bad guy into 
one of the most memorable characters, and most impressive acting turns, in 
the entire film. Jeffrey Wright, as Peoples, is the secondary villain of the 
piece, and he is so good it is difficult to believe he is the same man who 
starred in 1996's "Basquiat." Fresh off her Academy Award nomination for "The 
Sixth Sense," Toni Collette does a respectable job as Diane Palmieri, but has 
little to do. And Vanessa Williams, as Carmen, is, in essence, the straight 
man to Shaft's flashier persona, and equips herself with a good-natured 
blandness.
With Shaft's groovy token theme song, by Isaac Hayes, prominently appearing 
at several points throughout, as far as can be told, "Shaft" successfully 
recaptures the feel of the 1971 original, but with a bare minimum of sexual 
innuendo. The film is action-lite, the type of high-spirited motion picture 
that knows it isn't great art, but thrives on this fact. Director Singleton, 
along with coscreenwriters Richard Price and Shane Salerno, and star Jackson, 
have all put their heads and hearts together to create a movie that will 
delight anyone looking for a big, silly action movie that seemingly succeeds 
without really trying, and doesn't add up to a whole lot in the long run.
Special Note: Producer Jerry Bruckheimer should be especially distressed to 
learn that the car chases within this film are infinitely more thrilling and 
fun than in his recent "Gone in 60 Seconds," a complete misfire that is 
supposed to be all about chase sequences, but never gets it right.

Title
Review for Bug's Life, A (1998)
Directed by John Lasseter.
Voices: Dave Foley, Julia Louis-Dreyfus, Kevin Spacey, Hayden 
Panettiere, Madeline Kahn, David Hyde Pierce, Phyllis Diller, Brad 
Garrett, Denis Leary, Joe Ranft, Edie McClurg.
1998 - 94 minutes.
Rated G (nothing objectionable).
Reviewed November 28, 1998.
By Dustin Putman 
Dustin Putman's Film Reviews >
After the recent animated debacles of, "A Rugrats Movie," and "A Bug's 
Life," I am seriously considering raising my highly negative rating on 
Dreamworks' other insect film from October, "Antz." I hated that movie, 
and yet, it is so much better than these latest two excursions.
"A Bug's Life," is the second animated insect film in the last two 
months, and I hoped for the best, considering it was done in the 
wonderful style of Pixar's last film, 1995's "Toy Story," but in no way 
does, "A Bug's Life," even remotely match up to that. 
Flik (David Foley), an ant, who along with his many comrades, has the 
job every year of gathering up the seasonal harvest, only to have to 
give half of it away to the dominating grasshoppers, led by Hopper 
(Kevin Spacey). Flik, however, feels all alone and unwanted in the 
world, especially after he accidentally loses all of their food, and the 
ants are threated by Hopper to gather up a whole other season's load by 
the time the last summer leaf falls from the trees. Banished from Ant 
Island, Flik leaves the colony in search of some strong reinforcement to 
help out, but through a misunderstanding, returns with a handful of 
helpless circus bugs, including a walking stick (David Hyde Pierce), a 
dung beetle (Brad Garrett), a gypsy moth (Madeline Kahn), a male ladybug 
(Denis Leary), and a caterpillar (Joe Ranft).
"A Bug's Life," has one thing going for it. Only one thing. With its 
glorious, bright colors, the computer-generated animation is a spectacle 
to look at. The film itself, unfortunately, is a lifeless, unamusing 
contraption without any of the flair or excitement of, "Toy Story."
The characters in, "A Bug's Life," are an assortment of either unlikable 
or dull insects without any charm or personality, other than to stand 
around and recite arbitrary and thoroughly unfunny one-liners. The thin 
story was also stretched out to a nearly unbearable 94 minutes, and it 
often felt as if they ran out of ideas throughout, and so they made up 
pointless scenes to pass as time-filler.
After giving such scathing reviews to the animated films from this year, 
I was beginning to think that I had simply outgrown them, but then I 
realized this is just not so. I still adore almost all of the older 
Disney films, and many of the newer ones, such as 1989's, "The Little 
Mermaid," 1991's, "Beauty and the Beast," 1993's, "The Nightmare Before 
Christmas," and yes, 1995's, "Toy Story." Maybe this has just been a bad 
year for children's films, and hopefully, the upcoming, "The Prince of 
Egypt," will not be a disappointment. As for, "A Bug's Life," I did not 
enjoy anything about it. Not the story, not the characters, and not even 
the voiceover work, which was far more lively in, "Antz." "A Bug's 
Life," goes down as yet another failure for Disney, and it is a sad 
state of affairs when their best film in the last two years has been the 
minor Jonathan Taylor Thomas picture, "I'll Be Home for Christmas." 

Title
Review for Dinosaur (2000)
Directed by Ralph Zondag, Eric Leighton.
Voices: D.B. Sweeney, Julianna Margulies, Ossie Davis, Alfre Woodard, Max 
Casella, Samuel E. Wright, Peter Siragusa, Joan Plowright, Della Reese.
2000 - 82 minutes
Rated PG (for dinosaur violence).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, May 20, 2000.
Last November, audiences who went to see "Toy Story 2" were treated to an 
advanced look at this summer's tentpole Disney animated feature, "Dinosaur." 
A beautiful and majestic peek at the world when dinosaurs ruled the Earth, 
the trailer was awe-inspiring not only because of its revolutionary step 
forward in visual effects (placing lifelike computer-generated characters in 
largely live-action settings), but also because, for once, it seemed as if 
Disney was growing up themselves. It should have been self-evident that the 
studio had not matured that much, as "Dinosaur" misleadingly appeared to be 
dialogue-free and a fairly realistic glimpse into the Jurassic era. Instead, 
what Disney chose to do with this supposed-to-be-insurrectionary family film 
is they not only gave the dinosaur characters' voices, but they implanted 
them in a story that has been recycled in practically every other animated 
Disney movie ever made, but with only one-tenth of the charm and 
entertainment value. The animation may be the most realistic created, but 
that is where the compliments stop for the abysmally featherbrained 
"Dinosaur."
The sweeping prologue (the only section that spares us stock character 
voices), in which an Iguadon egg becomes misplaced from its mother's nest, 
and through a series of circumstances, ends its journey on an island 
primarily populated by Lemurs, tiny, kind, monkey-like creatures, is as 
imaginative as this picture gets. When they egg hatches, there is a moment of 
pause by the Lemurs due to the Iguadon's nature to be a meat-eater, but soon 
they have adopted him and named him Aladar (voiced by D.B. Sweeney). Time 
passes and just as Aladar has grown a little older, and a lot larger, tragedy 
strikes. Narrowly escaping, a violent meteor shower (visually reminiscent of 
the bomb dropped on Hiroshima) wipes out their entire island. While trekking 
through a wide, desolate expansion of dry, open ground, Aladar and his four 
Lemur family members join a group of dinosaurs traveling to a green, more 
healthy and peaceful place to live, headed by the gruff Kron (Samuel E. 
Wright).
"Dinosaur" has too many problems to count, but one of its biggest is that the 
story, written by John Harrison and Robert Nelson Jacobs, was never fully 
thought out. In fact, there is very little in the way of a plot to speak of, 
and, aside from having to ward off two violent T-Rex-lookalike Carnotaurs, no 
true dilemmas to overcome. The film almost immediately shoots down the 
hopeful notion that it would present a serious look at the alleged nature of 
dinosaurs, and their interactions with the different species', opting to tell 
an awkward PG-rated kiddie flick that undiscriminating children will enjoy, 
but will likely leave all other viewers out in the cold.
There are certain elements that define the quintessential animated Disney 
film. They are usually inhabited with memorable characters; a rightfully 
nasty and original villain; have a great deal of heart; are filled with 
musical numbers that the characters carry out in all their glory; and are 
superbly animated. "Dinosaur" does away with the musical numbers, which is a 
somewhat amiable change of pace, but bars the picture from having any other 
defining or noteworthy qualities outside of its technical skill in the 
animation arena. Meanwhile, "Dinosaur" is wholly devoid of the three former 
Disney attributes. 
Unlike Minnie Driver in 1999's far superior "Tarzan" or Demi Moore in 1996's 
"The Hunchback of Notre Dame," the voice work, supplied by several well-known 
actors (i.e. Julianna Margulies, Joan Plowright, Alfre Woodard, etc.), is 
forgettable, and just like the ho-hum direction by Ralph Zondag and Eric 
Leighton, their hearts simply do not seem into this project. The writing does 
not help, as the characters are purely disposable and have few defining 
personality features to tell them apart, and, most importantly, remember them 
once the lights go up.
At 82 minutes, almost ten of which are taken up by the end credits, 
"Dinosaur" is almost over before it begins, and good riddance. A crushing 
bore in the story and character department, and not taking full advantage of 
its grandiose vision (save for the astounding opening and the meteor shower 
sequence), "Dinosaur" is a distressingly lifeless concoction. The fact that 
it holds so much promise makes the outcome all the more calamitous.

Title
Review for Mission: Impossible II (2000)
Directed by John Woo.
Cast: Tom Cruise, Thandie Newton, Dougray Scott, Rade Sherbedgia, Ving 
Rhames, John Polson, Richard Roxburgh, Brendan Gleeson, Anthony Hopkins.
2000 - 127 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for violence, profanity, and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, May 27, 2000.
Four years after Tom Cruise toplined Brian De Palma's "Mission: Impossible," 
a $400-million worldwide box-office hit that, nonetheless, left audiences 
scratching their heads over the nearly incomprehensibly intricate story, 
comes "Mission: Impossible 2," from acclaimed action filmmaker John Woo. 
While De Palma has a more old-fashioned, sophisticated helming style, Woo is 
more modern and energized, carrying his go-for-broke attitude over into this 
exciting first sequel. 
Following an attention-grabbing prologue set upon an ill-fated airplane, and 
then switching to international spy Ethan Hunt (Tom Cruise) on a 
rock-climbing vacation until he is given his latest mission, the picture 
wastes little time in setting up its plot. It seems an old comrade-gone-bad 
of Ethan's, Sean Ambrose (Dougray Scott), is out to steal a bio-engineered 
virus in Sydney, Australia that has the power to wipe out the whole country, 
if not the world. Seeking the help of spunkily alluring and sexy thief Nyah 
Hall (Thandie Newton), she eventually accepts after being saved from a 
near-disastrous car accident, and falling into bed with Ethan. Conveniently 
an old flame of Sean's, Nyah is injected in her ankle with a locating device 
that tracks where she is at all times, and must travel to his headquarters 
and "rekindle" a relationship with him, all the while attempting to uncover 
Sean's entire dastardly plan. The problem is, Ethan has promised Nyah that 
she will be safe, and with himself beginning to care so much for her at the 
moment when she is knee-deep in potential danger, this mission is especially 
vital to Ethan.
A rare sequel that improves notably from its predecessor, "Mission: 
Impossible 2" is a rousing, wondrously filmed and edited action-romance 
(reminiscent in many ways of 1999's "Entrapment," starring Sean Connery and 
Catherine Zeta-Jones) that works well in both said genres. From the startling 
opener aboard the plane, to the surprisingly sexy car chase in which the cars 
being driven by Ethan and Nyah do a sort of lyrical dance together, to the 
nerve-racking motorcycle/beach battle that everything leads up to in the 
finale, director John Woo (previously a Hong Kong filmmaker) knows perhaps 
better than anyone else how to successfully set up an invigorating, 
edge-of-your-seat action setpiece. While constantly far-fetched, Woo's films 
are created primarily for their ability to entertain, which this one does, 
some of the time.
When Woo isn't pulling off an extravagant stunt and the camera has stopped 
moving, he still knows how to film pretty pictures (and pretty people), but 
the exposition scenes do occasionally drag, particularly in the half-hour 
before the sparkling 30-minute climax (so, on estimation, the problems mostly 
spring from the uninteresting 70-100 minute mark). Although "Mission: 
Impossible 2" attempts to be nothing more than a fun summer action movie, 
another setback is that, when all is said and done, it has style to spare and 
not enough character substance. Little is ever discovered about Ethan, Nyah, 
or Sean (or Ethan and Sean's previous kinship), and so they remain merely 
figures in a big, flashy movie. 
Thankfully, the one element that does have more heart than expected in a film 
of this genre is the warm romance that evolves between Ethan and Nyah. 
Ethan's fling in the original with Emmanuelle Beart was nothing more than a 
fleeting afterthought, whereas the romantic relationship here is full of 
compassion and eroticism. It would be overtly obvious to have Nyah turn out 
to be a femme fatale, and it is much more effective that she remain who she 
says she is throughout, and even grows feelings for another, something she 
wasn't sure she could do. As played by British beauty Thandie Newton (1998's 
"Beloved"), Nyah is the most memorable character, and Newton gives her an 
added dimension that otherwise might not have appeared, judging from the 
slight screenplay, by Robert Towne. Newton not only holds the screen, but she 
single-handedly grabs it away from everyone else when she is present.
After four years in which Tom Cruise released the likes of the big-budget art 
film "Eyes Wide Shut," and the unconventional, Oscar-nominated "Magnolia," he 
has once again returned to mainstream Hollywood, and proves that he still 
hasn't lost that special touch that has made him such a box-office draw all 
these years. Mostly known for his dramatic roles and romances, Cruise has 
shown with his blossoming "Mission: Impossible" franchise that he is a bona 
fide action star, one of the best there currently is. If that wasn't enough, 
performing his own stunts here, Cruise contributes some amazing physical 
work, including extreme motorcycle riding and mountain climbing (with no net 
below to catch him).
Best of all about "Mission: Impossible 2" is that its story is actually easy 
to follow, and therefore what happens means more to the viewer. In adapting a 
second film in a big screen series based on a 1966 television drama, Woo has 
neither borrowed nor paid tribute to De Palma's previous working, and, 
instead, has made his own individual vision of what the series should be 
like. And while De Palma is an undeniable major talent (particularly in his 
early work, such as "Carrie," "Blow Out," and "Dressed to Kill"), Woo more 
fittingly connects to the genre, and with "Mission: Impossible 2," he has 
made one of the most electrifying action yarns since 1994's "Speed." It may 
not be a masterpiece, but it sure does pack a wallop.

Title
Review for You've Got Mail (1998)
Directed by Nora Ephron.
Cast: Meg Ryan, Tom Hanks, Greg Kinnear, Parker Posey, Jean Stapleton, 
Dabney Coleman, Steve Zahn, Dave Chappelle.
1998 - 118 minutes.
Rated PG (for mild profanity).
Reviewed December 20, 1998.
"You've Got Mail," the third showcase that has brought together the 
winning team of Tom Hanks and Meg Ryan (after 1990's odd-ball "Joe Vs. 
the Volcano" and 1993's charming "Sleepless in Seattle"), obviously 
seemed like a no-brainer for director Nora Ephron and co-writer Delia 
Ephron since what they have basically made this time around is a ho-hum, 
mostly sloppy retread of many far more intelligent and witty romantic 
comedies.
Set in New York City, Kathleen Kelly (Meg Ryan), for many years, has run 
her late mother's quaint children's bookstore called "The Shop Around 
the Corner" (which was the title of the original James Stewart picture, 
for which this film is based on). She has a writer boyfriend (Greg 
Kinnear), but has been recently sending honest and intimate e-mails over 
AOL to a man that she first met in an Over 30 chatroom, but they have 
decided to keep their identities anonymous. What Kathleen doesn't know 
is that her secret e-mail buddy is actually Joe Fox (Tom Hanks), who has 
his own hyper and giddy girlfriend (Parker Posey), and is about to open 
a more high-profile book store on the same street, threatening 
Kathleen's business. The gimmick for the film is that these two people 
have grown to love each other over the internet, even though they are 
feuding in real life.
"You've Got Mail," is a sleek, well-photographed romantic comedy that 
actually compliments the beauty of NYC more than the actual stars of the 
film, since this story has been done far too many times before, and much 
better, at that. One of the biggest problems with the film is that there 
didn't appear to be any attempt to make an original film. No doubt, 
Ephron assumed that she had it made once she cast Hanks and Ryan, and so 
she forgot to add a quality screenplay. Watching the film, I didn't get 
any sense of excitement, urgency, or suspense involving the question of 
if Hanks and Ryan would get together at the end, since I knew for a fact 
that they would. Far too many times, I predicted dialogue and even what 
would occur in the next scene, and most of the time I was right on the 
mark. If an audience member can predict what the characters are going to 
say before they actually say it, then you know you're in trouble.
I will not criticize Tom Hanks and Meg Ryan, since both of them have 
proved to be talented actors, and Ryan is simply too cute for words, but 
that is the exact problem. They are too good to be wasting their time in 
such a tried-and-true Hollywood formula. "Sleepless in Seattle" was also 
predictable, but that film was more sound and sharp in its writing and I 
cared about the characters more. Why not shake things up a bit and add a 
little creativity to the mix, instead of making what is basically an 
inferior remake to "...Seattle?"
Rarely have I seen so many charasmatic supporting characters wasted so 
blatantly as they are in this movie. Greg Kinnear has the most chance of 
a developed character, but he disappears towards the middle and there is 
no mention of him again. Parker Posey, in her first notable role in a 
big-budget film, is punished with the emotionless "bitch" role, and is 
not even given one scene where she and Hanks simply talk. It's a shame 
Ephron decided to cast such a wonderful, fresh actress, only to throw 
her to the curb. Meanwhile, Dave Chappelle and Steve Zahn make no 
impression whatsoever with roles that might as well have been classified 
as extras.
Maybe I am making it sound like I hated "You've Got Mail," which isn't 
the case. The film was never boring, but also never what I would 
consider entertaining. Basically, it just seemed to sit there, and it 
amazed me how little could be accomplished, even though the running time 
is overstretched to two hours. Hanks and Ryan, like always, have a great 
deal of chemistry together, and I liked their characters. I liked a few 
of the lines of dialogue (when Hanks enters a store, he introduces the 
two children he is with as his aunt and brother). The soundtrack of 
popular pop songs from the 70's, 80's, and 90's were fun to listen to. 
Everything seemed in place for a charming, and I was hoping, 
imaginative, romantic comedy, but to no avail. Nora Ephron may have hit 
the jackpot with "Sleepless in Seattle," and I am also an admirer of her 
underrated 1994 comedy, "Mixed Nuts," but "You've Got Mail," ultimately, 
fails to add anything new or worthwhile into the now worn-out romantic 
comedy genre.

Title
Review for Watcher, The (2000)
Directed by Joe Charbanic.
Cast: James Spader, Keanu Reeves, Marisa Tomei, Chris Ellis, Ernie Hudson.
2000 - 93 minutes
Rated R (for violence and profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, September 9, 2000.
There have been so many films made in the Serial Killer genre that, more 
often than not, they rely on a sole gimmick to set them apart from the crowd. 
When a movie of this sort attempts to create genuine characters and 
situations, and acquire innovative approaches to its story, as in 1986's 
stark "Henry: Portrait of a Serial Killer" or 1991's Oscar-winning "The 
Silence of the Lambs," it comes as a startling change of pace. On the one 
hand, Joe Charbanic's "The Watcher" falls into the former category--that is, 
it's one hope for success falls on the idea of the villain holding up a 
peculiarly close relationship with the troubled investigator on the case. The 
picture is rarely ever original, and first-time feature film director Joe 
Charbanic uses too much flash and not enough substance to convey his ideas. 
However, the movie does hold a few unpredictably intriguing notions, and 
successfully creates a palpable level of suspense. With both positive 
qualities and negative downfalls consistently weighing from both sides, the 
fate of "The Watcher" falls on how satisfying the venture is once everything 
is said and done. Ultimately, the film begins to unravel during its climax, 
and the disappointing ending leaves you asking what exactly the point was. It 
also puts in place the final nail in its at-once-promising coffin.
Detective Campbell (James Spader), a troubled man suffering from migraine 
headaches and a barbituate dependency, has recently relocated to Chicago from 
Los Angeles to get away from his unfortunate past. At the same time, murders 
of young women begin to plague the area, and it soon becomes apparent that 
they are the work of Griffin (Keanu Reeves), a serial killer from Campbell's 
previous case in L.A. who has followed him to his new surroundings to haunt 
him once more. The hook is that Campbell begins to receive individual 
pictures of anonymous women in the mail, and is given exactly twenty-four 
hours to locate the potential victim before Griffin ends their life. It seems 
Griffin gains pleasure in forming relationships with the top investigators on 
his case, and although he doesn't know it yet, so does Campbell, whose 
obscure past is linked to the killer.
As far as movies in the recent Serial Killer genre go, "The Watcher" is a 
step above the tiresome likes of 1997's "Kiss the Girls" and 1999's "The Bone 
Collector," but inferior to 1995's "Se7en" and "Copycat." While getting off 
to a rocky start that doesn't seem to be going anywhere, when the 
cat-and-mouse games begin between Griffin and Campbell at the thirty-minute 
mark, the film is reinvigorated with a level of much-needed tension and fast 
pacing. Unfortunately, as with most thrillers of this sort, the outcome can 
be easily telegraphed in advance and its novel twist inevitably resorts by 
its conclusion into a cliched fight to the finish between the protagonist and 
antagonist.
The cast is talented all the way around, but nonetheless give a mixed bag of 
performances. James Spader (1997's "Crash") is in fine form as the afflicted 
hero, Campbell, and is effective in transmitting his character's confusion to 
why, exactly, he feels such a strong connection to his enemy. Meanwhile, 
Keanu Reeves (1999's "The Matrix") plays against-type as the cold-blooded 
murderer. Reeves isn't bad in the role, but Griffin's motivations are never 
clearly identified, and he occasionally has trouble acting menacing. The 
once-successful Marisa Tomei (1992's "My Cousin Vinny"), as Campbell's 
psychiatrist Polly, has recently fallen on hard times, and is handed here an 
underdeveloped character who has little purpose other than becoming one of 
Griffin's targets. Tomei simply looks bored in the part, and understandably 
so.
The one thought-provoking idea that screenwriters David Elliot and Clay Ayers 
do form is that, in your everyday life, you come into contact with a large 
amount of people, but most take interaction for granted and rarely ever 
notice those around them. Throughout, Campbell comes into very close 
proximity with Griffin (at one point, they share an elevator together), but 
as is common in human nature, Campbell never notices.
Complete with a memorable blend of current heavy metal and pop music, as well 
as annoyingly artsy photography that includes slow-motion and grainy video 
footage, "The Watcher" is a film that comes thisclose to overcoming its 
problems and succeeding as a thriller, but doesn't quite make it. The climax 
simply does not hold the amount of care required to end on a satisfying note. 
It leaves the viewer with a feeling of distaste and wasted time, rather than 
of pleasure and time well spent.

Title
Review for Skulls, The (2000)
Directed by Rob Cohen.
Cast: Joshua Jackson, Paul Walker, Leslie Bibb, Hill Harper, Craig T. Nelson, 
William Petersen, Christopher McDonald, Steve Harris.
2000 - 106 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity, violence, and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, April 1, 2000.
Rob Cohen's "The Skulls" is a handsomely produced disaster of a movie, filled 
with such ludicrous plotting and inconsistencies that it has to be seen to be 
believed. At least when Universal Pictures hired Shane Hurlbut as the 
cinematographer, they got their money's worth, which is more than can be said 
about virtually everyone and everything else involved in the making of this 
"thriller," a so-called "'The Firm' for teens." The problem is that that 1993 
Tom Cruise-starrer was also a dumbed-down version of a John Grisham novel. 
Drop its IQ down yet another 50 points, transform its characters into college 
students, and what you are left with is "The Skulls."
Luke McNamara (Joshua Jackson) is a former street kid whose key to being 
accepted at the prestigious Yale University is his expertise on the college's 
famed rowing team. Planning to go to law school after graduation, he is 
unsure of how he is going to manage it, considering he has twenty bucks in 
the bank, considerably less than the annual $45,000 tuition fee. Lurking 
about the campus is a much-talked-about secret society called The Skulls (if 
it is such a secret, how come everyone knows about it?), to which we are 
informed at the on-set that at least two of the United States' presidents 
have been members. Once initiated, there is no exempting, but The Skulls 
promise inductees unlimited amounts of wealth and fortune, as well as a few 
trophy women to go along with it. 
Despite the warnings of Luke's two best friends, Will (Hill Harper) and Chloe 
(Leslie Bibb), he is chosen to join The Skulls, and without hesitation, 
accepts. A pair of new members are chosen to be soul mates, and Luke is 
partnered with Caleb Mandrake (Paul Walker), whose father, Judge Litten 
Mandrake (Craig T. Nelson), coincidentally, is the head of the society. Luke 
is overjoyed to later discover that $20,000 has been added to his bank 
account, but being a member of The Skulls means inevitably slighting Will and 
Chloe, whom he is secretly in love with. Then an apparent suicide of someone 
close to Luke occurs on campus, but evidence points to foul play, and it 
becomes believed that the victim was murdered. All suspicions of Luke point 
to The Skulls being involved in a cover-up scheme.
What can be said about "The Skulls" other than it's one of the most 
unintentionally silly movies so far this year, not to mention one of the 
worst? The screenplay, by John Pogue, is a real howler, and should never have 
been given the chance to see the light of day. In one scene, a female 
character is chased across campus in broad daylight, which conveniently 
appears to be deserted. In another, Luke is drugged to an almost catatonic 
state, to the point where saliva is uncontrollably dribbling out the side of 
his mouth. Then, all of a sudden, out of the blue, he jumps right into a 
conversation as if nothing had happened. Was he just playing an April Fool's 
joke on everyone, and decided it would be funny to pretend he was a human 
vegetable? And who could forget the laughable duel climax, complete with real 
guns, that takes place in what looked like the courtyard of the school?
The dialogue is no better, with one distressingly stilted scene in which 
Luke, Will, and Chloe discuss the history of The Skulls, reciting dialogue 
that not for a second seems natural, but simply an excuse to relay to the 
audience some background information. "The Skulls" might have at least been 
funny had director Rob Cohen (who made the far superior 1996 action film, 
"Daylight") and screenwriter Pogue let the audience know that it was meant as 
a comedy. To my dismay, however, it appears like the movie is very well 
attempting to be a serious-minded thriller. 
"The Skulls" marks the debut of Joshua Jackson (TV's "Dawson's Creek") in a 
lead film role, after supporting parts in 1998's "Urban Legend" and 1999's 
"Cruel Intentions," and it's unfortunate that he had to choose such an 
unusually bad movie to take that next step in his career. All other actors 
are handed throwaway roles, except for Paul Walker (1998's "Pleasantville"), 
who makes next to no impression, and Leslie Bibb (TV's "Popular"), who is the 
only one in the cast who projects even the slightest hint of intelligence. 
Bibb has a bright screen presence, but she is surrounded by such inanity that 
all she can do is struggle to come away from the wreckage unscathed (she 
succeeds, for the most part).
Worst of all, when "The Skulls" isn't downright awful, it's just a chore to 
sit through. Dull and oddly outdated, only the lush photography by Hurlbut, 
accentuating its gorgeous Toronto-based setting, saves the picture from being 
a surefire cure for insomniacs. On second thought, maybe Universal should 
have hired someone less accomplished to work as cinematographer. That way, 
when viewers would fall into a deep slumber for its duration, it would cause 
them to forget that such an absurd motion picture was actually ever committed 
to celluloid. It would also save the actors from any further embarrassment.

Title
Review for Love Letter, The (1999)
Directed by Peter Ho-Sun Chan.
Cast: Kate Capshaw, Tom Everett Scott, Tom Selleck, Ellen DeGeneres, 
Julianne Nicholson, Geraldine McEwan, Blythe Danner, Gloria Stuart, 
Alice Drummond.
1999 - 88 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity, sexual situations, and brief nudity).
Reviewed May 22, 1999.
An honest, passionate, and ultimately mysterious note is the subject of 
Peter Ho-Sun Chan's romantic comedy-drama, "The Love Letter," based upon 
the novel by Cathleen Schine. There's a lot to like here, and even 
though it is only the start of the big summer movie season, it was nice 
to sit back, relax, and watch a movie about realistic people; it's just 
too bad the story surrounding the characters comes off as a mere 
contrivance, and that the supporting cast, all wonderful actors, are 
criminally wasted.
Helen MacFarquhar (Kate Capshaw) is a 40-ish single mother who lives in 
the quaint New England town with the dreamy title, Loblolly By The Sea. 
The fact that she has a young daughter is completely pointless to the 
film, since she is shipped away to summer camp during the opening 
credits to never be seen again. Helen works at one of those cute little 
bookstores that you only see in the movies; the kind that is constantly 
swarming with employees, but never has one customer. Maybe it's because 
the town is so small, or maybe it's because the residents are 
illiterate, or not big readers. Either way, how could they have the 
money to keep the shop in business? Anyway, one day Helen finds a love 
letter wedged between the cushions of a couch, and immediately believes 
that someone has written it for her. As she walks around the town 
daydreaming of all of the possible authors, she soon narrows down the 
list to George (Tom Selleck), a recently divorced father who has been 
her life-long friend, or Johnny (Tom Everett Scott), a 20-year-old 
college student working at the bookstore for the summer, who finds the 
note himself and believes it is from Helen. Things grow more complicated 
when Helen's best friend, Janet (Ellen DeGeneres), discovers the letter 
and suspects it to be directed for her, while Helen starts to doubt her 
blossoming relationship with the much-younger Johnny and sets her sights 
on the more mature, lonely George.
"The Love Letter" is a very well-intentioned and mildly entertaining 
distraction from life, but at a too-short 88-minutes, the distraction is 
not nearly long enough, and is unnecessarily slight. The screenplay, 
written by Maria Maggenti, is fine with what it has, but desperately 
needs more meat to it, as the movie stubbornly centers directly on 
Helen, while the rest of the intriguing characters are more or less 
pushed to the wayside. Still, there are a lot of nice moments and a 
subtle deeper meaning that shines through with a quote that appears on 
the bookstore's chalkboard late in the film. Although the writer of the 
love letter is eventually discovered, the movie probably didn't even 
need to resolve such a thing, as the major thread running through the 
film is that of Helen's self-discoveries about herself, and her life. It 
was also a pleasant change of pace to include a conclusion that doesn't 
turn out quite as you might predict, but that is stronger because of its 
honesty.
Kate Capshaw, recently seen in numerous indie films ("The Locusts," "The 
Alarmists"), jumped onto the scene in 1984's rousing adventure, "Indiana 
Jones and the Temple of Doom" (where she met a guy named Spielberg and 
married him), but "The Love Letter" is her first major film vehicle in a 
long time. I like her, and yet it's funny how so many movies choose the 
most uninteresting character to be the center. This is exactly what 
happens in "The Love Letter," as all of the characters around her are 
more original, starting with Tom Everett Scott, as the young man of 
Helen's desires. Scott has stumbled lately in such mediocre fare as "An 
American Werewolf in Paris" and "Dead Man on Campus," but he has found a 
better role here. Playing off of him splendidly is Julianne Nicholson, a 
young woman closer to his age who has strong feelings for him, even 
though he's too concerned with Helen to really process it. But the 
absolute bright spot in the cast is Ellen DeGeneres, who is so very good 
in everything she's in that, if I were to make a movie, she'd be the 
first one I'd cast. She is the picture's comic highlight (as usual), but 
is not merely replaying her other characters, and has a serious scene 
with Capshaw that is perhaps the most powerful moment in the film. 
Meanwhile, Blythe Danner and Gloria Stuart (her first role since 
"Titanic") briefly appear as Helen's mother and grandmother, but have 
nothing to do, particularly Stuart, one of the sweetest old ladies I've 
ever set eyes upon. It's a real shame she was put in such a throwaway 
role, but does garner a few laughs in only her three scenes.
Like Loblolly By The Sea, "The Love Letter" is an enjoyable enough way 
to spend an hour and a half, but doesn't end up having much to offer in 
the way of substance. On Oprah this week, Capshaw said that when she 
read the novel from which this adaptation stems from, she fell in love 
with the idea of it becoming a motion picture and immediately joined on 
as star and producer (it probably didn't hurt that she is married to Mr. 
Dreamworks SKG). Either the book must have been infinitely superior, or 
Capshaw should have definately held out for a better project.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Double Jeopardy (1999)
Directed by Bruce Beresford.
Cast: Ashley Judd, Tommy Lee Jones, Bruce Greenwood, Annabeth Gish, Roma 
Maffia.
1999 - 106 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, sex, nudity, and blood).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, September 25, 1999.
Have you ever seen a film that could possibly have been successful, but was 
basically ruined due to an ad campaign that gave away literally every secret 
the picture has to offer? It's a common occurrence, but never before has a 
trailer blatantly spoiled a film the way Paramount's ads for "Double 
Jeopardy" do. If you are able to disregard this almost-fatal flaw, you will 
find that the film really is a highly servicable thriller, full of fine 
performances and blessed with brisk pacing that consistently saves the film 
from ever becoming tedious. While you watch "Double Jeopardy," you enjoy it, 
but even if the ad campaign hadn't given away every secret, it still would 
have been rather predictable, and ultimately can't escape its formulaic 
plotting.
Libby Parsons (Ashley Judd) has it all; a generous, caring relationship with 
her husband, Nick (Bruce Greenwood); a cheerful 4-year-old son; a love for 
sailing; and a beautiful, lakeside home in the northeast. While spending the 
night together on the boat Nick just bought for Libby, she awakens to 
discover she, as well as the boat, is covered in blood, and her husband is 
missing. The sea-rescue squad catches her holding the knife she has just 
found on the deck, and when Nick's body is never recovered, Libby finds 
herself facing serious time behind bars, and before long, is sentenced to a 
9-year prison term. Heartbroken that she has to be separated from her son, 
who is thus adopted by her best friend, Angela (Annabeth Gish), Libby decides 
to make the best of her time there, becoming friends with some of her fellow 
inmates and working out a lot. Then, to her horror, Angela and her son 
disappear for a month, but she is able to track them down by a telephone 
operator, where they are now staying in San Francisco. To make a long story 
short, Libby overhears her son on the phone exclaim, "Daddy!" and all of a 
sudden, she realizes that she was intentionally framed for the "murder" by 
her husband himself. A former lawyer and matter-of-fact cellmate (Roma 
Maffia) explains to Libby about a process called Double Jeopardy, in which a 
person cannot be convicted of the same crime twice. So if, say, Libby wanted 
to actually murder him once she's released, she could, and there's nothing 
anyone could do about it. 
Switch to six years later, Libby is granted a three-year parole, and is sent 
to live at a community house for recently-released convicts, run by the 
flawed parole officer Travis Lehman (Tommy Lee Jones), who supposedly was in 
a car accident years before that killed his wife and daughter. Since then, 
Travis hasn't been able to lay off the alcohol, but he does catch on rather 
quickly to Libby's ulterior motives, and attempts to stop her when she 
escapes from his custody.
You know, I may have given away quite a few of the major plot points, but 
they were also all discussed in the theatrical trailer. And you know what 
else? The trailer also had the shameless nerve to unravel even more of the 
story, right up to the climax in New Orleans, with Libby holding the gun at 
Nick, only for it to go off. After watching a 2 1/2-minute cliffs notes 
version of the 106-minute film, one wonders why anyone would even be 
interested in spending their hard-earned money on something that they already 
know the outcome of, but judging from the fairly-packed theater last night, 
it didn't stop any of them.
Beginning with a painfully obvious 15-minute prologue in which the "murder" 
takes place, I sat back in my seat, expecting to suffer through the remainder 
of a film that had "Mainstream Hollywood" written all over it. Once Libby is 
sent to prison, however, "Double Jeopardy" quickly improves, due in large 
part to Ashley Judd's superb, touching performance, as a woman who, in a 
moment's time, finds her whole happy existence seriously altered. With an 
acting career that began with her best-ever work in Victor Nunez's small 1993 
masterpiece, "Ruby in Paradise," Judd has followed this up with some 
disappointing commercial projects (1997's "Kiss the Girls") that have 
nonetheless helped to buoy her star potential, and has wisely intermixed 
these with more independent efforts (1997's "The Locusts," 1998's "Simon 
Birch"). "Double Jeopardy" belongs squarely in the commercial category, but 
that doesn't keep Judd from creating a believable, strong-willed character 
that we easily root for.
Tommy Lee Jones, in a role that is nearly a carbon copy of everything he has 
appeared in in the last six years (save for maybe 1995's "Batman Forever"), 
manages to pull off a strong performance that is more satisfyingly-written 
than most of his other recent efforts. While his character, like the film 
itself, is an utter cliche (the troubled, alcoholic man who finally comes to 
terms with his past mistakes), Jones sparks it with more life than there 
might have been had a lesser actor been cast in the part.
It makes you wonder, though. Would I have thought more highly of "Double 
Jeopardy" if, going into it, I knew nothing about it? There would have 
definitely been some extra surprises that most likely would have been 
unpredictable, and I probably would have found the premise more ingenious. 
Despite this, the film really is needlessly implausible on the basic story 
level, and the climactic showdown resorts to that reliable struggle scene 
that ends with a gun going off and killing one of the characters. But which 
one? I'll give you a hint: there's no way Paramount would have allowed the 
picture not to have a happy ending in which Libby and her son reunite. With 
all of the film's virtues and flaws weighed equally, let's just called 
"Double Jeopardy" a near-recommendation: a well-made thriller, to be sure, 
but just about as banal as they come.
COMING SOON: My personal domain website, at www.filmhaven.com.

Title
Review for Monkeybone (2001)
Directed by Henry Selick.
Cast: Brendan Fraser, Bridget Fonda, Chris Kattan, Dave Foley, Rose McGowan, 
Whoopi Goldberg, Giancarlo Esposito, Megan Mullally, Lisa Zane.
Voice: John Turturro.
2001 - 87 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for scatological humor).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, February 24, 2001.
There is a good movie hiding somewhere within "Monkeybone," just breaking to 
get out. Equipped with an imaginative premise and occasionally eye-popping 
visuals of a world and creatures that have never been glimpsed before on the 
silver screen, this otherwordly fantasy should be alive with energy and 
originality, but it isn't. It is an empty, lethargic slug of a movie that 
creeps along with several good ideas, but does nothing with them.
Stu Smiley (Brendan Fraser) has created an offbeat cartoon known as 
"Monkeybone" that has just been picked up by the Comedy Channel. Not really 
interested in mainstream success, his career is, nonetheless, just about to 
take off. On his way home from a premiere party with his loving girlfriend, 
Julie (Bridget Fonda), whom he is about to propose to, they are involved in a 
freak car accident with an unwieldily balloon that leaves her unharmed, but 
Stu in a deep coma. From here on, Stu finds himself arriving in a fantasy 
world known as Downtown, inhabited by creatures big and small, including 
Monkeybone himself (voiced annoyingly by John Turturro). He soon comes to 
find that it is a netherworld in which he is to stay in until word comes 
whether he should be sent to Heaven or Hell, or return to his life and 
girlfriend. Meanwhile, back on Earth, it has been three months since the 
accident and Stu is showing no signs of progression. When his older sister, 
Kimmy (Megan Mullally), decides it is time to pull the plug on him, Julie 
plots to inject him with "nightmare juice" that she hopes will scare him out 
of his comatose state.
At just 87 minutes (including opening and ending credits), "Monkeybone" feels 
like an ambitious film that was destroyed by a directing and editing hack 
job. While the movie just barely makes sense, it is also clear that large 
amounts have been cut out, and to lethal effect. In Harry Knowles' scathing 
review at "Ain't-It-Cool-News," he speaks of how the original screenplay, 
loosely based on a comic book called "Dark Town," was an extravagant, 
brilliant piece of originality and wonder, and in the process of getting it 
to the screen, large amounts were edited out after a shaky test-screening, or 
never filmed at all, due to budget restraints. Knowing this, it can safely be 
said that "Monkeybone" may very well have once been a good motion picture, 
but has, instead, been turned into a lifeless, overblown monstrosity.
While the scenes set in Downtown are, indeed, a visual feast of gorgeous set 
decoration and production design, they always feel rushed, as we 
intermittently are taken back to the world of the living to follow Julie's 
plight. Because of this, there is no rhythm or natural flow to any of it, and 
its spare parts clank together like pieces of rusted metal. Not only that, 
but director Henry Selick (who fared much better with 1993's "The Nightmare 
Before Christmas," and is making his live-action debut here) proves to not 
have a gift with human actors, as none of the characters are the least bit 
interesting, and hardly any of the actors give inspired performances. 
To be fair, no one is given much screen time except for Brendan Fraser 
(1999's "The Mummy") and Bridget Fonda (1999's "Lake Placid"), but even they 
seem distant throughout, as if their hearts simply weren't in on this 
production. Neither is given anything worthwhile to do, and their roles feel 
painfully rote. All of the other actors just struggle to appear onscreen at 
all, and each one of them is wasted. There seems to be promise in the 
friendly relationship between Stu and a half-cat/half-human named Kitty, 
played by Rose McGowan (2000's "Ready to Rumble"), but something tells me 
most of her scenes found their way to the cutting room floor. Aside from the 
humorous initial reaction to see Whoopi Goldberg play Death, she is given 
nothing to do. The same goes for the highly talented and extremely funny 
Megan Mullally (TV's "Will & Grace"), who isn't offered one funny line to 
utter. Only Chris Kattan (TV's "Saturday Night Live"), as a recently deceased 
runner whose body is inhabited by Stu, stands out from the crowd, and 
successfully blends both physical comedy and drama. Unfortunately, his screen 
time is as brief as everyone else's.
"Monkeybone" is a very bad movie, and amazingly so. With a story so fresh and 
a world so promising, it almost feels as if the results were intentionally 
botched. Whatever the case may be, the finished product is far more dull and 
artificial than it has any right to be. It leaves you feeling frustrated and 
angry at everyone involved in its journey to the screen.
    - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
      http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman
http://www.atnzone.com 

Title
Review for Love & Human Remains (1993)
Directed by Denys Arcand.
Cast: Thomas Gibson, Ruth Marshall, Matthew Ferguson, Cameron Bancroft, 
Joanne Vannicola, Mia Kirshner, Rick Roberts.
1995 - 99 minutes
Rated R (for violence, sexual situations, nudity, profanity, and drug use).
Reviewed June 15, 1999.
On the surface, director Denys Arcand's "Love and Human Remains" may appear 
to be yet another cliched, boring Gen-X comedy, but it is far from that. 
Taking a more noticable cue from someone such as Robert Altman ("Nashville," 
"Short Cuts"), the film chronicles the empty lives of seven young adults 
living in an unnamed Canadian city, all loosely connected in some way. But to 
spice things up even more, Arcand has also seemed to include a David 
Lynch-ian subplot that, no doubt, stands as a clever metaphor for AIDS. 
Based on the play, "Unidentified Human Remains and the True Nature of Love," 
by Brad Fraser, the film's roots center in on two roommates and ex-lovers, 
David (Thomas Gibson), a cynical, 30-year-old gay man who used to be an actor 
but has turned to being a waiter, and who firmly believes that there is no 
such thing as "love," opting instead for one night stands; and Candy (Ruth 
Marshall), a lonely book reviewer who hates almost everything she reads and 
desperately wants to find a lover, even though deep down she is in love with 
David. Back at the restaurant David works at, his 17-year-old busboy, Kane 
(Matthew Ferguson), begins to hang around him, clearly interested, attracted 
to, and cautious of, David's gay lifestyle. David's two best friends include 
the womanizing Bernie (Cameron Bancroft), who sleeps with practically a 
different woman each night, and Benita (Mia Kirshner), a friendly S&M 
dominatrix who gets people off by telling them urban legends, and who happens 
to be psychic. Meanwhile, Candy finds herself gaining, and experimenting 
with, two partners, a bartender (Rick Robert) and an admiring, caring 
lesbian, Jerri (Joanne Vannicola). Among all of these interwining character 
threads is a serial killer, who may or may not be one of these seven people, 
that has much of the city in a panic, murdering beautiful, vulnerable women 
and then stealing their earring by gruesomely tearing them off their earlobes.
"Love and Human Remains" is a largely effective, relevant motion picture, 
due, in part, because of the way director Arcand and screenwriter Brad 
Fraser, listen to each one of the characters. At first glance, any one of 
these people could be dismissed as unlikable, cruel, or weird, but very few 
of them actually are, as we are allowed to observe and learn about them, and 
the inner workings of their minds. Sure, David may seem hard-edged on the 
outside, constantly stating that "love" doesn't exist, but that facade is 
relatively easy to uncover to find a man who, just like Candy, longs to love 
and be loved by someone who really cares for him. He finds a glimmer of hope 
in Kane, but David is probably just a little too old for him, and Kane 
clearly has a lot of internal issues to work out with himself before they 
could even hope to start a relationship. The love Candy wants, however, comes 
to her relatively easily when, after having sex with Jerri, Jerri tells her 
that she passionately and deeply loves her. Too bad for Candy, then, since 
she realizes at this point that the whole thing was an awful mistake, since 
she now knows she isn't gay.
The dangers of getting AIDS is one of the major undercurrents flowing through 
the film, with both David and Candy very cautious about getting it. Even they 
aren't safe all of the time, as is proven by the serial killer (AIDS, get 
it?) who might be closer to these two characters than they think. Also, 
symbolizing their closed-up feelings on life and love, an unidentified cat is 
constantly standing outside of their apartment window, trying to get in and 
shield itself from the cold. The symbolism in the film could easily have come 
off heavy-handed, but they are not, fortunately, shoved down the viewers' 
throats, and are admittedly creative ideas that wholeheartedly work in spite 
of themselves. Without giving too much away, even when the climax becomes 
more or less a violent thriller, I was able to buy it because I had never 
seen a relatively serious and intelligent look at human relationships 
intercut with a serial killer subplot.
If all of the roles are mostly well-handled, the performances are mostly 
top-notch, headed by Thomas Gibson (currently starring on the TV series, 
"Dharma and Greg"), who is the epidome of perfect casting, both handsome and 
dark, savvy and brooding. Ruth Marshall is in every way his match on-screen, 
as a frustrated, weight-concious woman who realizes it is difficult to find 
love, and even when you do, it might turn out to be the wrong kind. Matthew 
Ferguson is striking as a teenager confused with his own sexuality, adding an 
appropriate mixture of curiosity and reluctancy to his unsure character. Mia 
Kirshner ("Exotica," "The Crow: City of Angels"), now a rising star, in one 
of her first film roles, somehow brings a touching quality to her memorable 
role, even though it is probably the most underwritten in the piece. Just 
from Kirshner's own acting assurance and facial expressions do we discover 
all about her, as a woman who works for a living as a dominatrix, but like 
everyone else, is very lonesome in her own life, finding a friend in only 
David. Cameron Bancroft and Rick Roberts, respectively, are fine in their not 
dissimilar roles as two lecherous slimeballs (who do not come in contact with 
each other once during the film). Last but certainly not least, Joanne 
Vannicola gives perhaps the most purely humane, understandable, and genuinely 
moving performance in the whole movie, mirroring that of Candy and David, as 
a schoolteacher who wants more than anything to be with Candy, but whose love 
is not returned. 
"Love and Human Remains" might have spent a little more time with the less 
fully-realized characters of Benita, Bernie, and the bartender, but on the 
whole, it is a one-of-a-kind film that takes a lot of courageous chances, 
story and character-wise, and also marked the impressive english-language 
directing debut of Arcand ("Jesus of Montreal"). The Canadian landscapes are 
painted with a grim forebodement, adding to the overall atmosphere of not 
only the murders, but the struggling relationships of the characters. In 
spite of the many positive critical reviews it garnered, "Love and Human 
Remains" did not gain the sort of notices it deserved upon U.S. release in 
1995, and is very much a worthwhile rental choice. If anything, you're sure 
to never see a Gen-X "comedy" like this one ever again.
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Love, etc. (1996)
Directed by Marion Vernoux.
Cast: Charlotte Gainsbourg, Yvan Attal, Charles Berling.
1999 - 100 minutes.
Rated R (for nudity, sexual innuendo, and profanity).
In French w/ English subtitles.
Capsule Review, August 15, 1999.
Marion Vernoux's "Love Etc." is a rare French film that could almost be 
mistaken for an American film in its portrayal of three characters who are 
about as annoying and dim-witted as a bunch of flies. Marie (Charlotte 
Gainsbourg) is a lonely art restorer who puts a personal ad in the local 
newspaper in hopes of meeting a charming companion who can sweep her off her 
feet. Benoit (Yvan Attal), a man with no self-esteem and a low self-worth 
level, answers it, but afraid that she will be turned off by his appearance, 
sends her a picture of his better-looking, womanizing best friend, Pierre 
(Charles Berling), instead. Once Benoit and Marie meet, they instantly hit it 
off, even going as far as to get married soon after. Unfortunately, their 
unexpected happy existence is threatened when Pierre begins hanging around 
more and more, until Benoit is convinced they are having an affair behind his 
back. If not for the mature performances by the three leads, especially 
Charlotte Gainsbourg, "Love Etc." would be an almost completely worthless 
drama, but as is, it is more frustrating than anything. From the very 
beginning, it is obvious that the actors are playing characters who are well 
below their own personal intelligence, as they all are forced to do unlikely, 
at times cruel, things to one another. A few subtle, quiet moments sneak in 
every once and a while, but the asinine screenplay, by Julian Barnes, 
destroys all signs of cinematic promise.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman.
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Perfect Blue (1997/I)
"Perect Blue," directed by first-time filmmaker Satoshi Kon, was my first 
foray into the world of anime films, a contemporary animation style from 
Japan, and as such, I can also call it the most outlandish animated film I've 
ever seen. Definitely not for children, it is a violent and bloody thriller, 
but one that is thoroughly likable, thanks to the amicably sympathetic lead 
character.
The film tells the story of Mima Kirigoe, the lead vocalist of a Japanese pop 
band called Cham, who decides to quit her rising singing career to pursue 
acting, despite the caution of her manager. She quickly garners a pivotal 
role on a televison series, but begins recieving threatening letters and 
faxes, and also learns of an internet site that tells everything she does 
each day, down to the smallest detail. Someone must be watching her every 
move, Mima decides, but that's far from her only problem. A lookalike of Mima 
starts to appear everywhere she goes, threatening to restart her music 
career, posing as her.
"Perfect Blue" is a wildly inventive creation that is just about as adult as 
an animated film can get, and at times, I even started to forget that it was, 
in fact, animated. The filmmaking process of the soap opera Mima stars in is 
shown in a techincal, realistic light, and it occasionally could waver over 
into the category of being creepy, particularly the climax, which involves a 
twist that I not for once saw coming. 
The unique animation style is one of the highlights of viewing the film. 
Although not up to the artistry of a Disney picture, it nonetheless remains 
almost life-like, particularly in the drawings of the characters and the city 
landscapes that can be seen from Mima's apartment. The colors are bright and 
stylized, and the animation always seems reality-based, rather than Disney's 
often exaggerated features. 
Since it is the character of Mima that guides us through the film, it was 
improtant that the viewer could see eye-to-eye with her. Mima loves her music 
career, but doesn't want to be known as a "pop star," and so she finds 
herself in a situation in which she gets stuck doing a graphic television 
series that, in one scene, requires her character to be raped. Somewhat 
ashamed of herself, and for defying her best friend, Rumi, who didn't want 
her to do the scene, Mima finally blows up in her room when she sees that, 
not only is someone stalking her and she has a crazed doppleganger running 
around, but her pet fish have all died.
At 80 minutes, "Perfect Blue" runs at a brisk pace, but still manages to grow 
tedious and slightly confusing in the middle half-hour, which becomes 
particularly repetitive. The exciting, gory climax boosts the film up a 
notch, however, with a chase across the rooftops of buildings and through the 
city streets. Best of all, with the final line of dialogue that comes from 
Mima in the last scene, I noticed a definite growth on Mima's part, as she 
finally realizes she can do whatever she wants for her career, just as long 
as it makes her happy. "Perfect Blue" isn't quite as perfect as the title 
suggests, but it is still a film that I could easily recommend to those 
searching for something a bit more original than the norm.
- Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
  Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Go (1999)
Directed by Doug Liman.
Cast: Sarah Polley, Desmond Askew, Katie Holmes, Scott Wolf, Jay Mohr, 
Taye Diggs, Timothy Olyphant, William Fichtner, Breckin Meyer, J.E. 
Freeman, Nathan Bexton, Jane Krakowski, James Duval, Courtland Mead.
1999 - 100 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, nudity, sex, and drug use).
Reviewed April 10, 1999.
Doug Liman's "Go" is a glittery, flashy, and fast-paced dark 
comedy-thriller in the obvious style of Quentin Tarantino. Although the 
basic outline is completely different, both films feature off-beat and 
interesting dialogue; several dispicible, if very funny, characters; and 
the same invigorating non-linear storytelling techniques.
Set entirely on Christmas Eve and early Christmas morning in L.A., "Go" 
begins with a jolt as we are treated to quick flashes of a rave before 
the Columbia logo is even finished. We then move on to the stories at 
hand. Ronna is a 20-year-old grocery story worker who is threatened to 
be evicted from her apartment if she doesn't come up with enough money 
soon. Accepting to take a double-shift when her English co-worker, Simon 
(Desmond Askew), goes on a trip to Las Vegas, Ronna finally sees a light 
at the end of the tunnel when two of her customers, Zack (Jay Mohr) and 
Adam (Scott Wolf), approach her about scoring some ecstacy. Agreeing to 
sell them some, Ronna sets off to see Todd (Timothy Olyphant), a drug 
dealer, but when she doesn't have enough money to pay him for the pills, 
she forces her friend, Claire (Katie Holmes), to stay with him as 
colateral. As predicted, things don't go quite as planned.
Switching back to the opening of the film, we now follow Simon on his 
wild trip to Las Vegas with his three buddies (Taye Diggs, Breckin 
Meyer, and James Duval), where he runs into problems after sleeping with 
two strangers, causing a large fire, and breaking the "no-touch" rule 
when he hires a stripper to dance for Marcus (Diggs) and him.
The last story involves Zack and Adam, two soap opera actors, who 
unwittingly find themselves having Christmas dinner with a sexually 
determined cop (William Fichtner) and his oddball wife (Jane Krakowski). 
These three tales, as well as several enjoyable and well-written 
subplots, one in which involves the unexpected romantic coupling of 
good-girl Claire and the shady Todd, all inevitably careen and cross 
paths with each other by the film's end, but many of the plot 
developments really are genuinely surprising and satisfying. 
There are many pleasures to be had in "Go," but one of the greatest 
satisfactions is in the unorthodox way that the film is made, as it 
actually leaves it up to you to use your mind and follow all of the 
feuding stories. You rarely see this in a wide-release film, and 
sometimes it can be distracting, but "Go" moves so smoothly through time 
that it was almost impossible not to get caught up in the proceedings. 
Not only that, but I am the type of person who especially loves to 
discover films without having the outcome be telegraphed well in 
advance. Here, there is no way to figure out how everything is going to 
turn out, and it was this anticipation that involved me even more. John 
August should be personally thanked for writing the sharp-witted and 
entertaining screenplay, which, at a swift 100 minutes, gives the 
characters enough time to have many intriguing conversations and 
distinguish themselves with each other.
In the acting department, I doubt a superior young cast could have been 
possibly executed, and this was an impressive career move for all 
involved. Giving the best performance is Katie Holmes, who also has 
likability on her side since she is, perhaps, the only non-slimy 
character in the whole film. Not only that, but Holmes really does prove 
how promising she is as an actress, as the words in the superb 
screenplay effortlessly roll out of her mouth like wildfire. Also 
particular standouts are Sarah Polley, so much different than her 
sympathetic parapalegic role in 1997's "The Sweet Hereafter," and Taye 
Diggs, who sparks all of his scenes to life (as if the movie didn't 
already have enough life to it!).
Although "Go" may appear from the television ads like it is another
 teen-oriented movie, it really isn't at all. In fact, the youngest 
character is probably around nineteen or twenty, and the age group goes 
all the way up to one central character who is in his forties. 
Thankfully, there's no high school in sight, nor is there a prom, or a 
cliched plot.
Director Doug Liman made a splash in 1996 with his indie film, 
"Swingers," starring Jon Favreau and Vince Vaughn, and he actually 
improves upon that film to bring us something more assured and complex. 
Kudos also go out to the gritty cinematography by Liman himself, which 
is a spectacle to see (particularly the rave scenes), and the 
perfectly-assembled soundtrack, with the song, "New," by No Doubt, 
making a big impression. A goofy, hilarious sequence has another of 
Ronna's friends (Nathan Bexton) hallucinating from taking a hit of 
ecstacy and imagining that he is dancing with a grocery story customer 
to the Macarena song.
If there is a problem with "Go," it is the same problem I had with the 
slightly superior "Pulp Fiction," which is that for all of its 
intricacies, the movie ultimately doesn't really lead up to much. The 
twists and turns are sorted out, yes, but what I mean is that nothing 
much is solved, as everything simply circles around in time. 
Fortunately, the performances, direction, screenplay, and impressive 
technical aspects work together as a solid unit to make the exciting 
journey to nowhere a great deal of fun. In short, "Go" really does, 
well, go! 
    Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
    Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Urban Legends: Final Cut (2000)
Directed by John Ottman.
Cast: Jennifer Morrison, Matthew Davis, Loretta Devine, Hart Bochner, Joseph 
Lawrence, Eva Mendez, Jessica Cauffiel, Anthony Anderson, Michael Bacall, 
Anson Mount, Marco Hofschneider, Chas Lawther.
2000 - 98 minutes
Rated R (for violence, gore, profanity, and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, September 23, 2000.
1998's slasher thriller "Urban Legend" may have been disregarded by a lot of 
reviewers for following the same formula as 1996's groundbreaking "Scream," 
but it was, to me, the most stylishly made and cleverly written of all its 
so-called "clones." The idea of a killer murdering people based on urban 
legends--folk tales that have been passed down as true stories even though 
they never actually happened--was a novel one, and director Jamie Blanks 
succeeded in creating both heightened tension and a visceral mood. "Urban 
Legend" ultimately went on to gross $38-million, considerably more than its 
limited budget, and if there's one thing you should know about the horror 
genre, it's that any movie that makes money gets a sequel within the next two 
or three years. In the case of "Urban Legend," it took exactly two years--to 
the weekend.
"Urban Legends: Final Cut," the directorial debut of editor/music composer 
John Ottman (1995's "The Usual Suspects"), is predictably inferior to its 
predecessor, as almost all sequels are, but it prospers by going in an 
entirely new direction from the original and nailing out more than its fair 
share of fresh ideas. The movie is entertaining and atmospheric, and its blur 
between fantasy and reality is ingeniously executed, if similar in nature to 
2000's "Scream 3."
The movie is set at New England-based Alpine University, a prestigious film 
school that gives away the Hitchcock Award every year for the most 
outstanding student film, almost guaranteeing a shot at the big time in 
Hollywood. Amy Mayfield (Jennifer Morrison) is one of the determined 
hopefuls, a primarily documentary filmmaker who, after getting a ride to the 
library on a blustery, snowy evening from the school's security guard Reese 
(Loretta Devine), gets the inventive idea of making a horror movie about a 
killer whose murders are, indeed, based on urban legends. Reese insists that 
the ghastly murders that occurred at nearby Pendleton U several years before 
are true, but that, nonetheless, it would make a good movie.
As Amy's film progresses, she gradually grows suspicious when her classmates 
begin disappearing, not the least of when she witnesses an apparent snuff 
film of one of them being brutally murdered on the darkened, closed-down set 
of her movie. Someone is clearly out to not only sabotage Amy's dreams, but 
to do away with all of the people helping out on her crew.
Easily the most innovative twist in "Urban Legends: Final Cut" is the way the 
ill-fated characters become literal pawns in urban legends brought to life, 
all the while Amy's movie on the very same subject films on at the same time. 
Even more so than in "Scream 3," the way that reality and fiction intermix is 
extremely well done.
What the sequel lacks, however, is the memorable characters of the original, 
as well as the taut pacing that made the 1998 film so exciting and 
suspenseful. Screenwriters Paul Harris Boardman and Scott Derrickson have not 
constructed nearly as tightly written a script as Silvio Horta did, nor is 
Ottman quite as assured a first-time director as Blanks was. Meanwhile, the 
mystery involving who the killer is is not only unforeseen, but the amount of 
suspects and red herrings involved aids in adding much fun to the proceedings.
As the film's heroine Amy, Jennifer Morrison (1999's "Stir of Echoes") is a 
surprising choice for the lead since she is such a little-known actress, but 
as with the majority of the cast, their lack of general star power acts in 
showing off a bunch of new talent who are able to create believable 
characters, since there is no star baggage to go along with them. Morrison is 
likable, if not quite up to par with Alicia Witt's Natalie in the first film.
The supporting cast includes the rather bland Matthew Davis, playing the dual 
role of film student Travis and his brooding twin brother Trevor; Marco 
Hofschneider (1992's "Europa, Europa"), hamming it up and having a heck of a 
time in the process, as sleek, womanizing cinematographer Simon; the 
charismatic Eva Mendez, as camera technician Vanessa, who secretly harbors a 
crush on Amy; the very funny Jessica Cauffiel (2000's "Road Trip"), as bad 
actress Sandra; and Joseph Lawrence (TV's "Blossom"), wasted as showoff 
hotshot Graham. The sole returnee of "Urban Legend" comes in the form of that 
film's best character, security guard Reese, who has an affinity for acting 
out blaxploitation films, and aspires to be just like her idol, Pam Grier. 
Loretta Devine, as in the original, steals every scene she is in, and should 
there possibly ever be a second sequel, deserves to be the main star.
Aside from one disturbing sequence in which a girl wakes up in a bathtub full 
of ice, only to see that her kidney has been removed and lays on the table 
next to her, the film is never very scary, but it is consistently 
entertaining and surprisingly funny, as it offers up several great lines of 
dialogue and stringently follows the conventions of recent slasher films. 
"Urban Legends: Final Cut" is not a work of high art, but it is a relatively 
classy horror picture, and director John Ottman has proven that he can 
successfully cross over from being, not only a gifted composer, but also a 
respectable filmmaker.

Title
Review for Hilary and Jackie (1998)
Directed by Anaud Tucker.
Cast: Emily Watson, Rachel Griffiths, James Frain, David Morrissey, 
Charles Dance, Auriol Evans, Keely Flanders, Celia Imrie, Rupert 
Penry-Jones, Bill Paterson. 
1998 - 121 minutes.
Rated R (for profanity and sex).
Reviewed December 15, 1998.
By Dustin Putman Dustin
Putman's Film Reviews>
One of the most powerful images in Anaud Tucker's "Hilary and Jackie," 
is of Jackie de Pre (Emily Watson) sitting in her living room all alone, 
shaking violently, a sufferer of multiple sclerosis. Heartbreaking 
moments like this, mixed with observant scenes involving cello playing, 
is what caused, "Hilary and Jackie," to be such a natural and human 
drama.
The film, based on the autobiography by Hilary de Pre, entitled, A 
Genius in the Family, spans four decades, from the 1950's to the 1980's, 
as it follows two close-knit sisters, Hilary (Rachel Griffiths) and 
Jackie, who, during childhood, were masterful at playing the flute and 
cello, and won many competitions. As they grew up, however, they took 
different paths. Hilary, realizing how inferior she was to her younger 
sister at playing, gave up the flute and married Daniel Barenboim (James 
Frain), moving to the secluded countryside of England. Meanwhile, 
Jackie, who knows she cannot live without her sister, goes into a deep 
depression, nearly giving up the cello, and just as she began performing 
again, was ultimately diagnosed with multiple sclerosis.
"Hilary and Jackie," follows a rather basic, ordinary storyline, and 
although some of it could be telegraphed in advance, other sections of 
the picture genuinely surprised me. Also throwing conventional 
storytelling to the winds, a la Quentin Tarantino, the film follows 
Hilary through a large portion of her life, and then circles back, 
following Jackie's point-of-view during the same time frame. Although 
there was no real purpose to choose such a style, the film, I think, 
grew because of this. By showing Hilary's perspective, and then 
Jackie's, there are many revelations in the characters, and we are able 
to understand more deeply what Jackie, confused and lonely, was going 
through.
After giving one of the breakthrough performances of the decade in 
1996's brilliant, "Breaking the Waves," Emily Watson has created another 
thorough, exact character, and yet Jackie is quite different from her 
"Waves" character, Bess. When she grows more and more helpless from the 
disease, the film became occasionally too heart-rending to sit through, 
but director Anaud Tucker should be applauded for not looking away from 
multiple sclerosis. He courageously chose, instead, to look the illness 
straight in its face, in all of its tragedy and sadness. Rachel 
Griffiths, as Hilary, is every bit the perfect match for Watson, and one 
particular scene involving her during the conclusion was particularly 
moving. 
The other performances in the film were not quite as good, or memorable, 
because they were all mostly underwritten. This flaw did not much affect 
my feelings for the film, however, because this is a story about two 
sisters, not about their various husbands and family, although we do get 
a look into their childhoods. Played superbly as children by Keely 
Flanders and Auriol Evans, the early scenes were especially effective 
because of the sense we got, in which, as Jackie surpassed Hilary in her 
talent of an instrument, her parents sort of pushed Hilary to the side, 
as if she wasn't as important.
It isn't really giving anything away to say that Jackie du Pre, 
unfortunately, died at the age of 42 in 1987, due to her illness. 
"Hilary and Jackie," is a glorious, seemingly accurate tribute to this 
obvious talent, who has widely been considered the greatest musical 
prodigy of the 20th-century. The fact that her life was unfairly cut 
short seems like a crime, since she was an overall good person who 
happened to have a lot of internal and emotional conflicts throughout 
her life. The final scene, set at an unidentified, dreamy beach, and 
involving the two sisters as children, returned to the set-up of the 
opening sequence, and not only was the cinematography by David Johnson 
gorgeous to look at, but the implications of what is said in the scene 
was a thought-provoking and poignant way to conclude the ode to Jackie 
du Pre's life. 

Title
Review for Original Sin (2001)
Directed by Michael Cristofer. 
Cast: Antonio Banderas, Angelina Jolie, Thomas Jane, Jack Thompson, Gregory 
Itzin, Allison Mackie, John Pringle, Cordelia Richards, James Haven. 
2001 - 116 minutes 
Rated R (for violence, sex, and nudity). 
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, August 3, 2001. 
Well, here's something we don't see very often. "Original Sin," based on the 
novel "Waltz Into Darkness" by Cornell Woolrich, is a motion picture that has 
enlisted the aide of two big stars to tell a melodramatic, overwrought 
potboiler. It plays like a cross between the latest installment of the 
direct-to-video erotica series, "Body Chemistry," and 1999's elegantly woven 
"The Talented Mr. Ripley," yet its occasional dips into pure insipid 
filmmaking are so loopy it sort of invokes a charm all its own. 
Told through elongated flashbacks by American temptress Julia Russell 
(Angelina Jolie), who is in jail and about to be executed for an unknown 
crime, her troublesome ways lead her into the arms of Luis Vargas (Antonio 
Banderas), a wealthy, Cuban merchant who requests for a mail-order bride. She 
comes in the form of the bewitching Julia, who doesn't look like the picture 
that has been sent to him, but explains that she didn't want a man that was 
only looking for external beauty. Moving in with Luis and instantly getting 
married, Julia and Luis are both taken by surprise when they find that they 
truly are connecting and falling in love with one another. 
Enter Detective Walter Downs (Thomas Jane), a man sent by Julia's sister to 
search for her whereabouts when she doesn't receive a reply to the letters 
she has mailed. Soon after, Julia disappears (along with practically all of 
Luis' bank account). Had Julia been merely deceiving Luis the entire time? 
And who exactly is she, when it is discovered that the real Julia Russell was 
murdered while on the ship transporting her to Cuba--the same one that the 
fraudulent "Julia" was on? 
Written and directed by Michael Cristofer (who got his start with Jolie on 
the cable movie, "Gia"), "Original Sin" is a "Jeckyl and Hyde"-sort of tale, 
both in terms of plotting and payoff. Until the very end, the characters 
remain specters whose true intentions are always in question, and even then, 
their true selves are left open for debate. As a thriller set during the turn 
of the 20th-century, the film moves at a relatively slow pace, yet casts a 
spell of mystery of intrigue that is palpably felt. It features moments of 
sheer power and earnestness (and even a few surprising twists), and others 
that are so misdirected and ludicrously written, they must be seen to be 
believed. The movie is not a comedy, but judging from the near-consistent 
laughter that came from the audience, it has what it takes to become a camp 
classic. Like 1980's infamous "Mommie Dearest," the picture is serious-minded 
and ambitious, yet so incredibly banal as to become an unintentional riot. 
To get an idea of just how goofy the movie can get, a key character blatantly 
shoots another right in front of two police officers, and then nonchalantly 
tells them that there's no need for him to get medical help--because he's now 
dead for good! In a "Naked Gun"-style spoof, this would be a comedic 
showstopper. In a serious period piece, it is so uninhibitedly oddball that 
it almost crosses over into the realm of brilliance for its sincerely 
clueless courageousness. 
Just for keeping a straight face throughout, Antonio Banderas (2001's "Spy 
Kids") and Angelina Jolie (much better here than in this summer's "Tomb 
Raider") should receive well-earner accolades. Both actors bring an 
unexpected intensity to their roles that often manage to hide the technical 
inanities of the film, and for Jolie, this is her most challenging and 
impressive turn since 1999's "Girl, Interrupted," for which she won an Oscar. 
In a pivotal supporting role, Thomas Jane (1999's "Deep Blue Sea") is 
exceptional as the detective who teams up with Luis to find, and possibly 
murder, Julia. Jane has a smoldering profundity about him that calls upon the 
incomparable Russell Crowe for inspiration. 
Of special note for those interested, Banderas and Jolie also perform a 
couple of sex scenes that are so prolonged and explicit (with Banderas 
getting ample opportunity to show off his backside, and Jolie exposing her 
double--ahem--assets), they could almost pass for soft-corn porn. How this 
got past the MPAA with an R-rating when the blasphemous organization unfairly 
strikes down upon every other sexual situation that occurs in today's movies 
is one for the stars. 
I can't wholeheartedly recommend "Original Sin," although fans of the actors 
will certainly want to check them out in very good performances stuck in one 
of the weirdest big-budget movies to come around the pike in some time. Is it 
a laugh riot? An erotic thriller in the vein of "Red Shoe Diaries?" An 
involving romantic mystery that, as Julia Russell so eloquently puts it, "is 
not a love story, but a story about love?" You be the judge. One thing's for 
certain: "Original Sin" may not be looked upon as a particularly good movie 
(and it isn't), but it surely won't be forgotten. 

Title
Review for Payback (1999)
Directed by Brian Helgeland.
Cast: Mel Gibson, Gregg Henry, Maria Bello, David Paymer, William 
Devane, Lucy Alexis Liu, Bill Duke, Deborah Kara Unger, Kris 
Kristofferson.
1999 - 102 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, sexual situations, and blood).
Reviewed February 6, 1999.
"Payback," Brian Helgeland's inauspicious directing debut 
(coincidentally, he previously penned the award-winning screenplay for 
1997's "L.A. Confidential"), is a wildly uneven and thoroughly 
unpleasant revenge thriller that takes one idea---a movie with non-stop 
violence, death, and villains---and runs with it, or should I say, 
barely manages to crawl away with it.
Mel Gibson, in yet another disappointing picture ("Conspiracy Theory" 
and "Lethal Weapon 4," anyone?), stars as the reprehensible 
villain/hero, Porter, a man who becomes determined to get his 50% share 
of $140,000, which he stole in a robbery, back when his partner-in-crime 
(Gregg Henry) and drug-addicted wife (Deborah Kara Unger) double-cross 
him, shoot him, and leave him for dead. Porter is not dead, 
however---not by a long shot---as he quickly rehabilitates and, along 
with his loyal prositute girlfriend, Rosie (Maria Bello), sets out to 
make everyone involved in the scam pay.
The tagline for "Payback" is, "get ready to root for the bad guy," and 
sure enough, this is true, as pretty much every significant character 
who appears is crooked in some way. I wouldn't have a problem with this 
offbeat detail if the painfully thin story had been of any interest, but 
it wasn't, and therefore, I found myself having an especially laborious 
time investing myself into a wide array of character that have 
absolutely no redeeming qualities whatsoever. No attempt is made to 
flesh the roles into three-dimensional characters, and there are no 
vacant signs that anyone has any sort of humanity in them. Just because 
the protagonist, a "bad guy," is played by Mel Gibson doesn't mean I 
will "root for him," and I didn't. Quite the contrary, every person in 
the movie deserved to die a gory death (although some of them did, 
anyway, just to spice up the dull proceedings).
Since none of the respectable actors in "Payback" actually have human 
beings to play, only one performance managed to stand out. Lucy Alexis 
Liu (of T.V.'s "Ally McBeal"), who plays a spicy S&M dominatrix, 
brightens up every scene she is in, and has a definite flair for comedy, 
something I would have liked to have seen more of, since most of the 
humor fell with a resounding splat. Meanwhile, Gibson, who is perfectly 
fine here, sleepwalks through a role that is not the least bit 
challenging. Unger, who made an impression in 1997's "The Game," is 
surprisingly wasted and it is difficult to see why she took such a part 
since she disappears ten minutes in, and only has two purproses: (1) to 
get high on heroin, and (2) because she plays a key part in an early 
flashback. Finally, Kris Kristofferson appears in a throwaway role 
during the climax, and this unnecessary plot development sticks out like 
a sore thumb (tellingly, he didn't appear in the original cut of the 
film, but was cast when extensive reshoots took place months later).
Like most action movies, the star often takes a licking but keeps on 
ticking. In the course of the 102-minute running time of "Payback," 
Porter is shot three times in the back, hit by a van, beaten up, and has 
his feet smashed with a sledgehammer. And guess what? Not only does he 
survive the whole ordeal, but he is happy-go-lucky in the penultimate 
sequence (and can still walk!), even though he looks like he had 
recently substituted for a punching bag. 
"Payback" is not, in any way, an entertaining film, even though I am 
sure the makers hoped it would be with all the graphic carnage that goes 
on, but take away that violence and what you are basically left with is 
a blank screen. Perhaps director Helgeland would have been smart to 
consider this, so he could have at least added a few worthwhile 
elements, like a fresh storyline and characters whom you could even 
remotely stand to be around for a few hours. 

Title
Review for Bats (1999/I)
Directed by Louis Morneau.
Cast: Lou Diamond Phillips, Dina Meyer, Leon, Bob Gunton, Carlos Jacott.
1999 - 90 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and mild gore).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, October 22, 1999.
If you thought last summer's "Lake Placid," one of the most recent 
"nature-run-amok" horror flicks, was unsatisfying, wait until you get a load 
of "Bats," a PG-13-rated snoozefest that is just about as mild and unscary as 
a film can be in this genre. The premiere picture for new movie studio, 
Destination Films, it is obvious that they timed the release perfectly so as 
to cash in on the impending holiday, but in their mad rush to get it finished 
and out in theaters, they have forgotten a few vital elements, such as 
likable characters that you can root for, hair-raising chills, and a story 
that actually makes sense. Halloween may bring it in some fast cash at the 
box-office, but "Bats" is strictly direct-to-video fare, and it certainly 
doesn't bode well for Destination, which is off to a disasterous start.
The pre-credits sequence features a teenage couple parked out in the middle 
of a desolate desert road. The guy thinks he feels something swipe by his 
arm, which was hanging out the window, so he goes to check it out. Then, BAM! 
You know the routine, and this tried-and-true horror cliche can often be fun. 
Unfortunately, because of the PG-13 rating they must adhere to, the attack 
scene is a collage of quick, flashy cuts, which are rather difficult to make 
out. Even on the most elementary level, "Bats" fails miserably.
Switch to young bat researcher (now there's a career!) Sheila Casper (Dina 
Meyer) and her wise-cracking assistant (Leon), who are approached to travel 
to Gallup, Arizona, to investigate a series of murders believed to be caused 
by bats. This is impossible, Sheila skepticizes, because bats aren't 
carnivorous. That's, of course, before Sheila, along with the town sheriff, 
Emmett Kimsey (Lou Diamond Phillips), discover mad scientist Dr. McCabe (Bob 
Gunton) has created two biologically-altered bats who have the ability to 
pass on a virus throughout their species, rendering them deadly. Soon, the 
small desert town is being overrun by the black-winged serpents, and it is up 
to our three zero-dimensional heroes to stop them.
If I had known that the film was going to be so depressingly bad, and that 
the word, 'bats,' was going to be uttered to the point of nausea, I would 
have kept myself busy by counting the exact number of times it is spoken. In 
all seriousness, the word, 'bats,' is mentioned in at least fifty percent of 
the lines of dialogue, clearly out of desperation to keep the film 
interesting when it's actually extremely dull. No attempt is made in the 
vacuous screenplay, by John Logan, to develop the characters or the 
relationships, and the plot itself furiously comes into focus in the first 
ten minutes, and is never brought up again. In place of intelligence, we get 
scene after scene of extras running around screaming, a 'la Hitchcock's "The 
Birds," but without any of the excitement. And once that ends, a prolonged, 
insipid climax comes into play, set in the pure daylight!
With visual effects that are adequately convincing, bats that are about as 
believable as the Muppets, and three performers (Phillips, Meyer, and Leon) 
who are unquestionably above this grade-Z material, the most annoying thing 
about "Bats" is its out-and-out earnestness. With a premise as ridiculous as 
this one, at least a little bit of self-knowing jokiness is needed to show 
viewers that, yes, the filmmakers know it's silly. Ultimately, the only 
comedy present is in Leon's lame-o one-liners, and that earnestness--it just 
never lets up! Had the tone of "Bats" been along the lines of 1995's 
intentionally campy, "Tales From the Crypt Presents Demon Knight," director 
Louis Morneau, in an inauspicious jump to the big leagues after his work on 
the surprisingly superior "Carnosaur 2," might have been onto something. As 
is, "Bats" is low-rent horror garbage, and one of those rare theatrical 
outings that actually deserves to be relegated to the junk bin at video 
stores across the world.

Title
Review for Down to You (2000)
Directed by Kris Isacsson.
Cast: Freddie Prinze, Jr., Julia Stiles, Zak Orth, Shawn Hatosy, Selma Blair, 
Henry Winkler, Rosario Dawson, Lucie Arnaz, Ashton Kutcher.
2000 - 95 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, January 21, 2000.
At first glance at the cast list, one may instantly become under the 
impression that "Down to You" is a "teen" movie. There's Freddie Prinze, Jr. 
("She's All That"), Julia Stiles ("10 Things I Hate About You"), Selma Blair 
("Cruel Intentions"), Shawn Hatosy ("Outside Providence"), Rosario Dawson 
("Light It Up"), and Ashton Kutcher (TV's "That '70s Show"). Times, how they 
are a' changin', as all of these actors have graduated from being in high 
school to college, and the finale is even set after college graduation. What 
has remained the same, however, are the maturity levels of the characters, 
most of which rarely act like adults, but rather twentysomethings who are 
still stuck in their high school days. 
Told in flashback as the two central characters annoyingly chatter away 
directly at the screen, discussing how their relationship blossomed, and then 
ultimately welted away, it is clear Al Connelly (Freddie Prinze, Jr.), an 
aspiring chef, and Imogen (Julia Stiles), a talented artist, are still in 
love with each other, so we are forced to sit around for ninety minutes until 
their inevitable reconciliation. Any film with such a predictable premise 
can, of course, still work, but it is vital that the writing be sharp, the 
actors appealing, and the plot developments satisfying and involving. One out 
of three isn't too bad, considering that it is January, the usual dumping 
ground for films that the studios have little confidence in, and that the 
other two 2000 movies I've seen ("Next Friday" and "Supernova") have been 
haphazard, to put it mildly.
When a film uses the vexatious gimmick of characters narrating the story as 
they talk squarely to the camera, the technique is usually a sign of 
amateurishness and desperation on the filmmaker's part. First-time 
feature-film director Kris Isacsson also wrote the screenplay to "Down to 
You," and you can easily tell it's a novice effort, as its approach to the 
subject matter is often shallow, uneven, or just a plain, old bad idea (Al 
talking to a spider in the middle of a supposed-to-be dramatic montage pops 
instantly to mind). The relationship between Al and Imogen, which the film 
centers entirely around, is one that isn't nearly developed enough to be 
fully engaging. After a couple charming early sequences where they "get to 
know each other," an overwhelming number of scenes between the two take place 
in bed, and since this is a PG-13 movie we're talking about, the proceedings 
come off as acutely tame, and rarely ever push the plot forward.
As Al and Imogen, Freddie Prinze, Jr. and Julia Stiles have winning chemistry 
with one another, but Stiles consistently acts Prinze, Jr. right off the 
screen. Clearly, a refreshingly bright talent, Stiles has been a standout in 
both last spring's superior "10 Things I Hate About You" and this film, and 
is able to inquire an added level of layers to her character of Imogen. We 
care for Imogen, and what happens with her, because she is an intelligent, 
sweet-natured young woman with ideas and goals for herself. In contrast, 
Prinze, Jr. is undeserving of his recent rising popularity. Frequently wooden 
or unable to sell the lines of dialogue he is given, his very limited thesp 
abilities are even more noticeable next to Stiles. Due to this, Al isn't a 
believable character, and next to Imogen, he seems intellectually lacking. 
What Imogen sees in Al outside of his cute physical appearance never is made 
particularly clear, and that is probably because Isacsson was unsure himself 
while penning the uneven script.
The supporting characters are almost unanonymously badly handled, with only 
Zak Orth and Shawn Hatosy, as Al's best friends, turning in something 
resembling more than one dimension. Orth, especially, makes quite an 
impression as Monk, a quirky pornography filmmaker whom Al is always going to 
for advice. Throughout the picture, up until his final scene, Orth is 
gradually able to unveil Monk's human side, and there is a very subtle 
development late in that is the one surprising element of the film, and 
actually makes perfect sense when you think back on his earlier scenes. 
Hatosy has less to do, but is a naturalistic actor, one that never 
disappoints, no matter how limiting his role is (and let's face it, it is very
 limited here). Meanwhile, Selma Blair, as Cyrus, a part-time student/adult 
film actress, is criminally wasted and only sketchily written, while Rosario 
Dawson, as Imogen's party-girl friend Lana, has even less to do.
"Down to You" is saved from being a total washout because of its final ten 
minutes, which hint at the possible depth and perceptiveness that the rest of 
the film is sorely lacking in its topics of true love and lasting 
relationships. The actors all have the ability to give strong performances, 
as they have in the past (except for Prinze, Jr., who hasn't proven anything 
to me yet), but either they are brought down by the unskillful writing, or by 
not even being given the chance to create flesh-and-blood characters. For 
example, Blair's Cyrus, we sense, is an individual hiding her insecurities 
just underneath the surface--a possibly intriguing subplot that the film 
frustratingly bypasses. For all of its attractive attributes, "Down to You" 
never rises above being merely skin-deep.

Title
Review for Detroit Rock City (1999)
Directed by Adam Rifkin.
Cast: Edward Furlong, Sam Huntington, James DeBello, Giuseppe Andrews, Lin 
Shaye, Natasha Lyonne, Melanie Lynskey, Shannon Tweed, Kevin Corrigan.
Special Appearances: KISS (Gene Simmons, Paul Stanley, Ace Frehley, Peter 
Criss).
1999 - 94 minutes.
Rated R (for profanity, sexual situations, drug use, violence, and nudity).
Reviewed August 14, 1999.
Set over a 24-hour period in 1978, "Detroit Rock City," directed by 
first-timer Adam Rifkin, is nothing much more than an ode to the hard 
rock/heavy-metal music scene, particularly the band, KISS, fans of which this 
loud, lewd, and crude comedy was made exclusively for. You do not, however, 
have to like them in order to enjoy the film, as proven by myself. Watching 
the film, I was entertained for the most part, even though it was obvious 
where the story was going every step of the way, but once it was over, the 
nagging question on my mind, as well as probably everyone else's, was, "What 
exactly was the point?" 
The movie doesn't take any time to get started, nor does it ever stop until 
the end credits begin, as we follow four stoner teenage boys who are 
determined to acquire tickets to the highly-publicized KISS concert in 
Detroit, Michigan, no matter what. Comprising an amateur metal band of their 
own, the members that make up KISS are their ultimate role models, and seeing 
them perform live has been something they have been attempting to do for 
three years straight. Once in Detroit, the film breaks off to follow each of 
the four protagonists on their own wild and wacky adventures. After Jam's 
(Sam Huntington) religious, chain-smoking mother (Lin Shaye) catches him with 
KISS tickets (whom she has dubbed the "Knights In Satan's Service"), she 
quickly dispatches of them and takes him to a boarding school. When Jam's 
three friends break him out of the joint and make it to the titled city, 
Jam's mother, there to protest the concert with other outraged parents, sees 
her son in the crowd and forces him to go to church and make a confession. 
While in there, a girl from school (Melanie Lynskey) who has had a long-time 
crush on him and is about the move away with her parents, runs into him and 
they have a quick tryst within the confessional. The leader of the group, 
Hawk (Edward Furlong), doesn't have enough money to pay the scalper, so he 
enters a strip contest at the local bar, and inadvertently catches the eyes 
of a voluptuous older woman (Shannon Tweed). Trip (James DeBello) attempts to 
steal some tickets off of a young kid at a convenience store, and gets into 
big trouble when he finds the child is with his much, much bigger older 
brother. And Lex (Giuseppe Andrews) must save Christine (Natasha Lyonne), a 
teenage disco diva who is being held hostage by a pair of car thieves.
"Detroit Rock City" has enough extra energy for several movies, and with a 
constant fast pace and 94-minute running time, doesn't overstay its welcome. 
Slight, stupid, and sparingly sweet in a few spots, the film fails, in part, 
due to the characters themselves. All of the subplots that are developed 
throughout are instantly dropped once the foursome inevitably make it inside 
the concert, watch KISS perform one song, and...well, that's it. The end 
credits blaze across the scene so quickly that it not only leaves you feeling 
unsatisfied, but also clueless as to why some of the up-and-coming actors 
even appeared in the movie, only to be wasted. 
The performances of the four main characters are servicable enough, but are 
no match for the colorful supporting players, all of which give it their 
valiant best, even when they have nothing to do. After making a splash in 
Woody Allen's magical 1996 musical, "Everyone Says I Love You," Natasha 
Lyonne has mostly been placed in small secondary roles (also see 
"Krippendorf's Tribe" and "American Pie") that do not give this big talent 
nearly enough to do. As the disco-loving Christine, Lyonne garners one of the 
film's biggest laughs but disappears for almost the rest of the film, only to 
make a brief appearance towards the end that has no payoff. Also a standout 
is Lin Shaye, as Jam's strict mother. Shaye not only has the most fun in her 
somewhat juicy comic role, but is also downright hysterically funny, and has 
a concluding scene that is even a little touching. Shaye, notable mostly for 
her standout role in "There's Something About Mary," is quickly becoming one 
of the queens of the "supporting roles," right up there with Janeane Garofalo 
and Parker Posey. And Melanie Lynskey, as the girl who pines for Jam from 
afar, momentarily brings some unexpected warmth to her scenes, but like the 
rest of the minor characters, leaves the proceedings too soon.
With one of the best film soundtracks to come along in some time (right up 
there with "Dick" and "Summer of Sam"), the '70s music keeps the movie 
energetic and lively, with a few original, lesser-known song choices. 
Additionally, the outstanding costume designs and set decoration capture the 
period flavor extremely well, and the lively cinematography, by John R. 
Leonetti, often feels like you are watching a prolonged MTV advertisement. 
"Detroit Rock City" is a passable time-waster, but shouldn't director Rifkin 
have aimed just a little bit higher in the substance department, so that the 
movie wouldn't be totally devoid of a reason for being? Coming at a time when 
"American Pie" has already depicted four boys losing their virginity at the 
same time, and "Forces of Nature" involved a comic scene in a strip joint, 
most of the movie feels just plain outdated, even for being set over two 
decades ago. A nice, respective try, but "Detroit Rock City" just misses the 
mark.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman.
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Wild Wild West (1999)
An old television show (this time being the 1960s western/sci-fi series, "The 
Wild Wild West") turned into a big-screen feature film in the 1990s. Sound 
familiar? It should, considerieng that it's been done probably two dozen 
times in the last nine ten years, and not one of them have been good. Let's 
see, there was "The Flintstones," "Sgt. Bilko," "McHale's Navy," "Leave it to 
Beaver," "Maverick," "Lost in Space," "The Mod Squad,"...want me to go on?
Set in 1869, special government agent Jim West (Will Smith) and brilliant 
inventor and master of disguise Artemus Gordon (Kevin Kline) are paired 
together by President Ulysses S. Grant (Kline, again) to stop the evil 
mastermind, Dr. Arliss Loveless (Kenneth Branagh), whose legs have been 
amputated and who is planning to take over the world with a giant mechanical, 
fire-throwing tarantula. In hot pursuit of Loveless, West and Gordon hop 
aboard a train, do wacky things, get off and are captured by Loveless, are 
chased by round metal razors through a cornfield, and finally, save the 
president, as well as a scantily-clad damsel-in-distress (Salma Hayek), and 
defeat Loveless and his entourage. The End.
If you are wondering what happened to the rest of the movie, or think that 
I'm exaggerating, I'm not. Basically, what you see in the trailer is what you 
get, and nothing more. 100 minutes long, but seeming more like an hour, "Wild 
Wild West" is the latest brainless special-effects extravaganza without any 
thought going into the story or characters. The film is an empty-headed 
excursion, not excruciating to sit through, but who would want to waste their 
money on something a 10-year-old could have written with more dimensions? A 
terrible sign to begin with, the screenplay was written by not one, not two, 
not three, but four different people who would probably prefer to remain 
nameless.
As Jim West, Will Smith is Will Smith, still the suave, wise-cracking hero 
who saves the day. Kevin Kline is clearly the more accomplished thespian and 
he proves it here, even in the midst of the intellectually dead story. Kline 
does wring a few laughs out of the screenplay, but something tells me that 
most of it was improvised and those jokes that work owe more than a little to 
his comic skills. Kenneth Branagh, as the wily Dr. Loveless, is doing nothing 
but grabbing a paycheck and running (at least, I hope, since those optical 
effects of his amputated legs are awfully realistic). And then we come to 
Salma Hayek, such a charming actress who is always far more funny and 
well-used when she makes talk show appearances, as opposed to appearing in 
movies. Hayek is fresh-faced, giddy, and is so severely wasted that, if I 
didn't know better, would guess she filmed all of her underwritten scenes in 
one day.
The only true saving grace of "Wild Wild West" is the marvelous production 
design by Bo Welch that is always fun to look at, and the offbeat music score 
by Elmer Bernstein. Too bad what we are watching within these technical 
aspects is devoid of any original ideas, and rarely any sort of comedic wit.
"Wild Wild West" is Will Smith's third film in the last four years to open on 
the 4th of July weekend. After meeting box-office success with the junky 
"Independence Day" and the empty "Men in Black" (which was also directed by 
"WWW" filmmaker, Barry Sonnenfeld), Smith's luck may have finally run out. 
Last year's "Enemy of the State" was a step in the right direction, but Smith 
next needs to prove that he can appear in more worthwhile film (as he did in 
1993's excellent drama, "Six Degrees of Seperation"), rather than wasting his 
time on overblown Hollywood products that exit the viewers' minds as soon as 
they leave the theater. That, in a nutshell, is exactly the case of the 
not-very-wild "Wild Wild West."
      - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
        Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for You've Got Mail (1998)
 Directed by Nora Ephron.
 Cast: Meg Ryan, Tom Hanks, Greg Kinnear, Parker Posey, Jean Stapleton, 
 Dabney Coleman, Steve Zahn, Dave Chappelle.
 1998 - 118 minutes.
 Rated PG (for mild profanity).
 Reviewed December 20, 1998.
 "You've Got Mail," the third showcase that has brought together the 
 winning team of Tom Hanks and Meg Ryan (after 1990's odd-ball "Joe Vs. 
 the Volcano" and 1993's charming "Sleepless in Seattle"), obviously 
 seemed like a no-brainer for director Nora Ephron and co-writer Delia 
 Ephron since what they have basically made this time around is a ho-hum, 
 mostly sloppy retread of many far more intelligent and witty romantic 
 comedies.
 Set in New York City, Kathleen Kelly (Meg Ryan), for many years, has run 
 her late mother's quaint children's bookstore called "The Shop Around 
 the Corner" (which was the title of the original James Stewart picture, 
 for which this film is based on). She has a writer boyfriend (Greg 
 Kinnear), but has been recently sending honest and intimate e-mails over 
 AOL to a man that she first met in an Over 30 chatroom, but they have 
 decided to keep their identities anonymous. What Kathleen doesn't know 
 is that her secret e-mail buddy is actually Joe Fox (Tom Hanks), who has 
 his own hyper and giddy girlfriend (Parker Posey), and is about to open 
 a more high-profile book store on the same street, threatening 
 Kathleen's business. The gimmick for the film is that these two people 
 have grown to love each other over the internet, even though they are 
 feuding in real life.
 "You've Got Mail," is a sleek, well-photographed romantic comedy that 
 actually compliments the beauty of NYC more than the actual stars of the 
 film, since this story has been done far too many times before, and much 
 better, at that. One of the biggest problems with the film is that there 
 didn't appear to be any attempt to make an original film. No doubt, 
 Ephron assumed that she had it made once she cast Hanks and Ryan, and so 
 she forgot to add a quality screenplay. Watching the film, I didn't get 
 any sense of excitement, urgency, or suspense involving the question of 
 if Hanks and Ryan would get together at the end, since I knew for a fact 
 that they would. Far too many times, I predicted dialogue and even what 
 would occur in the next scene, and most of the time I was right on the 
 mark. If an audience member can predict what the characters are going to 
 say before they actually say it, then you know you're in trouble.
 I will not criticize Tom Hanks and Meg Ryan, since both of them have 
 proved to be talented actors, and Ryan is simply too cute for words, but 
 that is the exact problem. They are too good to be wasting their time in 
 such a tried-and-true Hollywood formula. "Sleepless in Seattle" was also 
 predictable, but that film was more sound and sharp in its writing and I 
 cared about the characters more. Why not shake things up a bit and add a 
 little creativity to the mix, instead of making what is basically an 
 inferior remake to "...Seattle?"
 Rarely have I seen so many charasmatic supporting characters wasted so 
 blatantly as they are in this movie. Greg Kinnear has the most chance of 
 a developed character, but he disappears towards the middle and there is 
 no mention of him again. Parker Posey, in her first notable role in a 
 big-budget film, is punished with the emotionless "bitch" role, and is 
 not even given one scene where she and Hanks simply talk. It's a shame 
 Ephron decided to cast such a wonderful, fresh actress, only to throw 
 her to the curb. Meanwhile, Dave Chappelle and Steve Zahn make no 
 impression whatsoever with roles that might as well have been classified 
 as extras.
 Maybe I am making it sound like I hated "You've Got Mail," which isn't 
 the case. The film was never boring, but also never what I would 
 consider entertaining. Basically, it just seemed to sit there, and it 
 amazed me how little could be accomplished, even though the running time 
 is overstretched to two hours. Hanks and Ryan, like always, have a great 
 deal of chemistry together, and I liked their characters. I liked a few 
 of the lines of dialogue (when Hanks enters a store, he introduces the 
 two children he is with as his aunt and brother). The soundtrack of 
 popular pop songs from the 70's, 80's, and 90's were fun to listen to. 
 Everything seemed in place for a charming, and I was hoping, 
 imaginative, romantic comedy, but to no avail. Nora Ephron may have hit 
 the jackpot with "Sleepless in Seattle," and I am also an admirer of her 
 underrated 1994 comedy, "Mixed Nuts," but "You've Got Mail," ultimately, 
 fails to add anything new or worthwhile into the now worn-out romantic 
 comedy genre.

Title
Review for Where the Heart Is (2000)
Directed by Matt Williams.
Cast: Natalie Portman, Ashley Judd, Dylan Bruno, James Frain, Stockard 
Channing, Richard Jones, Joan Cusack, Sally Field, Keith David.
2000 - 118 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, April 27, 2000.
Director Matt Williams' "Where the Heart Is" is such a well-meaning, 
brightly-acted slice-of-life that it's too bad more care wasn't given to the 
episodic, uneven screenplay, by Lowell Ganz and Babaloo Mandel. Moving with 
hasty rapidity through a five-year time period, with almost every following 
scene set a few weeks, or months, or even a whole year, later, the film never 
garners enough emotional interest in its characters because they always seem 
to be getting vigorously wrung through the motions. If anything, "Where the 
Heart Is" does have a big heart, but everything feels closely scripted, with 
only a few fleeting scenes boosting a human naturalism that desperately was 
needed throughout.
Based on the 1996 novel by Billie Letts that gained popularity when it was 
chosen as Oprah Winfrey's Book of the Month, "Where the Heart Is" begins as 
we meet pregnant 17-year-old Novalee Nation (Natalie Portman), who is fleeing 
her trailer park existence in Tennessee with her boyfriend, Willy Jack 
Pickens (Dylan Bruno). Stopping off at an Oklahoma-based WalMart to go to the 
bathroom and buy a pair of new shoes (her old ones fell through the hole in 
the floor of Willy's busted-up jalopy), Novalee is devastated to discover 
that he has left her stranded there when she gets back to the parking lot, 
with no trace of him or the car in sight. With literally no money or a home 
to go to, Novalee takes up shelter in WalMart, hiding in the bathroom each 
night as it closes down. Then she gives birth to the baby one late night in 
the store, and briefly becomes a highly publicized celebrity, with her 
daughter, whom she has given the sturdy name of Americus, being called the 
"WalMart Baby." 
Novalee is quickly given a home by the kindly Sister Husband (Stockard 
Channing), and WalMart hands her a job working for them. She also makes 
friends with unlucky-in-love Lexie Coop (Ashley Judd), who has four kids, 
each with a different father. All of this takes place within the opening 
half-hour, with the remaining 90 minutes light on plot, but heavy on tragedy 
and bad things happening, as Novalee may now have a roof over her head, but 
still has a life that isn't endlessly filled with wine and roses.
Surprisingly, some of the most entertaining scenes are in the subplot 
involving Willy Jack Pickens, who the film occasionally alternates back to 
after he abandons Novalee at the WalMart. Following a brief jail term for 
picking up a minor in his car, Willy, who turns out to be a talented country 
singer, heads to Nashville, where he is hired as a client by disgruntled 
agent Ruth Meyers (Joan Cusack), and quickly is given the more alluring name 
of Billy Shadow.
As Willy, Dylan Bruno (1999's "The Rage: Carrie 2") is superbly cast and a 
real find, easily holding his own in a minor storyline that otherwise goes 
nowhere and is pointless to the picture as a whole. In yet another memorable 
and funny performance, her best since her Oscar-nominated turn in 1997's "In 
and Out," Joan Cusack has loads of fun as the matter-of-fact Ruth Meyers, who 
is clearly fed up with her profession as a country music agent, but keeps 
right on chugging. Unfortunately, very little comes of the notable amount of 
time spent on this side story, save for a climactic reunion between Novalee 
and Willy, and Ruth abruptly disappears completely.
The majority of "Where the Heart Is" focuses on Novalee Nation, and the 
trials and tribulations she must go through to seek full happiness. Seemingly 
destined to never break out of her trailer trash upbringing, Novalee 
nonetheless has aspirations to become a professional photographer, as well as 
being the kind of caring parent that her own money-grubbing mother (Sally 
Field) never was. Natalie Portman has proven time and time again what a 
sparkling talent she is as an actress, and in her first adult role, this 
performance is no exception. Her character of Novalee, however, is not nearly 
as complex as her roles in 1999's "Anywhere But Here" or 1996's "Beautiful 
Girls," so it isn't quite as showy, despite equipping herself remarkably.
Best of all is Ashley Judd, whose character of Lexie Coop, a woman who 
strives for joy and a happy marriage and everything in between, but can't 
seem to find a truly compassionate and loving man to share her life with, may 
be underdeveloped, but is given most of the only genuinely honest scenes. A 
particularly heartbreaking one comes near the end that is less the work of a 
Hollywood performer, and more the work of a true-born actor, something that 
is rarely seen nowadays. Rounding out the cast are Stockard Channing, as the 
infinitely generous Sister Husband, and James Frain, as the shy, gentle 
Forney, a librarian caring for his alcoholic sister, who grows to fall deeply 
in love with Novalee, despite her only ever viewing him as a good friend.
Where "Where the Heart Is" makes its fatal mistake is in not allowing the 
characters to naturally progress throughout the film without major calamities 
popping up in nearly every scene. From tornadoes, to kidnappings, to abuse, 
to pedophilia, few subjects are left unturned by screenwriters Lowell and 
Ganz, and because of this, the proceedings come off as disjointed at almost 
every turn. While not exactly melodramatic, the emotions within are surely 
manipulative, not helped much by Mason Daring's needlessly syrupy music 
score. "Where the Heart Is" has its eclectic and talented cast in place, but 
the screenplay they are given to work with is clunky and below their 
intelligence level. They deserve better.

Title
Review for Charlie's Angels (2000)
Directed by McG.
Cast: Drew Barrymore, Cameron Diaz, Lucy Liu, Bill Murray, Sam Rockwell, 
Kelly Lynch, Crispin Glover, Tim Curry, Luke Wilson, Tom Green, Matt LeBlanc, 
LL Cool J.
2000 - 98 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for violence, profanity, and sexual innuendo).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, November 4, 2000.
After months of alleged production delays, casting and script problems, and 
endless rumors of on-set arguments, "Charlie's Angels," a big-screen 
adaptation of the cult '76-'81 television series (starring Jaclyn Smith and 
Farrah Fawcett, among others), seemed doomed for catastrophic failure. After 
all, when was the last time we saw a TV-show-turned-feature-film that was 
worthwhile, particularly when the budget was an overblown $90-million? 
Moreover, the terrible teaser trailer, with the three lead actresses 
performing their martial arts moves in front of a fiery background, was not 
exactly cause to break out the champagne glasses.
Imagine, then, the delightful surprise of watching the finished product and 
gradually realizing that I haven't had this much fun at the movies all year. 
In a nutshell, "Charlie's Angels" is an unequivocal success--a highly 
entertaining, funny, exciting, no-holds-barred, bubblegum triumph of the way 
to make a great action-comedy, as well as a rambunctious female empowerment 
fantasy.
Tough-girl Dylan (Drew Barrymore), sexy sweetheart Natalie (Cameron Diaz), 
and ultra-intelligent Alex (Lucy Liu) are Charlie's Angels: a trio of strong 
young women who work for mystery millionaire Charlie (voiced by John Forsythe 
and never seen) and his personal assistant Bosley (Bill Murray) to keep the 
world safe from nasty villains and megalomaniacs. Their latest mission is to 
rescue an electronics genius by the name of Knox (Sam Rockwell), who has been 
kidnapped by wealthy thief Roger Corwin (Tim Curry) and his silent henchman 
(Crispin Glover).
A comedic rendition of the countless James Bond flicks--only twenty times 
more fun and original--"Charlie's Angels" is not so much about its thin 
storyline as it is about the refreshingly lightweight style which feature 
film debut director McG (whose previous credits include several music videos) 
evokes. From the stunning opening sequence that begins on an airplane and 
ends on a sailboat, to the climax set around an ancient castle alongside the 
California coast, director McG clearly knows exactly how to balance all of 
his various genres, including action, comedy, and romance, for optimum 
effect. The movie is far-fetched, yet so shamelessly tongue-in-cheek as to 
never seem anything less than innocently believable.
If there was ever any on-set strife between the cast members, you won't find 
any signs of it here. Each actor finds just the perfect tone for their 
character, and they all elicit an overwhelming joy of performing. 
Actress-producer Drew Barrymore (1999's "Never Been Kissed") has found in her 
character of Dylan a chance to show off her comic flair to a greater effect 
than she ever has before. Cameron Diaz (1999's "Being John Malkovich"), as 
Natalie, is hilariously klutzy, yet smart, and has a smile so warm and 
beautiful that she sells every moment she appears here. Rounding out the 
angels is Lucy Liu (2000's "Shanghai Noon"), as streetwise Alex, who provides 
a welcome contrast to her tonally sunnier costars, and equips herself in her 
kung-fu-style action sequences quite nicely. Together, Barrymore, Diaz, and 
Liu are charismatic joys who obviously had just as much fun making the film 
as it is to watch it.
Adding an extra amount of amusement to the proceedings is the constant stream 
of costume changes the actresses goes through, as they head undercover posing 
in different disguises. There is particular entertainment to be had in a 
sequence in which Barrymore and Diaz crossdress, while the leather-clad, 
whip-striking Liu poses as a dominatrix-cum-efficiency-expert and bewitches 
every student in the class.
The supporting cast is appropriately over-the-top, and all the more enjoyable 
because of it. Bill Murray (1998's "Rushmore") returns to his purely jokey 
roots with Bosley, and makes a big impression with a not-so-large role. Sam 
Rockwell (1999's "The Green Mile") is lively and magnetic as the kidnapped 
Knox; Tim Curry is at his slimy best as Roger Corwin; and Tom Green (2000's 
"Road Trip"), Matt LeBlanc (TV's "Friends"), and Luke Wilson (1999's "Blue 
Streak") are effective as the gals' love interests.
Special notice must be made to Crispin Glover (2000's "Nurse Betty"), whose 
brooding role as The Thin Man is one of the most memorably nasty and 
appropriately animated villains to come around in years. Watch Glover 
closely; he doesn't have one line of dialogue throughout, but simply by the 
drifty way in which he carries himself and smokes his cigarettes, as if he 
were a famed magician performing his most popular trick, does he create a 
wholly fresh and despicably enjoyable character.
With sunny, attractive cinematography; fast-paced editing; a sharply clever 
screenplay by Ryan Rowe, Ed Solomon, and John August; a standout soundtrack 
that wittily includes innumerable songs featuring the word, "angel," in them, 
as well as a nice mixture of music from the '70s, '80s, '90s, and the present 
day; and awesome stunts not matched since last summer's "Mission: Impossible 
2," "Charlie's Angels" is a film that is unquestionably better than it has 
any right to be. The movie makes no halfhearted effort to be anything more 
than a happily diverting popcorn film, and by doing so, exceeds the viewer's 
highest expectations. By being unpretentious in the extreme, it is the most 
invigorating thing that has happened to the action genre in the last decade. 
"Charlie's Angels" is F-U-N, the type of movie the term, 'rollicking good 
time,' was invented for.

Title
Review for Jawbreaker (1999)
Tri-Star; rated R (language, sexual situations, violence); 87 minutes
Cast: Rose McGowan, Rebecca Gayheart, Judy Greer, Julie Benz, Chad Christ,
Ethan Erickson, Carol Kane, Pam Grier, Tatyana M. Ali.
Jawbreaker is the very definition of a "rip-off."  This uninspired teen comedy
takes equal parts Carrie (1976), Heathers (1989) and Clueless (1995) and mixes
in all the necessary teen movie clichs.  Along the way writer/director Darren
Stein forgets to give the film a life of its own.
The film opens with a voice over from geeky Fern Mayo (Judy Greer) about the
four most popular girls at Reagan High: Courtney Shayne (Rose McGowan) who can
basically be summed up as Satan in heels, Julie Freeman (Rebecca Gayheart) a
good girl with the face of a supermodel, Marcie Fox (Julie Benz) a dim-witted
blonde who demands that people call her "Foxy", and Liz Purr (Charlotte
Roldan) an angel in disguise.  Liz is everyone's favorite because she's both
beautiful and kind.
Liz is about to turn 17 and, as a prank, Courtney convinces the other girls to
help her in kidnapping Liz on her birthday morning.  In order to keep Liz from
making any noise Courtney stuffs a jawbreaker into her mouth before they gag
her.  They then stuff Liz in the trunk of Courtney's car but when they open it
later, Polaroid camera waiting to capture the moment, their lives will never
be the same: poor Liz has swallowed the jawbreaker and choked to death with it
lodged in her throat (the audience is treated to a few too many graphic looks
at Liz's dead body).
Courtney, thinking fast, decides to pass the death off as a rape/murder and
Marcie and a reluctant Julie assist her.  Things get complicated when Fern
discovers what the three girls are up to.  In order to keep her quiet Courtney
comes up with another plan and transforms geeky Fern into "Vylette", hoping
that she will also help to replace Liz in the minds of the devastated
students.
Up until about this point the film is effective enough.  However, an
investigation begins into Liz's death and the film becomes excessively dull.
The recently rediscovered talents of Pam Grier are thoroughly wasted in the
role of Detective Vera Cruz and the film is downright insipid in its treatment
of both the characters and the audience during this long middle stretch.
Courtney's plan to frame a sleazy guy (Marilyn Manson, in a brief cameo) is
never believable for a second.
Meanwhile, the audience is stuck watching a string of random events which fail
to develop the characters or add anything of interest to the plot.  Julie
leaves the group and begins a lame romance with aspiring actor Zack (Chad
Christ).  He apparently gives her the courage to turn on Courtney but the way
things develop only make Julie look stupid.  Fern's rise to popularity is
equally lame.  
We do get the best scene in the film (the only one with a spark of
originality) during this section.  It's a smart and subversive bit where
Courtney gets the high school's resident jock stud Dane (Ethan Erickson) to
demonstrate, using a popsicle, exactly what he would like for her to do to
him.  It at least provides us with a look at Courtney's personality but the
way the scene finishes doesn't make any sense.
Stein is very conscious of the teen movie tradition he is working in and not
only freely borrows major plot elements but also includes direct
acknowledgment of this with some stunt casting.  William Katt and P.J. Soles
(students in Carrie) are Liz's distraught parents, Jeff Conaway (from Grease
(1978)) is Julie's creepy single dad and Carol Kane (the frightened babysitter
in When a Stranger Calls (1979)) camps it up as principal Miss Sherman.
At times Jawbreaker feels simply like Teen Cinema's Greatest Hits but the
audience is cheated with watered down interpretations of the best this genre
has to offer. 
The only notable aspect of Jawbreaker is the incredibly stylish look.  The
costume design by Vickie Brinkford and the production design by Jerry Fleming
are both bright and vivid.  They were apparently instructed to work from the
color palette of a jawbreaker and the screen is always splashed with bits of
vibrant color.  Director of photography Amy Vicent, who beautifully lensed
Eve's Bayou (1997), does a remarkable job here as well.  Shot composition and
camera movement is consistently impressive.
Performances are mostly sub-par with McGowan providing only a few good moments
(compared with her excellent work in The Doom Generation (1995) and Scream
(1996)) and Gayheart making the biggest impression due to the sweet nature of
her character and her obvious beauty.  None of the actors look as if they have
set foot inside a high school within the last five years with the exception of
actress/singer Tatyana Ali, who has a small role as a cheerleader.  The male
cast all resemble male models and are credited with names like "Auto Stud,"
"College Stud," and "High School Stud #2."
The soundtrack is decent and Imperial Teen's catchy "Yoo Hoo" makes a bigger
impression than any other aspect of the film.

Title
Review for Blow (2001)
Directed by Ted Demme.
Cast: Johnny Depp, Penelope Cruz, Ray Liotta, Rachel Griffiths, Paul Reubens, 
Franka Potente, Ethan Suplee, Emma Roberts, Jordi Molla, Cliff Curtis, Bobcat 
Goldthwait.
2001 - 120 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, sexual situations, and drug use).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, April 7, 2001.
How can a man so capable of loving manage to disappoint everyone he has ever 
cared about in his life? This is a question not easily answered in "Blow," a 
film by Ted Demme (1996's "Beautiful Girls") that is based on the true story 
of the rise and fall of George Jung, who was the largest provider of cocaine 
in the United States during the 1970s and '80s. As a character study and a 
drama, the picture is highly effective and always involving, succeeding in 
getting us to care about our protagonist, even while we question just how his 
life could have taken such a wrong turn. 
As a child, George (Johnny Depp) was brought up in a middle class family with 
a hard-working, caring father, Ray (Ray Liotta), and a nagging mother (Rachel 
Griffiths). Ray attempted to ingrain into his son's mind that money isn't 
everything, or even a sizable part, of what life is all about, but by the 
time he graduates high school and moves to a Californian beach town in 1969 
with his best friend, Tuna (Ethan Suplee), all that is on George's mind is 
how he can make a load of money without having to work for it. His ticket to 
the high life comes in the form of marijuana, which is generously provided by 
Derek (Paul Reubens), a friend of his stewardess girlfriend, Barbara (Franka 
Potente), which he begins to sell on the beach and quickly becomes the token 
dealer in the area. 
Seven years and several arrests later, George's drug of choice has switched 
to cocaine, which he learns about while in the pen, and quickly garners up 
millions of dollars in cash buying it from Colombian drug lord Pablo Escobar 
(Cliff Curtis) and selling it in the U.S. While at his friend's wedding, 
George meets an alluring woman named Mirtha (Penelope Cruz), marries her, and 
has a baby girl that changes his life. Mirtha's tastes are expensive, 
however, and with an insatiable drug habit, George isn't sure if he will ever 
be able to get out of the drug business and give his daughter a healthy life.
"Blow" is the third motion picture about drugs in the last seven months (with 
the other two being the superior "Requiem for a Dream" and "Traffic"), but 
manages to differentiate itself enough to not feel routine or tedious. 
Whereas "Requiem" was a stark horror story of the way drugs destroy lives, 
and "Traffic" was a more technical mosaic of how drugs affect the entire 
world, "Blow" is a reasonably conventional docudrama about a talented man 
with infinite promise who ultimately chooses a lifestyle that ends up ruining 
his life, and every human relationship that has ever meant something to him. 
Putting George Jung's life into perspective, he really does not seem like a 
notable enough person to have an entire movie dedicated to him. Jung was a 
drug dealer, albeit a remarkably successful one, who had the law eventually 
catch up to his illegal actions. Much of the film is reminiscent in style and 
execution to 1997's brilliant "Boogie Nights" and 1998's misguided "54," both 
of which involved drugs but did not have them as the centerpiece of the 
action. "Blow," in comparison, finds a happy medium between the two--it isn't 
as powerful or expertly directed as "Boogie Nights," but has far more depth 
and intelligence than "54"--and concludes on a note of bittersweet tragedy. 
Johnny Depp owns the screen for every second he appears, which is more or 
less the entirety of the 120-minute running time. As George Jung, the 
34-year-old Depp is believable as a young man in his early twenties, and 
equally convincing as a 50-year-old in the final act. What is most 
impressive, however, is how sympathetic he makes Jung. We care about him even 
as we despise him for not cleaning up his act for good, and it is a testament 
to Depp that his character remains accessibly likable throughout. 
Ray Liotta, as George's loyal, if quietly disappointed father, is on a roll 
this year. With April only beginning, Liotta's has also been a standout in 
"Hannibal" and "Heartbreakers." In many ways, Liotta's portrayal is just as 
tragic as Depp's, as he plays an honest man who had high hopes for his only 
child, only to see him spiral deeper and deeper into an abyss. It isn't a 
large part, but Liotta creates the most clearly defined and heartbreaking 
supporting character in the film. A close second is Paul Reubens (1999's 
"Mystery Men"), stunningly deft in a rare dramatic turn as Derek.
The female counterparts include the likes of Penelope Cruz (2000's "All the 
Pretty Horses"), excellent as the ruthless, immature Mirtha, who dashes 
George's hopes of going straight; Franka Potente (2000's "Run Lola Run"), a 
radiant beauty in her first American film, as George's first ill-fated 
girlfriend, Barbara; and Rachel Griffiths (2000's "Me Myself I"), sternly 
poignant as George's stubborn, outraged mother.
Spanning five decades and accurately capturing the fashions and music of, 
particularly, the late-'60s and '70s, "Blow" is something you only find once 
or twice in the opening months of each year: a mature, emotionally resounding 
film that could have easily been released in December and garnered several 
Oscar nominations. It does not equal up to "Requiem for a Dream" or "Traffic" 
(both of which were nominated for Academy Awards this year), and moves a 
little too quickly through certain portions of George Jung's life (no doubt 
due to a desire to cut the film down to two hours), but "Blow" remains a 
more-than-worthwhile drama that confirms what a good director Ted Demme is, 
and what an unequivocal talent Johnny Depp continues to be.
 http://www.all-reviews.com/reviewers/DustinPutman.htm
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman
http://www.atnzone.com

Title
Review for Cell, The (2000)
Directed by Tarsem Singh.
Cast: Jennifer Lopez, Vince Vaughn, Vincent D'Onofrio, Marianne 
Jean-Baptiste, Dylan Baker, Jake Weber, Jake Thomas, Tara Subkoff, James 
Gammon, Gareth Williams, Colton James, Patrick Bauchau.
2000 - 117 minutes
Rated R (for violence, gore, profanity, and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, August 19, 2000.
Following a fairly disappointing summer, where every movie seemed to be a 
cliched take-off of a film already made, acclaimed music video director 
Tarsem Singh's "The Cell" is a visionary masterpiece, not quite like anything 
you've ever seen before, nor will likely ever see again. A disturbing, 
evocative journey into the human mind, the film recalls your spookiest 
dreams, most forbidden fantasies, and darkest past memories, strung together 
in an unforgettably bold visual palette. That such a creative and bizarre 
motion picture was made at all is relatively surprising. That such a creative 
and bizarre motion picture was made in the big-budget world of mainstream 
Hollywood is nearly a miracle.
Catherine Deane (Jennifer Lopez) is a hard-working, sympathetic child 
therapist who, for seven years, has been working for Dr. Miriam Kent 
(Marianne Jean-Baptiste), the head of a top-flight institution and the 
creator of the Synaptic Transfer System, which allows a person to literally 
go into the subject's mind. Recently, Catherine has been working with a 
comatose young boy named Edward (Colton James), attempting to bring him back 
into reality, but the process of directly connecting with him is proving 
time-consuming and frustrating.
Meanwhile, the body count has risen once again with the discovery of the 
eighth body of a woman, found in a lake and bleached completely white, made 
to look like a porcelain doll. The schizophrenic killer is Carl Stargher 
(Vincent D'Onofrio), who seeks pleasure in kidnapping women, locking them up 
in a small Plexiglas room for 40 hours, and then flooding the room completely 
with water. What he does next, including suspending himself above his victims 
by fourteen metal rings deeply pierced into his body, is best left unsaid. 
His latest potential victim is Julia Hickson (Tara Subkoff), who has gone 
missing from the area and has forty hours to be found before she drowns. 
Worst of all is that Carl Stargher has just lapsed into a coma, preventing 
him from being able to tell anyone where Julia is located. 
Enter FBI Agent Peter Novak (Vince Vaughn), whose only hope of saving Julia's 
life is persuading Catherine to go into Carl's mind. While the chance of 
success for such short notice is slim, Catherine agrees, not knowing what 
severely twisted things lie within the mind of such a pathological, mentally 
unhinged person.
A creepy horror-thriller with large helpings of fantastical imagery, "The 
Cell" puts a fresh spin on the tiresome Serial Killer genre by not only being 
about saving the latest victim in jeopardy, but also focuses on the 
inner-workings of a sick mind. A thought-provoking triumph, the film is 
possibly one of the most visually imaginative films ever put to celluloid, 
aided by director Singh, screenwriter Mark Protosevich, and, arguably the 
star of the picture, cinematographer Paul Laufer. Using jump cuts, slow 
motion, fast motion, upside-down and sideways shots, and many more stylish 
techniques, Singh and Laufer have created an entirely new world, one that is 
as beautiful and awe-inspiring as it is threatening and nightmarish. If 
Tarsem Singh ever had a blueprint to model "The Cell" after, his original 
film source would clearly be Luis Bunuel's mesmerizing "Un Chien Andalou," in 
which every grotesque moment was a powerful metaphor for the unfortunate toll 
that schizophrenia had taken on a person.
Carl, whose mind portrays his adult self as a powerful ruler who delights in 
the torture of all creatures that find their way into his lair, also has 
created a version of himself as a frightened child (Jake Thomas) whose father 
physically and verbally abuses him. Catherine quickly realizes that the only 
possible way to get through to Stargher and find out where Julia is is to 
warm up to the child in him, whom she grows to deeply feel for under the 
discouraging circumstances.
The beautiful Jennifer Lopez (1998's "Out of Sight"), who has gained added 
popularity in the past two years from her debut pop album, "On the 6," should 
be applauded for taking on such an undoubtedly daunting project as this. 
Lopez appropriately underplays the role of Catherine, who sympathizes with 
the abused Carl and seems to connect with him due to something unmentioned 
from her own past. While more development could have been done with her 
character (the thinly written roles are the picture's sole sore spot), Lopez 
brings much-needed maturity and subtlety to Catherine, and believably 
portrays a therapist.
Vincent D'Onofrio is both menacing and poignant as the ill Carl Stargher, and 
like Lopez, gets to take on many different role and costume changes, 
depending on what his mind does with him. The film calls for him to be 
psychotic and frightening at certain points, and lonely and scared at others, 
and D'Onofrio pulls it off. Vince Vaughn is professional, if unextraordinary, 
as Peter Novak, and does exactly what is required of the role, and not much 
more.
Featured in supporting roles are Marianne Jean-Baptiste (1996's "Secrets & 
Lies") and Dylan Baker (1998's "Happiness"), as the two scientists who head 
the project of synaptic transfer; Jake Weber, as Peter's partner, Gordon 
Ramsey; and Tara Subkoff, who manages to be powerful in only a few small 
scenes, as Carl's last victim, Julia Hickson.
A genuinely rewarding and surprisingly touching experience, "The Cell" is a 
one-of-a-kind motion picture that is not only a feast for the eyes and ears 
(the music score, by Howard Shore, is erratically memorable), but also works 
up and lays bare emotions that are rarely felt in films nowadays. That "The 
Cell" is a visually astounding work of art, as well as satisfying on a story 
basis is cause for celebration, and director Tarsem Singh deserves all the 
praise one could possibly get for making a debut feature as strong as this 
one.

Title
Review for Story of Us, The (1999)
Directed by Rob Reiner.
Cast: Bruce Willis, Michelle Pfeiffer, Rob Reiner, Rita Wilson, Colleen 
Rennison, Jake Sandvig, Tim Matheson, Paul Reiser, Lucy Webb, Julie Hagerty, 
Red Buttons, Jayne Meadows, Betty White, Tom Poston, Jordan Lund.
1999 - 96 minutes
Rated R (for profanity and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, October 16, 1999.
Rob Reiner's "The Story of Us," the new comedy-drama about the highs and lows 
of a couple's rocky 15-year marriage, is a film that gets so many of the 
details exactly right, that it comes as a disappointment to find that the 
denouement arrives about twenty minutes too early, apparently due to either 
numerous cuts made prior to its release, or a promising, if uneven, script 
that wasn't ready to be put onto film. The talent is all in place, it seems, 
but its snappily-paced structure in which it goes back-and-forth in time only 
causes the proceedings to feel episodic and strangely disjointed.
Ben (Bruce Willis) and Katie Jordan (Michelle Pfeiffer) have been married 
fifteen years, and to most, give off the appearance of being gloriously happy 
with each other. At dinner with their children, 10-year-old Erin (Colleen 
Rennison) and 12-year-old Josh (Jake Sandvig), each night, they like to play 
a game called High/Low, in which they go around the room and each family 
member must state their highest and lowest point of that particular day. Once 
alone, however, Ben and Katie's exteriors transform from marital bliss to 
their plans on what they are going to do when the kids leave for summer camp 
the following day--they will leave together, for the children, but Ben is 
then going to start packing up some clothes for his stay at a nearby hotel, 
without Katie. Once separated by everything but the telephone (they construct 
artificial excuses just to call up each other because they do secretly long 
to be together again), both sides of the progressively-drifting-apart couple 
reminisce about what their life has been like since they first met each 
other. Will they realize that fifteen years is simply too much time for them 
to throw their relationship away, or will they come to terms with the fact 
that they'll most likely be better off apart? I'll leave the particulars of 
the answer to this question up to the viewer to discover, but let's put it 
this way--had the more subtle, skilled Woody Allen have made the picture 
(and, for the most part, it really is reminiscent of his work), the outcome 
probably would have been a little different.
As it should be, the two people that are front-and-center for the entirety of 
the brief 96-minute running time are Bruce Willis and Michelle Pfeiffer, both 
of whom have never been better (aside from Pfeiffer's marvelous role as 
Catwoman in 1992's "Batman Returns"). Willis, usually burdened by an 
unknowing smirk plastered upon his face, throws the majority of his usual 
acting mannerisms to the wind to create a character we have never seen him 
play before, and his performance here--and it hits all of the right notes, 
mind you--is even superior to his delicately poignant turn in the recent 
box-office smash, "The Sixth Sense."    
Michelle Pfeiffer, an engaging actress who, nonetheless, makes frequent 
missteps in her film choices (just take a look at her work in the otherwise 
mediocre 1999 drama, "The Deep End of the Ocean," and 1997's painfully 
overwrought "A Thousand Acres"), is Willis' match in every way. Bringing off 
an astute believability to the premise, Pfeiffer, more than even Willis, 
makes her character someone who creditably appears to be longing for a 
reconciliation with the man whom she still loves deeply. And her final, 
tearful monologue is a real winner, evoking the distinct feelings of joy, 
pain, sentimentality, and frustration that, no doubt, comes with any close 
marriage. Despite being instructed to scream at one another a few too many 
times for my taste, the marital woes of Ben and Katie are effectively and 
realistically brought to life, as we find ourselves truly caring about what 
happens to them. 
It's not so much that there is anything distinctly wrong with what appears in 
the finished product of "The Story of Us," as there is merely a sensation 
floating overhead that tells me the film could have been remarkably better 
had the screenplay, by Alan Zweibel and Jessie Nelson, been more 
fully-written. The flashback-laden construction of the plotting is 
smoothly-done, but for it to really work to its fullest potential, the film 
calls for itself to be of epic proportions, a motion picture about the truths 
of marriage and love/hate relationships, similar to Ingmar Bergman's 1973 
drama, "Scenes from a Marriage." As is, there are many on-target moments that 
hold just the right tone, while several montages are included to rush us 
through protracted periods of time. The problem is, the montages seem like 
nothing but advertisements for the actual film, and, I swear to you, one 
montage late in the picture is almost exactly like the theatrical trailer, 
with even the same music score, by Eric Clapton, in the background.  
The supporting cast is chock-full of recognizable thesps that are 
unfortunately all wasted. Rob Reiner and Paul Reiser briefly appear as Ben's 
friends, and ditto for Rita Wilson and the severely underrated Julie Hagerty 
as Katie's. Tim Matheson has nothing to do but play the potential guy that 
Katie is considering having an affair with, and there is no attempt to turn 
him into anything more than a one-dimensional figure whose purprose is to 
cause a conflict. Really, the only supporting performance that is worth 
noting is that of Colleen Rennison as Erin, Ben and Katie's young daughter. 
The 12-year-old Rennison (last seen in a pair of 1996 bombs, "Carpool" and 
"Unforgettable") proves to be a naturally-gifted actress who is touching as a 
girl who suspects something is wrong with her parents, but hopes only for the 
best.
In its depiction of a marriage on the rocks, "The Story of Us" is successful 
in its ideas, but not necessarily in its treatment. There are many wonderful 
moments, including an interlude midway through in which Katie and Ben decide 
to take a trip to Venice in an attempt to rekindle their flames, and a 
particular scene that shows them dancing along the water is simply magical. 
Its major fall, however, comes in its generally crowd-pleasing conclusion 
that, to be sure, leaves things on an uplifting note, but feels like a cheat 
when considering the validity of the situations that had come before. It has 
been widely reported that Willis filmed this movie around the same time his 
own marriage with actress Demi Moore was coming to an end. Perhaps in staying 
with the film's truthfulness, Willis should have suggested a less-neat finale 
that remained faithful to its characters and their plight, without going into 
what could basically be described as fantasy territory. 

Title
Review for Zbogum na dvadesetiot vek (1998)
Directed by Aleksandar Popovski and Darko Mitrevski.
Cast: Lazar Ristovski, Nikola Ristanovski, Vlado Javanovski, Dejan Acimovic, 
Petar Temelkovski, Sofija Kunovska.
1999 - 83 minutes (in Macedonian w/ English subtitles).
Not Rated (equivalent of an R or NC-17 for one explicit sex scene, nudity, 
violence, profanity, and gore).
Opens November, 1999 in limited release.
Reviewed July 8, 1999.
"Goodbye 20th Century!," a Macedonian sci-fi/drama, is a visionary motion 
picture full of many startling, bold images, and reminiscent of French 
director Jean-Pierre Jeunet's 1995 fantasy, "City of Lost Children." From a 
camera travelling through a toilet drain and into outer space, to a beautiful 
shot of the exterior of a shopping mall as a New Year's celebration goes on 
inside, "Goodbye 20th Century!" directors Aleksandar Popovski and Darko 
Mitrevski prove to have a huge amount of style and visual flair to spare. 
Among these especially stunning technical attributes, however, is a motion 
picture that is as frustrating and incomprehensible as I can remember seeing 
in recent memory. No attempt to follow any sort of coherent path is made, nor 
is there any way that we can identify with the severely selective and vaguely 
written main characters and, therefore, what we are left with is a bunch of 
jumbled storylines that have nowhere to go but crash into each other and 
explode.
The film is made up of two loosely-related 40-minute stories, intercut with 
what is supposed to be the first-ever wedding captured on film in the early 
1900's, between a brother and sister who are deeply in love. Beginning in the 
aftermath of a war in the year 2019 that has left the Balkans a desolate, 
sparse landscape, a man named Kuzman (Lazar Ristovski) is abruptly shot into 
a grave by his fellow comrades after being suspected as the cause of the mass 
deaths of their children. Rising up from the grave afterwards, and 
subsequently, after being shot several more time, Kuzman discovers that he is 
immortal because, as one person notes, "the ground will not take him." 
Meeting a prophet, Kuzman is instructed to travel to the Glass City and kill 
the Man With The Green Hair, who guards a wall that foretells everyone's 
future, including his own.
The latter half of the film then goes back in time to New Year's Eve 1999, at 
the turn of the century. Following a mysterious man dressed in a Santa Claus 
outfit, he solemnly attends an otherwise joyous New Year's party and then 
rents a purely white room from a guy named Peter, which also holds various 
people mourning the recent death of his brother. Discussing different 
theories on what the 21st Century will hold, Santa states in all seriousness 
that time as we know it will stop at the strike of midnight. Everyone laughs 
the notion off, of course, but might this obviously psychotic man dressed as 
Santa Claus be able to correctly prophesize the future? Oh, and the briefly 
aforementioned wedding in 1900 between the brother and sister, find their 
festivities cut short when the brother is shot dead. 
When the confused (to put it mildly) proceedings conclude with the titled 
quote, "Goodbye 20th Century!," you are left with the nagging question, "what 
exactly was the point?" Is the film taking these fantasy elements to make a 
statement on the currently bleak state in the Balkans? Perhaps, but only 
those who are closely related to Macedonia will be able to grasp this 
concept. Besides, even if the film is trying to be earnest, that doesn't 
erase the blatant ludicrous and misguided nature of the narrative, in which a 
farting wheelchair-bound woman; a tattoed, nude hussy who has sex with her 
brother in a bathtub; leather and iron-clad futuristic men; and an old lady 
who gets her brains blown out by Santa, all figure into the story. 
With everything taken under consideration, maybe "Goodbye 20th Century!" is 
simply a parable letting us know that the world has always been a bad place, 
as noted with the murder of the groom in 1900, and is not likely to get any 
better, as the question of apocalyptic doom sweeps over on the eve of the 
year 2000. If this is the case, not only is the film shoddily made on the 
screenplay level, but also comes off as arbitrary and simple-minded, a 
virtual waste of the viewer's time. 
One of the most offensive things about "Goodbye 20th Century!" is its 
treatment of incest, which flows throughout the picture. Not only does Kuzman 
gain his own mortality after animalistically having sex with his sister in 
the first story (which could be looked upon as a good or bad thing), but the 
siblings who are getting married during the interlude between the two 
vignettes are negatively looked upon, and the ceremony ends in death. So, 
what does this mean? Do directors Popovski and Mitrevski believe incestuous 
relationships are a virtuous thing (as referenced with the immortal man)? And 
if so, then why do they go back on their word to portray it in a bad light 
with the wedding? If they are trying to only push their point more firmly 
across that the world is an unfair place, then why must they focus their 
attention on incest, especially since they have nothing interesting or 
insightful to say about the controversial subject?
If this is an example of the best in Eastern European cinema, which I 
certainly don't believe it is, then perhaps filmmakers in that section of the 
world should rethink what they want to say with their films, instead of 
trivializing them with artificial and silly plot occurrences and having 
nothing substantial to say about their subjects to begin with. In short, 
"Goodbye 20th Century!" is an ambitious film on many different levels, and I 
can appreciate that, but it rarely succeeds on any of them. 
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Final Fantasy: The Spirits Within (2001)
Directed by Hironobu Sakaguchi.
Voices: Ming-Na, Alec Baldwin, Donald Sutherland, James Woods, Peri Gilpin,
Steve Buscemi, Ving Rhames, Keith David.
2001 - 106 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for violence and brief profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, July 11, 2001.
Taking its title from the enormously popular video game series, Hironobu
Sakaguchi's "Final Fantasy: The Spirits Within" is a landmark achievement in
CG animation. With a full cast of human characters entirely evolved from
computers, it is the most impressively detailed and life-like animation to
have graced the silver screen--ever. Pretty images, however, do not a great
movie make, so it is with much relief and elation to say that "Final Fantasy"
has an--at once--somber, original, thrilling, and thought-provoking story
with messages that dig far deeper than the usual sci-fi/action film.
Set in the year 2065, Earth has been taken over by threatening, transparent
aliens who suck the spirit out of any living thing that they can get their
hands on. In order to save the fate of mankind, Dr. Aki Ross (voiced by
Ming-Na) and her trusting mentor, Dr. Sid (Donald Sutherland), must find the
last eight remaining spirits that have not been taken away by the so-called
"phantoms," which hold the key to salvation. Aiding in their journey is buff
nice-guy Gray Edwards (Alec Baldwin), whom Aki finds herself taking a liking
to. Standing in their way every step, General Hein (James Woods), who lost
his family to the creatures, has vowed to take out the aliens by his own
radical means.
Ambitiously written by Al Reiner (1995's "Apollo 13") and Jeff Vintar, "Final
Fantasy: The Spirits Within" defies all expectations and then surpasses them,
both in its historical leap in computer-generated animation, and its
beautiful, multi-layered story that thoughtfully touches upon such subjects
as life, death, human compassion, and faith. From the characters' skin pores,
to their nearly flawless movements, to their gently blowing hair strands,
people have never before looked quite so--well--genuine. Although it is still
fairly clear that they are animated figures, sometimes it isn't so apparent,
and this is when the CG creators' work really shines. Furthermore, the
ruinous backdrops from which the action takes place is astonishingly
naturalistic and awesome to look at.
The plot threads are every bit the animation's equal. While "Final Fantasy"
could have been marred in futuristic nonsense and non-stop alien attacks,
director Hironobu Sakaguchi's aims are significantly higher, both in scope
and substance. The action sequences involving the phantoms seeking out the
spirits of the characters are exciting and well-photographed, but the
quieter, more subtle moments are what lifts the motion picture above being
conventional. One such scene, in which Aki and Gray turn to each other in an
instantaneous embrace as they mourn the tragic deaths of their crew members,
is heartbreakingly powerful filmmaking that transcends the limits, up until
this point, of modern animated movies. With a story that is infinitely more
mature than most, and characters with a deep sense of humanity, it was easy
to grow to care about them as if they really were living and breathing actors.
The voice work is distinctive and universally strong. Ming-Na strikes all the
right notes as the determined Dr. Aki Ross, who is, perhaps, the most
memorable sci-fi heroine since Sigourney Weaver in 1979's "Alien" and its
sequels. Alec Baldwin holds up his end of the bargain in the other lead role,
as Gray Edwards, a dead-ringer for Ben Affleck. The burgeoning relationship
that forms between Aki and Gray is an involving, sweet one that doesn't feel
forced or tacked-on. Rounding out the notable voice cast is Donald
Sutherland; James Woods, whose villain role turns out to have an
understandable motive and, at the very least, a trace of heart; and Ving
Rhames, Peri Gilpin, and Steve Buscemi as the remaining members of Dr. Aki
Ross' hard-working crew.
At a time when practically every week holds some sort of step forward in
modern visual effects, "Final Fantasy: The Spirits Within" currently stands
as one of the great artistic achievements in film history. A gorgeous,
surprisingly meditative look at the beauty of life and the mysteries of
death, the film is definitely not standard animated fare. It has the ability
to inspire, contemplate, and most important of all, make you care.
   - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
     http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman
http://www.atnzone.com

Title
Review for End of Days (1999)
Directed by Peter Hyams.
Cast: Arnold Schwarzenegger, Gabriel Byrne, Robin Tunney, Kevin Pollak, Rod 
Steiger, CCH Pounder, Miriam Margolyes.
1999 - 118 minutes
Rated R (for violence, gore, profanity, nudity, and sex).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, November 27, 1999.
In Arnold Schwarzegger's very first starring role since 1996's "Eraser" (and 
not counting the embarrassing 1997 debacle "Batman & Robin"), Peter Hyams' 
"End of Days" is, on the one hand, an intelligent film choice, but on the 
other hand, a not-so-good one. In his role as ex-cop Jericho Cane, 
Schwarzenegger has more substance to work with than usual, because he is a 
washed-up, borderline alcoholic still grieving over the untimely murders of 
his wife and daughter. He handles his character well, and for someone who 
oftentimes is criticized for his thespian skills, he believably conveys the 
true loss of loved ones. The problem with "End of Days" isn't Schwarzenegger, 
and it isn't the nifty visual effects, or the other performances. No, the 
source of the dilemma stems squarely from the ham-handed screenplay, by 
Andrew W. Marlowe, which not only lays on the melodrama a little thick in the 
second half, but also wastes much of the opportunity to make a rousing, 
unforgettable, end-of-the-millenium thriller. As New Year's approaches and 
you'd like to check out a movie set on the eve of the 21st-century, rent one 
of the decade's most innovative, underrated films, 1995's "Strange Days."
Opening in NYC, circa 1979, a woman gives birth to a child, which is then 
briefly taken away from her to be involved in a snake sacrifice on the grungy 
basement level of the hospital. It seems this baby has been chosen as the one 
to be impregnated between the hours of 11 o'clock and midnight on December 
31, 1999, thus ending the world. Yes, I'm sure this sounds silly so far, but 
at least a character wisely asks if they mean Eastern Standard Time. Switch 
forward to the final week of the millenium, the baby has grown up to be 
20-year-old Christine York (Robin Tunney), a young woman who unknowingly has 
been hunted down for her whole life, and who has the ability to see things 
that aren't really there--or, at least, things that seem to only be in her 
imagination. Meanwhile, on the other side of the city, a wavery entity makes 
its way into a ritzy restaurant, travels into the bathroom, and enters the 
body of an unidentified businessman (Gabriel Byrne). Of course, we know out 
of common sense that it is the spirit of Satan himself, come to conceive of a 
child with Christine. Enter Jericho and his partner Chicago (Kevin Pollak), 
who unwittingly get involved in the satanic plot after investigating a 
mysterious gunman in the hospital, who turned out to be a priest.
Coming to theaters after the similarly religious-themed "Stigmata," "End of 
Days" is a better film, overall, simply because it introduces two 
protagonists (Jericho and Christine) that are at least likable enough to root 
for, unlike the central character in the former picture (played by Patricia 
Arquette), who was a slutty dimwit. Since "End of Days" is supposed to be 
nothing more than an entertaining popcorn movie (which it somewhat succeeds 
at), I can forgive most of its far-fetched nature, but some of it is such 
blatant rubbish that you can't help but snicker. A virtuous priest (Rod 
Steiger, in his first role that calls for him to actually act in years), for 
example, discusses how the number of the Devil, 666, actually means 999 if 
turned around. Add a "1" in front of it and you get 1999. If this is supposed 
to be anything but laughable, religious hogwash, then my first name is Merv.
New Year's Eve in 1999 is such an obviously provocative setting for a film 
that it is an unfortunate shame director Peter Hyams (1997's "The Relic") 
chooses to not put it to any notable use. With an alleged budget of 
$100-million, no one can tell me the filmmakers didn't have enough money to 
really throw caution to the wind and make an action-thriller that is 
something truly special and one-of-a-kind. As is, the only impressive visual 
effects are the effective ripples in the air that signify the Dark Side, and 
the demonic face of Satan that appears in a wave of fire in the otherwise 
cheesy climax.
As proven in "The Relic," Hyams may not be a master of building and 
developing characters, but he sure does know how to set up an action 
sequence, with no more valid example than the one edge-of-your-seat setpiece 
in the second half, which takes place on the subway. Nicely built-up and even 
suspenseful (one moment--the only in the whole movie--really startled me), 
the scene plays itself out to a stirring conclusion.
Gabriel Byrne, seemingly borrowing some of Al Pacino's mannerisms from the 
much-better 1997 horror film, "Devil's Advocate," is exceptionally menacing 
and appropriately cast as the ultimate villain. Byrne, who coincidentally 
portrayed a priest in "Stigmata," is, like in that film, the highlight of the 
cast. No matter what the role, Byrne takes himself, grabs the character 
tightly, and seems to make it his own, as if it was written for no one else.
"End of Days" isn't a bad movie by any means; it's just a reasonably silly 
one that, in one form or the other, has been overdone to death. There are no 
true surprises in the course of the whole film (aside from the aforementioned 
unconvincing and cornball twist at the end), nor does it even attempt to want 
to make any sense. After a sizable hiatus, Schwarzenegger is back in top 
form, but I think it's about time for this "End of Days" to signal the end of 
a well-worn, tiresome subgenre.

Title
Review for Eight Days a Week (1997)
Directed by Michael Davis.
Cast: Josh Schaeffer, Keri Russell, R.D. Robb, Mark L. Taylor, Johnny Green, 
Catherine Hicks, Gabrielle Boni.
1999 - 93 minutes.
Rated R (for profanity and sexual situations).
Capsule Review, August 23, 1999.
"Eight Days a Week," a barely-released teen comedy made in 1997 and now on 
video everywhere, has one major selling point, and that is Keri Russell, star 
of TV's "Felicity." Without her, the film would probably still be tucked away 
into obscurity, and it's easy to see why. In the far-fetched story of an 
unpopular teenage boy (Josh Schaeffer) who decides to live right outside the 
home of his true love (Keri Russell) all summer until he wins her heart, the 
film is painfully obvious and opts to usually be silly rather than honest. 
Only a few of the more quiet scenes shine through, hinting at a dramatic 
turnaround that could possibly save the movie, but the exploitative, 
thoroughly unsatisfying ending only serves to unmask the absolute shallowness 
of not only the film, but the director, as well.
   - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
     Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Wedding Planner, The (2001)
Directed by Adam Shankman.
Cast: Jennifer Lopez, Matthew McConaughey, Bridgette Wilson-Sampras, Justin 
Chambers, Judy Greer, Kevin Pollak, Frances Bay.
2001 - 107 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for mild profanity and a scene of scatological humor).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, January 27, 2001.
For 107 minutes, "The Wedding Planner," a distressingly lifeless romantic 
comedy directed by Adam Shankman, stands as an embarrassment for every person 
that was involved in its creation. With the commitment of such talented movie 
stars as Jennifer Lopez and Matthew McConaughey, it is destined to stand as a 
negative footnote in both of their careers, as neither one even give us the 
pleasure of good performances. Lopez's strong point is most certainly not 
comedy, as she consistently resembles a deer caught in the headlights, while 
McConaughey simply looks bored. Together, they flounder and desperately 
overact in an attempt to bring life to the charmless screenplay, hideously 
written by Pamela Falk and Michael Ellis, and insipid direction by first-time 
director Shankman.
Mary Fiore (Jennifer Lopez) has been a dedicated and highly successful 
wedding planner for five years, effortlessly controlling everything involved 
in the festivities. In fact, so much of her time is taken up by her 
profession that romance has been absent from her personal life for two whole 
years. That all changes when she has a strained meet-cute with doctor Steve 
Edison (Matthew McConaughey), who saves her from a runaway garbage cart. 
Following a magical night which they spend watching an old movie in a San 
Francisco park, Mary is appalled to discover a couple days later that Steve 
is engaged to marry her latest client, Fran Donolly (Bridgette 
Wilson-Sampras). Forced to work with the couple as she plans their wedding, 
Mary cannot help but fall for Steve, who is likewise beginning to have doubts 
about Fran being "the one" for him.
The romantic comedy genre is one that you don't really expect to be 
unpredictable. In almost all cases, the two unlikely lovers end up together 
in the end. Because of this, it is vital that the film exhibit at least a 
modicum of sweetness and entertainment value, with the two characters 
invoking charisma together. Take the similar 1998 film, "The Wedding Singer," 
for example, which wasn't the least bit surprising in the story department, 
but flourished because of its bright writing and the standout performances by 
Adam Sandler and Drew Barrymore. The makers of "The Wedding Singer" had their 
hearts in exactly the right place, and it ended up being one of the best 
comedies of that respective year. "The Wedding Planner" is almost a carbon 
copy of every romantic comedy ever made, but its humor never fails to fall 
flat, and the whole production seems to be stuck on autopilot.
It cannot be denied that Jennifer Lopez (2000's "The Cell") and Matthew 
McConaughey (2000's "U-571") are attractive performers, but they are walking 
stiffs in this film, and their characters offer up no rooting interest. The 
supporting cast are a little better, but they, too, often overact with the 
skill of an untrained tiger. Judy Greer (2000's "What Women Want") at least 
has some fun as Mary's friend and coworker, which is more than can be said 
for the two main stars. The only two actors who come away unscathed are 
Bridgette Wilson-Sampras (2000's "Beautiful") and Justin Chambers (1999's 
"Liberty Heights"), who bring dignity and intelligence to their roles of 
Steve and Mary's potential suitors. Wilson-Sampras is especially good, and 
the final scene between her and McConaughey is one of the few well-written 
passages in the entire picture. Tellingly, it is a quiet, dramatic sequence, 
leading one to hypothesize that the movie might have been more successful 
without all of the stupid slapstick, which is not helped by Mervyn Warren's 
cartoonish, nails-on-a-blackboard music score. 
You would think that romantic comedies would be one of the simplest genres to 
write for. After all, they don't ask much in the way of creativity, and only 
require the assistance of a sturdy screenplay and a cute couple. When even 
those slight requirements are not met, as they fail to be in "The Wedding 
Planner," you know that the whole enterprise is in serious trouble. By the 
time Lopez and McConaughey reunite at the end to consummate their love for 
one another in the crucial final scene, I caught my mind wandering to "The 
Pledge," the far superior film I saw right before this one. That is as 
telling a final statement as anything in "The Wedding Planner."
   - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
     http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman
http://www.atnzone.com 

Title
Review for Traffic (2000)
Directed by Steven Soderbergh.
Cast: Benicio Del Toro, Michael Douglas, Don Cheadle, Catherine Zeta-Jones, 
Erika Christensen, Luis Guzman, Jacob Vargas, Dennis Quaid, Amy Irving, 
Topher Grace, Miguel Ferrer, Steven Bauer, Clifton Collins Jr., James Brolin, 
Benjamin Bratt, Majandra Delfino, Corey Spears, Peter Reigert, Marisol 
Pedilla Sanchez, Tomas Milian, Albert Finney, D.W. Moffett, Joel Torres.
2000 - 147 minutes
Rated R (for profanity, violence, extreme drug use, sex, and nudity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, January 6, 2001.
A sprawling, candid mosaic of the controversial, bitter war on drugs in the 
United States, Steven Soderbergh's "Traffic," loosely based on the 1989 BBC 
miniseries, "Traffik," offers no easy answers, nor does he attempt to 
sugarcoat the bleak topic into something that can ever change in today's 
society. Presenting a wide array of characters from different social 
standings, and showing how drugs have the power to impact everyone's life in 
one way or another, the film is truly spellbinding and often 
thought-provoking from its beginning to the end, 2 1/2-hours later.
Filmed in alternate, cleverly chosen hues, depending on where the scene is 
set and which storyline we are involved in, director Soderbergh (who also 
acted as the cameraman, under the pseudonym Peter Andrews) adapts a 
"you-are-there" style of filmmaking, with shaky, hand-held shots, and a 
screenplay, expertly developed by Stephen Gaghan, that is never anything less 
than convincing. The enormous, flawlessly-chosen cast, with each performance 
pitch-perfect, work as a unit in order to bring their roles to life, aiding 
in the entire picture's almost frightening, harsh realism. And Steven 
Soderbergh (who had great luck earlier in the year with the more mainstream, 
yet inferior, "Erin Brockovich") joins Robert Altman (1975's "Nashville") and 
Paul Thomas Anderson (1999's "Magnolia") as one of the only contemporary 
filmmakers to successfully make an ensemble film with such an ambitious, epic 
scope.
The first subplot is set in Tijuana, with Javier Rodriguez (Benecio Del Toro) 
and Manolo Sanchez (Jacob Vargas) two cops out to bust a planned cocaine 
transfer in the middle of the desert. Their plan goes awry when Army General 
Salazar (Tomas Milian) intercepts, later employing Javier and Manolo to find 
and capture hired assassin Francisco Flores (Clifton Collins Jr.), who is, in 
turn, linked to wealthy drug dealer Carlos Ayala (Steven Bauer).
Living in San Diego, California, Carlos is arrested and handcuffed, much to 
the dismay of his pampered wife, Helena (Catherine Zeta-Jones). Helena, who 
is six months pregnant with her second child, is clueless as to why her 
husband has been taken to prison until she is clued in by her defense lawyer 
Arnie Metzger (Dennis Quaid) on why they, in fact, have so much money. 
Desperate to get Carlos off the hook, and with her son in danger if she 
doesn't come up with $3-million, Helena finds herself taking over her 
husband's illegal business in an attempt to return everything to the way it 
was.
Meanwhile, Ohio Supreme Court Justice Robert Wakefield (Michael Douglas) is 
appointed Drug Czar for Washington, D.C., which takes him away from his 
Cincinatti-based family for long stretches of time. As Robert prepares to 
grasp the U.S.'s drug problems by the throat, he has no idea that his 
16-year-old daughter, Caroline (Erika Christensen), a straight-A honor 
student, has been introduced by her prep school friends to freebasing heroin, 
and is slowly wavering out of control.
In the style of the aforementioned "Nashville" and "Magnolia," there are no 
main characters in "Traffic," nor are there any outright heroes or villains. 
The movie features, not one, but many different plotlines, each of which 
evolves as things do in real life, rather than the way they are expected to 
by the viewer. And every actor stunningly supports the next as they portray 
flawed individuals who have, in some way, become involved with today's 
distressing drug culture.
The performances are first-rate across the board, any one of which is more 
than worthy of notice. Benicio Del Toro (2000's "The Way of the Gun") is 
almost always the standout feature of any movie in which his presence graces, 
and he is no exception here. As the inherently honest Javier, Del Toro steals 
the show whenever he appears, and proves what an extraordinary physical aura 
he gives off, reminiscent of Russell Crowe or Brad Pitt. It seems Del Toro is 
almost too big of a star to even fit on camera, let alone in any movie that 
is nothing less than equal to his talents.
As DEA agents Montel Gordon and Ray Castro, whose sting operation of drug 
dealer Eduardo Ruiz (Miguel Ferrer) leads them to the arrest of Carlos Ayala, 
Don Cheadle (1997's "Boogie Nights") and Luis Guzman ("Magnolia") develop a 
close-relationed camaraderie that acts as one of the major emotional centers 
of the whole picture. Cheadle is especially outstanding in a truly likable 
turn.
Aside from being a rapturous beauty with a definite skill at line-reading, a 
very-much-pregnant Catherine Zeta-Jones (1999's "Entrapment") unearths 
herself as a stirring actress, bringing a palpable grittiness and poignance 
to her portrayal of a woman who finds herself in the most dire of 
circumstances, and will do anything under her will to save her gradually 
deteriorating family life. 
In the most effective of the subplots, Michael Douglas (2000's "Wonder Boys") 
underplays to ultimate perfection his role as Robert Wakefield, a man 
passionate about making a difference concerning today's drug problems, yet 
too naive and focused on his work to realize he has an addict living within 
the walls of his own house. Lending fine support in one of the strongest 
minor roles, Amy Irving (1976's "Carrie") is quietly effective as Robert's 
lonely wife, Barbara, who blames herself when their daughter's life spins out 
of control. 
Finally, newcomer Erika Christensen, as Robert's teenage daughter, Caroline, 
makes an unforgettable debut with the most heartbreaking character in the 
film. In the early scenes, which show Caroline recreationally taking drugs 
with her pals from school, including Topher Grace (TV's "That '70s Show") and 
Majandra Delfino (TV's "Roswell"), there is an accuracy present that rarely 
is achieved in the world of film. The sequence where Caroline is first 
introduced to heroin, which is followed by a single tear dropping down her 
cheek as she exhales from freebasing for the first time, is one of the most 
haunting images I've ever seen depicted on film. Christensen, like 
Soderbergh's treatment of this portion of the film, injects Caroline with 
such a tragic, raw power that it is often almost too difficult to watch.
Director Soderbergh has made his share of fine films in the past, not the 
least of being his acclaimed 1989 breakthrough, "Sex, Lies & Videotape," but 
"Traffic" is the very first of his efforts that could easily be considered a 
masterpiece. Always involving, always intelligent, and never coy about its 
high aspirations, Soderbergh wants each viewer to take something a little 
different away from the film, not necessarily caring what that one thing 
might be as long as he's sure it won't soon be forgotten. A grand 
entertainment, "Traffic" is one of the best Hollywood productions to come out 
of the pipeline in years, and its final statement is one of unshakable and 
disturbing finality. The drug culture in the United States, states 
Soderbergh, is a war that can most certainly be fought, but one that is never 
likely to be won.
   - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
     Http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman ( Reviews by Dustin Putman )
     Http://www.atnzone.com ( NZone Magazine )

Title
Review for Crinoline Head (1995)
Note: My exclusive, one-on-one interview with Tommy Faircloth is accompanying
this encore review presentation in the next e-mail.
Directed by Tommy Faircloth.
Cast: Richard Abbott, Tommy Faircloth, Billie Fontanez, David Garone, Brian
Kelly, Steven Lee, Tracey Powlas, Cathy Slaminko, Liz Taheri.
1995 - 85 minutes
Not Rated (equivalent of an R for violence, profanity, and some gore).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, May 16, 2001.
A 1997 article in Fangoria Magazine (issue #160) first sparked my attention
to "Crinoline Head," an offbeat independent horror-comedy written and
directed by Tommy Faircloth. The intriguing premise persuaded me to order the
film off of Faircloth's self-owned Horse Creek Productions a couple years
ago, and while expecting merely a low-rent, low-budget slasher pic, what I
got far exceeded my expectations. Since then, I have watched the movie
countless times, and have enjoyed it immensely upon each viewing.
"Crinoline Head" is a no-holds-barred, often hilarious comedy that just so
happens to involve a killer on the loose. It isn't exactly a spoof, a 'la
"Scary Movie," but gets major laughs out of the delightfully perverse,
"tell-it-like-it-is" dialogue, and its cast of diverse, intentionally
dimwitted characters. It isn't an artistic triumph, but it is one of the most
consistently entertaining, impressive indie horror films to have come out of
the '90s.
The film begins as a group of college students prepare to travel to a
secluded, lakeside house for the weekend. Few of them are actually friends
with each other, and they all have their own motives for tagging along. The
house belongs to Derrick's (Richard Abbott) family, and the invitees include
Robyn (Liz Taheri), a wholesome young woman who pines for Derrick from afar;
Cathy (Billie Fontanez), Robyn's tomboy best friend; Trish (Cathy Slaminko),
a stuck-up bitch who wants nothing more than to become a member of the
sorority headed by the ditzy Jenny (Tracey Powlas); Paul (Brian Kelly), a
quiet, mysterious type; Greg (David Garone), a rich boy who hates the
outdoors; and Bodhi (Tommy Faircloth) and Mark (Steven Lee), roommates who
speak and act like male Valley Girls.
Once at the house, Paul spins a tale that he insists occurred at this very
house fifteen years before. It seems a young boy named Dorchester ended up
feasting on his deceased mother after she died at the cabin when food ran out
and no one came to rescue him. When Dorchester finally was discovered, he was
sent to a mental institution, refusing to let go of a crinoline skirt his
mother had been working on before her death, but has since disappeared. Sure
enough, the kids are eventually stalked one at a time by a slasher who wears
a crinoline skirt over his head.
Boasting perfectly-chosen songs from indie punk bands, including Everready
and Tiltwheel, and an eerie score by Michael Borwegen, "Crinoline Head" works
surprisingly well as both an outrageous black comedy and an always-engrossing
horror movie. A playful throwback to the slasher flicks of the '80s, the film
wisely does not try to copy or steal from its predecessors, but comes up with
a style and tone all its own.
Perhaps the highlight of "Crinoline Head" is watching the talented, mostly
unknown actors at work. Each one fully embodies their exaggerated characters,
so much so that it is difficult to believe the performers could be like
anything other than the despicable types they play here. This feeling is made
no more palpable than when dealing with Cathy Slaminko, as Trish, and Tracey
Powlas, as Jenny. Slaminko and Powlas are right on target throughout, proving
their comedic skills, as well as the precise grip they have on their
standout, enchantingly hateful roles.
Also making an impression are Billie Fontanez and Liz Taheri, as the most
down-to-earth people in the whole movie, Cathy and Robyn. Fontanez is
especially captivating and frequently humorous as a tough, young woman who
doesn't stand for being dissed or talked back to. Brian Kelly ("Freakshow"),
as Paul, is also very good, as is Tommy Faircloth himself, who has a
wonderfully bright, likable screen presence, as the celery-obsessed Bodhi.
"Crinoline Head" also exhibits quite a bit of originality when dealing with
the inevitable killings (including an unfortunate drowning in a toilet bowl
filled with excrement), as well as the stylish editing (at one point, a
character's throat being slit is promptly cut by a butcher knife slicing into
a juicy, red tomato) and stalk sequences (a frightened girl nervously sits on
a bed as the closet door behind her slowly opens, revealing the crinoline
skirt-wearing psycho). An unadulterated, genuinely fun movie from beginning
to end, "Crinoline Head" is a motion picture not to be missed by horror buffs
everywhere. It also exposes writer-director Faircloth as a truly talented
filmmaker on the rise.
- Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
http://www.all-reviews.com/reviewers/DustinPutman.htm
http://us.imdb.com/reviewsby?Dustin+Putman
http://www.atnzone.com

Title
Review for Lake Placid (1999)
Directed by Steve Miner.
Cast: Bridget Fonda, Bill Pullman, Oliver Platt, Brendan Gleeson, Betty 
White, Meredith Salenger, Mariska Hargitay.
1999 - 82 minutes.
Rated R (for violence, blood, and profanity).
Reviewed July 18, 1999.
"Lake Placid," plain and simple, is a sorry excuse for a 
"creature-in-the-water" movie, even on the basis of the cliched subgenre. 
Most of the fault has to be put on director Steve Miner who, for reasons 
unknown, insists on making each of his movies ridiculously and shamefully 
short (this is also what severely hurt the otherwise stylish, suspenseful, 
84-minute "Halloween: H20"). Perhaps Miner just wants the audience to think 
his films are fast-paced and exciting, which they may be, but I have extra 
news for him: they also come off feeling utterly empty and leave a negative 
taste in your mouth. Having to spend approximately $7.75 on a movie ticket 
doesn't help matters, either.
Here's the deal: when a scuba diver is torn in half within a small Maine 
lake, New York paleontologist Kelly Scott (Bridget Fonda), whose boyfriend 
(an unbilled Adam Arkin) has just broken up with her, is assigned to travel 
down to the lake and examine the tooth that was found on the corpse's body. 
Once down there, she meets up with game warden Jack Wells (Bill Pullman), 
mythology professor Hector Cyr (Oliver Platt), and two county sheriffs 
(Brendan Gleeson, Meredith Salenger) to investigate the death. They soon 
discover the culprit is a giant, 30-foot-long crocodile that has leaked in 
from the ocean (yeah, right!), and that casually is able to eat large bears 
and cattle without a moment's thought. 
"Lake Placid" is dumb filmmaking. If it wasn't for David E. Kelley's 
surprisingly snappy dialogue within the otherwise haphazard screenplay, the 
movie would be a complete misfire. As is, the film not only is short, but it 
is cheap-looking, despite its $30-million price tag. Although the animatronic 
crocodile is somewhat realistic, the computer-generated shots are beyond 
cheesy (as they were in 1997's similar, but superior, "Anaconda"), and 
practically the whole film seems to be set in the same exact area of woods 
right beside the lake. Due to the length, and just as the case was with 
"Halloween: H20," there is a first-act and then it rapidly switched to the 
third-act. My question to Miner and perhaps Kelley is, "didn't anyone tell 
you that there is supposed to be a second act leading up to the climax?"
In the true bottom-of-the-barrell horror vein, "Lake Placid" portrays a group 
of dimwitted characters who do the most stupid things at the most dire times, 
such as scuba diving even while knowing that there is a vicious crocodile 
lurking about, or running into the water to get away from the reptile! These 
sorts of genre tactics usually can slide by with me just because I get a sick 
satisfaction watching people being stalked by someone and/or something, but 
the film isn't the least bit scary, or even suspenseful. Not once was I able 
to not predict when the crocodile was going to pop out of the water, and all 
of the big action scenes (there aren't many to begin with) were shown in the 
trailers. To top things off, not only are the human characters written below 
normal intelligence, but so is the crocodile who, in one scene, stares at its 
potential food but waits until the person is safe before it attempts to 
attack. 
In the acting department, Bridget Fonda is feisty and resourceful, if a bit 
of a whiner, as the strong-willed heroine, and former- "Golden Girl" Betty 
White is a scene-stealer as elderly farmer Delores Bickerman, who feeds her 
cattle to the crocodile on a regular basis and recites obscene lines of 
dialogue such as, "If I had a dick, I'd show you where to suck it." 
Meanwhile, Bill Pullman is the token potential love interest of Fonda's, 
Brendan Gleeson plays his bumbling sheriff character to a hilt, and Oliver 
Platt often overacts to the point of annoyance, but garners one or two 
laughs. Meredith Salenger, who made a splash in the '80s with such films as 
"The Journey of Natty Gann" and "Dream a Little Dream," returns after a 
sizable big-screen absense with the thankless, thoroughly one-dimensional 
role of another sheriff, and based on her strong performances in the past, 
she deserves far better.
The only thing "Lake Placid" ultimately has going for it is its witty 
dialogue. The premise is old-hat by now and, coincidentally, is stunningly 
close to 1982's fellow horror-comedy, "Alligator." It may tickle your funny 
bone now and again, but not for long periods at a time, and on the same 
weekend in which the terrifying masterpiece, "The Blair Witch Project," goes 
into limited release, the only thing horrific about "Lake Placid" is that 
director Miner actually thought he was making a good movie.
      - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
        Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Blow Out (1981)
We often hear about and see movies that are an example of style over 
substance, which is those films that are technically more impressive 
than the story and characters are. Brian De Palma's "Blow Out," however, 
is one of the few films I've seen that is a triumph of both style and 
substance.
"Blow Out" stars John Travolta in one of his best early roles as a sound 
man for a bunch of B-horror movies. It is in the midst of election 
season, as well as the 100th-anniversary of the Liberty Bell in 
Philadelphia, and while out one night on a bridge recording nighttime 
sounds, including tree branches hitting each other, leaves rustling, and 
owls hooing, he witnesses a car blow out, which then plunges off the 
bridge and into the river. Travolta is able to save the woman inside 
(Nancy Allen), but the driver, who turns out to be the Governor, is 
killed. Later, while listening to the accident that he got on tape, he 
is surprised to hear a bang right before the actual blowout occurred, 
and becomes convinced it was a conspiracy to kill the Governor. 
Meanwhile, the infamous Liberty Bell Killer is stalking the women of 
Philadelphia.
"Blow Out" is a truly virtuoso thriller that is superbly made in all 
aspects, and includes many purely original and visually stunning 
moments, including one scene in which, as Travolta slowly replays the 
sound on the tape, he visualizes where all of the sounds came from. 
Another impressive moment is the first sequence of the picture, a POV 
shot in which a killer slowly stalks the residents of a college dorm. 
And without giving anything away, the last brilliant moment comes in the 
climax, with a giant American flag hanging in the background. All of the 
scenes, as well as the rest of the movie, are helped considerably by 
Pino Donaggio's unforgettable music score. 
Another aspect of "Blow Out" that is refreshing is the amount of layers 
the film piles on. On one hand, it is about a conspiracy. There is also 
a subplot involving the post-production work of the B-movie they are 
making. And then there is the subplot involving the Liberty Bell Killer, 
which leads to a few extremely chilling, suspenseful moments. And there 
is the political election going on. And the anniversary of the Liberty 
Bell. And the sweet relationship that develops between Travolta and 
Allen, who has never been better. By the sound of all of these stories, 
it may seem like the picture may be overstuffed, but it isn't at all. 
Instead, all of these different plotlines add to the atmosphere of the 
film, and makes the movie seem richer and more inventive.
"Blow Out" is one of director De Palma's best films, and ranks right up 
there with 1976's "Carrie," and 1980's "Dressed to Kill," the former 
starring Travolta and Allen, and the latter featuring Allen once again. 
Sadly, De Palma has recently fallen on hard times with the recent 
disappointment, "Snake Eyes," but "Blow Out" is an example of how great 
De Palma can really be.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for X-Men (2000)
Directed by Bryan Singer.
Cast: Hugh Jackman, Anna Paquin, Patrick Stewart, Ian McKellen, Famke 
Janssen, Halle Berry, James Marsden, Bruce Davison, Rebecca Romijn-Stamos, 
Tyler Mane, Ray Park, Shawn Ashmore.
2000 - 100 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for violence and mild profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, July 15, 2000.
It has taken over twenty years for Marvel Enterprises to adapt one of their 
comic books into a live-action motion picture, but they have finally 
succeeded with "X-Men," arguably their most popular current superhero series. 
Having never read the comic before, or seen the animated series, my only 
relation to the world of "X-Men" came eight years ago (when I was in middle 
school), at a time when the collectors' trading cards were all the buzz. I 
remember looking at my schoolmates' cards, and one night I even attempted to 
go buy some, but either I looked in the wrong place or they were all sold 
out. In the sixth grade, collecting "X-Men" cards was the "in" thing to do, 
and being an impressionable preadolescent, it was relatively easy to get 
swept up into the world of Wolverine, Cyclops, Storm, and the many other 
characters. However, the fad never truly rubbed off on me, and aside from a 
cursory knowledge of some of the "mutants" and their powers, I went in to see 
the first "X-Men" movie, which is already shaping up to become a franchise, 
without knowing very much in the way of details.
Being a non-fan, it is with pleasure to report that "X-Men" is a good, 
respectable film--not 'great' by any stretch of the imagination--but one of 
the very few comic book adaptations that has been successfully translated to 
the big-screen. The opening chapter in the "X-Men" saga, I suspect, is more a 
set-up for grander, more satisfying, things to come, much like the original 
"Star Wars" was back in 1977. Some of the central characters are developed 
more than others, and there is a great deal of exposition for which the 
occasional action scenes are built around, but that is just fine, because 
like "The Empire Strikes Back," "X-Men II" will begin to fill in the missing 
puzzle pieces and concentrate on the characters and backstories that there 
was no time for in the original.
Set in the not-so-distant future, when the United States Senate is attempting 
to pass a bill against mutants (i.e. human beings who have obtained special 
powers due to DNA mutations), headed by the discriminatory, close-minded 
Senator Kelly (Bruce Davison). Magneto (Ian McKellen), a mutant whose family 
was taken away from him during WWII, suspects that another present-day 
Holocaust is at hand, and sets out with his henchmen, Mystique (Rebecca 
Romijn-Stamos), a blue-skinned shapeshifter; Toad (Ray Park), who has a very, 
very long tongue; and Sabertooth (Tyler Mane), a hairy man-beast, to prepare 
for war. On the opposing side, the so-called X-Men, mutants who strive for 
peace and acceptance, must stop Magneto before the point of no return. Headed 
by Professor X (Patrick Stewart), a wheelchair-bound telekinetic, the X-Men 
run a school for gifted mutants, with the faculty run by Dr. Jean Grey (Famke 
Jannsen), also a telekinetic; Cyclops (James Marsden), whose eyes shoot laser 
beams if not shielded by sunglasses; and Storm (Halle Berry), who can control 
the weather.
The X-Men acquire two new mutants to their team after saving Wolverine (Hugh 
Jackman) and Rogue (Anna Paquin) from an attack on a wintry Canadian country 
road by Sabertooth. Rogue, a frightened 17-year-old high schooler, has run 
away from home after kissing a classmate and inexplicably putting him in a 
coma for three weeks. Holing up in a bar, she meets Wolverine and suspects 
that they both may be mutants after seeing him get attacked by a group of 
troublemaking men and defending himself by extracting sharp blades from in 
between his knuckles. Because they both are outcasts, and Rogue cannot ever 
come into human contact with anyone without sucking their life energy from 
them, they quickly bond, and at first, do not know what to expect from the 
Without the careful handling of the characters of Wolverine and Rogue, 
"X-Men" would   feel like a shallow excursion to oft-covered territory, just 
as most comic book adaptations fall into the trap of. However, as played by 
Aussie newcomer Hugh Jackman and Academy Award winner Anna Paquin (1993's 
"The Piano"), and scripted by David Hayter, Wolverine and Rogue spring to 
life, forming the heart and soul of the rather simplistic story. The 
camaraderie that develops between the two, with Wolverine sort of becoming 
the surrogate guardian of Rogue, is nicely developed and sweet.
The other X-Men aren't nearly as fully drawn, with most slinking in the 
background for large periods of time, only to come into their own when they 
must use their powers to save themselves or those around them. The exceptions 
are Patrick Stewart ("Star Trek") and Ian McKellen (1998's "Gods and 
Monsters"), as Professor X and Magneto, respectively, the leaders of their 
conflicting sides. Both performers are effective and suitably cast, and this 
is an especially nice change from Stewart's usual role as Captain Picard in 
the "Star Trek" movies.
Meanwhile, Rebecca Romijn-Stamos, despite having next to no dialogue, is 
seductively threatening and leaves a memorable impression as Mystique, 
arguably the nastiest villainess since Michelle Pfeiffer's Catwoman in 1992's 
"Batman Returns." As the other evil opponents, Ray Park, as Toad, and Tyler 
Mane, as Sabertooth, are fairly inconsequential characters, and the film 
neither benefits nor suffers from their appearances. On the "good" side, 
Famke Janssen (1999's "House on Haunted Hill") and Halle Berry (1998's 
"Bulworth") are likable as Jean Grey and Storm (who has my personal favorite 
superpower), but they have very little screen time and even less to do. In 
the next "X-Men" installment, I am sure they will be more prominently 
displayed. Finally, James Marsden is sorely disappointing as Cyclops, 
although it is difficult to say whether his utter blandness is the fault of 
the actor, or merely because he has the least to do. Based on his strong 
previous work in 1999's "Disturbing Behavior" and 2000's "Gossip," my 
suspicions point to the latter. 
Unlike the "Batman" series, which catastrophically plummeted in quality 
following "Batman Returns," "X-Men" relies more on storytelling than the 
visual flair of the set design and cinematography, which is a wise choice. 
Whereas "Batman" is a fantasy almost through-and-through, "X-Men" is set in a 
realistic version of today's world, with characters that only happen to have 
powers beyond normal human capabilities. Nonetheless, the visuals are 
occasionally impressive, particularly a beautiful shot of a snow-covered 
Canadian vista that is reminiscent of 1999's gorgeous "Snow Falling on 
Cedars," as well as the climax set atop the Statue of Liberty.
At 100 minutes (including end credits), "X-Men" reaches its finale about 
fifteen minutes too quickly, leaving a sneaking feeling that a fair amount of 
footage was left on the cutting room floor. Better to end while leaving its 
audience wanting more, however, rather than wearing out its welcome with an 
excessive running time. In an attempt to bring a Marvel comic book to life, 
20th Century Fox has created an entertaining, if slight, motion picture in 
"X-Men," undoubtedly only the beginning in a successful new franchise, and if 
it's any indication that director Bryan Singer (1995's "The Usual Suspects") 
has succeeded, I am already anxiously awaiting a sequel. Look for it to be 
released in 2002. You can mark my word with a capital "X."

Title
Review for Mission to Mars (2000)
Directed by Brian De Palma.
Cast: Gary Sinise, Don Cheadle, Connie Nielsen, Tim Robbins, Jerry O'Connell, 
Peter Outerbridge, Armin Mueller-Stahl, Kavan Smith, Elise Neal, Kim Delaney.
2000 - 112 minutes
Rated PG (for violence and mild profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, March 11, 2000.
Like so many recent films by Brian De Palma, "Mission to Mars" clearly holds 
promise, but eventually throws it away for a more conventional and 
disheartening approach to the material he is working with. Unlike in his 
early career, when he made several stunning motion picture achievements, such 
as 1976's "Carrie," 1980's "Dressed to Kill," and 1981's "Blow Out," lately 
De Palma has been on autopilot, developing a haphazard adaptation of an 
acclaimed novel (1990's "Bonfire of the Vanities"); an idiotic, disposable 
serial killer movie (1992's "Raising Cain"); and a stylistically impressive, 
but substantially empty-headed thriller (1998's "Snake Eyes"). Even his 1996 
box-office hit, "Mission: Impossible," was a film that left audiences 
scratching their heads as to what exactly it was about. With "Mission to 
Mars," De Palma has entered, for the first time, into blatant hack territory, 
as he dwells too often on melodramatic situations involving characters we 
don't care about, and goes right over the deep end with a conclusion that 
caused me to feel sticky afterwards--from all the cheese, that is.
Aiming a little higher in the outer space genre, as there are no evil aliens 
or slimy space creatures to be found, "Mission to Mars" begins at a picnic on 
Earth for the families of NASA workers who are about to launch up into the 
great big, blue sky. While it is appreciated that screenwriters Jim Thomas, 
John Thomas, and Graham Yost opted to show the astronomers' family life 
before the space mission takes off, it tuns out to (1) be pointless filler, 
since the other family members are never seen or heard from again following 
the fifteen minute prologue, and (2) feature terribly arbitrary dialogue that 
even I wouldn't have the guts to write down on paper. 
Switch forward 13 months, a 4-person crew sent to Mars to investigate an 
anomaly turns tragic when a violent funnel arises and eats all but one: Luke 
Graham (Don Cheadle). Sending an SOS to a space station millions of miles 
away, several of the head passengers turn out to be friends with Luke, 
including space cowboy Jim McConnell (Gary Sinise), still grieving over the 
untimely death of his wife (Kim Delaney, shown fleetingly in flashbacks); the 
spousal team of Woody Blake (Tim Robbins) and Terri Fisher (Connie Nielsen); 
and Phil Ohlmyer (Jerry O'Connell), whom we learn nothing about so I have 
nothing to say concerning him. Problems ensue on their mission to Mars, until 
they finally make it to the red planet, where it becomes increasingly evident 
that there is, in fact, other intelligent life in the universe.
For a movie that is supposed to be an adventure, never before have I seen a 
big-budget picture so absolutely laid back in its style. Whenever something 
troublesome comes up, the film remains slow-moving, as if the lack of gravity 
has also taken away the oxygen in the characters' brains. Even in certain 
life-or-death situations, they are constantly calm and collect, and De Palma 
takes great pains in creating tension and suspense (which he occasionally 
does achieve) without any action at all (save for the awe-inspiring funnel 
sequence at the 20-minute mark, which, sorry to say, folks, is as exciting as 
this film ever gets).
For the opening half, "Mission to Mars" was a relatively enjoyable, if 
problematic, motion picture. Even if they were underwritten, I liked some of 
the characters, particularly husband-and-wife Woody and Terri, whom Tim 
Robbins and Connie Nielsen successfully project the feeling that they are in 
love with each other. There are also three great scenes--the aforementioned 
funnel death setpiece; one in which there is a leak somewhere in their 
spacecraft, causing them to slowly lose oxygen; and another in which a key 
character accidentally overshoots their aim outside the ship, causing him/her 
to hurl out into space to the point of no return. 
'Abysmal' is the best adjective to describe the latter half of "Mission to 
Mars." In place of the previous tautness is a treacly encounter with an 
extraterrestrial (who looks about as realistic as Wiley Coyote), followed by 
a sap-inducing vomit bag of a finale that, if the movie hasn't lost you 
before this, will most certainly run right off the tracks for you here. 
Amidst it all is the eventual answer to the origin of life on Earth, which, I 
guess, is passable, but certainly nothing earthshakingly original or profound.
Special mention should go to Ennio Morricone's laughably bad score which, at 
times, is so overwhelmingly soap opera-ish within scenes that aren't even 
dramatic that it elicited at least a couple laughs from me throughout. The 
organ music (yes, you heard that right) is a little better, and certainly the 
most unconventional element of the film, but it still seems out of place.
Since some of the actors are big talents, even when they are simply cashing 
paychecks (as they are doing in "Mission to Mars") they still equip 
themselves admirably. What isn't admirable is their choice to make this 
picture at all, which holds nothing in the way of inventiveness (it's all 
been seen before, in one way or the other, in such superior films as 1968's 
"2001: A Space Odyssey" and 1977's "Close Encounters of the Third Kind"), and 
everything in the way of corniness. "Mission to Mars" isn't exactly a dull 
experience, but it is a monotonous one, because the capabilities it so 
obviously holds is put to zero good use. 

Title
Review for In Crowd, The (2000)
Directed by Mary Lambert.
Cast: Lori Heuring, Susan Ward, Nathan Bexton, Matthew Settle, Laurie 
Fortier, Kim Murphy, Daniel Hugh Kelly, Ethan Erickson, Jay R. Ferguson, 
Katharine Towne, Erinn Bartlett, A.J. Buckley, Tess Harper.
2000 - 108 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for violence, profanity, brief nudity, and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, July 23, 2000.
"The In Crowd" is the type of film that is usually banished by its studio to 
the second or third week of January, an annual dumping ground for lackluster 
movies that have next to no chance of succeeding financially, or otherwise. 
The fact that it is being released in mid-July says even less for the faith 
its studio, Warner Brothers, has in it, as it will surely be buried even more 
quickly amid the bigger, flashier summer pictures. And once word gets out on 
just how bad it really is, expect it to exit theaters in another week and be 
nestled in video stores by the end of the year. Why didn't everyone just save 
themselves the money, count their losses, and send this one straight to 
cable, where it belongs--just barely.
Set at a ritzy country club beach resort, Adrien Williams (Lori Heuring) has 
gotten a job for the summer as one of the club's staff members. Just released 
from a mental institution where she has resided in recent years for as-of-yet 
unknown circumstances, Adrien yearns to get her life into order, and working 
at the resort is her first step back into the real world. The problem is, the 
world she has just stepped into is about as authentic as a plastic Christmas 
tree, and most of the people just as artificial.
Soon, Adrien has been befriended by the beautiful, socially powerful Brittany 
(Susan Ward), who draws her into the lifestyle of her snobby friends, all of 
whom seem to bathe in their family's money without any goals of their own, 
aside from getting wasted by booze and drugs. Brittany and Adrien seem to 
make the perfect match, until they both grow an attraction for their hunky 
tennis instructor, Matt (Matthew Settle). When Matt takes a stronger liking 
to the more genuine Adrien, Brittany's thin facade of kindness and stability 
begins to slowly shatter, and her new friend turns into her next target.
"The In Crowd" is a thoroughly disposable psycho-thriller aimed at the teen 
demographic, and one of the very worst theatrical films of its type in recent 
memory. At a needlessly long 108 minutes, the film meanders along with often 
nowhere to go, all leading up to a conclusion that can easily be telegraphed 
by the twenty-minute mark. The clumsy screenplay, by Mark Gibson and Philip 
Halprin, is shallow and strictly generic, and the unfocused direction, by 
Mary Lambert, practically screams, "first-time filmmaker." The problem is, 
Lambert is a veteran, having previously made 1989's "Pet Sematary" and its 
1992 sequel, and seems to have lost here whatever vigor and style she had for 
her profession to begin with.
With a decidedly large cast of characters, it would take only extraordinary 
actors to pull off the one-dimensional roles that have been written for them. 
Unfortunately, most of them are clearly inexperienced (it doesn't take the 
help of the Internet Movie Database to figure this one out), and the only one 
that really stands out is Susan Ward (TV's "Sunset Beach"), as the 
potentially unhinged Brittany. Usually over-the-top in her portrayal, this 
acting choice works because she is the only one to add any true energy to her 
scenes. The one exception is Nathan Bexton (1999's "Go"), having fun and 
hamming it up as Bobby, the sole good guy of the "in" crowd who, nonetheless, 
is an undoubted alcoholic.
In the central role, Lori Heuring (1998's "The Newton Boys") is passable, but 
too often underacts to the point of nausea, or fails in trying to sell her 
more dramatic moments. While physically fetching, her overall blandness and 
obvious confusion in the motives of her character show through far too often 
than they should. All other actors more or less blend into the background, an 
amazing feat considering how many prominent supporting players there are, 
including Matthew Settle (1998's "I Still Know What You Did Last Summer"), 
Ethan Erickson (1999's "Jawbreaker"), Katharine Towne (2000's "What Lies 
Beneath"), Laurie Fortier (1996's "To Gillian on Her 37th Birthday"), Kim 
Murphy (1998's "City of Angels"), and Daniel Hugh Kelly (1999's "Chill 
Factor").
It would be relatively easy to go on about how the film is really a drama 
that ruined any chances it had at being successful by letting itself be 
awkwardly molded into the form of a cliched, predictable thriller, or how the 
movie is so badly lit that the movie appears as if it was filmed with no 
source of light other than the sun, but why bother? When it all comes right 
down to it, I honestly would be hard-pressed to come up with five positive 
things, no matter how minor or inconsequential they may be, to say about "The 
In Crowd." 

Title
Review for Clown at Midnight, The (1998)
In my first-hand experiences, a person could go through 100 
direct-to-video movies in a row, and when all is said and done, maybe 
ten of them are even remotely worthwhile (whether because they are good 
or have so much unintentional humor that they're worth a look). 
Reminiscent of both 1990's superior "Clownhouse" and 1991's "Popcorn," 
director Jean Pellerin's "The Clown at Midnight" comes very close to 
fitting in to the former group. It is a slasher flick, plain and simple, 
but what is so unanticipated is that the film is a step above many of 
the recent horror movies that have been released theatrically, and 
coming from Artisan Entertainment (the company that also released the 
horrid "Strangeland" to theaters), this film deserves more notice.
"The Clown at Midnight" begins with a prologue: after a late-night 
performance of "Pagliacci" at an opera theater, the lead actress is 
brutally murdered in her dressing room by a person dressed in a clown 
costume following a quick tryst with her boyfriend. Switch forward about 
fifteen years, the deceased singer's teenage daughter (Sarah Lassez), 
who has recently been having frighteningly real dreams and flashbacks to 
the night of the murder, returns to the opera house, along with several 
other students, to fix up and renovate the place. After their teacher 
(Margot Kidder) mysteriously disappears, the students are left alone in 
the deserted building and, one by one, are stalked by an inexplicable 
clown figure whom lurks in the secret passageways under the stage.
Does the premise sound like something right out of the '80s 
tried-and-true stalk-and-slash genre? Perhaps, but what differentiates 
"The Clown at Midnight" from the norm are some fairly nail-biting and 
stylishly executed moments. Aside from the startling opening, the murder 
set-pieces always try to suck as much suspense out of each situation as 
possible, especially one set in the basement, in which the location of 
the killer is almost impossible to predict. And although usually very 
predictable, this particular sequence genuinely surprised me.
Ultimately, the characters are not quite as successfully articulated. 
Aside from Lassez, James Duval (as the handsome rebel/make-up effects 
expert), and Tatyana Ali (as Lassez's best friend, Monica), all of the 
roles are strictly amateurish and one-dimensional, particularly the 
proto-typical jock and witch with a capital 'B.' Also, as is usual with 
slasher movies, the characters are all forced to do really stupid things 
during the most dire circumstances, including treading off alone in dark 
areas of the opera house, or stopping for a few moments to look back 
while in the middle of being chased. As far as the performances go, they 
are almost unanonymously above-par for the direct-to-video horror 
subgenre. Of course, Duval and Lassez have both appeared in several 
independent films (including Gregg Araki's "The Doom Generation" and 
"Nowhere"), but the standout is Ali (TV's "The Fresh Prince of Bel Air" 
and "Jawbreaker"), who is not only spunky and cute, but also truly 
likable, an amazing feat for such an underwritten part.
Enjoyable as the film is, "The Clown at Midnight" really is nothing 
special, and breaks no new ground. The screenplay, by Kenneth J. Hall, 
is highly problematic, as is the climax, which doesn't make a whole lot 
of sense when you stop to think about it. It's a dumb horror picture, 
nothing much more, and is the type of effort that the "Scream" movies 
make fun of (although there is a clever line of dialogue here in which 
Monica says, following a false alarm, "for a second, I felt like one of 
those bimbos in a cheesy horror flick"). There have been so many worse 
movies of its type, though, that to completely bash it would be unfair. 
Here's some last advice: if you are a horror fan, give "The Clown at 
Midnight" a chance; you may be pleasantly surprised. On the other hand, 
if you hate movies where people with low-IQs are chased around and 
killed by demented bozos, avoid it at all costs!
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Happiness (1998)
Directed by Todd Solondz.
Cast: Jane Adams, Dylan Baker, Philip Seymour Hoffman, Lara Flynn Boyle, 
Cynthia Stevenson, Camryn Manheim, Louise Lasser, Ben Gazzara, Rufus 
Read, Jared Harris, Elizabeth Ashley, Jon Lovitz, Marla Maples, Anne 
Bobby, Molly Shannon.
1998 - 140 minutes
Not Rated (by the MPAA standards, the equivalent of NC-17 for profanity, 
violence, brief sex, masturbation, nudity, and disturbing subject 
matter).
Reviewed April 29, 1999.
Note: This review may include elements that are possible spoilers; if 
you haven't seen the film yet, and plan to, read with caution.
Acclaimed independent director Todd Solondz is not, and I repeat not, a 
fluke. Since making the criminally overlooked 1989 gem, "Fear, Anxiety, 
and Depression" and the brilliant, uncompromising 1996 "Welcome to the 
Dollhouse," Solondz has proven that he has a very distinct and 
on-the-mark way of coming up with original characters set against the 
backdrop of dire, seriously downbeat stories, and then, somehow, is able 
to make them funny. Not a one-liner sort of funny, but the sort of funny 
that comes from wonderously accurate situations in which comedy 
naturally shines through, even as we are suffering along with the people 
on-screen. Solondz's latest film, "Happiness," which is now available on 
video and DVD after a controversial but much-heralded run in theaters 
(its original distributor, Universal, dropped the film after being 
scared off with the dark subject matter, only for the indie company, 
Good Machine Productions, to graciously snap it up). And after finally 
seeing the film, I have two comments concerning this: (1) words fail me 
to think that Universal can snub this masterful piece of work, but then 
release such "award winners" as the horror joke-fest, "Bride of Chucky," 
and the schmaltzy, embarrassingly sentimental, "Patch Adams"; and (2) 
why exactly did this film recieve an initial NC-17 rating, only to drop 
it and go unrated? Sure, the material that is dealt with reaches into 
the darkest depths of human nature, but not even a miniscule second of 
it is in any way exploitative, and the two infamous ejaculation scenes 
aren't even as graphically displayed as in 1998's R-rated box-office 
hit, "There's Something About Mary." I guess since "...Mary" reached for 
the lowest-common-denominator, while "Happiness" dealt with its 
characters and situations truthfully, the MPAA didn't know how to react 
to something so intelligent. 
In true Altmanesque style, a 'la "Nashville" and "Short Cuts," 
"Happiness" interweaves several different stories together into a 
perfectly-woven tapestry that is admittedly quite ironic, since the 
title of the film is the farthest possible feeling away that any of the 
miserable characters presented here could be. The picture centers on 
three New Jersey-based sisters and the people around them, all of which 
have their definite problems and eccentricities. Joy Jordan (Jane Adams) 
is the youngest of the three, a recently-turned thirty-year-old who 
still lives at her parent's home, writes songs and plays the guitar in 
her spare time, seems destined to get involved in loser guys, and is 
told early on by her sister, Trish (Cynthia Stevenson), that everyone 
always thought she would be a failure. Trish, the oldest sister, is a 
joyful housewife and mother of three who naively does not know that her 
psychiatrist husband, Bill Maplewood (Dylan Baker), is secretly a 
pedophile who often buys children's magazines to get off on them and 
seems to be headed down a path of destruction. And finally, the third 
sister, Helen (Lara Flynn Boyle), is a much-admired writer who is 
growing bored of her artificial and aimless relationships with men and 
believes that her own writing is terrible. Two of her poems, entitled 
"Rape at 11" and "Rape at 12," lead her to ultimately wish that she had
 been raped as a child, simply so she could be authentic. Helen becomes 
intrigued one day when she recieves an anonymous obscene phone call that 
is actually coming from her nerdy, insecure, and overweight neighbor, 
Allen (Philip Seymour Hoffman), who randomly chooses numbers in the 
phone book and calls the women up, only to spit out sexual and verbal 
threats upon them. 
As you can already see, the peoples' lives that inhabit "Happiness" 
certainly aren't made up of sugar and spice and everything nice, and 
many of the depressed or unusual characters haven't even been mentioned, 
including the Jordan sisters' parents, Mona and Lenny (Louise Lasser and 
Ben Gazzara), who are getting separated after forty years of marriage; 
Bill and Trish's 11-year-old son, Billy (Rufus Read), who has recently 
become concerned that he hasn't been able to "cum" yet; another neighbor 
of Allen's, Kristina (Camryn Manheim), an obese, lonely woman who is 
harboring a dark secret of her own concerning the death of the apartment 
buiding's doorman; an angry possible suitor (Jon Lovitz) of Joy's who 
practically snaps her in half with crushingly mean-spirited words after 
she breaks up with him; and another one of Joy's troubled romances, Vlad 
(Jared Harris), who is a Russian taxi driver and thief.
Todd Solondz's "Happiness" is one of the most startlingly courageous and 
assured films of 1998, a movie that takes these wide variety of 
off-centered character, all of which could have easily been transformed 
into caricatures, but instead, treats them honestly and openly as 
(severely) flawed, but strangely likable human beings, some of which you 
may find yourself surprisingly sharing characteristics with as the film 
presses on. "Happiness" is filled to bursting with incredibly harsh and 
painful emotions, but as is standard with Solondz, much of it is 
downright hilarious as well, and intentionally so. It wouldn't be too 
great of a shock to actually find youself ashamed at almost inexplicably 
laughing at certain very human situations, as well as the characters 
themselves. After only three films, it is obvious that Solondz is one of 
the masters of flawlessly intermingling both pitch-black comedy and 
heartbreaking drama, sometimes at the very same moment.
Because of the fine line the film is constantly walking on between 
realism and ludicrousness, it was vital that the screenplay, by Solondz, 
and the many performances not be merely adequate, and they aren't. The 
writing is particularly effective because of the facile way that it 
moves from one group of characters to the next, and then back again, all 
the while constantly coming up with fresh, stirring, humorous, and 
devastating situations. In the one previously mentioned scene that is 
obviously so emotionally damaging for Joy, Trish tells her the truth 
about how everyone feels negatively about her path in life, foolishly 
unaware that words really do hurt.
In the acting department, "Happiness" has acquired several well-known 
actors (but not overly so) as well as some first-timers in a starring 
role. Jane Adams, whom has previously been seen in such small roles as 
1995's "Father of the Bride II" and 1998's "Music From Another Room," is 
the one truly kind character, as Joy, and Adams brings out all of her 
appropriate emotions, including the confusion that she feels for what 
she wants to do in her life. Joy loves playing the guitar and writing 
songs, but is hesitant to show them to anyone, and moves from one job 
(as a telephone operator) to another (a teacher for distrusting foreign 
refugees!). One very funny scene, due to the so-genuine-it's-scary way 
that the characters react, occurs when another worker at the telephone 
job dies, but when she tells one of her co-workers (Molly Shannon) all 
about him, a budding conversation erupts around the office as everyone 
else tries to figure out who he was, even though he worked with all of 
them for a whole year. 
As Trish, Stevenson is perfect as the unsuspecting wife and mother who 
"has it all," even though she is clueless to her husband's very serious 
and criminal problem. In perhaps the best performance in the film, Dylan 
Baker is remarkable and sincere as the chronic child-molesting Bill, and 
what is even more astounding is how much we are able to sympathize and 
care about him, even after we watch him in one disturbing, nerve-racking 
scene, drug his whole family and his son's playmate at a sleepover, just 
so he can have his way with the young child. The brutally honest 
relationship between Bill and his son, Billy, is also highly 
confounding, since they are able to speak to each other with such 
unabashed frankness, and about the most personal things imaginable.
Philip Seymour Hoffman is amusing as the rather pathetic and shy Allen, 
as his main hobby, we find, is simply making obscene phone calls. 
Clearly, he has terminally low self-esteem, so when he finally rings up 
Helen who, in response, calls him back with *69 and tells him to call 
her again some other time, he doesn't know how to respond. His 
blossoming romance with his neighbor, Kristina, is one of the more 
touching elements in the film. As played poignantly by Camryn Manheim 
(TV's "The Practice"), Kristina keeps coming over to talk to Allen 
because she likes him, but he thoughtlessly ignores her, even though she 
is exactly what he has been looking for all along: a loving, caring 
relationship.
Also of special notice is Lara Flynn Boyle as the third sister, Helen. 
Boyle has always been an actress I've kept my eye on, and she deserves 
more challenging and satisfying work, such as this film. Louise Lasser 
is a hoot as the sisters' aging mother, a sarcastic, precarious woman 
who, in one of the funniest scenes, spots her husband's possible 
mistress walking down the street and immediately begins to aim her car 
right for her, only to pull out of it at the last minute and wave to her 
as she passes by. Jon Lovitz also makes quite an impression in the 
attention-getting opening scene, especially since he is playing someone 
so unlike any other character I've seen him portray.
Although it's almost foolish to compare such two recently great films, 
"Happiness" does not quite reach the overall height of Solondz's 
masterpiece, "Welcome to the Dollhouse," but nor should it have to. With 
this latest motion picture, Solondz has taken a gigantic risk, and with 
so many characters, it's inevitable that a few moments would feel 
marginally uneven. At a sizable running time of 140 minutes, the film is 
never, ever boring and the time flies by. If Solondz had failed with 
this film, it would have been damaging to his career because of the many 
chances that are taken, but he grandly succeeds in almost everything he 
has set out to do. Yes, most of the characters are outlandish, at times 
dangerous, people that you wouldn't really want to meet, but what 
Solondz has done is taken these extreme characters to bring us a 
portrait of lonely, seemingly meaningless lives that most likely stand 
for our own. No one in "Happiness" is actually happy, but they 
persistently strive to be just that. God, don't we all?
Dustin Putman's Film 
Haven 

Title
Review for Perfect Storm, The (2000)
Directed by Wolfgang Petersen.
Cast: George Clooney, Mark Wahlberg, John C. Reilly, John Hawkes, William 
Fichtner, Diane Lane, Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio, Rusty Schwimmer, Allen 
Payne, Karen Allen, Bob Gunton, Cherry Jones, Dash Mihok, Christopher 
McDonald, Janet Wright, Josh Hopkins, Michael Ironside.
2000 - 129 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity, violence, and intensity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, July 1, 2000.
Wolfgang Petersen's "The Perfect Storm," is a slam-bang, pulse-pounding 
action thriller that has the clear distinction of creating the most realistic 
and horrifying storm ever put to celluloid. This is appropriate, of course, 
since it is based upon the worst storm in recorded history that fell upon the 
New England border in October 1991, when three weather patterns (a cold 
front, a low-pressure system, and a hurricane) collided. With the awesome 
technology of Industrial Light & Magic, Petersen has crafted a technical 
masterpiece that puts you dead-center in the storm, surrounded by visual 
effects that never once call attention to themselves, and are always nothing 
less than believable. 
The humans involved in the catastrophe hold no such scrutiny, but they are 
adequately developed enough that we care about them when their lives become 
in peril. The film focuses on the plight of the Andrea Gail, a boat holding a 
crew of fisherman from Gloucester, Mass., who have set out on the open seas 
for one last attempt to earn some extra money by catching swordfish. When 
skipper Billy Tyne (George Clooney) decides to travel to the faraway Flemish 
Cap for one last round of fishing, despite the warnings of friendly rival 
Linda Greenlaw (Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio) that they will have no way of 
getting back without passing through the storm, Billy's pride and ego get the 
best of him. With the agreement of the other men on board, including Bobby 
Shatford (Mark Wahlberg), whose loving girlfriend, Christina (Diane Lane), 
waits nervously on land, they opt to ride out the storm rather than let all 
of the fish they have caught spoil. What they don't know, since their radio 
has gone out, is the full force of the storm, and that they are heading right 
for the eye of it.
Accurately capturing each side of the storm, and the people involved in it, 
there are also four subplots at hand: the dilemma of the search and rescue 
helicopter team; the plight of the Mistral, a yacht headed for Bermuda that 
is carrying three passengers (Karen Allen, Bob Gunton, Cherry Jones); the 
Andrea Gail's friends and family, who nailbitingly await any news on their 
rescue; and the meteorologist (Christopher McDonald) who first coined the 
phrase, "The Perfect Storm," because every weather pattern was in place to 
create a storm of disastrous proportions.
Based on the book of the same name by Sebastian Junger, "The Perfect Storm" 
is an edge-of-your-seat thrill ride that is one step above most disaster 
pictures of its type because of the reality that is brought to it, both from 
a visual standpoint, as well as in its portrayal of the working-class 
characters. While not all are developed satisfactorily, particularly the 
three passengers on the Mistral, as well as suave, ladies' man Andrea Gail 
traveler Alfred Pierre (Allen Payne), they all are on hand to create a dark 
atmosphere and brooding sense of dread that hangs over the proceedings. 
As head of the Andrea Gail, George Clooney is well-cast as the no-nonsense 
Billy Tyne, whose love of fishing outweighs all other things, including the 
possibility of death. Their second film in a row together (the other being 
1999's "Three Kings"), Mark Wahlberg equips himself nicely as Bobby Shatford, 
a young man who tells Billy at one point, "I have a girl that I can't stand 
to be away from for more than ten minutes. But then again, I love to fish." 
Bobby has agreed for Christina to do away with his somewhat dangerous 
profession after this one last trip, and the conflicting feelings that he 
feels is made palpable, due to Wahlberg's strong performance. 
Rounding out the large cast is the always-good Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio, 
as Linda Greenlaw; Diane Lane, as Christina; John C. Reilly, heartfelt and 
likable as Andrea Gail fisherman Dale Murphy, who is having problems handling 
not being able to see his young son as much since he separated from his wife; 
William Fichtner as bad-tempered Sully; and John Hawkes as the lonely Bugsy. 
As Irene, a straight-talking, yet sweet, single mother whom Bugsy strikes up 
a potential relationship with before he sets off on the Andrea Gale, Rusty 
Schwimmer is a charismatic, natural standout, and steals each of her scenes.
All human actors, however, play second banana to the star attraction of the 
picture, which is the robust, life-threatening storm itself, complete with 
downpouring rain, violent lightning, and, in a startlingly frightening 
climactic moment, a 100-foot tidal wave. The special effects supervisors at 
ILM have done a striking job bringing the storm to life, in all its horrific 
glory, and it is because of them that most warrants seeing it on the big 
screen.
"The Perfect Storm" isn't a great motion picture. There are too many loose 
story threads and one too many artificial and cliched lines of dialogue for 
such a title. The picture also, perhaps, takes just a little too much time 
getting to the storm, and fleetingly tests the patience. Once it gets going, 
though, it never lets up. As a purely visceral experience, "The Perfect 
Storm" is an electrifying powerhouse, undoubtedly the most exciting and 
rewarding action-thriller of the summer.

Title
Review for Gummo (1997)
Directed by Harmony Korine.
Cast: Jacob Reynolds, Jacob Sewell, Nick Sutton, Chloe Sevigny, Darby 
Dougherty, Carisa Bara, Linda Manz, Max Perlich, Harmony Korine, Ellen 
M. Smith.
1997 - 95 minutes.
Rated R (for violence, nudity, and profanity).
Reviewed October 29, 1998.
Harmony Korine first made a splash into the film world by writing 1995's 
raw, critically-acclaimed, "Kids." It was obvious he had a talent for 
writing, judging from that picture, but could he direct? All doubts of 
this question were quickly diminished for me after seeing his debut, 
"Gummo," which was my favorite film of 1997, and one of my top 5 of the 
decade. It is a film experience like no other, a movie for which the 
word original was clearly invented for.
"Gummo," breaks all the rules of filmmaking. It mixes all film stocks, 
as well as occasionally adds documentary-style sequences. It does not 
have a nicely packaged plot and characters, but instead, is a series of 
fascinating, invigorating vignettes that form a mosaic of the small, 
backwoods town of Xenia, Ohio, where a disasterous tornado hit a few 
years before. The main people we follow, although there are many, many 
more, include two teenage boys (Jacob Reynolds and Nick Sutton) who kill 
cats and sell their corpses to a supermarket for money; three sisters 
(Chloe Sevigny, Darby Dougherty, Carisa Bara), two of which are albino; 
a lowlife (Max Perlich) who pimps his wife, who has down-syndrome; and a 
mysterious boy (Jacob Sewell) who wanders the town wearing big, pink 
bunny ears.
There is not much else that can be said about the "story," because there 
is none on the surface. One of the greatest delights of "Gummo," is 
trying to figure out what everything means and what the underlying 
themes are. Much of what I have described may sound offensive, like the 
cats being killed, and to some people, I am sure it will be. After all, 
that is why when originally released, the critics either thought it was 
a piece of vile trash or a piece of cinematic brilliance (I am in the 
latter category). Ultimately, some of the best movies are those that 
aren't afraid to be different, and aren't afraid to take chances, even 
if it means outraging some audiences. 
Another one of the biggest treats of "Gummo," is that you could watch it 
over and over again, just so to catch all of the different elements. 
There are so many things going on, and so many layers, that by the 
film's end, it feels like I actually had taken a trip to Xenia and 
learned a great deal about its history (even though the film is 
fictional, and actually filmed in Nashville). There is also a great deal 
of humor, some of which is very funny and obviously not all of it 
scripted. One particular scene involving an interview with a real albino 
woman is hilarious, especially when she says her favorite actor is 
Patrick Swayze. "I would actually pay money to touch him." 
The performances, some of which are by non-actors, all seem extremely 
natural, for the most part, and many of the scenes are done so perfectly 
and accurately that it felt like I really was watching a documentary, 
albeit one that featured quite a few dysfunctional, but always 
interesting, individuals. Chloe Sevigny, who also had the duty of being 
costume designer, is one of my favorite actresses (after her winning 
roles in this, "The Last Days of Disco," and the otherwise mediocre, 
"Palmetto"), and she acts so differently here that it's like watching a 
different person. Linda Manz, in her first role since 1980's "Out of the 
Blue," is memorable and rather touching as a mother who mourns for her 
dead husband by doing a tap dance in front of a mirror in the basement.
It is difficult to explain "Gummo," since it is so completely innovative 
and unconventional. Director Korine is truly a genius when it comes to 
the cinema, and he has said that he made the film not to please anybody, 
but just to make something that he himself would want to see. And 
through the countless bizarre and absorbing vignettes, is a message, I 
think, that is closely related to that of the message in, "Kids," even 
though it was more accessible in that film. It is a film not about a lot 
of strange people in a town, but a film about the world in general, and 
one that has a great deal to say about the loss of childhood innocence. 
Saying that, "Gummo," is reminiscent of the mindblowing, controversial, 
virtuoso 1928 short film, "Un Chien Andalou," by Luis Bunuel and Salvador 
Dali, which is now considered a classic, is probably the highest 
compliment I could give it. When that film was released, people were 
outraged at some of the images featured in it, from dead donkeys rammed 
into a piano, to a woman's eye being slit open in close-up. It was 
disturbing, for sure, but what those viewers didn't realize was that 
Bunuel and Dali wanted to tell the story of a confused man's identity 
crisis. You just have to look underneath the eccentric, often grotesque 
surface, to uncover the deep meaning it was trying to say. I have a 
feeling Korine would easily understand that.

Title
Review for Mummy, The (1999)
Directed by Stephen Sommers.
Cast: Brendan Fraser, Rachel Weisz, John Hannah, Arnold Vosloo, Jonathan 
Hyde, Kevin J. O'Connor.
1999 - 125 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for mild profanity and horror elements).
Reviewed May 8, 1999.
The first week of May apparently has become the new starting-off point 
for the Summer Movie Season, as a big special-effects blockbuster opens 
and cashes in tons o' money (last year was "Deep Impact"). This year, 
that film is "The Mummy" a loose-as-a-goose remake of the 1932 Universal 
horror classic. The funny thing is, this latest adaptation's villain 
isn't even an actual mummy, which sort of makes the title rather 
confused. On second thought, that's probably appropriate, since the 
whole film is a painfully muddled attempt at intermixing three genres 
(adventure/horror/comedy) that only a master director could pull off. 
Unfortunately, the director of "The Mummy" happens to be Stephen 
Sommers, a talentless filmmaker whose clumsy and idiotic 
monster-on-a-cruise-ship adventure/horror/comedy "Deep Rising" graced 
the silver screens last year, and whose motto probably is, "the more 
special effects shots, the better the film!" I'd say Sommers should have 
quit while he was ahead, but he's never actually been ahead.
In the brief prologue, set around 1200 B.C., a narrator that would sound 
better equipped for a slapstick in the "Naked Gun" vein tells the story 
of the high priest, Imhotep (Arnold Vosloo), who was caught having an 
affair with the Pharaoh's wife, and then heartbroken when she killed 
herself. In an attempt to resurrect her body, the proceedings are broken 
and Imhotep is mummified alive and locked in a tomb with a mound of 
flesh-eating scarab bugs.
Switch forward to Cairo, Egypt, circa 1926, Evelyn (Rachel Weisz), an 
intelligent, klutzy librarian, is given a sacred map by her older 
brother, Jonathan (John Hannah), that points the way to Hamunaptra, the 
infamous city in which Imhotep's body stands amid treasure. With the 
help of the ruggish American adventurer, Rick O'Connell (Brendan 
Fraser), whom has been to Hamunaptra before, the three of them set out 
to find the treasures, including a consecrated book hidden amidst the 
ruins, but instead find The Book of the Dead. Once Evelyn foolishly 
unlocks and reads a passage from it, the ghoulishly decomposing body of 
Imhotep is resurrected, both to set into motion the ten deadly plagues 
of Egypt and to once again attempt the revival of his beloved mistress.
Pleasant and wickedly funny is the way I would have decribed "The Mummy" 
at the 45-minute mark, which mostly involves the characters of Evelyn 
and Rick and their travels to Hamunaptra. The dialogue was amusing (at 
one point when Evelyn gets drunk, she mistakenly says, "I bet you're 
wondering why a place like me would want to go to a girl like this"), 
and an action sequence in which they must jump from a firey ship when it 
is taken over by their adversaries was fast-paced and exciting. It's 
just too bad that these early scenes were simply the set-up for the 
resurrection of Imhotep (who, by the way, isn't a mummy but a rotting 
corpse) and a non-stop parade of mindless and flashy visual effects, 
courtesy of Industrial Light & Magic. Ultimately, once the main story 
arrived, the film completely fell apart, losing sight of its characters 
and concentrating solely on the millions of dollars that had been put up 
on the screen. Well, Sommer also was concerned about throwing a corny, 
completely inappropriate one-liner at us every minute, and I almost was 
apt to feel sorry for the waste of Fraser's talent until I remembered 
that he was the one that chose to appear in the film in the first place.
A more on-target title probably would have been "Prince of Egypt 2: 
Imhotep's Tomb," since the animated film from last December is 
frighteningly similar, minus the dead coming back to life. From the 
artificial first shot that would lead you to believe you were about to 
view an animated feature in which hundreds of slaves are shown working 
among the pyramids, to the subplot in which the plagues are set into 
motion, including a swarm of locusts and the river running red, the film 
was basically "The Prince of Egypt," but with comedy. Although ILM's 
effects look good, they are never actually convincing or threatening, 
nor is the film itself, since you get the notion right from the start 
that every character is bound to die except for our noble protagonists 
who improbably escape any sort of life-threatening danger that comes 
their way. 
Another plot development that threatens to strangle your suspension of 
disbelief concerns Imhotep's mission to sacrifice Evelyn in order to 
bring his love back from the grave. Oddly enough, he didn't need a 
female sacrifice when he tried the same ritual during the prologue. 
So what's to like about "The Mummy?" Let's see. I did like the opening 
sections and some of the line-readings were funny. Rachel Weisz is a 
stand-out in her role of Evelyn, the only three-dimensional and actually 
likable character in the whole film. Since her wasted turns in 1996's 
awful "Chain Reaction" and the failed "Stealing Beauty," she has clearly 
been a young actress on the rise, and with "The Mummy" she should 
graduate to a more well-known status. Once Imhotep is defeated (I'm not 
giving anything away since this is a given before you even walk into the 
theater), the film jumps back to life for the last ten minutes, in which 
they must race to get out of the underground city as it crashes down 
around them. 
A big-budget remake of "The Mummy" has been a much-sought after motion 
picture project since the mid-'80s, but such innovative directors as 
George Romero and Joe Dante had been turned down because the studio 
claimed that no straight-forward horror movie could succeed with a big 
budget. So what did Universal do instead? They traded in scares and 
suspense, not to mention far more impressive "mummy" designs (that can 
be seen in this month's issue of Fangoria Magazine), for a mainstream 
action-adventure directed by the newly-confirmed hack, Stephen Sommers, 
who obviously has no idea how to create tension, all in the name of a 
few extra box-office bucks. That's Hollywood for you.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Runaway Bride (1999)
Directed by Garry Marshall.
Cast: Richard Gere, Julia Roberts, Joan Cusack, Paul Dooley, Rita Wilson, 
Hector Elizondo, Christopher Meloni, Jean Schertler, Laurie Metcalf.
1999 - 116 minutes.
Rated PG (for mild profanity).
Reviewed July 31, 1999.
1990's "Pretty Woman" became the most popular romantic comedy of all time not 
only because of the unmistakable chemistry between Richard Gere and Julia 
Roberts, but because of the surprising charm and innocence that it also 
possessed. It may not have been groundbreakingly original (and it wasn't), 
but it ably carried itself purely on the intelligence of the actors and 
screenplay. Over nine years have passed now, and although Roberts and Gere 
are a little bit older, they unfortunately aren't quite as wise in their 
project choices, as proven by their sophomore reunion with director Garry 
Marshall. Unlike "Pretty Woman," "Runaway Bride" constantly feels like a 
phony, artificially manufactured excuse just to get the two actors together 
once again. Apparently, the importance of the writing and story weren't at 
the top of everyone's minds when they decided to take on this lackluster 
endeavor.
Ike Graham (Richard Gere) is a once-divorced columnist for the USA Today who 
happens to be working for his ex-wife (Rita Wilson). Searching for a 
revitalizing, interesting story to write about, Ike is told by one of his 
buddies that there is a young lady in the small rural town of Hale, Maryland, 
who likes to dump grooms on their wedding day and run away. When the article 
finally is written, that woman, Maggie Carpenter (Julia Roberts), who doesn't 
purposefully hurt her fiances as much as she has trouble committing herself 
for a lifetime with one certain person, is humiliated and outraged. Writing a 
letter to the editor of the USA Today spotting fifteen--count 'em, 
15!--factual errors, Ike is promptly fired for turning the paper into 
basically a tabloid. Fortunately, his best friend, Fisher (Hector Elizondo), 
comes up with a sure-fire way to save Ike's job: you see, Maggie is planning 
to get married in a week or two (her fourth attempt) with Bob (Christopher 
Meloni), a football coach and fitness nut, and if she once again backs out at 
the last minute, Ike's theory that he wrote in the paper will be confirmed.
When Ike arrives in Hale ("I think I'm in Mayberry!"), a quaint, 
old-fashioned kind of town, he gets a room at the motel in the town square 
and starts to pursue and question Maggie, a misunderstood woman who works at 
the local hardware store and is the butt of many "harmless" jokes with the 
townspeople (all of which know each other by name). At first despising the 
head-strong, determined Ike, she finally agrees for him to follow her around 
to see what makes her tick--for a sizable fee, of course, which must be a 
rip-off/ode to "Pretty Woman," where Gere payed Roberts (playing a 
prostitute) to spend six days with him while in L.A. Since Ike and Maggie are 
spending all of their time together, they start to get to know one another to 
the point that marriage with Ike sounds more appealing than marriage with 
Bob. But even if they go through with it, who is to say Maggie won't run 
again?
"Runaway Bride" lacks the smarts, wit, and spontaneity that the best romantic 
comedies have (just recently, the other Julia Roberts-starrer of the summer, 
"Notting Hill," had this). Simply put, this new film is stuck on auto-pilot, 
and therefore, comes off as a tiresome excursion into terrain that has been 
covered too many times to count. For one, you know going in that director 
Garry Marshall wouldn't dare make a movie with these two actors and not have 
them get together by the final act, so there is nary an ounce of suspense or 
interest generated from this major aspect of the story. To shake things up a 
little, Marshall and screenwriters Josann McGibbon and Sara Parriott should 
have went a similar route as Roberts' sweet 1997 career-revitalizing hit, "My 
Best Friend's Wedding," which had an upbeat resolution that was nonetheless 
more truthful and complicated than by just having the two romantic leads get 
together. Perhaps Marshall feared that audiences would get upset if Roberts 
and Gere didn't live happily ever after at the end, but it, no doubt, would 
have at least added a sprinkle of originality that is hopelessly absent from 
almost every scene in the overlong 116-minute running time. And that's 
another thing; the film may actually have worked on a minor level had it 
concluded with its natural ending, but instead, it proceeds to go on for 
another unnecessary fifteen minutes.
Once again, Julia Roberts and Richard Gere shine in their latest foray, but 
the romantic heat between the two that was so tangible in "Pretty Woman" 
isn't present nearly as much here, most likely because the writing, as 
mentioned, isn't as satisfying. Their roles of Ike and Maggie also happen to 
be the least interesting characters in the whole film, which is a glaring 
flaw that looms overhead most of the picture. No fault of Roberts and Gere, 
especially, who seems far more loose and care-free than I think I've ever 
seen him on film, but every time one of the supporting players would appear 
on-screen, things would brighten up considerably.
Joan Cusack, as always, is a comic delight and standout as Maggie's best 
friend and hairstylist at the "Curl Up and Dye" Salon (which, yes, garnered a 
big laugh). Cusack is not really wasted, particularly since she and Roberts 
have a subtle, honest scene together, but it is rather frustrating to 
constantly see Cusack, one of America's biggest current acting talents, cast 
in the "friend" role. Studio heads, take note: Give Cusack the lead in a 
movie, for once. Believe me, she has proven her worth and is fully capable of 
holding up a picture on her own. Why don't other people see this? 
One compliment that probably should be given to the screenwriters is in the 
three-dimensional treatment given to the ex-wife character of Gere's, played 
by Rita Wilson in a memorable, superior performance to anything I've seen her 
in. Too often overacting or missing the mark (see her disappointing work in 
1998's remake of "Psycho"), Wilson is perfect here as a woman who still cares 
for Gere, despite their divorce and avoidance to what went wrong with their 
marriage, and is able to have a warm, loving relationship with him. Of the 
other supporting actors, Hector Elizondo is not used nearly as well or 
effectively as he was in "Pretty Woman" and is given very little to do, while 
Laurie Metcalf is hilarious in her too-brief performance as the town baker, 
as is Jean Schertler as Roberts' lovable, if brazen, granny.
When you go to see a movie that features megastars Julia Roberts and Richard 
Gere and, yet, you mostly want them to disappear into the background so you 
can watch the people around them strut their stuff, what exactly does that 
tell you? In my opinion, it tells you that the screenplay needed an extensive 
rewrite to strengthen the two lead characters, who aren't nearly as flashy 
and absorbing as Cusack, Wilson, Metcalf, and Schertler. When Roberts and 
Gere finally do come together in the last scene, you are happy for them, but 
left with an uncertain feeling inside. If Roberts' Maggie really does have a 
lot of personal problems to work out, then how can you be so sure that she 
and Ike won't be making a trip to divorce court a week later? Or, better yet, 
and it is this plot contrivance that is the most difficult to swallow, why 
would Maggie be smitten with Ike in the second half when she thoroughly can't 
stand him in the former section because of the cruel things he wrote about 
her, in a country-wide newspaper, no less? Regretfully, "Runaway Bride" too 
often appears to be so concerned with big box-office receipts that everyone 
involved forgot about making the film actually good. Sorry, Julia, but don't 
worry, I still love ya! On second thought, who couldn't?
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman.
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Season of the Witch (1972)
Directed by George A. Romero.
Cast: Jan White, Ray Laine, Bill Thunhurst, Joedida McClain, Virginia 
Greenwald.
1972 - 89 minutes.
Rated R (for violence, profanity, sexual situations, and brief nudity).
Reviewed October 27, 1998.
"Season of the Witch," which was director George A. Romero's first film 
after making the groundbreaking 1968 horror classic, "Night of the 
Living Dead," is a creepy and unusual experience. It has a sort of a 
story, but is intercut frequently with on-going dream sequences, which, 
paired with a loud, bizarre music score, are admittedly very disturbing.
Joan Mitchell (Jan White), an unhappy housewife and mother of a teenage 
daughter, has been suffering from a terrible recurring nightmare that 
features a person in a demon mask trying to break into her house. Her 
husband, Jack (Ray Laine), is always away on business trips, it seems, 
and so with a lot of time on her hands, she becomes intrigued with a 
practicing witch who lives near her. Trying out her spells to see if 
they work, she first manages to seduce her daughter's older boyfriend 
(Bill Thunhurst), and then begins to sway towards a potential murder.
"Season of the Witch," is no ordinary horror film, that's for sure. It 
is in no way a slasher film, nor is it about the living dead, which 
Romero has made quite a few films about. It is deliberately paced, with 
lots of exposition sequences, and then there are the frightening dream 
scenes. It is a skillful, respectable picture, and is extremely 
effective.
Unfortunately, "Season of the Witch," comes as a disappointment by the 
film's end for several reasons. The plotline and motives of the 
characters are very muddled, and we never really understand why Joan is 
so taken aback by witchcraft, except that it is interesting to her. The 
characters are also not very tightly written. In one scene, Joan's 
husband will be kind and caring, and in the next he will be physically 
abusive and distant. A subplot involving Joan's daughter is never 
resolved in any way, and she is not given enough screen time for us to 
care either way. The last scene is anticlimactic, leaving almost every 
story thread hanging loose, and there is no payoff.
Romero has proven himself to be a masterful director, and it is clearly 
evident in, "Season of the Witch," that he was onto something that 
potentially would be horrifying. Maybe the answer to these problems lies 
in the fact that, prior to its release, the film was cut from 130 
minutes to a relatively short 89 minutes. By cutting 41 minutes of 
footage, almost half of the current running time, it seems that Romero 
edited out the elements that the film desperately needs more of, in 
order to be a satisfying experience, rather than an unfulfilling one. 
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Dustin Putman's
Film Haven >

Title
Review for Curve, The (1998)
Directed by Dan Rosen.
Cast: Matthew Lillard, Michael Vartan, Randall Batinkoff, Keri Russell, 
Tamara Craig Thomas, Anthony Griffith, Bo Dietl, Dana Delany.
1999 - 91 minutes
Rated R (for profanity, sexual situations, and a suicide).
Reviewed June 13, 1999.
There's a long, unfortunate story behind "The Curve." Originally titled "Dead 
Man's Curve," the film premiered at the 1998 Sundance Film Festival, was 
eventually picked up by Trimark Pictures, and the director, Dan Rosen, was 
promised a theatrical release. Time ticked by, its name was changed, and it 
finally ended up bypassing theaters for home video in March, 1999. But 
there's still one more catch: even on video, it is only available at 
Blockbuster (which is where, of course, I rented it), although the DVD is 
available everywhere. Sound strange? I thought so too. 
"The Curve" is an inauspicious thriller set at a Maryland college that, like 
1998's dumb comedy, "Dead Man on Campus," takes off from the urban legend 
that if your roommate commits suicide, you automatically receive a 4.0 GPA 
for the semester. Tim (Matthew Lillard) and Chris (Michael Vartan) despise 
their roommate, Rand (Randall Batinkoff), both for his cruel attitude and 
emotionally abusive way he treats his girlfriend, Natalie (Tamara Craig 
Thomas), who has just discovered she is pregnant. When Rand finds out about 
his oncoming child, he explodes, giving Tim and Chris a fairly good chance to 
murder him and make it look like a suicide. Spiking his alcohol with rat 
poison, Rand, sure enough, dies, and Tim eagerly pushes him off a cliff. 
Although Chris does need the 4.0 since he is hoping to be accepted to 
Harvard, he gradually grows with guilt, and it soon becomes apparent that Tim 
may very well be setting him up to take all blame for the murder, even though 
Rand's body has yet to be found. And Chris is even more outraged when he 
finds Tim trying to take advantage of his girlfriend, Emma (Keri Russell).
"The Curve" is a thoroughly despicable mystery-thriller, a film that 
eventually gets so over-to-the-top and convoluted it quickly becomes 
ludicrous. It's the type of movie where you're never quite sure who the 
characters are, or their intentions, until the "shocking" climax. This 
tried-and-true plot device sometimes works ("The Usual Suspects," "Clue: The 
Movie"), but more often than not risks the posssibility of going so far over 
the deep end to completely lose its audience. That is one of the major 
downfalls of "The Curve." As plot twist after plot twist gathers on top of 
each other, up until the very end, I did not feel a sense of shock (even 
though I admittedly didn't see some of it coming), but instead felt simply 
jerked around. It's OK to want to be unpredictable and surprising, but there 
comes a point when the shocks stop becoming effective and turn into a great 
annoyance.
The characters in "The Curve" are rarely who they say they are, but some of 
the performances are adequate enough. Matthew Lillard doesn't do as much of 
his usual comedic schtick as usual, but also does not turn in nearly as 
impressive a performance as in "SLC Punk!" Michael Vartan ("Never Been 
Kissed") is the only actual character that is successfully developed beyond 
merely being a pawn to the plotting, and is believable as a young man who is 
desperate to get into Harvard, but not enough to want to turn to murder. Keri 
Russell (TV's "Felicity") is fine as Vartan's grilfriend, but her 
thought-to-be intelligent character makes a u-turn at the midway point and 
becomes nothing more than a floozy. Randall Batinkoff does nothing with his 
villainous character of Rand, but it isn't entirely his fault since the 
screenplay only calls for him to be a one-dimensional jerk. None of the other 
performances make any impression, with the only other central character, 
played by Tamara Craig Thomas, a passive "object" who takes the abuse from 
Rand and does nothing about it. Sure, there are people like this in the real 
world, but writer-director Dan Rosen should have written at least one of his 
female characters to be a strong individual.
Ultimately, "The Curve" is so concerned about its plot that it doesn't pay 
much attention at all to its characters, and therefore, the film only comes 
off feeling even more empty-headed. I enjoy a good thriller as much as the 
next person, but this film is ridiculous and often even inane. Rosen has made 
a technically pleasing independent film, with competent cinematography and a 
memorable music score. It's too bad his film was treated so neglectfully by 
its studio and sent straight-to-video, but after seeing it for myself, I 
honestly blame them for only one thing: picking up the film's distribution 
rights in the first place.
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Toy Story 2 (1999)
Directed by John Lasseter, Lee Unkrich, Ash Brannon.
Voices: Tom Hanks, Tim Allen, Joan Cusack, Don Rickles, Jim Varney, Wallace 
Shawn, Annie Potts, John Ratzenberger, Kelsey Grammer, Wayne Knight, Laurie 
Metcalf, Jodi Benson.
1999 - 90 minutes
Rated G (nothing objectionable).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, November 25, 1999.
The third computer generated animated film from Pixar, "Toy Story 2" can be 
regarded with ease as one of those very rare sequels that actually improves 
upon its predecessor. Watching the original, in its entirety, for the first 
time since its theatrical release in November of 1995, and then going to see 
the sequel two hours later, it is abundantly clear that "Toy Story 2" is 
richer and more awe-inspiring in the animation department, has a stronger, 
appreciatively non-preachy message to make about the act of growing up, and, 
most importantly, is at least twice as imaginative. Sure, there are a 
sampling of corny jokes (as in the first one) to satisfy the children in the 
audience, but also like the original, it is a film that has a snappy pace, 
clever writing, and is condescending to neither kids nor adult viewers. Those 
attributes are, at least, something I doubt you could find in the new 
"Pokemon" movie. 
Picking up a couple years after its precursor, this immensely entertaining 
sequel reintroduces all of the old toys that are owned by the young boy named 
Andy, most notably Woody (voiced by Tom Hanks), a cowboy, and Buzz Lightyear 
(Tim Allen), a space explorer. Now all friends, the gang of toys, which also 
include Mr. Potato Head (Don Rickles), Slinky the Dog (Jim Varney), Hamm the 
Piggy Bank (John Ratzenberger) and Rex the Dinosaur (Wallace Shawn), find 
their worst fear come true when, through a chain of unfortunate events, Woody 
is stolen at a yard sale by spiteful toy owner Al (Wayne Knight). While Buzz 
Lightyear and a select few of the other toys set out to rescue Woody, Woody 
himself discovers why Al wanted him so badly: he unknowingly used to be the 
star of a popular television show, and is the one missing character in the 
collection. Meeting and becoming quick friends with the other toys from the 
show, cowgirl and confidante Jessie (Joan Cusack), a horse named Bullseye, 
and the old paternal figure called The Prospector (Kelsey Grammer), Woody 
begins to have second thoughts about going back to Andy because he believes 
he might have finally found his rightful place in the world of toys.  
What is so utterly delightful about "Toy Story 2" is that it never once 
rehashes the original, instead consistently coming up with sensationally 
innovative new ideas and branching the story off into many enlivening 
directions. Due to this, it dodges the usual fate of becoming an unnecessary 
sequel because, for once, Walt Disney Pictures does not seem to be aiming for 
a quick buck, as they have patently directed all of their efforts into making 
an exemplary continuation of a recent beloved family film.
While the 1995 picture grew a little frustrating because of the majority of 
the action taking place in bedrooms, "Toy Story 2" is akin to the also 
superior 1993 sequel "Addams Family Values," in that it takes the characters 
into a much-needed outside setting. Opening in Andy's bedroom, then going 
into the city, through a toy store, and culminating at an airport (with pit 
stops in between), the film is a grand achievement and another step forward 
in the world of animation, appearing more sharp and detailed than even 
Pixar's last film, 1998's "A Bug's Life." Never short of being colorful and 
visually extravagant, certain shots are so very impressive that they almost 
look like live-action, while the human characters also appear slightly more 
real than their artificial representations in the original.
Staying true to the memorable toy characters he previously created, director 
John Lasseter does not try to miraculously alter the personalities of Woody, 
Buzz, or the rest of the ensemble, but simply continues their evolvement as 
regular people. By doing this, Lasseter also has introduced several fresh 
characters, including Mrs. Potato Head, The Prospector, Bullseye, Tour Guide 
Barbie, and the most effective, Jessie. Marvelously voiced by Joan Cusack, 
Jessie is one of the most well-written and realistically portrayed modern 
animated characters in some time. In an unusually touching and meaningful 
flashback for a family movie, we watch how Jessie's life has lead up to this 
moment. She used to have an owner, a loving girl who was her best friend, but 
as the years went by, the girl turned into a young woman, the places where 
her toys used to be changed into posters and make-up, Jessie stopped being 
played with, and finally, ended up being thrown away. "You never forget your 
owner," Jessie tearfully says, "but they forget you." This line is so 
powerful and stirring because it is completely true, and even if toys aren't 
actually alive in real life, its connotation remains wholeheartedly valid.
For every minor instance where something doesn't work (in a throwaway ode to 
the first "Star Wars" trilogy, Buzz Lightyear discovers his arch nemesis, 
Zurg, is actually his father), there are no less than twenty other things 
that do. The climax, for example, is ingeniously set at a busy airport, and 
stands as one of the most exciting action set-pieces this whole year. Joyous 
and lighthearted, "Toy Story 2" is ideal family entertainment, and the most 
satisfying Disney movie since 1991's "Beauty and the Beast." 

Title
Review for Hurlyburly (1998)
Directed by Anthony Drazan.
Cast: Sean Penn, Kevin Spacey, Chazz Palminteri, Robin Wright Penn, Anna 
Paquin, Garry Shandling, Meg Ryan.
1998 - 123 minutes
Rated R (for profanity, sex, and excessive drug use).
Reviewed June 25, 1999.
"Hurlyburly" is an actors' dream, but there is a nearly non-existent 
storyline. Set "a little while ago" in Los Angeles, Eddie (Sean Penn) is a 
casting director who lives in a high-profile home in the Hollywood hills with 
his cold business partner, Mickey (Kevin Spacey), and a nasty-tempered 
struggling actor, Phil (Chazz Palminteri). The film follows them through a 
year in their life, centering on Eddie, who slowly begins to realize that a 
life full of nothing but drugs, sex, and partying is an empty life, indeed. 
Overly talky, no doubt due to the fact that it is based on a stage play, but 
just when I was about to give up on the mostly dispicable characters in the 
second half, the gentle, touching ending snuck up and left me emotionally 
shaken. Sean Penn has never been better than he is here, and that's saying 
quite a lot, while Anna Paquin (of 1993's "The Piano," for which she won the 
Best Supporting Actress Oscar at age 11), as a lost teenage wanderer, is 
remarkably refined, a character chamelion if I've ever seen one. Also of note 
is Meg Ryan, who sheds her "cutesy" image as a prostitute with a young 
daughter. Too bad more couldn't have happened in the plot department to equal 
up to the performances.
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Family Man, The (2000)
Directed by Brett Ratner.
Cast: Nicolas Cage, Tea Leoni, Jeremy Pivens, Don Cheadle, Saul Rubinek, 
Harve Presnell, Makenzie Vega, Josef Sommer, Mary Beth Hurt, Lisa Thornhill, 
Amber Valletta.
2000 - 126 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity, sexual situations, and partial nudity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, December 23, 2000.
Sort of a modern-day rendition of 1946's holiday classic "It's a Wonderful 
Life," "The Family Man" is a fantasy in which a wealthy Wall Street dealer is 
given a chance to glimpse the wildly different way his life would have turned 
out had he married his college sweetheart. Aside from the premise, the film 
is not likely to become a perennial Christmas mainstay, due to its uneven 
tone and flawed, obvious screenplay that backs itself into a corner in which 
no possible conclusion could possibly be satisfying.
Opening in 1987, Jack Campbell (Nicolas Cage) is about to board a plane to 
begin a one-year internship in London, much to the pleading of his beloved 
girlfriend, Kate (Tea Leoni). If he gets on board, she instinctively tells 
him, their strong relationship will not survive a year apart, and their lives 
will go different directions. Fast forward to the present day, Jack thinks 
that he has it all: a great job that is making him loads of money, a very 
expensive Ferrari, a sleek apartment in a fashionable Manhattan skyrise, and 
a sometimes-girlfriend (Amber Valletta) who he basically uses for sex. 
Following a chance encounter with a street hustler (Don Cheadle), Jack 
awakens on Christmas morning in the suburbs of New Jersey, with two young 
children and a wife in Kate. Instead of a high-powered exec on Wall Street, 
he works for the tire dealership named after his father-in-law (Harve 
Presnell), and instead of a wardrobe consisting of an endless series of 
suits, he owns mostly sweatshirts and sweatpants. Although something is very 
different about the way Jack is acting to his new life, it is his precocious 
5-year-old daughter (Makenzie Vega) who speaks up about it, believing that he 
is an alien who has taken over her father's role. At first, Jack longs to 
return to his old, true life, but the more time he spends with his newfound 
family, the more he realizes what he has missed all these years, and how much 
he truly loves the effervescent Kate.
Directed by Brett Ratner (1998's "Rush Hour"), "The Family Man" is an 
occasionally sweet, but mostly trying experience that isn't written up to the 
intelligence of its two main actors. Taking a well-worn story that has been 
done before in a superior fashion ("A Christmas Carol" comes instantly to 
mind), the film grows tiresome very quickly, due to the predictable nature in 
which it plays itself out. A more lighthearted tone and a less-protracted 
length (it runs over two hours) might have made the movie an enjoyable piece 
of Christmastime fluff, but it overstays its welcome, hammering home a thin 
message that could have been solved in a lot less time. 
The main offender is its screenplay, written by David Diamond and David 
Weissman, which lingers more upon the drama of the situation, rather than the 
comedy. While this approach could have worked, the film just isn't very 
smart. The rocky, but loving, relationship between Jack and Kate does not 
play itself out naturally, as almost every one of their scenes plays itself 
out in a particular fashion, with everything starting to look up until one of 
them says something that angers the other, leading to an argument. For a 
romance to work in the movies, there has to be genuine passion involved, and 
this is particularly difficult to establish when they can't seem to get along 
for longer than five minutes. A lot of their conversations deal with how much 
they love each other, or how beautiful and spectacular one of them finds the 
other, but with the evidence presented here, it is difficult to root for two 
people who are interesting and likable as individuals, but annoying as a 
couple.
Nicolas Cage (2000's "Gone in 60 Seconds") and Tea Leoni (1998's "Deep 
Impact") are both very good actors, and they do give it their all, even while 
their characters are merely going through the motions. Cage successfully 
exhibits the longing his character of Jack begins to feel when he discovers 
he doesn't, in fact, have it all, while Leoni is touching and strong-willed 
as the amiable Kate, who doesn't understand why her husband has suddenly 
grown so questionable about family life.
All of the supporting roles are wasted, and any subplots that result from 
them go unfinished. Jeremy Piven (1998's "Very Bad Things"), as Jack's best 
friend, is on hand to do nothing more than remind him of what a great catch 
Katie is, while Lisa Thornhill (1997's "Meet Wally Sparks"), as a woman who 
wants to have an affair with Jack, is a bright screen presence who is 
woefully underutilized. Don Cheadle (2000's "Mission to Mars"), taking up 
where Will Smith left off in "The Legend of Bagger Vance," is the 
otherworldly person who allows Jack to see the things he has missed by 
choosing the path he took thirteen years before. Only Makenzie Vega has good 
screen time as Jack and Kate's daughter, and she is quite an impressive young 
actress, adorable and talented without ever being cloying.
While the message that "The Family Man" wanted to make was apparent from the 
first twenty minutes, the way the story was going to wrap up was more of a 
mystery. Since most of the movie isn't actually real, but a look at what Jack 
could have had, it almost seems like a waste, and no matter how things were 
concluded, the ending would be severely problematic. Having seen the finale, 
all I can say is that it isn't terrible, but also far too tidy for its own 
good. That is the notable flaw of "The Family Man," in general. Instead of 
genuinely playing itself out, it is simply too neat--too disingenuous--to be 
worthwhile.
    - Copyright 2000 by Dustin Putman
      http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman ( Reviews by Dustin Putman )
      http://www.atnzone.com ( NZone Magazine )

Title
Review for Twin Falls Idaho (1999)
"Twin Falls Idaho," by first-time directors and real-life brothers Michael 
and Mark Polish, manages to be a film about the potentially "tabloid" topic 
of siamese twins, but does not exploit this heavy subject matter. Instead, 
they have made an indie drama that is mature and discerning, about the close 
bond between siblings, and about the struggle of these two accepting people 
who have been dealt a certain hand in life, even while struggling to break 
free as individuals. If the film sometimes is a little too obvious and the 
dialogue doesn't constantly ring true, it is clear that the Polish Brothers 
have a definite talent as rising filmmakers, and due to their own closeness, 
have concocted a picture that is satisfying, solely based on the finely-tuned 
relationships that they have created between the three pivotal characters.
Penny (Michele Hicks) is a down-on-her-luck young woman who is broke and 
without any certain idea of where her life is headed. Sometimes prostituting 
herself for the much-needed cash, Penny winds up one evening at the scummy 
hotel room of her latest client, Francis (Michael Polish). When Francis 
enters into the room, however, and she discovers that he is one-half of a 
pair of siamese twins, Penny flees. After realizing that she left her purse 
at their place and feeling rather guilty for her unsympathetic behavior 
before, Penny goes back to the hotel to discover that Francis is actually 
very ill, and it is his brother, Blake (Mark Polish), who is the much 
stronger of the two. "How come you don't get sick too?" Penny asks, to which 
Blake replies, "Because if I got sick, who would take care of Francis?" Penny 
ultimately begins a close friendship with them, mostly because she detects an 
emotional closeness due to her own alienation from the world, and a brief 
romance appears to blossom between her and Blake, only to end with the cold, 
hard realization that it would never work out. "Maybe I'll call you when I'm 
single," Blake tells her humorously, but with an unavoidably very serious 
undercurrent.
"Twin Falls Idaho" is not set, as you may first assume, in Twin Falls, Idaho, 
but rather it is just one of many symbols that end up being just a little too 
heavy-handed for their own good. Symbolism is a tricky thing to do 
successfully, as it should almost always be of the subtle persuasion in which 
you have to think long and hard about certain things before you would even 
process that it was, in fact, a symbol. A recent, efficient example of this 
would be Stanley Kubrick's "Eyes Wide Shut," whose symbols, if you aren't 
paying close attention, could potentially fly straight over your head. 
Although not a serious, damaging criticism, "Twin Falls Idaho" is not so 
refined in this respect. For example, 'Twin' stands for the two brothers 
being twins, 'Falls' is their last name, and 'Idaho' is the name of the hotel 
they are staying in. Early on, Penny is oddly given a two dollar bill as 
change from a taxi driver, and her own name, Penny, symbolizes singularity, 
which further portrays the conflict between the idea of 'one' and 'two.'
Even if "Twin Falls Idaho" also is stronger in its set-up and first half, as 
opposed to its predictable, somewhat maudlin conclusion, the film is buoyed 
over to being recommended, if marginally so, because of the impressive 
performances and the one-of-a-kind relationship between the brothers, which 
is just about as believable and heartfelt as any sibling relationship has 
ever been portrayed on film. It would be too easy to group Blake and Francis 
as one being, and both are wisely given differing, distinctive personalities, 
even when they are also presented as being just about as close to one another 
as two people could possibly be, both physically and spiritually. Blake and 
Francis believe that being siamese twins is the only way they would prefer 
life, because that's the only way that they've ever known. At one point, 
Blake tells Penny, "We came into this world together, and we're leaving it 
together, too." And yet, Blake can't help but see Penny as his sort of 
savior, an understanding, virtuous light at the end of the tunnel, whom he 
starts to love, if only he could be alone with her. In one of the film's most 
powerful scenes, Blake and Francis trudge out for a night on the town during 
Halloween, the only day of the year when they blend in with everyone else and 
are accepted as "normal" people. Ending up at a party that Penny invites them 
to, they see another two attendants that have dressed up as siamese twins, 
but sadly witness them untying the strings between one another and going off 
in their own separate directions. For Blake and Francis, it isn't that easy.
In her film debut, model Michele Hicks is remarkable as Penny, the character 
with the most noticable arc. Hicks turns Penny into an experienced, 
hard-edged lost soul who nonetheless is extremely vulnerable to the world 
around her and unsure of what she wants to do with her life. For the story 
between the brothers to work, there had to be a third party that could come 
in and add an emotional center to the film, which Hicks brilliantly does. She 
is the one we follow most in the film, as we root for her to get out of her 
job as a hooker and redirect her path, no matter where it may take her. 
"Twin Falls Idaho" is flawed in many ways (it also falls victim to a couple 
particular lines of dialogue that feel completely "written"), but its virtues 
also cannot be denied. The restrictive, unusual, but fully caring position 
that Blake and Francis are in is no better identified than between a touching 
exchange between Blake and Penny. "Do you ever get lonely?" she inquires. His 
answer: "For two minutes--just two minutes--each day, right after I wake up 
and right before I fall asleep, I'm alone. It's pretty difficult to ever be 
lonely."
   - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman.
     Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Dogfight (1991)
Directed by Nancy Savoca.
Cast: River Phoenix, Lili Taylor, Richard Panebianco, Anthony Clark, 
E.G. Daily, Mitchell Whitfield, Holly Near, Brendan Fraser.
1991 - 94 minutes.
Rated R (for profanity, violence, and sexual situations).
Reviewed October 8, 1998.
Nancy Savoca's "Dogfight" is a virtually unknown gem, and is one of the 
sweetest, most touching romances of the decade. It was barely released 
in 1991 by Warner Brothers, who must not have had much faith in such a 
truthful motion picture, and it shows (since then, they have widely 
released such gems as 1997's "Batman and Robin," and this year alone, 
have come out with the likes of "Major League III," and "The Avengers"). 
"Dogfight," however, is an important film that deserves to be seen, and 
includes two of the best performances of the 90's.
Set in 1963, primarily during one fateful night, four young Marines stop 
in a small town for their last night stateside, not knowing the horrors 
that await them in Vietnam. Together, they decide to participate in the 
game, "Dogfight," which requires each of them to find the ugliest woman 
they can find, take her to a party, and then have them judged on the the 
most unattractive one. The film focuses mostly on Birdlace (River 
Phoenix, in one of his last movies), who, while looking for a victim, 
stumbles into a coffee shop and meets Rose (Lili Taylor), an introverted 
young woman who hides behind frumpy clothes and her love of folk music. 
They start to talk, and Birdlace asks her to come to the party, and she 
agrees to it, not believing that someone would actually be interested in 
her. Birdlace realizes Rose isn't actually "ugly," but it's the best he 
can do. 
That is only the beginning of "Dogfight," a quiet, flawlessly 
made film, in which not much more should be said, except to say that 
Birdlace begins to actually like Rose, and it develops into much more of 
a complex story than it originally seems.
Although the basic plotline may sound cruel and mean-spirited, and it 
is, at the center of the story is a wonderful, sweet, poignantly 
written, love story. To get a feel for the type of picture it is, the 
movie is similar in structure to 1995's "Before Sunrise," which was 
about two twentysomethings who meet on a train and decide to spend the 
day together in Venice before going their separate ways. The 
differences, however, is that this film is set during the Vietnam War 
and there are much more serious overtones. 
If there is one element of "Dogfight" that I could single out as being 
brilliant in every sense of the word, it is Lili Taylor, who, in one 
role after the other, gives a three-dimensional, flesh-and-blood 
performance, and this is her best role to date. Her character is so 
likable that when bad things happen to her, it is heartbreaking and 
feels unfair. One of the best scenes occurs early on, after she has been 
humiliated at the Dogfight, and goes home, turns on her folk record in 
her bedroom, and simply sits down to listen to it. Sure, she has just 
been embarrassed, but at least she has her music. Most movies wouldn't 
have the integrity to include such a small, delicate scene, but it is an 
important moment.
The last ten minutes of "Dogfight" are what makes the movie really 
special, however, particularly the startlingly powerful last scene, in 
which nothing is said or explained, but then, nothing needs to be. 
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Mystery, Alaska (1999)
Directed by Jay Roach.
Cast: Russell Crowe, Mary McCormack, Ron Eldard, Lolita Davidovich, Colm 
Meaney, Burt Reynolds, Hank Azaria, Ryan Northcott, Rachel Wilson, Scott 
Grimes, Maury Chaykin, Judith Ivey, Adam Beach, Megyn Price, Mike Myers, 
Little Richard. 
1999 - 118 minutes
Rated R (for sex and profanity).
Reviewed October 2, 1999.
"Mystery, Alaska" is an uneasy hybrid of two genres, one of which is way past 
its prime. At first glance and through the advertising campaign for the film, 
it appears to be a sports movie for the whole family, about a small-town 
hockey team, a la "The Mighty Ducks." The "sports movie" has, in the last 
fifteen years, become a reliable staple of big-studio films, from 1984's "The 
Natural," to 1988's "Major League," to 1988's "Bull Durham," to 1992's "The 
Might Ducks," to 1994's "D2: The Mighty Ducks," to 1994's "Major League 2," 
to 1996's "D3: The Mighty Ducks," to 1998's "Major League 3: Back to the 
Minors," to the currently-in-release "For Love of the Game." Just taking a 
gander at the aforementioned pictures, which amount to roughly only 5% of the 
total "sports movies" in recent years, is quite a dizzying and tedious task. 
By now, films that conclude with the biggest cliche of them all, "The Big 
Game," are no longer suspenseful, nor can audiences honestly care about the 
outcome. The protagonists either win (which they usually do) or they lose; 
there aren't many other twists you can throw into the rather limitied 
proceedings. 
But this is where the formula for "Mystery, Alaska" gets a little tricky (and 
mind-boggling, for that matter). The film is rated R, for several sexual 
situations (including a premature ejaculation scene that was carried out to 
much more successful effect in last summer's "American Pie") and for a 
dizzying parade of profanity (let's just say the F-word is not used 
sparingly). While much of the film does center on the rag-tag hockey team in 
the snowy mountain town of Mystery, Alaska, and the impending game that they 
will be playing against the professional New York Rangers, the rest of the 
118-minute film dwells around the many characters who inhabit the team or are 
a part of the town. Subplots are brought up almost ludicrously too often, so 
that many different minor stories are being played out simultaneously. 
Extramarital affairs, fatal heart attacks, a gun-shooting, a trial, and 
teenage puppy love are just a hint of the issues that are dealt with 
throughout, therefore cutting off all chances of children seeing and enjoying 
the film. Consequently, the hockey scenes are portrayed in such a 
tried-and-true, flatly-filmed manner that adults will most likely be bored 
with these moments. And yet, if "Mystery, Alaska" fails to attract an 
audience (since there really isn't one), at least you have to commend 
director Jay Roach ("Austin Powers"), screenwriters David E. Kelley (TV's 
"The Practice") and Sean O'Byrne, and its distributor Hollywood Pictures, for 
having the courage to make a somewhat off-beat film that does not cut corners 
or condescend to a certain audience simply to earn a quick buck. It doesn't 
always work, and the screenplay remains seriously flawed and uneven, but it's 
unusually ambitious for a "sports movie" and should be admired on that simple 
basis. Let us all be thankful, at least, that "Mystery, Alaska" is not "D4: 
The Mighty Ducks."
The film takes a look at all of the interrelated townspeople of Mystery, as 
they prepare for their run-in with the Rangers, and most of the characters 
are given their own individual stories, which are not all equally efficient 
and often clank together like giant pieces of metal. John (Russell Crowe) is 
a thirtysomething married man and sheriff who lives to play hockey every week 
on the team, until he is abruptly cut in order to make room for the 
much-faster Steve (Ryan Northcott), a bright-eyed teenager. Fellow teammate 
Skank Marden (Ron Eldard) is a womanizer who "loves to play ice hockey and 
fornicate because those are the two most fun things to do in cold weather." 
Unfortunately, Skank has currently begun to have an affair with the unhappy 
wife (Lolita Davidovich) of Pitcher (Colm Meaney), the town major, who has 
forgotten how to show love and human compassion. Then there's Judge Walter 
Burns (Burt Reynolds), a strict father whose son, Birdie (Scott Grimes), 
another hockey player, is constantly being put down, and a teen daughter 
(Rachel Wilson) who is the girlfriend of Steve. Finally, the arrival of 
Charles Danner (Hank Azaria), a wealthy former resident of Mystery who 
returns with the big news about the New York Rangers, causes John's wife 
(Mary McCormack) to question whether she made the wrong choice years ago when 
she decided to get married, have kids, and stay put in the tiny burg of 
Mystery.
The scenes of people playing ice hockey in "Mystery, Alaska" are kept to a 
pleasing minimum (discarding the neverending climax), so that the characters 
themselves have a chance to be developed. While nothing pleases me more than 
a character-driven motion picture, and this one oddly reminded me of 1996's 
underrated treasure, "Beautiful Girls," the writing is too often lackluster 
and not nearly as witty and memorable as writer David E. Kelley's current 
television ventures, including "The Practice" and "Ally McBeal." Also, where 
"Beautiful Girls" was an intelligently-drawn comedy-drama about the 
relationships between people in a snowy U.S. town, "Mystery, Alaska" is 
sloppy and often too neat-and-tidy for its own good. There are no laughs, 
even though the film constantly attempts to be funny and, aside from two or 
three particular instances, the drama is rarely effective the way it could 
have easily been had the screenplay been written with a surer hand.
On the positive side, the inner turmoil of John, handled well by Russell 
Crowe, as he nears the end of his hockey career, is noticably similar to that 
of Kevin Costner in the higher-profile "For Love of the Game." While Costner 
was instructed to sit around and whine and pout, Crowe's struggle to enter 
into the next phase of his life is more subtle, and therefore, cogent. 
Additionally, the underused Lolita Davidovich (1994's "Intersection," one of 
the most overlooked films of the decade) is touching as the mayor's wife, a 
woman confused about her marriage and unsure what her recent affair means. 
Although more could have been done with it, the sweetest relationship comes 
in the form of the youngest one, between 17-year-old Steve and his 
girlfriend, who fears his rising popularity will cause him to forget about 
her. The two performers, Ryan Northcott and Rachel Wilson, making their major 
film debuts, strike the right notes throughout.
A perceptible strain for melodrama, further subplots come off as nothing more 
than gimmicks to add an extra amount of conflicts, including one in which a 
character suddenly dies, and another that feels like it's come right out of a 
John Grisham courtroom drama. More focus on the interesting characters and 
their predicaments, and the complete cutting of these unnecessary storylines, 
might have aided the film quite well, overall.
After "Austin Powers," its sequel, and this more adult film, director Jay 
Roach has not proven himself yet to be anything more than an 'adequate' 
filmmaker. He usually aims for the obvious, and in this film's case, 
distractingly forces silly humor onto the rest of the material, including an 
insipid, totally unfunny cameo by Mike Myers. "Mystery, Alaska" is a 
respectable film as far as "sports movies" go, but it really is frustrating 
to watch a group of capable performers that are so far above the given 
material. It's clearly a case in which a film's aspirations were higher in 
the planning stages than what was translated to film.

Title
Review for Meet the Parents (2000)
Directed by Jay Roach.
Cast: Ben Stiller, Robert De Niro, Teri Polo, Blythe Danner, James Rebhorn, 
Phyllis George, Jon Abrahams, Owen Wilson, Nicole DeHuff, Kali Rocha.
2000 - 108 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, October 7, 2000.
Since his decidedly juvenile breakout hit, 1997's "Austin Powers: 
International Man of Mystery," director Jay Roach has grown up quite a bit as 
a filmmaker, as proven by "Meet the Parents." While still a comedy, much of 
it sprouts solely from the sharply observed dialogue and the subtleties in 
the comic performances, rather than from slapstick situations (although there 
is some of this, as well), and the movie is better--funnier--because Roach 
doesn't push as hard. Where the movie loses its luster, however, is in its 
slightly overlong length to get to a point that can be telegraphed well in 
advance. I hasten to add that there are jokes within that haven't made me 
laugh quite so hard in a while, and they alone are worth the price of 
admission to see, even if the whole enterprise comes off uneven.
The unfortunately named, sounds-like-it's-spelled male nurse Greg Focker (Ben 
Stiller) is passionately in love with school teacher Pam (Teri Polo), so sure 
that she is the one for him that he has bought an engagement ring to propose 
to her. When word hits that Pam's younger sister (Nicole DeHuff) is getting 
married, and her fiancee asked her father's permission before proposing to 
her, Greg decides to take the same impressive, old-fashioned route. With the 
marriage right around the corner, Greg decides to accompany Pam back home for 
the festivities, meeting her parents for the first time.
Things go wrong for Greg right from the start, with his suitcase, which holds 
the engagement ring, getting lost at the airport. Pam's father, Jack (Robert 
De Niro), is a lovable family man who, nonetheless, holds a dagger for any 
potential suitor who gets too close to his eldest daughter. A former worker 
for the CIA, Jack believes in honesty and telling the truth at all times, 
something Greg fails at in his attempt to win him, as well as Pam's lovable 
mother, Dina (Blythe Danner), over.
As with the Chevy Chase-starring "National Lampoon's Vacation" series, 
particularly 1989's raucous "Christmas Vacation" (which this film closely 
resembles in many ways), everything that could possibly self-destruct for 
Greg, does. From losing Jack's beloved cat, who has been trained to use a 
toilet to do his business in, to nearly setting the whole house on fire, 
Greg's chances of winning over Jack grow more and more obscure with each 
passing second, when all he wants to do is be as good of a life partner as 
possible to Pam.
"Meet the Parents" is an undeniable, crowd-pleasing comedy that refreshingly 
doesn't rely on endless raunchiness to be funny, and is consistently 
enjoyable up until the final fifteen minutes, which begin to overstay their 
welcome. It is very clear from the get-go where the film is headed, so a 
little tightness in the editing room might have solved its length problem, 
and made the jokes arrive at a quicker rate.
Where the movie excels in its its two standout central performances. Ben 
Stiller (1998's "There's Something About Mary") is perfectly cast in the type 
of comedic role he does best: the hapless good guy who can't seem to do 
anything right in the presence of others. When Stiller is forced to wear a 
humiliating speedo, or discusses how to milk a female cat, he presses the 
laughs for all their worth. His match in every way, Robert De Niro has great 
fun in playing with his big screen image (as he did in 1999's "Analyze 
This"). Essentially the straight man, De Niro is funny almost every time he 
speaks, turning otherwise ho-hum dialogue into riotous gold.
The female parts aren't nearly as fully written, although both Blythe Danner 
(1997's "The Myth of Fingerprints") and Teri Polo (TV's "Sports Night") are 
likable in their parts. All other supporting roles are superfluous, including 
Owen Wilson (2000's "Shanghai Noon"), wasted as Pam's ex-boyfriend. Showing a 
little spark with virtually nothing to do is Jon Abrahams (2000's "Scary 
Movie"), as Pam's teenaged stoner brother.
"Meet the Parents" follows a rather predictable, well-worn path, but the 
sheer joy of performing on the actors' parts sells the film as a whole. 
Director Roach and screenwriters Jim Herzfeld and John Hamburg have made a 
flawed, yet extremely witty comedy with enough spark to be able to disregard 
the noticeable kinks. While not a classic, "Meet the Parents" is the type of 
comedy that would be appropriate for almost any age group, all of which will 
undoubtedly have a good time and be entertained. It's rare that you can say 
that in a time when gross-out, scatological humor is at an all-time high, but 
for "Meet the Parents," it suffices.

Title
Review for Bedazzled (2000)
Directed by Harold Ramis.
Cast: Brendan Fraser, Elizabeth Hurley, Frances O'Connor, Orlando Jones, 
Miriam Shor.
2000 - 92 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and violence).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, October 21, 2000.
At the risk of making a throwaway pun, "Bedazzled," directed by Harold Ramis 
(1993's "Groundhog Day"), is a devilishly enjoyable and savvy comedy that 
ends of packing quite a heavier punch by its conclusion than could have ever 
been expected. A loose remake of the 1967 Dudley Moore-starrer of the same 
name, the film is one of those rare cases in which the movie completely 
blindsides you, both because of its vast improvement over the unextraordinary 
theatrical trailer, and because of the unextraordinary trailer, which wisely 
does not even hint at how utterly imaginative and clever the proceedings are. 
Elliot Richards (Brendan Fraser) is a gawky computer consultant who is a 
genuinely nice guy that, nevertheless, is the type of eager-to-please person 
most people try to avoid having to confront in a conversation. Amid his 
odd-man-out treatment, his one true love is Alison Gardner (Frances 
O'Connor), a fetching coworker of Elliot's for three years who doesn't even 
know he exists. After a failed attempt to strike up a conversation with 
Alison at a bar, Elliot is distracted by a sultry, alluringly sexy woman 
(Elizabeth Hurley) who informs him that she is the Devil incarnate, and has 
come to grant him seven wishes in exchange for his soul. Following a round of 
persuasion tactics, the Devil convinces Elliot to sign the contract and wish 
away. But there's only one hitch: in her dastardly plan, with every wish he 
makes, the Devil wickedly misconstrues things so that they not work out for 
him.
One of the genuine pleasures of "Bedazzled" is in not only seeing where each 
of Elliot's wishes takes him, but how the Devil conditions each wish to only 
turn out negatively for him. Aside from the tiresome, overlong first 
vignette, in which he wishes to be rich, powerful, and married to Alison, 
only to become a Colombian drug lord under attack whose wife despises him, 
the movie is unadulterated fun from beginning to end, even when it appears to 
be nothing more than harmless fluff. 
Had "Bedazzled" stayed on its predictable main course from beginning to end, 
the picture would be admirable, but hardly memorable. However, the 
screenplay, by Larry Gelbart, Harold Ramis, and Peter Tolan, is a rare comedy 
straight out of mainstream Hollywood that is actually ambitious in both its 
ideas and snappy writing, and concludes with several emotionally rewarding 
scenes that do not completely abandon their humorous roots, but clearly and 
wisely hold a valid moral, like any useful fairy tale. 
In a multilayered role that, once and for all, ties up all doubts about his 
clear talent as a performer, Brendan Fraser (1999's "Dudley Do-Right") not 
only carries the film as the lovable, insecure Elliot, but also is given the 
chance to jump into the part and become (among others) a well-loved 7 1/2' 
pro basketball player, a highly intelligent and fashionable gay man, and the 
world's most emotionally sensitive guy. After a string of forgettable 
characters (including the aforementioned "Dudley Do-Right" and 1999's "The 
Mummy"), Fraser is back with a movie that fully exposes how very good he can 
be.
In what is inarguably the best performance I've seen her give, to date, 
Elizabeth Hurley singlehandedly steals the show as the "Princess of 
Darkness." Clearly exhibiting that she's having a fun time, Hurley digs into 
the tricky role with great relish, being both very funny and, at times, 
surprisingly threatening. What is so impressive about the writing is the way 
the movie dabbles in slapstick every now and again, but despite its fantastic 
nature, seems to be planted firmly in reality when dealing with the 
characters. Hurley's Lucifer could have easily been written as an evil, 
one-dimensional type, but she isn't; it is clear that she likes Elliot and 
maybe even grows to care about his well-being, but is, nonetheless, stuck 
going against his yearning for happiness due to her decidedly high title as 
king (or is it queen?) of the underworld.
Throughout the just-right 92-minute running time, "Bedazzled" is whimsical 
and reasonably lighthearted, but because Elliot has, indeed, sold his soul to 
Satan, the viewer is understandable to wonder how exactly the movie could 
conclude with a happy ending. Without giving any details away, director 
Harold Ramis finds the perfect climactic approach, striking a satisfying 
chord and holding it until the end credits. It's not every week that you see 
a movie that surpasses all expectations (no matter how high or low they may 
be) to become a first-rate film worth seeing by all, but "Bedazzled" does 
just that. It's a wonderfully original and entertaining comedy--the rarest of 
breeds.

Title
Review for Sugar & Spice (2001)
Directed by Francine McDougall.
Cast: Marley Shelton, Mena Suvari, Rachel Blanchard, Marla Sokoloff, Melissa 
George, Sarah Marsh, James Marsden, Alexandra Holden, Sean Young, W. Earl 
Brown.
2001 - 80 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, January 23, 2001.
Diane Weston (Marley Shelton) is the famed head chearleader of the "A" squad 
at Lincoln High School. Her best friends and co-cheerleaders are the 
tough-as-nails Kansas (Mena Suvari), the religious-nut Hannah (Rachel 
Blanchard), the Conan O'Brien-obsessed Cleo (Melissa Georgia), and the 
book-smart Lucy (Sara Marsh). From the second Diane literally knocks sweet 
football jock Jack Bartlett (James Marsden) down while doing backflips at a 
school pep rally, they falls instantly in love. Before long, Diane is 
pregnant, and realizing their love for each other, she and Jack decide to get 
married. With her at home with a bun in the oven, and Jack working 
minimum-wage at a video store, Diane forms a plan for her and the girls to 
learn from the mistakes of movie character thieves, so that they can 
successfully rob a bank and get the amount of cash each of them needs for the 
future.
This is the setup of "Sugar & Spice," a highly satirical jab at cheerleaders, 
bank robberies, and teenage pregnancy from director Francine McDougall and 
screenwriter Mandy Nelson. What begins as an inanely unfunny "stupid teen 
movie" eventually finds its footing at the 20-minute mark to become a 
surprisingly clever and knowing comedy that curiously pays tribute to many 
popular gangster/thief movies, including "Reservoir Dogs," "Heat," "Dog Day 
Afternoon," and "Point Break." The writing miraculously becomes fresh and 
appropriately zany, and the film runs at a fast pace, never growing outwardly 
tedious for a minute (save for the whole terrible opening section).
Moving at the trajectory it was remaining successfully on, "Sugar & Spice" 
might have been an early moviegoing surprise for 2001. Unfortunately, just as 
the film has gained maximum momentum, it ends abruptly in midstream, never 
wrapping up its characters or the story in any satisfying manner. At just 80 
minutes (including end credits), the picture feels rushed and rather 
pointless--a nice enough diversion, but one that fails to go that extra mile 
to become anything other than such.
The characters, in staying with the satire of the piece, which often reminds 
one of 1999's far superior "Election" and "Drop Dead Gorgeous," fit neatly 
into the package and are entertaining individuals, except for one problem: 
they are never developed outside of one or two personal traits. Because of 
this, their potentially bright, inspired performances are more or less 
wasted. Marley Shelton (1999's "The Bachelor") appears in almost every scene 
as the put-upon protagonist, Diane, but she remains at arm's length with the 
viewer, never being allowed to break out from a broad caricature. The same 
goes for the rest of the girls, with rising star Mena Suvari (1999's 
"American Beauty") sorely wasted as the edgy Kansas. Marla Sokoloff (2000's 
"Whatever It Takes") does offer up some fun, however, as the spiteful Lisa, a 
member of the "B" squad cheerleading team who dispises the "A" squad and, 
coincidentally, witnesses the bank robbery and recognizes the girls (despite 
being equipped with Betty doll masks). Meanwhile, James Marsden (2000's 
"X-Men") has nothing to do but look and act like a lovable, if immature, 
doofus.
For the majority of its too-brief running time, "Sugar & Spice" runs so close 
to the line of delightfully savage lampooning that it is all the more 
disappointing when the movie never follows through with its ambitious nature. 
Writer Mandy Nelson surely knows how to write smart-allecky, at time even 
ingenious, dialogue, but she has failed in exposing any sort of emotional 
truths about its characters or the situations. Since that is the key to a 
good satire--playfully mocking people and valid societal issues while 
offering up a bit of ironic realism--"Sugar & Spice" ultimately misses the 
boat by a millimeter. 
    - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
      http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman
http://www.atnzone.com

Title
Review for Me, Myself & Irene (2000)
Directed by Bobby Farrelly, Peter Farrelly.
Cast: Jim Carrey, Renee Zellweger, Chris Cooper, Robert Forster, Anthony 
Anderson,  Mongo Brownlee, Jerod Mixon, Michael Bowman, Traylor Howard, 
Richard Jenkins, Rob Moran.
2000 - 115 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, brief nudity, and sexual innuendo).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, July 22, 2000.
Writer-directors Bobby and Peter Farrelly have made a career out of 
increasingly upping the ante in their big-screen comedy ventures, going for 
broke with bawdy, salacious humor in order to do one thing, and one thing 
only: make the audience laugh. Where the Farrelly brothers have also 
excelled, however, is in their continuous creation of quirky stories and 
likable characters that they place the outrageousness around, so as to ground 
the films in at least a modicum of reality. Beginning with their first and, 
coincidentally, best and funniest picture to date, 1994's "Dumb and Dumber," 
and followed by 1996's "Kingpin" (their weakest film, but still ambitiously 
enjoyable) and 1998's funny and raucous, if overrated, smash hit, "There's 
Something About Mary," their latest endeavor is the utterly satisfying, 
charming, and predictably rib-tickling "Me, Myself & Irene." 
Headlining the fine cast in his first return to a purely comic performance 
since 1997's "Liar, Liar," Jim Carrey stars as Charlie, a sweet-natured, yet 
meek and seemingly inconsequential, Rhode Island State Trooper whose marriage 
to an intelligent blonde (Traylor Howard) ended fifteen years ago when she 
struck up an unlikely romance with an African American midget limo driver and 
fellow MENSA member. Charlie is left to take care of his three sons whom he 
was left with, and who turn out to "have year-round sunburns," but he loves 
them unconditionally and trudges on with his life. 
Switch forward to the present, one day, triggered by yet another case of 
citizens not taking his profession and authority seriously because of his 
understated personality, Charlie snaps and temporarily becomes Hank, his 
crude, despicable alter ego who is able to do the sorts of things Charlie 
would never do. Diagnosed with Multiple Personality Disorder, Charlie is 
assigned to escort the beautiful Irene Waters (Renee Zellweger) back to her 
home state of New York following a wrongful arrest for fraud, granted that he 
take the medication for his now-fragile condition. Soon, Charlie and Irene 
are on the lam after they learn they are being stalked by two cops (Chris 
Cooper, Richard Jenkins) who have been hired by Irene's crooked boyfriend to 
do away with her. To make matters worse, Charlie loses his medication and, 
without any control over it, frequently becomes the up-to-no-good Hank, who 
cares about very little but getting into Irene's pants.
If the plot of "Me, Myself & Irene" sounds slightly unfocused and more than a 
little implausible, that is okay because what Bobby and Peter Farrelly enjoy 
doing is creating a basic premise in which to design a line of crass jokes 
and unrestrained humor that is snappy and funny enough to withhold a two-hour 
movie. While not as purely comic as, say, "Dumb and Dumber" or "Kingpin," 
"Me, Myself & Irene" pays close attention to its eccentric three-way 
relationship between Charlie, Hank, and Irene, and amidst the raucous laughs 
unearths a genuinely sweet romance.
After two years of focusing on more dramatic work that has rightfully proven 
his wide acting chops (1998's "The Truman Show," 1999's "Man on the Moon"), 
Jim Carrey is in top comedic form as the lovable Charlie, as well as the 
unruly Hank. Acclaimed for his extreme range of facial expressions, Carrey 
garners many laughs simply from his transformations from himself to his alter 
ego. Best of all, Carrey is the type of performer who cherishes the audience, 
and wants nothing more than to entertain everyone; therefore, when even the 
slightest comic opportunity arises, Carrey runs with it.
A standout in 1996's "Jerry Maguire," followed by an unfortunate appearance 
in 1999's flat, unconvincing "The Bachelor," Renee Zellweger is her usual 
winning self as the title character of Irene. Carrey may be the bigger 
personality of the two, but their quick interplay is the source of what makes 
"Me, Myself & Irene" work so well, and Zellweger does excellent work as she 
reacts to Charlie's sweetness and Hank's lewd ways, as well as forms the 
center for the romance that ultimately forms between Charlie and herself.
Lest anyone forget "Me, Myself & Irene" is, indeed, a Farrelly comedy, the 
jokes come fairly fast and furious, and involve (but are not exclusive to) a 
stubborn cow that is the victim of a potential road kill incident, but 
refuses to die; an inappropriate sex scene involving a chicken; an 
interesting way for a grown man to get ahold of milk; the three robust, black 
stepsons of the very-much-Caucasian Charlie who just so happen to be 
18-year-old prodigies; and the morning travails of Charlie, who attempts to 
urinate in a toilet despite his erection. 
A road movie at heart, the film takes up the majority of its running time 
following Charlie/Hank and Irene traveling and hiding out from the cops, and 
it is this section that is the most thoroughly satisfying. Only the overly 
violent climax that is reminiscent of Carrey's self-fighting scene in "Liar, 
Liar" loses its humorous footing, but promptly recoups in time for the 
charismatic finale.
With a soundtrack complete with rerecordings of several Steely Dan classics 
(including my personal favorite, "Do It Again," which plays over the end 
credits), and a purposefully cheesy occasional narration in the vein of a 
Disney nature documentary from the 1950s, "Me, Myself & Irene" is one of the 
more enjoyable and lively motion pictures to come along this summer, and 
demonstrates how a successful comedy should be carried out.

Title
Review for Tomcats (2001)
Directed by Gregory Poirier.
Cast: Jerry O'Connell, Shannon Elizabeth, Jake Busey, Horatio Sanz, Jaime 
Pressly, Bill Maher, David Ogden Stiers, Bernie Casey, Garry Marshall.
2001 - 95 minutes
Rated R (for profanity, sexuality, brief nudity, and cringe-inducing humor).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, March 31, 2001.
At this point in today's mainstream cinema, gross-out humor has become as 
prevalent as the appearance of Friday during each week. Last week's bid for 
yuks (as well as yucks) was "Say It Isn't So," and this week, it's "Tomcats," 
a raunchy-as-all-hell comedy written and directed by first-time filmmaker 
Gregory Poirier. Some of the material is very funny, to be sure, but much of 
it doesn't work because, like "Say It Isn't So," the editing isn't sharp 
enough to do the jokes complete justice. It doesn't help that a complete 
20-minute portion of the movie forgets the premise and is solely devoted to 
the setup and payoff of a joke so gross it makes "Scary Movie" look 
relatively tame in comparison. Another 10-minute section sets up a dominatrix 
sequence involving an elderly woman that also has nothing to do with the 
story. There is a fine line between a movie that just so happens to be crass, 
and one whose only purpose is to turn stomachs.
The "plot" goes something like this: a group of male friends make a pact to 
make annual monetary contributions to a pot that will go to the one who 
remains single the longest, without getting married. By the time they hit 27, 
the pot has hit a cool half-million dollars, and only two of them have yet to 
tie the knot--Michael (Jerry O'Connell) and Kyle (Jake Busey). When Michael 
goes in debt after a bit of failed gambling in Vegas, he tracks down Natalie 
(Shannon Elizabeth), the one woman Kyle has slept with in his life whom he 
had actual feelings for. Having lost her virginity to Kyle seven years 
before, only to be nastily spurned by him and left with only a roll of 
quarters to call a taxi, Natalie decides to help Michael out and give Kyle a 
taste of his own medicine. Their plan entails her managing to steal his heart 
(no easy feat for such a cold-hearted womanizer) and marrying him, only to 
quickly get it annulled and share half of the money Michael will receive. In 
the process, Michael begins to fall in love with Natalie himself.
Sharing certain similarities with 2000's despicable "Whipped," "Tomcats" is a 
step above that picture, but shares the same downfall: none of the characters 
are likable people. Michael may be the protagonist, and therefore the nicest 
guy to be found, but his foregoing conclusion that all women are merely sex 
objects is awfully shallow and distasteful, particularly for a young man in 
his late-twenties. Michael is played by Jerry O'Connell (1999's "Body 
Shots"), a bright-faced veteran actor best known for playing the chubby, 
scaredy-cat Vern in 1986's "Stand by Me." O'Connell runs with the part, and 
goes all out in embarrassing himself in certain scenes, but he can't overcome 
the fact that Michael isn't a particularly interesting or amiable individual.
If there is anyone to care about (and I use such a term loosely), it is 
Natalie, played with an undeniable sweetness by Shannon Elizabeth (2000's 
"Scary Movie"). Natalie is a police officer who also happens to be an 
enormously beautiful woman. She is smart, strong-willed, and doesn't put up 
with being disrespected by anyone, so it comes off as somewhat of a 
contradiction that she would waste her time helping Michael out with 
something so childish. If Natalie is harmed by the confines of the dumb, if 
ambitiously disgusting, screenplay, it is solely thanks to Elizabeth that she 
remains an intelligent girl. 
If the idea of watching a big, hospital-set chase scene for an enlarged, 
cancerous testicle that concludes in a cafeteria sounds potentially funny, 
then "Tomcats" may be worth a look. It most certainly can't be criticized for 
a lack of energy, and is entertaining to a point, but one has to wonder how 
low this crude genre can possibly go before it stops being innocently fun and 
just becomes an example of pointlessly offensive bad taste. "Tomcats," more 
so than most of the other recent films of its ilk, treads dangerously close 
to becoming the latter.
   - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
     http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman
http://www.atnzone.com

Title
Review for Someone Like You... (2001)
Directed by Tony Goldwyn.
Cast: Ashley Judd, Hugh Jackman, Greg Kinnear, Marisa Tomei, Ellen Barkin.
2001 - 95 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, March 31, 2001.
In the wrong hands, "Someone Like You" could have been the next "The Wedding 
Planner," the recent Jennifer Lopez romance that was perfectly wretched from 
one end to the other. As directed by Tony Goldwyn (1999's "A Walk on the 
Moon") and written by Elizabeth Chandler, however, it is an unusually 
smart-minded comedy-drama that works well wavering between both genres, 
garnering intermittent laughs and honest emotional insights. Whereas "The 
Wedding Planner" tried way too hard for guffaws, inspiring over-the-top 
performances and a clumsily dopey screenplay, "Someone Like You" is guilty in 
neither respect.
Jane Goodale (Ashley Judd) is an assistant producer on "The Diane Roberts 
Show," a successful television talk program. While many of the stories deal 
with passion, love, and relationships, Jane can't seem to find any of these 
things in her own life. This all changes, it seems, when she meets the show's 
new producer, Ray (Greg Kinnear), and falls head over heels for him. He says 
he loves her, and before she knows it, she has leased out her apartment and 
is preparing to move in with him. A stumbling block arises when Ray suddenly 
turns cold on her, dumping her abruptly and leaving her without a place to 
stay. 
Enter womanizing co-worker Eddie (Hugh Jackman), a self-confessed ladies' man 
who seems to have a different girl in his bed every night, and is looking for 
a roommate. Jane takes him up on the offer, as she finds herself sharing 
living quarters with a man whom she gets along with alright, but finds rather 
slimy in his dating habits. Still not over Ray, and distressed about whether 
something is wrong with her or not, she gathers up enough information to form 
the Cow Theory, which states that two cows will not mate with each other more 
than once, no matter what, and that such a fact might apply to most men. 
Egged on by her best friend and editor of a men's magazine, Liz (Marisa 
Tomei), Jane pens her thoughts into an editorial in which she creates an 
alias author, unprepared for the popularity and success it will achieve.
The generically-titled "Someone Like You," which was originally to be called 
"Animal Husbandry," based on the novel of the same name by Laura Zigman, is 
thankfully far from generic when it comes to how much it manages to stand out 
from the majority of romantic comedies made today. While most romances come 
off as if they have been processed by a computer, "Someone Like You" is more 
reality-based, as it stands as a delicate, involving character study of a 
woman who gradually finds solace in her own skin, and realizes she can be 
happy with or without a steady guy. 
As Jane Goodale, Ashley Judd has turned in her most accomplished performance 
since her career-making debut in 1993's "Ruby in Paradise." Judd strikes all 
the right notes, uncovering Jane to be a lovable working woman with a brain 
in her head and never with a loss of ideas and thoughts. We happily follow 
her through the entirety of the film because we grow to care about her as a 
true person, and want to know how everything turns out for her.
Last seen as Wolverine in 2000's "X-Men," Hugh Jackman is a charismatic, 
easy-on-the-eyes performer who proves to have what it takes to be a star. 
Eddie remains accessible throughout, even when he does things that we 
disagree with (such as using most women for one night stands), and it is a 
testament to Jackman's talent that he not once comes off as being a pig. 
In smaller roles, Greg Kinnear (2000's "The Gift") and Marisa Tomei (2000's 
"What Women Want") are fine with what they have to work with, but deserve 
better. Kinnear's Ray isn't simply a one-dimensional idiot, thanks to the 
relatively fresh character writing, but it is difficult to see why he took 
this role. The same goes for Tomei, an often delightful actress who too often 
gets throwaway parts that underutilize what she is so clearly capable of. 
Ellen Barkin (1999's "Drop Dead Gorgeous") shines in a brief role as talk 
show host Diane Roberts, who shares a nice moment with Jane late in the 
picture, as she discloses her own insecurities in her life.
"Someone Like You" is an enjoyable dramedy that is fairly obvious in where it 
is headed right from the start, but in getting there, it surprises in how 
moving and wise it becomes. The tale of a woman who, through the trials and 
tribulations of a failed romance and a possibly invigorating new one, finds 
her place in the world, it is a worthwhile movie that will likely exceed most 
people's wildest expectations on just how good something called "Someone Like 
You" could possibly be.
    - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
      http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman
http://www.atnzone.com

Title
Review for Charlie's Angels (2000)
After months of alleged production delays, casting and script problems, and 
endless rumors of on-set arguments, "Charlie's Angels," a big-screen 
adaptation of the cult '76-'81 television series (starring Jaclyn Smith and 
Farrah Fawcett, among others), seemed doomed for catastrophic failure. After 
all, when was the last time we saw a TV-show-turned-feature-film that was 
worthwhile, particularly when the budget was an overblown $90-million? 
Moreover, the terrible teaser trailer, with the three lead actresses 
performing their martial arts moves in front of a fiery background, was not 
exactly cause to break out the champagne glasses.
Imagine, then, the delightful surprise of watching the finished product and 
gradually realizing that I haven't had this much fun at the movies all year. 
In a nutshell, "Charlie's Angels" is an unequivocal success--a highly 
entertaining, funny, exciting, no-holds-barred, bubblegum triumph of the way 
to make a great action-comedy, as well as a rambunctious female empowerment 
fantasy.
Tough-girl Dylan (Drew Barrymore), sexy sweetheart Natalie (Cameron Diaz), 
and ultra-intelligent Alex (Lucy Liu) are Charlie's Angels: a trio of strong 
young women who work for mystery millionaire Charlie (voiced by John Forsythe 
and never seen) and his personal assistant Bosley (Bill Murray) to keep the 
world safe from nasty villains and megalomaniacs. Their latest mission is to 
rescue an electronics genius by the name of Knox (Sam Rockwell), who has been 
kidnapped by wealthy thief Roger Corwin (Tim Curry) and his silent henchman 
(Crispin Glover).
A comedic rendition of the countless James Bond flicks--only twenty times 
more fun and original--"Charlie's Angels" is not so much about its thin 
storyline as it is about the refreshingly lightweight style which feature 
film debut director McG (whose previous credits include several music videos) 
evokes. From the stunning opening sequence that begins on an airplane and 
ends on a sailboat, to the climax set around an ancient castle alongside the 
California coast, director McG clearly knows exactly how to balance all of 
his various genres, including action, comedy, and romance, for optimum 
effect. The movie is far-fetched, yet so shamelessly tongue-in-cheek as to 
never seem anything less than innocently believable.
If there was ever any on-set strife between the cast members, you won't find 
any signs of it here. Each actor finds just the perfect tone for their 
character, and they all elicit an overwhelming joy of performing. 
Actress-producer Drew Barrymore (1999's "Never Been Kissed") has found in her 
character of Dylan a chance to show off her comic flair to a greater effect 
than she ever has before. Cameron Diaz (1999's "Being John Malkovich"), as 
Natalie, is hilariously klutzy, yet smart, and has a smile so warm and 
beautiful that she sells every moment she appears here. Rounding out the 
angels is Lucy Liu (2000's "Shanghai Noon"), as streetwise Alex, who provides 
a welcome contrast to her tonally sunnier costars, and equips herself in her 
kung-fu-style action sequences quite nicely. Together, Barrymore, Diaz, and 
Liu are charismatic joys who obviously had just as much fun making the film 
as it is to watch it.
Adding an extra amount of amusement to the proceedings is the constant stream 
of costume changes the actresses goes through, as they head undercover posing 
in different disguises. There is particular entertainment to be had in a 
sequence in which Barrymore and Diaz crossdress, while the leather-clad, 
whip-striking Liu poses as a dominatrix-cum-efficiency-expert and bewitches 
every student in the class.
The supporting cast is appropriately over-the-top, and all the more enjoyable 
because of it. Bill Murray (1998's "Rushmore") returns to his purely jokey 
roots with Bosley, and makes a big impression with a not-so-large role. Sam 
Rockwell (1999's "The Green Mile") is lively and magnetic as the kidnapped 
Knox; Tim Curry is at his slimy best as Roger Corwin; and Tom Green (2000's 
"Road Trip"), Matt LeBlanc (TV's "Friends"), and Luke Wilson (1999's "Blue 
Streak") are effective as the gals' love interests.
Special notice must be made to Crispin Glover (2000's "Nurse Betty"), whose 
brooding role as The Thin Man is one of the most memorably nasty and 
appropriately animated villains to come around in years. Watch Glover 
closely; he doesn't have one line of dialogue throughout, but simply by the 
drifty way in which he carries himself and smokes his cigarettes, as if he 
were a famed magician performing his most popular trick, does he create a 
wholly fresh and despicably enjoyable character.
With sunny, attractive cinematography; fast-paced editing; a sharply clever 
screenplay by Ryan Rowe, Ed Solomon, and John August; a standout soundtrack 
that wittily includes innumerable songs featuring the word, "angel," in them, 
as well as a nice mixture of music from the '70s, '80s, '90s, and the present 
day; and awesome stunts not matched since last summer's "Mission: Impossible 
2," "Charlie's Angels" is a film that is unquestionably better than it has 
any right to be. The movie makes no halfhearted effort to be anything more 
than a happily diverting popcorn film, and by doing so, exceeds the viewer's 
highest expectations. By being unpretentious in the extreme, it is the most 
invigorating thing that has happened to the action genre in the last decade. 
"Charlie's Angels" is F-U-N, the type of movie the term, 'rollicking good 
time,' was invented for.
How Does It Look?
Presented in its original anamorphic widescreen theatrical aspect ratio of 
2:35:1, the picture quality on "Charlie's Angels" is a godsend. Filmed in 
brightly-chosen colors and hues, the clarity of the picture jumps off the 
screen from the first frame to the last. There are no artifacts, zero grain, 
nonexistent shimmering, and no bleeding of the colors. The treatment this 
"Special Edition" DVD got is, in one word, beautiful. Reference quality work.
How Does It Sound?
In the audio department, you case choose from English 5.1 (Dolby Digital), 
2-Channel (Dolby Digital), or a French track. Whichever way you play it, you 
will not be disappointed. Filled to the breaking point with music and action, 
you are sure to get a lot of groundbreaking play from your speakers. Dialogue 
is consistently clear, as well, making this DVD's audio treatment wonderfully 
alive.
Special Features?
Columbia Pictures didn't title the "Charlie's Angels" DVD a "special edition" 
for nothing. With so many bonus attractions, it's admittedly difficult to 
decide what to explore first. I began with the Screen-Specific Audio 
Commentary By Director McG and Cinematographer Russell Carpenter. McG and 
Carpenter are obviously good friends who got along very well, and had a lot 
of fun, while making this motion picture. Their enthusiasm for the finished 
product, and everything that went into its making, definitely shows through 
on this fast-paced and entertaining track that has no empty space, nor does 
it ever grow boring. Behind-the-scenes stories and talk of the actors make up 
much of their discussion, as do their intentions for what they were trying to 
make (a FUN movie).
Also found within are no less than six Making-Of Featurettes, each running 
between 2 1/2 and 8 minutes in length. "Getting G'd Up" is a heartfelt, if 
too brief, tribute to the joyful personality and talent of director McG. "The 
Master and the Angels" shows the kung-fu-style training that stars Drew 
Barrymore, Cameron Diaz, and Lucy Liu went through to prepare for their 
physically demanding roles. This is perhaps the most intriguing of the 
featurettes, as it gives a glimpse into the tough stuff that the stars went 
through to prepare for their roles. Most entertaining is a look at Barrymore 
screaming in agony after doing an umpteenth stomach crunch. "Welcome to Angel 
World" details the production design and set decoration of the film, while "
Angelic Effects" takes a fascinating look at how all of the visual effects in 
the movie were brought to cinematic life. Major work was done on a blue 
screen, to be sure, but it was surprising to see that much of it was actually 
filmed (such as the girls, albeit stunt doubles) jumping off a cliff as the 
castle behind them explodes. "Angelic Attire: Dressing Cameron, Drew, and Lucy
" is a relatively fluffy, brief piece that shows you how each of the actress' 
costumes were chosen, based on the realities of the characters they were 
playing. Finally, "Wired Angels" is a shot-for-shot replay of the fight scene 
between the three angels and Crispin Glover's Thin Man, but with all of the 
wires still prominently featured.
The special features aren't over quite yet, as there are three Deleted and 
Extended Scenes, preceded by an explanation from director McG on why they 
were excised. While none of the scenes are outright bad, it is easy to see 
why they were cut out, as they prove to not be vital to the film's tone or 
tight pacing. The bathroom scene, however, should be noted for being an exact 
replica of the bathroom in Stanley Kubrick's 1980 masterpiece, "The Shining."
There is an Outtakes and Bloopers section that is a mere repeat of the 
outtakes shown during the end credits of the film. There are also 2 Music 
Videos, for Destiny's Child's snappy "Independent Women Part 1" and Apollo 
Four Forty's "Charlie's Angels 2000," Talent Files, Production Notes on the 
inside booklet of the disc's box, and Theatrical Trailers. The trailers 
include the teaser and the full trailer for "Charlie's Angels," as well as 
trailers for "My Best Friend's Wedding," "Vertical Limit," "Crouching Tiger, 
Hidden Dragon," and two upcoming features: "The Adventures of Joe Dirt," with 
David Spade, and this summer's "Final Fantasy."
The Animated Menus boast great, dynamic showmanship, and like the film 
itself, are full of energy and originality.
The Bottom Line
"Charlie's Angels" remains the most entertaining film I saw last year, and 
with this "Collector's Edition" DVD, it is a must-buy for all fans of the 
format and the movie. And as I have heard mentioned before, if you didn't 
like the movie, then you simply didn't "get" it. While I'm certainly open to 
all opinions and criticisms, it is honestly difficult to believe that anyone 
could watch "Charlie's Angels," and not find it 100% fun.
    - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
      http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman
http://www.dvdmix.net

Title
Review for Loser (2000)
Directed by Amy Heckerling.
Cast: Jason Biggs, Mena Suvari, Greg Kinnear, Tom Sadoski, Zak Orth, Jimmi 
Simpson, Dan Aykroyd, Twink Caplan, Andy Dick, David Spade, Colleen Camp.
2000 - 95 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity, drug abuse, and mild profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, July 22, 2000.
In the last two decades, writer-director Amy Heckerling has defined a 
generation with the respective high school classics, 1982's "Fast Times at 
Ridgemont High," and 1995's "Clueless." Her latest teen opus, "Loser," has 
transported its characters to college, and while it probably won't catch on 
in a big way like the former two pictures did, it remains a charming and 
innocent-eyed romantic comedy, a teen movie that is refreshingly more serious 
than most, and is not littered with raunchy jokes about sex and human 
anatomy. Somewhat a throwback in tone to the '80s John Hughes era of "Sixteen 
Candles," "The Breakfast Club," and "Ferris Bueller's Day Off," Heckerling 
gains mileage by creating and understanding characters who have thoughts, 
ideas, and dreams outside of the requirements of the plot. The same can be 
said for "Fast Times" and "Clueless," and that is, no doubt, the reason why 
Heckerling has prospered each time she has ventured into the world of 
teenagers.
Repairing two of the stars of last year's big hit, "American Pie," Jason 
Biggs and Mena Suvari are delightfully cast as Paul Tannek and Dora Diamond, 
two NYU students who are having trouble making it through their first year of 
college in the Big Apple. Paul, a nice lug of a guy from the Midwest, 
attempts to make friends away from home, but fails to even win over his three 
obnoxious roommates (Zak Orth, Jimmi Simpson, Tom Sadoski), who spend their 
time partying, getting wasted, and taking advantage of girls. Paul wants to 
fit in, but cares too much about his education to risk losing his 
scholarship, and soon finds himself kicked out of his dorm room and 
relocating to a veterinarian clinic.
Meanwhile, Dora is simply struggling to get the money to go to the school by 
working as much as possible on the side as a waitress at a strip bar, and has 
begun an affair with her European Literature professor Edward Alcott (Greg 
Kinnear). Out of fear of the school finding out about their teacher-student 
relationship, he yearns to keep Dora a secret, and seems to only really want 
her around for (1) sex, and (2) doing chores for him around his apartment as 
a sort of slave. 
Paul and Dora, who both share Professor Alcott's class, become good friends 
when Paul's scheming ex-roommates hold a party and give Dora some roofies, 
causing her to nearly OD and have to get her stomach pumped. With Alcott 
listed as her next-of-kin, but him claiming that he doesn't know her, Paul 
lets her stay at the vet clinic with him while she recuperates, and they 
quickly bond. What Dora fails to recognize, though, is how much Paul is 
starting to care for her, and how bad a relationship she is already in with 
Alcott--one that she really needs to get out of.
"Loser" wins no points for originality, but then again, neither did 
"Clueless," which was one of 1995's best films. Boosting a smart, savvy 
screenplay and a bright, young cast, Amy Heckerling succeeds in telling an 
oft-told story by writing characters who may be flawed, but are good-hearted 
inside and often out. 
Also helping matters is a tinge of extra realism that is rare for the teen 
genre. Paul must maintain a 3.5 GPA to keep the scholarship he has earned, 
but without at least a B+ in Professor Alcott's class, he won't be able to. 
Not only is Dora stuck in a relationship with a big jerk, but when she is 
fired at her job, she has no idea how she is going to get the money for next 
semester's classes, nor how she is going to be able to keep commuting back 
and forth from her suburban home to Manhattan. The desperation that both 
characters possess is true-to-life, rather than the whole movie being solely 
about whether the guy gets the girl, or who is going to take who to the prom.
Jason Biggs rose to stardom last year with "American Pie," and while he was 
perfectly endearing there, he is even better here. His Paul is a young man 
who may not be fashionably hip or a big partier, but he is sweet, morally 
honest, and wants to do good in school. Constantly being pulled down by the 
criticisms he receives from his roommates, Paul has no idea where he fits in, 
and is unsure if he ever will, and the way he feels is made palpable by 
Biggs' engaging turn.
With "American Pie," "American Beauty," and now "Loser," Mena Suvari is 
shaping up to become one of Hollywood's most talented young actresses. In 
just a few movies, she has played a full spectrum of diverse characters, and 
has been successful in each one. Suvari's Dora is a bright girl who is 
understanding to other people's feelings, and is the first person who does 
not judge Paul based on how much he parties or how "cool" he is, but on what 
he is like as a person. Whenever Biggs and Suvari are onscreen together, they 
sparkle and are genuinely charismatic, and whenever they are in their own 
individual scenes, their attractive personalities and talent carry them along.
As Paul's airhead roommates, Zak Orth, Jimmi Simpson, and Tom Sadoski, do 
their jobs with flare, but have no positive qualities. The same can be said 
for Greg Kinnear (2000's "What Planet Are You From?"), who has recently been 
making a living playing jerks, but is so good at it that it's almost scary. 
The rest of the cast are in basically cameos, from Dan Aykroyd, as Paul's 
earnest father, to David Spade, as a video store clerk, to Twink Caplan, as 
Dora's coworker at the strip bar.
As with "Clueless," "Loser" has got one of the strongest soundtracks for a 
teen-targeted movie in recent memory, with such popular, non-mainstream fare 
as "Out of My Head," by Fastball, to "Blue (Da Ba Dee)," by Eiffel 65, to an 
appearance by band Everclear. And also, as with "Clueless," when the two 
central characters eventually discover their true feelings and finally have 
that long-awaited first kiss, it actually means something, because they don't 
seem like two actors locking lips, but two real people whom we know--we just 
know--have finally found the one person they deserve.

Title
Review for Fast and the Furious, The (2001)
Directed by Rob Cohen.
Cast: Paul Walker, Vin Diesel, Jordana Brewster, Michelle Rodriguez, Rick 
Yune, Matt Schulze. Ted Levine, Ja Rule.
2001 - 105 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for violence, profanity, and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, June 23, 2001.
Call me naive, but until I saw director Rob Cohen's "The Fast and the 
Furious," I didn't know there was a such thing as underground car racing 
gangs in the United States. Not being a mechanic or car aficionado, I also 
had no idea how cars could so quickly speed up to 140 mph. While the jury's 
still out on how realistic "The Fast and the Furious" is concerning its 
details on automobiles and racing, I, nonetheless, learned quite a bit from 
the film--more so than any usual moviegoing experience. I also learned that 
no matter how many slam-bang action scenes are put into a movie, the entire 
effort cannot work without a serviceable screenplay.
Set in the seedy world of street racing teams, Brian (Paul Walker) is an 
undercover cop who has managed to get in with one such group, led by Dominic 
Toretto (Vin Diesel). While his mission is to prove that they not only 
illegally race, but also hijack trucks on the side, Brian finds himself 
apprehensive of doing so when he not only becomes good friends with Dominic, 
but also falls for his sister, Mia (Jordana Brewster).
The plot of "The Fast and the Furious" is such a flimsy amalgamation of 
cliches and tedium that it not only remains wholly predictable from beginning 
to end, but also doesn't even find its premise until at least a half-hour in. 
Until then, we are treated to literally one scene after the next of people 
racing hot--no, make that very hot--cars. When the story finally shifts into 
high gear and we find that Brian is, indeed, a cop, the stakes are 
undoubtedly heightened. Unfortunately, this means that the pacing must slow 
down and the characters actually have to speak. They are not helped much at 
all by the underwhelming screenplay by Gary Scott Thompson, Erik Bergquist, 
and David Ayer. That it took three separate people to pen such a thin script 
is quite humorous, and just a little mindboggling.
The action sequences, by the way, are so thrilling that they almost 
single-handedly save the film from its countless flaws. The tight, precise 
editing aids in making each and every car racing sequence a high-throttle joy 
to behold, and a climactic scene involving a botched truck hijack is 
downright nailbiting. It's very easy to forget about such "frivolous" things 
as character involvement and story developments when your body is being 
overtaken by such rapid-fire images of excitement and danger. But once each 
scene has taken its toll, you are grounded back to the reasons why the movie, 
as a whole, is simply not finding the footing it should.
The cast is professional and attractive, but little else (with two 
exceptions). Vin Diesel (2000's "Pitch Black"), that of the muscular build, 
shaved head, and baritone voice, turns in another effective, highly modulated 
performance as the loyal Dominic. As his younger sister, Mia, Jordana 
Brewster (2001's "The Invisible Circus") is a strong actress with a brain to 
go along with her stunning beauty. While it would have been nice to see 
Brewster act as more than virtual wallpapering, at least she has more to do 
than Michelle Rodriguez (2000's "Girlfight"), as Dominic's sensual, 
hard-edged girlfriend, Letty. Who knows if Rodriguez is any good? All she is 
asked to do is make brooding, "I'm-so-tough" faces on cue. Finally, Paul 
Walker (2000's "The Skulls") gets his very first leading man role as 
undercover police officer Brian, and he doesn't impress. There just doesn't 
seem to be anything behind Walker's facial expressions, and so his character 
doesn't win the audience's sympathies as it should.
Despite several slow patches and an ending that doesn't know when to quit 
(yet still manages to leave characters and relationships hanging without 
closure), "The Fast and the Furious" offers mindless summer movie fun for 105 
minutes. If anything, the action leaves a cursory adrenaline rush. When the 
movie is over, though, don't expect to think about it again--because you 
won't.
   - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
     http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman
http://www.all-reviews.com/reviewers/dustinputman.htm
http://www.atnzone.com

Title
Review for Telling You (1998)
Directed by Robert DeFranco.
Cast: Peter Facinelli, Dash Mihok, Jennifer Love Hewitt, Andy Berman, Gary 
Wolf, Gina Philips, Jennifer Jostyn, Robert DeFranco, Frank Medrano, Matthew 
Lillard, Richard Libertini, Jennie Garth, Jensen Daggett.
1999 - 94 minutes.
Rated R (for profanity and sexual situations).
Capsule Review, July 27, 1999.
Robert DeFranco's minor indie film, "Telling You," which came and went in a 
handful of platform theaters before being shipped off to video has a 
surprising array of young stars, most of which are put to no good use. Phil 
(Peter Facinelli) and Dennis (Dash Mihok) are two recent college graduates 
who work at a pizza place together and are unsure of what they are going to 
do with their life, questioning some of the things they may have done 
differently. If "Telling You" had concentrated on the characters, the film 
may have worked, as the performances are fairly good, particularly by Mihok 
and Gina Philips, as Mihok's ex-girlfriend from high school, and one 
flawlessly written and subtle scene between the two late in the picture 
almost saves it. Alas, the film gets bogged down in cliches and amateurish 
overplotting, with the other central character's (Phil) plight left 
frustratingly hanging. Jennifer Love Hewitt, the biggest star in the cast, 
has a throwaway, one-dimensional role as Phil's bubbly, talkative ex, but she 
does her best with what she's given, which is next to nothing.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Superstar (1999)
Directed by Bruce McCulloch.
Cast: Molly Shannon, Will Ferrell, Elaine Hendrix, Harland Williams, Emmy 
Laybourne, Glynis Johns, Mark McKinney, Gerry Bamman.
1999 - 82 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for sexual innuendo and profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, October 8, 1999.
The popular "Saturday Night Live" character of the Irish Catholic high 
schooler Mary Katherine Gallagher probably doesn't have a more avid fan than 
myself. Watching the dwindling SNL each week, mostly in hopes of seeing the 
effervescent Molly Shannon portray the clumsy, yet sweet, underdog who dreams 
of being a success in whatever she sets out to do, Mary Katherine Gallagher 
stands as a role model--albeit an exaggerated one--for a lot of young people 
who may not be the prettiest or most popular, but who have a good soul and 
remain true to themselves. 
There was a lot of hope on my part that "Superstar," the character's debut 
feature film adaptation, would be a successful and bright comedy, one with a 
lot of heart and a lot of laughs, and with the always-entertaining Shannon 
on-board, I doubted it could fail. SNL-based motion pictures are too often 
criticized with the cliched statement that the movies almost always fail 
miserably because the usual 5-minute skits are stretched out to an 
insufferable film of an hour-and-a-half, but, for the most part, I disagree 
(unless the words, "The Blues Brothers," "Coneheads," or "Stuart Saves His 
Family," appear in the title). Even the critically-maligned SNL film from 
last year, "A Night at the Roxbury," was, for me, one of the most enjoyably 
funny comedies of 1998, far more satisfying than the uneven, overrated 
"There's Something About Mary."
That being said, 'guilty' would be the most accurate adjective to describe 
the way I feel for ultimately having to give "Superstar" a negative two-star 
rating. Although often outrageous, and outrageously rib-tickling, the film 
consistently does feel as if about fifteen 5-minute skits have been edited 
together, with three or four warm, character-defining moments placed in 
between, to pad out the running time to a far-too-brief, underdeveloped 82 
minutes (including the opening and end credits). 
The story is simple--almost painfully so--but it still could have worked had 
the screenplay been more focused and innovative, and the characters dealt 
with more satisfyingly. Unfortunately, the picture has been whittled down to 
a strenuously shallow concoction that, aside from its message concerning the 
importance of inner beauty, is only skin-deep. Mary Katherine Gallagher is a 
determined, accident-prone 17-year-old girl living with her loving, 
wheelchair-bound grandmother in "the ugliest house in the neighborhood, with 
the ugliest front yard, and the ugliest dog." Working part-time at a video 
store in which she gets to rewind the videocassettes as she watches her 
favorite movies over and over again, and attending St. Monica's Catholic High 
School, Mary dreams of nothing more than to be a superstar, "like the people 
you see in the movies." She also has an almost obsessive crush on the captain 
of the football team, Sky Corrigan (Will Ferrell), but unfortunately, he is 
currently going out with head-cheerleader/ice-queen Evian (Elaine Hendrix). 
When St. Monica announces their forthcoming "Let's Fight V.D." Talent 
Contest, Mary instantly knows what she's going to do: she's going to 
audition, and by golly, she's going to perform in the contest, and hopefully, 
will be able to nab Sky's admiration in the process.
"Superstar" is littered throughout with such delightful moments that it 
frequently starts to win you over, only for a slow spot to arise and sink 
things back down into mediocrity. The majority of the jokes are easy targets, 
and have been recycled from the usual character traits of Mary Katherine 
Gallagher, such as her tendency to fall over things, stick her hands under 
her armpits and sniff them when she grows nervous, and recite monologues from 
made-for-TV movies that will better express what she is feeling at any given 
moment. These moments tellingly add up to the heartiest laughs in the whole 
picture (particularly one sequence set in a confessional in which Mary 
expresses her feelings through a dead-on, perfectly-imitated monolgue from 
"Sybil," starring Sally Field), but while they work wonderfully and are 
especially memorable within the confines of a tiny skit, they plays as more 
of an afterthought in a big-screen movie.
Front-and-center is the incomparable female comedian Molly Shannon, who 
brings each and every one of her characters to vibrant life, whether it be on 
SNL or in films, which she has gradually, and deservedly, been doing more of 
recently. Although amicably appearing in supporting roles in "A Night at the 
Roxbury" and last Spring's Drew Barrymore vehicle, "Never Been Kissed," 
"Superstar" is Shannon's first chance to be the star attraction and shine 
throughout, and she does just that. Mary Katherine Gallagher is an earnest, 
likable creation, a person who is often accidentally involved in pratfalls, 
but is never demeaned or directly made fun of, and Shannon embodies the role 
with both sweetness and cheerful humor. That she is a 34-year-old actor 
playing a teenager (and this mostly goes for the whole "teen" cast) only aids 
in the picture's campy, almost innocent feel, reminiscent of 1978's classic 
musical, "Grease!"
Will Ferrell, as the object of Mary's compulsive affections, is underused and 
never really written fully as an actual character, instead remaining a sort 
of enigma throughout. Meanwhile, Harland Williams, as a silent, brooding 
fellow student/outcast who takes a liking to Mary, is a far more effective 
love interest, and Elaine Hendrix is clearly enjoying herself as the nasty, 
unredeemable villain, Evian. In one of the film's funniest scenes, Mary and 
Evian wage war in a battle of verbal insults that concludes with Mary 
practicing out martial arts moves that she learnied from watching a lot of 
Jackie Chan movies. "You're parents died because of their embarrassment of 
you," Evian heartlessly quips, to which Mary responds, "Well, at least I 
wasn't named after a type of bottled water." Later, Mary hilariously advises 
Evian to drink a bottle of herself.
By the time "Superstar" had reached its abrupt climax at the talent contest, 
I had become disappointed because I knew the film would soon be over, and 
what had come before was marginally adequate at best. Making matters worse, 
the large majority of its central comic moments were blatantly shown in the 
theatrical trailer and non-stop TV ads, and so they didn't work quite as well 
as they could have. Even when it somewhat recoups itself with a slightly 
unforeseen conclusion, and includes a crowd-pleasing moment for Mary that 
caused my theater's audience to erupt into applause (to which I almost was 
tempted to join in), the film is a major missed opportunity. Not only does it 
feel like a rush-job, but it possesses the exact aura of a skit, rather than 
a fleshed-out portrait of an admittedly lovable character. With "Superstar," 
Molly Shannon proves once and for all that she does, indeed, have what it 
takes to be a superstar; it's just too bad that for her first starring role, 
her marvelous character couldn't have been given a more worthwhile film 
vehicle.

Title
Review for Thomas Crown Affair, The (1999)
I've never seen the acclaimed 1968 Norman Jewison caper romance, "The Thomas 
Crown Affair," which top-lined Steve McQueen and Faye Dunaway, and after 
viewing this highly stylized 1999 remake, let's just say I'm not exactly 
dying to rent it anytime soon. Old-fashioned, cliched, and considerably 
uninvolving, the only aspect of the film that even remotely distinguishes it 
from a mainstream '60s movie is the repeated exploitation of actress Rene 
Russo's breasts. Don't get me wrong; at 45-years-old, she still looks 
stunning, but when a film's story stops dead in its tracks simply to show 
somebody nude for no apparent reason, you basically can sense that you're in 
for the long haul.
When a famous Monet painting turns up missing at the Metropolitan Museum of 
Art in New York City, Insurance Investigator Catherine Banning (Rene Russo) 
is sent in to find the thief and retrieve the priceless work of art, with the 
help of city investigator Michael McCann (Denis Leary). Ever notice how 
sleek, catchy names like Catherine Banning and Michael McCann only exist 
within the world of the cinema? Oh, how easy it is to get sidetracked. 
Anyway, all evidence points directly towards billionaire playboy Thomas Crown 
(Pierce Brosnan), so when Catherine begins snooping around and going out on 
dates with him to seek out any information she can get, and to blatantly 
steal his house keys right out of his pocket(!), imagine her utter shock when 
she discovers that she is madly, hopelessly, deeply falling for him. Sex 
ensues. So do some possible double-crosses. And so does a lingering getaway 
to a secluded Caribbean island where Catherine lets it all hang out and she 
and Thomas walk around in their birthday suits, and then go back to bed for 
another roll in the hay. Yes, you heard that right. And yes, it's as tedious 
as it sounds. 
After a seemingly endless prologue which introduces us to Thomas Crown, a man 
who "has it all," except an interesting personality, and features the 
intricate theft of the Monet, edited at the pace of a legless 100-year-old, 
Rene Russo enters the scene and breathes some much-needed life to the film. 
Beautiful, sassy, and likable, Russo has returned after a long absence to a 
lead role in an adult studio picture; It's just too bad it couldn't have been 
a film in which the screenplay (ineptly penned by Leslie Dixon and Kurt 
Wimmer) was thrown away and extensively rewritten with at least an ounce of 
wit and flair. If there is one thing director John McTiernan does right with 
this remake, it is that, once she enters the picture at around the 15-minute 
mark, Russo instantly becomes the human focus of the story. Unfortunately, at 
the one-hour mark, McTiernan throws the romance into high gear, but in the 
process, concocts a series of unintentionally funny, totally unnecessary sex 
scenes, and drops Catherine's IQ score by several points.
Tugging Russo's dignity down even more is her pairing with Pierce Brosnan, a 
great-looking actor who nonetheless is as dull as a piece of chopped wood. 
For the film to ultimately work, one of the most essential components is an 
actor that is able to pull off Thomas Crown's intriguing qualities and 
effortless allure. While Brosnan seems to have fun in his James Bond movies, 
and therefore, is able to pull off that world-famous role, he is more or less 
vapid here. I don't know; maybe it's because he knew the script was severely 
flawed, as was the lackluster directing, and didn't have his heart into it 
because of this. At any rate, it's decidedly better to make the best of what 
you've got, rather than choose to play it dull. Just look at Russo; she has 
fun even when she's flashing the audience every couple minutes. 
A desperate act if I've ever seen one, the original's Faye Dunaway makes a 
recurring, throwaway cameo as Thomas' psychiatrist, but the role is so 
thankless and wasteful that you are left wondering just what the point was. 
The scenes between the two stick out like a sore thumb in the context of the 
rest of the film, and there is no payoff to be had. Is McTiernan's purpose to 
give an "in the know" wink to those who remember the original? If so, then 
why not at least incorporate Dunaway somewhere in the confines of the story 
being told, instead of adding an extra, half-witted subplot that takes up 
even more precious minutes of the already-overlong running time.
There was another caper romance that came out this past April called 
"Entrapment," and it is the film that "The Thomas Crown Affair" only wishes 
it could be. "Entrapment" was filled with suspenseful and exciting sequences, 
and presented us with a relationship that played like more than just an 
afterthought. And if that's not enough, the two stars of the picture were 
Sean Connery and the radiant Catherine Zeta-Jones, who really set the romance 
on fire with heated chemistry and unavoidable passion. In contrast, you never 
for once believe that Rene Russo and Pierce Brosnan are in love. When their 
inevitable sex scene finally rolls around, their internal frame-of-mind 
practically shouts out, "Hey, I'm cashing a paycheck here!"
      - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman.
        Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Astronaut's Wife, The (1999)
Directed by Rand Ravich.
Cast: Charlize Theron, Johnny Depp, Joe Morton, Clea DuVall, Donna Murphy, 
Nick Cassavetes, Samantha Eggar, Blair Brown, Tom Noonan, Cole Sprouse, Dylan 
Sprouse.
1999 - 109 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, and sex).
Reviewed August 29, 1999.
Charlize Theron's really gotta get out of the city. In 1997's superb 
thriller, "The Devil's Advocate," she starred as a happy-go-lucky wife who 
travelled to New York City with her husband when he got a job at a 
prestigious law firm, and immediately went into a mental downward spiral as 
she began to suspect the people around her were demons. Change the demons to 
aliens, and what you've got is "The Astronaut's Wife," which certainly has 
the talent involved to make the film a suspenseful thriller, but is solely 
sunk on the shoulders of one culprit: writer-director Rand Ravich. Judging 
only on the work he does here, Ravich is akin to writing overblown, at times 
even laughable, dialogue, and wouldn't know subtlety if it came up and 
slapped him on the face. Sorry, folks. What you see is what you get with "The 
Astronaut's Wife," and what I saw wasn't very pretty.
Spencer (Johnny Depp) and Jillian Armacost (Charlize Theron) are a warm, 
loving married couple living in Florida, with Spencer an astronaut, and 
Jillian a second-grade teacher. When Spencer blasts off once again with his 
colleague, Alex Streck (Nick Cassavetes), Jillian is worried as usual, and 
even more so when, the next day, she and her younger sister, Nan (Clea 
DuVall), catch a report on the news that states Spencer and Alex lost contact 
for two minutes after a mysterious blast in space. Jillian and Alex's wife, 
Natalie (Donna Murphy), are relieved to learn by Mission Control that their 
husbands are fine, have been tested for any possible problems, and are 
recovering. Things go back to normal, almost. Although Spencer never talks 
about what happened during the two lost minutes (on the taped recording, 
there was a bunch of screaming, but nothing more), he announces to Jillian 
that his piloting days are over, and that he has been offered a business job 
in NYC. She hesitantly agrees, but before they leave, Alex abruptly suffers a 
stroke and does, while the grieving, paranoid Natalie commits suicide at the 
funeral reception a couple days later. In New York, Jillian quickly gets 
another elementary school teaching job, but she starts to suspect something 
isn't quite right with Spencer, this suspicion further confirmed when an 
official from Florida, Sherman Reese (Joe Morton), comes up to tell her that 
the third noise on the audio wasn't the blast, but another lifeform, and that 
Natalie was pregnant with twins when she killed herself. Oddly, Jillian has 
also just discovered that she is a few months along with twins, so...what 
exactly is inside of her?
"The Astronaut's Wife" isn't the most original of films, but (aside from it 
blatantly ripping off 1968's spooky Roman Polanski classic, "Rosemary's 
Baby," right down to Theron's short blond hair mirroring that on Mia 
Farrow's) it is the type of story that effortlessly could have become an 
enthralling, frightening motion picture on the subject of paranoia, somewhat 
like the recent "Arlington Road," had it been made with a firmer hand. 
Unfortunately, what we get instead are a group of characters who are 
intellectually far slower than the viewer, because if they had realized the 
obvious right from the get-go--that Spencer isn't really Spencer once he 
returns--then the movie would have been over at the 30-minute mark, which 
isn't exactly long enough to add up to a feature film. It really is 
frustrating, however, to watch people who are unmistakably written below 
average intelligence, because you instantly stop believing what is happening 
on-screen, and are forced to realize that, yes, it is only a movie, albeit 
one that holds its audience in contempt.
That's not the worst of the film's problems; I wish it was. Also on the 
screenplay level, the dialogue often is some of the most unintentionally 
laugh-inducing of the whole year. In one supposed-to-be-serious scene, 
Jillian is speaking on the phone with Sherman Reese, who is trying to tell 
her some important information about her husband. What is her reply? "Did you 
ever hear the story of the prince and princess, Mr. Reese?" Jillian asks, as 
she goes on to tell an elaborate fairly tale as tears stream down her face. 
In another sequence, out of the blue, Jillian turns on the radio and does a 
dance around her apartment. And finally, in what should have signalled the 
firing of the costume designer, and did signal a pretty hearty laugh from 
myself, Nan wears a ritzy, colorful feathered coat out to a restaurant, and 
doesn't exactly blend in with the others. Did she win the lottery after 
Spencer and Jillian moved up to the Big Apple?
If the movie is a disaster on the writing and directing levels, at least most 
of the performances are strong and effective, and on a technical level, it is 
often impressive. Amid her embarrassing lines of dialogue she is forced to 
mutter, Theron once again proves to be a presence to be reckoned with. Even 
if her character isn't written at the fully-developed level of the tragic one 
she played in "The Devil's Advocate," give her points for rising above the 
material and successfully acting as a likable protagonist. The 
almost-always-superb Johnny Depp is the weakest acting link. Regardless of 
the palpable air of menace he presents here, his character is a 
one-dimensional villain, and every facial expression he vents off practically 
screams, "I'm the baddie here!" In supporting roles, Donna Murphy has a 
touching final scene, and Joe Morton is sympathetic even if his only reason 
for being is to explain the goings-on. Clea DuVall, as Jillian's sister, Nan, 
gives the best performance in the whole film, and sells each and every one of 
her lines. It's just too bad she also is written to be a nitwit who doesn't 
even bother listening to Jillian's predicament, and the pay-off of her 
character is extremely disappointing.
"The Astronaut's Wife" carries out a bidding war throughout on a pacing 
level. Every time it gets set to take off, it quickly slows down again. If 
this movie was a stick-shift car, I would be fully convinced that the driver 
had never been taught how to use it. On a positive note, there are some nice 
touches sprinkled throughout, including a powerful visual image in one scene 
of Jillian and Spencer sitting in front of a giant U.S. flag that covers the 
whole background. Another scene set in a storage building extracts a fair 
amount of tenseness out of the situation, while the use of the atmospheric 
music score, by George S. Clinton, and fast-motion cinematography, hint at 
how striking the film might have been with someone else at the helm. 
Too bad director Ravich betrays his audience even more during the last act. 
Not only has this "twist" been done before, but in the confines of this 
particular film, it is almost maddeningly inadequate and a huge cheat. Forget 
about the time we have invested getting to know and like Theron's character; 
forget about the 109 minutes we've wasted waiting for a gratifying finale; 
oh, and forget about me even considering giving this inept sci-fi/thriller a 
passing grade.
   - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman.
     Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Snow Falling on Cedars (1999)
Directed by Scott Hicks.
Cast: Ethan Hawke, Youki Kudoh, Max Von Sydow, James Rebhorn, Rick Yune, 
James Cromwell, Celia Weston, Arija Bareikis, Sam Shepard, Richard Jenkins.
1999 - 126 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity, mild violence, and sex).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, January 9, 1999.
Based on the acclaimed novel by David Gutterson, Snow Falling on Cedars,? 
directed by Scott Hicks (1996s Shine?), is a sumptuous, meticulously 
poetic motion picture that refreshingly tells much of its story through 
strikingly beautiful visual images, rather than a lot of dialogue. One could 
complain that some of the characters are never fully realized, including the 
central figure of the story, but those that say such a thing, perhaps, have 
missed the point. The film consistently weaves in and out of the present and 
the past, based on peoples recollections, and, as in real life, memories 
often consist of nothing more than pictures, rather than words. 
Superficially a courtroom mystery, in which a young Japanese fisherman, Kazuo 
Miyamoto (Rick Yune) is being tried for the alleged murder of a man on a 
fog-induced night in the Pacific Northwest, circa 1950, what the film truly 
is, at heart, is a moving romance, as well as a documentation of the 
treatment of the Japanese, and their division with the Anglo population, 
sparked from World War II. Ishmael Chambers (Ethan Hawke) is a novice 
reporter who has returned to his hometown in the dead of winter (and a very 
heavy snowstorm) to cover the trial, which means much more to him than the 
usual news story because his childhood love and, he believes, soul mate, is 
Hatsue (Youki Kudoh), now Kazuo's loyal wife. As adolescents, Ishmael and 
Hatsue had fallen deeply in love with each other, but Hatsue decided, based 
on her mother's and the general public's belief, that the Japanese "should 
stick to their own kind." The majority of the residents of the small fishing 
town believe that Kazuo has to be the guilty one, but Ishmael suspects 
otherwise, and sets out to seek the truth, all the while pondering from afar 
about how his life might have been different had he and Hatsue followed their 
hearts ten years before.
Told out of chronological order, with flashbacks to Ishmael and Hatsue as 
children, teenagers, and Ishmael during and after fighting in WWII, and 
flashbacks within flashbacks, "Snow Falling on Cedars" is just as 
effortlessly told as an Atom Egoyan film (i.e. 1997's "The Sweet Hereafter"), 
and largely gains much of its effectiveness on the way the multiple stories 
beautifully and imperceptibly are revealed and transpire, akin to reading a 
complex, but very much satisfying, novel. Because the time period and 
storylines are changing throughout, there is no chance of any one of them 
(the trial, the romance, and the historical relevance) overstaying their 
welcome. 
There are many dazzling, powerful sequences to be had within, including when 
Hatsue and her family, along with the rest of the Japanese in the town, are 
forced out of their homes and shipped off to internment camps, which is an 
example of complete bravura filmmaking. The scene looking back at the close 
relationship between Hatsue and Ishmael when they were younger is also 
superbly filmed and fastidious in detail. And the portrayal of the way the 
whites in the town look at the Japanese is also accurate and, thankfully, not 
overwrought. The music, by James Newton Howard, strikingly aids in 
underscoring the scenes.
There's really no way a person could possibly pen a review for "Snow Falling 
on Cedars" without mentioning its clearest and most worthy attribute, which 
is the exquisite, occasionally awe-inspiring cinematography, by Robert 
Richardson. Not only should the film be a shoo-in for an Oscar nomination in 
this category (and deservedly, the award), but it many times left me in, 
basically, a wide-eyed gaze at the unbelievably beautiful images that were 
appearing on the screen, one after the other. Shots of rainy forests, and 
water dripping off of the leaves of plants, and snow-blanketed trees and 
mountains and whole, wide landscapes left me wondering if it was actually 
real (for it surely looked awfully believable), or billions of tons of fake 
snow, or a visual effect. Either way, never has snow looked as gorgeous and 
alluring and threatening as it does here.
The performances in the picture are not very flashy and, at times, are 
threatened to blend into the background. This posed a problem for me several 
times throughout, as I felt that the film was marvelously engaging to look 
at, but emotionally mute. Luckily, director Scott Hicks would prove me wrong 
immediately after each time my mind would wander to such a thought, with a 
stunner of a scene that left a precise dramatic impact. The last scene is 
particularly one of subtle, but unavoidably impassioned beauty. Of the cast, 
Youki Kudoh is a standout as Hatsue Miyamoto. She is so good, and so 
well-cast, that at times, her facial expressions say it all, and she doesn't 
even need to speak what she is thinking.
"Snow Falling on Cedars" probably isn't a film for everyone. While all mature 
audiences will be able to grasp its important themes and meaning, those 
partial to Hollywood movies with a lot of action or predictable comedy and 
romance will not be taken under its, overall, exquisite spell, due to a 
deliberately slow pace that cherishes and respects each and every one of its 
shots, and does not follow all of the rules of this sort of genre. 
Nevertheless, those audiences looking for a more challenging and intricate 
viewing experience will be genuinely delighted with the visual and emotional 
rewards that "Snow Falling on Cedars" has to offer.

Title
Review for A.I. Artificial Intelligence (2001)
Directed by Steven Spielberg.
Cast: Haley Joel Osment, Jude Law, Frances O'Connor, William Hurt, Sam 
Robards, Jake Thomas, Brendan Gleeson, April Grace.
2001 - 145 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, June 30, 2001.
Loosely based on the story, "Supertoys Last All Summer Long," by Brian 
Aldiss, and the late Stanley Kubrick's dream project up until his death in 
1999, "A.I.: Artificial Intelligence" is as accomplished a motion picture as 
anything director Steven Spielberg has ever made. Following Kubrick's 
unfortunate passing, Spielberg, who had prior been collaborating ideas with 
him concerning "A.I.," decided to make it his next directorial effort, both 
as a movie that he was passionate and excited about, and as a loving tribute 
to one of the great masters of the cinema.
The end result of the long, arduous, 25-year journey of "A.I." is a 
science-fiction film filled with endless imagination and wonder; a mature, 
almost devastating fairy tale; and a thought-provoking rumination on the 
importance of love, and determined hope, in one's life. The movie is, indeed, 
a Spielberg production, although it does feature an icy, somehow bleak, 
emotional core that is certainly Kubrickian in spirit, and undoubtedly 
intentional. Using the approach of differing styles of moviemaking (with 
Spielberg more of a wide-eyed optimist) turns out to work extraordinarily 
well in this film's case, as the picture is deeply touching and effective 
without being maudlin, and occasionally sterile without coming off as 
cold-hearted. 
Set in a futuristic setting, following the melting of the ice caps which has 
drowned entire U.S. cities (including Manhattan), Professor Hobby (William 
Hurt) has created a string of mechas--robots with the physical appearance of 
humans--to live in the world. With all mechas having been made into adults up 
until this point, Hobby introduces his most life-like creation yet: an 
11-year-old boy named David (Haley Joel Osment). Programmed to be able to 
love (the first of his kind to be able to do such a thing), David is taken in 
by Monica Swinton (Frances O'Connor) and her husband, Henry (Sam Robards), as 
a child "substitute" for their own young son, Martin (Jake Thomas), who has 
been cryogenically frozen while they await a cure for the disease he has. 
At first creeped out by David, Henry and Monica quickly warm up to him, and 
in Monica's case, falls in love with what is now her new son. Aside from not 
being able to eat or sleep, David is exactly like a regular boy, delighting 
in mimicking and picking up new information, as well as being able to play 
games. When Martin suddenly awakes from his comatose state and begins to get 
better, he rejoins his parents' lives, and in the process, David 
progressively loses the attention and, through a series of circumstances out 
of his control, made to look potentially dangerous. Forced to get rid of him, 
but not wanting him destroyed by the company for returning him, Monica drives 
David into the forest one day, and leaves him there alone, with only a 
mechanical, talking teddy bear as company.
Leading up to its release, "A.I.: Artificial Intelligence" was purposefully 
advertised in an obscure manner that didn't give away much of its premise, or 
hardly any scenes from the film itself. This was the wisest choice anyone 
could have made, as "A.I." is a gloriously creative film that prospers from 
its sheer unpredictability, and constant reminder that it is not just another 
"dumb sci-fi movie," but a motion picture overflowing with exciting ideas and 
relevant themes. 
Believing that Monica will love him if only he becomes a real boy, David sets 
off to find the Blue Fairy from the fairy tale, "Pinocchio," whom he 
earnestly believes is the only one with the power to grant him his wish. On 
his journey, he meets a fellow mecha named Gigolo Joe (Jude Law), whose name 
reveals what he has been programmed to do. Joe is a cynic, but forms a bond 
with David, and consequently, helps him to accomplish his mission, even if it 
is a lost cause. It is never clear to the viewer if the Blue Fairy does 
genuinely exist, and this mystery is what fuels the entire second half of the 
film.
Haley Joel Osment (2000's "Pay It Forward") is a revelation as David, even 
more so than in 1999's box-office smash, "The Sixth Sense," which led him to 
an Oscar nomination. At only 13-years-old, Osment's ability to convey utter 
realism and subtlety in each of his performances is remarkable, to say the 
least. This has never been so apparent as right here, in a difficult and 
complex role as a sympathetic character who is, nonetheless, not real, but a 
machine. Osment must carry the whole movie solely on his shoulders, and he 
hits every note exactly right. Simply no other child actor could have done as 
refined and impressive of a job.
The cast that surrounds Osment is truly fine, as well. Jude Law (1999's "The 
Talented Mr. Ripley") is self-assured and appropriately cocky and cool as 
Gigolo Joe. Law  plausibly paints Joe as a person (read: robot) who is suave, 
undeniably sexy, and devoted to pleasing women. As the increasingly 
distraught, yet caring, Monica, Frances O'Connor (2000's "Bedazzled") is 
heartbreaking, particularly in the bravura sequence in which she takes David 
on a trip that she knows will only have one of them returning home. Finally, 
William Hurt (1998's "One True Thing") is emphatically low-key and memorable 
as David's inventor, Professor Hobby, who may have an ulterior motive behind 
his creation of a mecha child.
The technical credits of "A.I." are awe-inspiring. Spielberg regular Janusz 
Kaminski's cinematography is both beautiful and understated, as is John 
Williams' unusually poetic music score. And the production design and visual 
effects, by Industrial Light & Magic, are a sight to behold. There are images 
throughout that will stick with you long after the lights in the theater have 
gone up, especially the depiction of New York City engulfed in an endless 
sea, as well as the haunting underwater creation of Coney Island.
A tragic, if inspiring, motion picture event, there are impassioned issues 
about humanity that are brought up which will resonate with every viewer. And 
the imagination and artistry which the film has been made with is 
second-to-none. To watch "A.I.: Artificial Intelligence" is to experience a 
visually astounding and emotionally rewarding triumph that, in time, is sure 
to go down as one of the all-time brilliant achievements in modern 
moviemaking. Stanley Kubrick sure would have been proud.
   - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
     http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman

Title
Review for Rushmore (1998)
Directed by Wes Anderson.
Cast: Jason Schwartzman, Olivia Williams, Bill Murray, Mason Gamble, 
Sara Tanaka, Seymour Cassel, Brian Cox, Luke Wilson, Connie Nielsen, 
Ronnie McCawley, Keith McCawley.
1998 - 93 minutes
Rated R (for profanity and brief nudity).
Reviewed February 13, 1999.
Perhaps it is wrong to label a film such as director Wes Anderson's 
"Rushmore" since it is such a completely original and thoroughly 
engaging motion picture that it does not really fall under any certain 
genre, but I will say that it is the best "coming-of-age" film since 
1986's "Stand by Me" and "Lucas," and one of the few movies made 
recently that I would call magical in everything it does, and in all of 
its little details.
"Rushmore" stars Jason Schwartzman, making his feature film debut, in an 
Oscar-worthy performance as Max Fischer, a bespectacled 15-year-old 
whose great love in life is the exclusive private school he goes to 
called Rushmore, and who dedicates so much of his free time to numerous 
petty clubs (he especially likes his acting troupe, who perform 
productions such as "Serpico") that he is failing all of his regular 
classes. Although his father (Seymour Cassel) works as a barber, Max 
says that his father is a doctor so that he won't be looked upon as of a 
lower financial status. One day things brighten up for Max when one of 
Rushmore's various school speakers actually doesn't put him to sleep. 
His name is Mr. Blume (Bill Murray), and he is burdened with two 
obnoxious teenage twin sons and a wife whom is having an affair. Also 
coming into the story is the lovely Miss Cross (Olivia Williams), a 
first-grade teacher who Max falls helplessly in love with when he 
discovers she has checked out the library book that he holds as a sort 
of spiritual guidance, Jacque Cousteau's "Diving for Sunken Treasure." 
Miss Cross lets him know right off that they can only be friends since 
he is so much younger than she, but Max feels betrayed to find out that 
she is beginning to take a fancy to Mr. Blume.
A regular filmgoer may think that they know where this story is headed, 
but they would undoubtedly be wrong since "Rushmore" is such a complete 
and utterly unpredictable film, and one that more or less puts to shame 
such recent films about teenagers as "She's All That" and "Varsity 
Blues." "Rushmore," as in life, is a mixture of comedy and drama, of 
surprises and inevitability, and most importantly, is purely human. 
Somewhat reminiscent of the aforementioned '80s gem, "Lucas," "Rushmore" 
is a movie that knows exactly how it is to be a teenager, with its air 
of uncertainties and disappointments, and its main character of Max is a 
likable, dedicated, but as all teens occasionally are, stubborn 
protagonist whom all audiences, ages 15 and up, should be able to 
wholeheartedly understand and sympathize with in his plight. 
Wes Anderson made his directing debut in 1996's offbeat "Bottle Rocket," 
a film that I was not too fond of, but it was apparent that he did have 
an undeniable spark for filmmaking. With his sophomore effort, 
"Rushmore," Anderson has finally lived up to his full potential, also 
due to the absolutely wonderfully-written screenplay by Anderson and 
Owen Wilson, which does not take the easy route by setting up a simple, 
clear-cut story, but instead lets the characters and their predicaments 
naturally flow. By challenging us, we are never quite sure where 
everything is going, and how everything is going to end up, and it was 
refreshing to finally feel that way about a film, especially after just 
previously sitting through the soggy, cliche-ridden "Message in a 
Bottle."
How the performances, writing, and film itself could be snubbed by the 
Oscars is beyond me, but I suspect that "Rushmore" was too offbeat and 
intelligent of a film for those members obsessed with war movies and 
those set in the Elizabethan era. Schwartzman is spectacular and 
perfectly cast in the lead role as Max, and has a genuine and 
naturalistic quality about him that you don't often see in young actors. 
Meanwhile, Bill Murray has been gifted with a career-reviving role here 
as the wily, but good-natured Mr. Blume. Olivia Williams as the object 
of Max's affection, Miss Cross, is also given a fully-developed 
character that we are able to care about. She is a woman who does like 
Max, but not at all in a romantic way, and is faced with the no-win 
situation of having to crushing his heart. Finally, Sara Tanaka is a 
godsend as Margaret Yang, a kind, fetching teenage girl who does show a 
liking in Max even though he is too absorbed in Miss Cross to notice her 
much.
In the first half-hour of "Rushmore," I noted to myself that I liked the 
film a whole lot, although I doubted it would end up being what I 
considered great. In a twist of the usual film that starts off 
promisingly, only to crash-and-burn in its climax, "Rushmore" 
progressively got better and better, and emotionally more deep and 
touching, that by the picture's magnificent and entirely satisfying 
ending I had absolutely fallen in love with the film. Played to the 
perfectly-chosen song "Ooh-La-La," by The Faces, "Rushmore" concluded on 
the highest note possible, and left me feeling cleansed of all of the 
motion picture rubbish I have had the misfortune of enduring thus far in 
1999. "Rushmore" is a splendidly-made motion picture in all respects, 
and one of 1998's very best films.
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Lucky Numbers (2000)
Nora Ephron's "Lucky Numbers" came and went in theaters in the fall of 2000, 
and it's easy to understand why. Excising her usual romantic plotline, Ephron 
(1993's "Sleepless in Seattle") and screenwriter Adam Resnick have made a 
pitch-black, meanspirited comedy that is too infrequently funny, and more 
uneven than it should have been. 
Set in 1988 in Harrisburg, Pennsylvania, television weatherman Russ Richards 
(John Travolta) is having a terrible winter, thanks to the unusually balmy 
temperatures that have led his snowmobile business threatening to foreclose. 
When his strip-club-owning friend, Gig (Tim Roth), suggests he rig their news 
station's lottery, with the help of the conniving lotto ball girl, Crystal 
(Lisa Kudrow), the scheme is set into motion--with disastrous results.
While certain elements of the picture do intermittently sparkle, including 
two delightfully humorous supporting performances from documentarian Michael 
Moore (as Crystal's asthmatic, masturbating cousin) and Maria Bamford (as a 
ditzy Denny's waitress), and a fun '80s soundtrack, the film is emotionally 
cold and extremely cruel-hearted. Our two protagonists, played by John 
Travolta (2000's "Battlefield Earth") and Lisa Kudrow (2000's "Hanging Up"), 
are both despicable human beings who deserve far worse than they are ever 
afforded throughout, and so we lose interest in their plight.
In the right hands, "Lucky Numbers" could have been the next "Fargo," or a 
funnier "A Simple Plan," but Ephron and Resnick botch the results with little 
to laugh about, and even less to be left in suspense with. It proves to be a 
detached experience that, like Russ and Crystal, isn't much fun at all.
How Does It Look?
Presented in an anamorphic widescreen transfer, the picture quality on the 
"Lucky Numbers" disc is very well orchestrated, if not perfect. While the 
picture is consistently bright and the colors accurately rendered, there was 
a little bit more grain than I expected from a big-budget 2000 movie from 
Paramount Pictures. Blacks levels are good, but often pose a grain problem 
during the nighttime shots, while the daytime scenes come off beautifully, 
thanks in part to the lovely Harrisburg scenery. A strong transfer, but 
misses the mark of being reference quality.
How Does It Sound?
With 5.1 Dolby Surround Sound, as well as a separate French track, the movie 
is perfectly clarified from beginning to end, with the notable music gaining 
quite a bit of mileage out of the surround system. 
Special Features?
While not labeled a "Special Edition," "Lucky Numbers" offers up a few 
goodies that bring the DVD's quality up a notch or two. First up is a 
screen-specific audio commentary track by director Nora Ephron. In some 
cases, it is far more entertaining than the film itself. Ephron presents 
herself and her thoughts well, and adds insight into the production. Her 
validity comes into question, however, when she mentions Lisa Kudrow's role 
is the best part for a woman she has ever read. Anyone who sees the movie 
will realize that Kudrow's Crystal is a nasty backstabber, and one-note to 
boot. Not exactly a quality female role, in my book. Also included on the DVD 
is an entertaining, if slight, featurette that incorporates scenes from the 
film with cast and crew interviews. Running just over nine minutes, it is a 
welcome addition to this release. Finally, there is the theatrical trailer 
for you to watch, and consider how it didn't look very good as a 
two-and-a-half-minute advertisement, either.
The Lowdown
The only thing to say about "Lucky Numbers" is that it is an ambitious movie 
that falls flat. As a stand-alone DVD release, it is not recommended, but for 
those that enjoy it, there is much to like in the special features that might 
make it worth a rental, or a buy for the devoted fans of Travolta, Kudrow, or 
Ephron.
Overall: * * 1/2 (out of * * * * ) . . . Recommended with reservations

Title
Review for Cruel Intentions (1999)
Directed by Roger Kumble.
Cast: Ryan Phillippe, Sarah Michelle Gellar, Reese Witherspoon, Selma 
Blair, Sean Patrick Thomas, Eric Mabius, Joshua Jackson, Christine 
Baranski, Swoosie Kurtz, Louise Fletcher, Tara Reid.
1999 - 97 minutes
Rated R (for profanity, sex, brief nudity, and mild violence).
Reviewed March 7, 1999.
Note: For anyone who read my essay, "The Cruel Intentions of Teenage 
Audiences," this review is based on my second viewing, with an audience, 
thankfully, that acted much more mature.
What an ingenious concept: Take a famed 18th-century novel, in this case 
Choderlos de Laclos's Les Liaisons Dangereuses, which has subsequently 
been adapted to film three times (in 1959, 1988, and 1989, 
respectively), and update it to modern-day New York City with wealthy 
teenage characters. Walking such a fine line with the classic source 
material could have easily turned out disasterously, or even laughably, 
but screenwriter Roger Kumble (also making his auspicious directing 
debut) has wisely stuck surprisingly closely to the book, as well as the 
1988 film version by Stephen Frears, "Dangerous Liasons," and has 
unexpectedly captured the tricky tone, as well, between absolute 
wickedness and ultimate redemption.
Sebastian Valmont (Ryan Phillippe) and Kathryn Merteuil (Sarah Michelle 
Gellar) are two devious step-sibling Manhattan socialites on their 
summer break before their senior year in an exclusive private school, 
who amuse themselves by playfully flirting with each other and bragging 
about their various sexual conquests. They are quickly growing bored, 
however, by the growing air of predictability in the games they play 
with potential love interests whom they care nothing for. When Kathryn 
is dumped by one of her boyfriends for the clumsy, childish 15-year-old 
virgin Cecile Caldwell (Selma Blair, star of "Zoe, Duncan, Jack and 
Jane"), she is outraged, and asks Sebastian for a favor: seduce Cecile 
and then spread rumors about her promiscuity, even though she has her 
eyes set on her black music teacher, Ronald (Sean Patrick Thomas). The 
stakes grow even higher between Sebastian and Kathryn when she makes a 
wager with him concerning if he can seduce Annette Hargrove (Reese 
Witherspoon), a young woman whose father is going to be the new 
headmaster of their school, and whom has recently written an article in 
"Seventeen" magazine where she professes her plans to wait until 
marriage to lose her virginity, before school starts. If he loses, she 
gets his vintage Porsche. And if he wins, he can enjoy Kathryn in any 
way he wants. "I'm the one person you can't have," Kathryn tells 
Sebastian, "and it kills you." Sebastian accepts, but while spend time 
with Annette, the unthinkable happens: he actually begins to form real, 
human feelings for her, despite initially only using her.
"Cruel Intentions" is a sleek and stylish comedy-drama that makes no 
compromises with its title: the two main characters in the film, and 
even some of the supporting ones, are extremely cruel and emotionally 
sick people who get their kicks out of using people. Because of this, 
the film is also certainly not your normal so-called "teenager" movie, 
and I could easily imagine adults also getting involved in the 
characters' plight, just like many have with "Dangerous Liasons." 
Even if the characters aren't all likable, they are written with a 
richness you don't often see, and the dialogue between Sebastian and 
Kathryn is truly fetching and enjoyable, as they don't always say what 
they mean, or slyly use double entendres to stand for what they are 
saying. And as played by Phillippe and especially Gellar, the two actor 
are certainly up to the challenge. Gellar finally has proven with this 
film that she can very well be a wildly versatile actress that can play 
sweet with one role and be deceptive and hateful with the next, as she 
does here. Even if Phillippe isn't always up to her level, he is still 
well-cast in the role and plays several scenes with a brutal honesty 
(even if, in the film, he is supposed to be deceiving someone).
As the innocent, beautiful Annette, Witherspoon turns in yet another 
fine performance to add to her impressive resume (which includes 
outstanding turns in such films as 1991's "The Man in the Moon," 1996's 
"Freeway," and 1996's "Fear"), and in one vital dramatic sequence, she 
is able to transform a potentially cliched scene into something that is 
thoroughly poignant. Witherspoon also works very well with Phillippe, 
even if there aren't quite enough scenes between them to believe that 
they have fallen in love, and they make a quite charismatic pair 
(perhaps because they are a couple in real life, just recently engaged).
In the fourth and final central role is Blair (in her first starring 
film), who is a standout as the juvenile Cecile. That Blair is 
26-years-old (about two to five years older than the other cast members, 
even though she plays someone two or three years younger) and is able to 
believably play a high school freshman only goes to show that she is 
also very talented, as well as has a firm comic sensibility, since many 
of her scenes rely on humor. All other actors in the film have 
relatively small roles who are used as pawns in Sebastian and Kathryn's 
scheme, including Thomas, as the music teacher; Eric Mabius, as a 
teenage football player and closeted homosexual; Joshua Jackson, as 
Sebastian's gay friend; and Christine Baranski as Cecile's aristocratic 
mother.
Although the story at hand is ultimately a tragic one, and includes a 
masterfully-done conclusion involving Gellar that rivals the one in 
"Dangerous Liasons" with Glenn Close, "Cruel Intentions" is also an 
often very funny comedy, particularly when dealing with small 
blink-and-you'll-miss details involving the characters, the 
always-amusing dialogue, and the infantile antics of Cecile. People can 
criticize "Cruel Intentions" all they want, but when it comes down to 
it, it is so very similar to 1988's Oscar-nominated "Dangerous Liasons" 
that it really is hard to nit-pick. The only major difference I can 
actually detect between the two, except for the obvious (such as the 
present-day time period and teenage characters), is that the characters 
in "Cruel Intentions" seem to jump more vibrantly to life. In 
retrospect, while watching "Dangerous Liasons" not long ago for the 
first time, despite the brilliant performances by Close, John Malcovich, 
and Michelle Pfeiffer, all I could really think about was telling the 
characters, "lighten up already!"

Title
Review for Urban Legend (1998)
Directed by Jamie Blanks.
Cast: Alicia Witt, Rebecca Gayheart, Jared Leto, Tara Reid, Michael 
Rosenbaum, Loretta Devine, Joshua Jackson, Natasha Gregson Wagner, 
Danielle Harris, Robert Englund, John Neville, Julian Richings, Brad 
Dourif.
1998 - 100 minutes.
Rated R (for violence, profanity, brief sex, and mild gore).
Suggested Retail Price: $24.99
Widescreen Format in the original 2.35:1 theatrical aspect ratio on Side 
A/Pan-and-Scan format on Side B
Languages: English and French 
Back in the early 1980's, there was a slasher movie craze, and it 
eventually burned out because the films simply weren't any good, 
reaching for the lowest-common-denominator in filmmaking. But then 
1996's "Scream," a genre-shattering horror flick, suddenly revived the 
genre, and since then we have been bombarded with new horror movies, and 
the strange thing is, ever since then, they could be divided easily into 
two categories: the great ("Scream," "Scream 2," "I Know What You Did 
Last Summer") and the awful ("An American Werewolf in Paris," 
"Wishmaster," "I Still Know What You Did Last Summer"). Usually you can 
tell before you see one of these little fright items whether they are 
going to be worthwhile or not. And luckily, the new slasher film, "Urban 
Legend," directed by newcomer Jamie Blanks, fits in the former category: 
the great. 
"Urban Legend" stars Alicia Witt (TV's "Cybill") as Natalie, a student 
of the fictional northeastern college Pendleton University, who becomes 
convinced after several dead bodies show up that a psychopathic killer 
is on the loose, murdering people in ways that are based on urban 
legends (i.e. an axe-wielding killer hiding in the backseat of your car, 
a babysitter receiving threatening phone calls that are coming from 
inside the house, etc.). Complicating the story even more is the myth 
that at the college 25 years ago, a muder spree took place, and the sole 
survivor was Mr. Wexler (Robert Englund), who, surprise!, is currently 
teaching the American Folklore class at Pendleton U.
As in the "Scream" movies, "Urban Legend" has a lot of fun toying with 
its audience on who the killer is: could it be Mr. Wexler; Paul (Jared 
Leto), a journalism major and potential boyfriend of Natalie; the 
school's janitor; or any number of the other students and staff. 
Regardless of this minor similarity to "Scream," "Urban Legend" is an 
original because of the extremely clever, ingenious storyline. 
Practically no popular legend is left unturned, and all of them are used 
to spooky effect. 
There are many things that separate this from those 80's stalk-and-slash 
movies: the characters aren't all one-dimensional airheads, and the 
performances are from mostly talented up-and-coming actors; the writing 
is sharp and often funny, with many in-jokes and tributes to other 
movies, most noticably "Halloween"; the killer's identity is, for most 
of the running time, unpredictable; and most importantly, it is actually 
scary, with many effective, suspenseful set-pieces. Two particular 
moments that are especially nerve-wracking is the opening scene, set at 
a gas station, and the other is set at a radio station. The picture runs 
at a brisk pace, and is consistently entertaining. The technical credits 
are superb, particularly the moody cinematography which casts the 
college as an ominous character of its own, and the down-beat music 
score by Chrstopher Young. Another plus is that there are very few songs 
in the movie, compared to other recent "hip" films aimed at young 
adults, and like some of the great genre works, like "Halloween" and 
"The Exorcist," it relies more on an instrumental scores. 
If there is a negative thing about the resurgence of the horror genre, 
it is usually the climax, which reveals the killer's identity and then 
becomes an example of overacting, and loses its frightening grip. Not 
here. In "Urban Legend," the villain, whom will remain nameless, 
obviously has a lot of fun, and it becomes both menacing and strangely 
humorous. Oh, and one last thing that is worth mentioning: Loretta 
Devine, who plays the school's black security guard who is obsessed with 
Pam Grier and blaxploitation movies, is a standout, stealing every scene 
she's in. The same thing goes for Tara Reid (last seen in the Coen 
Brothers' "The Big Lebowski), as Sasha, Natalie's friend, and DJ at the 
college's radio station. "Urban Legend" is one of the very best of the 
recent slasher offerings, because it mixes its laughs and chills with 
more smoothness and grace than usual, and it proves that just because 
it's a horror movie that includes people being murdered doesn't mean it 
still can't be intelligent and impressive filmmaking. 
The DVD edition of "Urban Legend" comes to you in a wonderful package 
filled to the brim with interesting and insightful special features. The 
film is certainly the best horror film to be released since "Scream," 
but the extra supplement material buoys it over to being an absolute 
must-buy on DVD.
First, the DVD transfer and sound is top-notch, like all of Sony's 
releases, and includes clear, precise colors, with an appropriate 
emphasis on shades of blue. Aside from maybe one or two instances, there 
are no noticable hints of bleeding or grain, and the sound perfectly 
compliments the the picture quality, with an especially powerful 
transfer of the memorable music score. The orchestral accompaniments 
were actually noticed more on DVD than when I saw this film in theaters 
last September. Like usual, I ignored the Full Screen version of the 
film and did not even take a look at it since any well-knowledged film 
buff will know that Widescreen is incomparably superior, capturing the 
theatrical aspect ratio that the movie was meant to be seen in.
As for the Special Features, Sony deserves a round of applause for going 
out of their way to bring us many enjoyable bonus'. The "Making-Of" 
featurette, which runs about ten to fifteen minutes, was fascinating 
because Director Jamie Blanks narrated the footage, which shows us 
filming of some of the major sequences, including the opening scene at 
the gas station; the parking garage death scene with John Neville; and 
the set-piece in the forest with Alicia Witt and Joshua Jackson (as 
Natalie's wise-cracking friend, Damon). Also among the featurette is an 
intriguing deleted sex scene between Michael Rosenbaum and Tara Reid in 
which they are attempting to mimic the positions of the Kama Sutra. 
Although fun to watch, the scene was wisely cut since it was rather 
pointless to the story and concluded with an odd occurrence happening 
that didn't really make much sense in the context of what follows. The 
Filmmaker's Commentary was done in my favorite commentary format, in 
which Director Jamie Blanks, writer Silvio Horta, and actor Michael 
Rosenbaum discuss the making of each scene as the film moves along, 
adding surprising and often funny anecdotes about the making of the 
picture, as well as stories of the cast and how they actually managed to 
get the film made in the first place. A particularly amusing on-going 
discussion that they bring up throughout is how they found the late Gene 
Siskel's negative review rubbish, since he claimed the film was far too 
bloody and gruesome. The filmmakers repeatedly point out, however, that 
they purposefully tried to stray away from excess blood and gore in the 
film, making it appear with tight edits that the viewer has seen more 
than they actually have. Other intriguing anecdotes during the 
commentary were that several lines were improvised; Loretta Devine's 
part grew more and more as they discovered how very good she was in it; 
and that the self-referential scene in which Jackson turns on the radio 
to hear Paula Cole's "I Don't Want To Wait" (the theme song to TV's 
"Dawson's Creek," which Jackson stars in) was actually thought of on the 
spot and was filmed during the last take. Finally, other Special 
Features include actor biographies and filmographies, which come in 
handy if you are interested in learning about each star and what else 
they have previously been in, and the film's atmospheric theatrical 
trailer.
With such a splendid compilation of Special Features on a film such as 
"Urban Legend," which was one of the more entertaining films of 1998 
(and on my runner's-up list of the year's best), this DVD is one of the 
better presentations that I have come across since buying my DVD player 
in September of 1998, and judging from the fine commentary, Director 
Blanks is a talented new filmmaker whom I expect a bright future from.
     - DVD Review written by Dustin Putman, March 2, 1999 
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for American Psycho (2000)
Directed by Mary Harron.
Cast: Christian Bale, Chloe Sevigny, Willem Dafoe, Cara Seymour, Reese 
Witherspoon, Samantha Mathis, Jared Leto, Matt Ross, Guinevere Turner, Justin 
Theroux, Bill Sage, Josh Lucas.
2000 - 100 minutes
Rated R (for violence, gore, nudity, sex, drug use, and profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, April 15, 2000.
Are you, more or less, setting yourself up for disappointment if you go to 
see a film adaptation of one of the most powerfully written novels you can 
recall reading? At the time of its publication (after one publishing company 
dropped it at the last minute), Bret Easton Ellis' horrific 1991 satire was 
widely reviled by some critics for being an offensive exercise in misogyny 
towards women, a "how-to" book on slaughtering someone and getting away with 
it. They not only missed the boat, but the entire ocean with this conclusion. 
Having read Ellis' novel the week prior to seeing the controversial film 
version, what struck me was not only its gracefully flowing and mysteriously 
alluring writing style, told in first-person by the central character, but 
also its portrait of a man come unhinged, who "isn't really there," and has 
no answer for why he commits such heinous crimes except to say that it is 
close to a masturbatory experience for him. And, of course, the book offered 
a right-on-target satirical view of the '80s--full of conceited egos, wealth 
and power, and materialistic excess. In other words, Ellis may have been 
lightly poking fun, but there was a startling amount of truth in everything 
he wrote, right down to the minuscule details. 
After several years of the film adaptation rights thrashing around from one 
studio and director to the next, "American Psycho" has finally surfaced on 
the big screen with, shock of all shocks, a female director, Mary Harron 
(1996's "I Shot Andy Warhol"), and a female collaborative screenwriting 
partner, Guinevere Turner. What we have here, however, is a motion picture 
that misses the mark in a way that the book critics did nearly a decade ago. 
While still attempting to be a satire, Harron has whittled down the book's 
casual product placement; violence; unforgettably self-absorbed, yet nuanced, 
characters; and its overall depth, to bring audiences a basic Cliffs Notes 
version of a masterful novel. In doing so, Harron has also altered a story 
supposed to be about a shallow era into a film that is, ultimately, just 
shallow. 
Patrick Bateman (Christian Bale) is a 27-year-old yuppie on Wall 
Street--overly wealthy; generically handsome (he looks much like the rest of 
his buff, chiseled colleagues); health conscious; womanizing; and only 
interested in "hardbodies" and getting reservations at the swankiest 
restaurants. What Patrick's coworkers and acquaintances don't know, though, 
is that he works out in his sterile, desolate apartment to the likes of 
pornos and "The Texas Chainsaw Massacre," and casually murders anyone he 
feels like it--old friends, bums, prostitutes, working partners, you name 
it--while spouting off a vocal review on the merits of some of his most 
beloved singers and bands, including Genesis, Whitney Houston, and Huey Lewis 
and the News. 
Like the novel, "American Psycho" has no actual story, with a plot that moves 
from Point A to Point B and so on, but is a loose gathering of thoughts and 
moments set in the life--a rather pathetic one, at that--of Pat Bateman. A 
modicum of a story does arise after Paul Allen (Jared Leto), Patrick's 
coworker, is axed to death, and Detective Kimball (Willem Dafoe) shows up at 
Pat's job to question him about the unknown whereabouts of Paul. 
One of the most compelling aspects of the novel was eventually realizing that 
Bateman is not a vile excuse for a human being, but simply an unstable man 
who, somewhere down the line of his life, has lost the ability to feel 
emotion, either for himself or those around him. It was a surprisingly 
poignant notion by Ellis, subtle, yet effective. The film attempts the same 
thing, but verges off-course in its conclusion to be something that almost 
begs you, in an overwrought fashion, to feel sympathy for this man.
Christian Bale has gotten a lot of publicity and early acclaim for his work 
as Patrick Bateman, and while he is playing a calculating character set on 
being physically perfect and financially sturdy, his performance remains cold 
and at a distance, speaking in a monotone voice that wears out its welcome 
right away. Bale is a fine actor, and he nails the adrenaline rush and 
childish excitement he gets on inflicting torture to others, but that is just 
about the only compliment he can be given. 
All other characters are minor, as they are all merely players in Patrick's 
own little world. They are often so inconsequential onscreen, however, that 
they make no impact. Reese Witherspoon, as Patrick's equally self-absorbed 
fiancee, Evelyn, is especially wasted in comparison to the stature of the 
character in the book, with her role whittled down to a mere three brief 
scenes. Witherspoon is given no chance to create any sense of a character at 
all, and so she is forced to basically phone in her performance. The same 
goes for all of Patrick's friends (played by Bill Sage, Justin Theroux, Matt 
Ross, and Josh Lucas); his drug-addled lover, Courtney (Samantha Mathis); and 
Detective Kimball (Willem Dafoe).
The only two who come away unscathed, and with their full respect intact, are 
Chloe Sevigny, as Jean, Patrick's adoring secretary, and Cara Seymour, as 
Christie, a sad-eyed, ill-fated prostitute who makes the wrong decision when 
coming back to Patrick's apartment for a second rendezvous. Sevigny 
especially nails her character, the only likable one in the film, and adds a 
much-needed complexity to her scenes that is absent from the rest of the 
picture.
The soundtrack, filled to the brim with nostalgic '80s song, such as Phil 
Collins' "Sussudio" and Huey Lewis and the News' "Hip to Be Square," aids in 
capturing an era that, aside from the costumes and hairstyles, fails to be 
brought to life. Other credit must go to Andrzej Sekula's appropriately 
sparse cinematography, with an emphasis on space and the color white to stand 
for the emptiness in Patrick's heart. And the central murder setpiece, 
arriving approximately an hour into the film, is spectacularly suspenseful, a 
bravura piece of filmmaking reminiscent of Stanley Kubrick's work in 1980's 
"The Shining." But what difference do these minor things make when the film 
at hand is an otherwise depressing, vacuous experience?
Thank goodness I read the book before seeing "American Psycho" because, while 
constantly being disappointed with the hack job director Harron and 
co-screenwriter Guinevere Turner have done with the source material, at least 
I could fill in the important blanks that the movie so mercifully leaves out. 
The novel notwithstanding, "American Psycho," the film, has nothing 
insightful to say about anything, not even the aforementioned subjects it 
attempts to satirize, while the dialogue comes off feeling stilted and 
annoying "written." By the time the twist ending kicks into gear in the final 
twenty minutes, most audience members will be left confused and feeling empty 
themselves, as what happens is nearly incomprehensible, with no attempt to 
bring reason or any answers to the proceedings. Although I don't want to do 
it, since film adaptations shouldn't fairly be compared to their written 
counterparts, it must be brought up once more. Having read the novel, it is 
impossible to watch "American Psycho" and not have your expectations 
tarnished, as the whole affair is an enormously large missed opportunity. 
Harron has taken nearly all that was great about Bret Easton Ellis' fine 
novel, stripped it of its dignity and profundity, and left it for the 
film-viewing world to behold as a sadly trivial, puerile, and, ultimately 
pointless, misfire.

Title
Review for Analyze This (1999)
Directed by Harold Ramis.
Cast: Billy Crystal, Robert De Niro, Joe Viterelli, Lisa Kudrow, Chazz 
Palminteri, Bill Macy, Leo Rossi, Kyle Sabihy, Rebecca Schull, Molly 
Shannon, Max Casella, Pat Cooper, Richard Castellano, Jimmie Ray Weeks, 
Elizabeth Bracco.
1999 - 106 minutes.
Rated R (for profanity, sexual situations, and violence).
Reviewed March 6, 1999.
Reading the cast and director for the new mobster comedy, "Analyze 
This," I asked myself, "how could this miss?" Robert De Niro ("Taxi 
Driver," "Raging Bull"), Billy Crystal ("City Slickers"), Lisa Kudrow 
("The Opposite of Sex"), and Director Harold Ramis ("National Lampoon's 
Vacation"). These are usually reliable filmmakers (well, okay, Crystal 
has been in a sizable slump lately), and tellingly, the first half-hour 
of "Analyze This" was very funny. Unfortunately, as the running time 
ticked away, I began to think that the first thirty minutes had, 
unbeknownst to me, been rewound and were being replayed another 
two-and-a-half times. The film has obtained a clever premise, but does 
not have any idea what to do with it as it progressively becomes more 
and more repetitive until I finally stopped enjoying or caring about 
what was happening on the screen.
Middle-aged psychoanalyst Ben Sobel's (Billy Crystal) life is finally 
going very well. Although he has never gotten along with his own 
uncaring parents, especially his father, who is also a psychiatrist, Ben 
has an easy-going teenage son (Kyle Sabihy) and is about to travel down 
to Miami to get married to his TV news reporter girlfriend, Laura (Lisa 
Kudrow). In little but a flash, however, Ben suddenly sees his plans 
ruined when he accidentally hits the car of the mob and subsequently 
gets paid a visit from famed mafia guy Paul Vitti (Robert De Niro), who 
desperately wants counseling, even though he himself won't even admit to 
having anxiety attacks. Ben tries to help Paul, mostly so he will get 
him off his back, but the plot gets more complicated when Paul follows 
Ben to his wedding, which ends with a man dropping eight stories to his 
death. It seems to Ben that no matter what he does, Paul Vitti will not
 go away, and the more they become involved, the more Ben's potentially 
happy life gets into danger.
"Analyze This" has a few laughs sprinkled throughout (mostly in the 
first half), but I always had the nagging thought that what director 
Ramis and writers Peter Tolan, Ramis, and Kenneth Lonergan had done was 
thought of one joke (Robert De Niro lightly spoofing his serious past 
mafia roles, while terrorizing and becoming buddies with comic Billy 
Crystal) and then tiresomely recycled it for the duration of the 
106-minute running time. Admittedly, De Niro is very funny here (and I 
can't remember the last time you could use that adjective to describe 
him), and Crystal is in top-form, but the whole movie is weighed down 
directly on their shoulders with nothing else to support them, including 
a substantial plotline.
Since "Analyze This" bills not one, not two, but three writers, you'd 
think that they would have been able to work together to fix the 
noticably large flaws, but they must have all been on auto-pilot. One of 
the most disappointing and wasted opportunities in the film is the way 
the movie deals with the supporting characters, all of which have next 
to nothing to do and aren't even given multi-dimensional characters to 
attempt to develop. Coming off of her Oscar-caliber work in two of last 
year's best films, "Clockwatchers" and "The Opposite of Sex," Lisa 
Kudrow's throwaway "girlfriend" role is an incredible step down. Sure, 
Kudrow's fellow "Friend" Jennifer Aniston did the same thing two weeks 
ago in "Office Space," but at least we got to spend a little time with 
Aniston. Kudrow, meanwhile, mostly just stands around, no doubt 
wondering why she agreed to appear in this film in the first place. 
Chazz Palminteri, as rival gangster Primo, fares even worse, in a role 
that plays more like an afterthought than an actual character. Finally, 
Molly Shannon (rising film star and cast member on "Saturday Night 
Live") has a rousingly hilarious one-scene cameo right at the beginning 
as one of Crystal's patients and then completely disappears. Too bad, 
considering that the supporting actors surely have proven that they have 
the abilities to support De Niro and Crystal.
Once "Analyze This" approached its second wedding scene leaving Kudrow's 
Laura standing alone at the altar once again, I had become thoroughly 
annoyed by where the story had gone, and had mostly lost respect for the 
character we were supposed to sympathize with the most, Ben. Afterwards, 
the climactic scene with Ben posing as a fellow mob boss in place of the 
depressed Paul, became a real laugh-free dead-zone, losing its last 
remaining comic punches. "Analyze This" proves that talent can certainly 
help any film out, but when the written material isn't up to their 
level, what we are virtually left with is a vacuum of thin air.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman 
Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Star Maps (1997)
Directed by Miguel Arteta.
Cast: Douglas Spain, Efrain Figueroa, Lysa Flores, Kandeyce Jorden, 
Martha Velez, Annette Murphy, Robin Thomas, Vincent Chandler, Al 
Vicente.
1997 - 90 minutes.
Rated R (for violence, profanity, nudity, and sex).
Reviewed November 8, 1998.
"Star Maps," an independent film that premiered at the Sundance Film 
Festival in 1997, is a decidedly weak drama that simply isn't tightly 
enough written or plotted to be satisfying, despite some notable 
performances.
Carlos (Douglas Spain), a young man in his late teens, returns to his 
Latino family's home in Hollywood and immediately is hired by his 
troublesome father, Pepe (Efrain Figueroa), to sell star maps, which 
point the way to the homes of celebrities, even though it actually is 
secretly a prostitution job. Carlos goes along with it, despite the 
warning of his caring older sister, Maria (Lysa Flores), and ill mother 
(Matha Velez), because what he really wants to do is become an actor, 
which his father assures him his job will eventually lead to. When one 
of Carlos' customers, Jennifer (Kandeyce Jorden), an actress on a soap 
opera, tells him she will get him a gig on her show, Carlos begins to 
think everything is turning up for him, but his father has different 
plans for him.
"Star Maps" is a technically well-made film, but one that is overstuffed 
with subplots, and not particularly successful when dealing with its 
characters. Aside from the central story, we've also got subplots 
involving Pepe and his own girlfriend (Annette Murphy); Maria's 
relationship with a kind-hearted pharmacist (Vincent Chandler); Carlos' 
mother, who is suffering from a nervous breakdown; and a lot of 
goings-ons involving the soap opera. Director Miguel Arteta might very 
well be a fine director, but in his film debut, he seems to have taken 
all of his ideas and mixed them up together into a 90-minute film. 
Because of this, there is not nearly enough time with any of the 
stories, and it eventually comes off feeling empty.
Flores, as Carlos' sister, gives a strong and poignant performance as a 
young woman who longs for a relationship but does not want to leave her 
ailing mother. And Jorden is also fetching as the actress who may be 
Carlos' answer to fame. I believe it is Jorden's acting abilities, not 
the screenplay, that makes her character feel wholly three-dimensional. 
Murphy is also memorable as Carlos' father's girlfriend, who is 
unknowing of how much of a liar Pepe actually is. All of the 
performances are quite good, but all of their individual stories would 
have fared better if each one had been made into a separate film, since 
they are all interesting people.
If there is one plotline that doesn't work, it is, unfortunately, the 
central one. Although the premise of people selling star maps, and 
themselves as prostitutes, is captivating enough, not enough is done 
with it, and so it feels like a missed opportunity, and just a gimmick 
to hang all of the other stories on it.
There is a lot that's good in, "Star Maps," and yet, it is clear after 
seeing it that it desperately needed another rewrite. Ultimately, the 
film plays like a rough draft in search of a final one.
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Bachelor, The (1999)
Directed by Gary Sinyor.
Cast: Chris O'Donnell, Renee Zellweger, Artie Lange, Marley Shelton, Hal 
Holbrook, Peter Ustinov, Edward Asner, James Cromwell, Brooke Shields, 
Jennifer Esposito, Stacey Edwards, Mariah Carey.
1999 - 101 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for mild profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, November 6, 1999.
If "The Bachelor" didn't have a cast full of recognizable stars, I'd almost 
believe it if someone told me it was filmed on a different planet, using 
human-looking aliens to portray the characters. A childish romantic comedy 
that is aimed at teenagers and adults, it is difficult to believe anyone 
would like the film, for it is so shoddily executed and implausibly written 
that it inevitably leaves a bitter taste in your mouth. And here's some 
advice for Chris O'Donnell: when you disappear from the movies for over two 
years (not since the Golden Raspberry Award Winner "Batman and Robin," and 
not counting your brief role in last spring's "Cookie's Fortune"), you should 
probably choose a film that is actually good, so you can easily regain your 
stature. The fact that you also produced this rubbish leads me to seriously 
question your reliability.
Just the premise itself is thoroughly distasteful: Jimmie Shannon (Chris 
O'Donnell), a 29-year-old yahoo who is terrified of commitment, finds himself 
searching desperately for someone to marry him before his 30th birthday after 
his grandfather dies and leaves him $100-million in his will if he will carry 
out this wish, and stay married for 10 years. Complications ensue because his 
birthday is one day away, and his longtime girlfriend of three years, Anne 
(Renee Zellweger), has just broken up with him after a disastrous proposal. 
Gathering up all of his girlfriends from the past, Jimmie actually hunts them 
down and proposes to each and every one of them, forgetting about Anne and 
concerned only with getting money. Of course, he's going to realize that Anne 
is the only one for him, and that he's been a jerk, but just from watching 
the film, I believe Jimmie will always be a jackass and deserves to be alone 
for the rest of his good-for-nothing life. That's just my opinion, though.
"The Bachelor" resembles a direct-to-video movie at almost every ill-advised 
turn because of its overall air of moronic silliness. Comparing the journey 
from bachelorhood to marriage, to a group of wild racing horses may be an 
inventive analogy, but in the context of this film, it falls to the ground 
with a big, loud "SPLAT!" Its romantic capabilities are also all there, 
because Chris O'Donnell and Renee Zellweger are charming performers, but 
O'Donnell's character is too despicable to root for, and his relationship 
with Zellweger too slapshot to be believable.
The screenplay by Steve Cohen is almost haphazardly bad, with its vacuous 
characters and repellent plot, but does manage a few fleeting glimpses of 
inspired humor. The scene in which Jimmie proposes to Anne at the Starlight 
Room is very funny, with Jimmie's reasoning for marriage being, "sh** or get 
off the pot." A handful of cameos (Mariah Carey, Jennifer Esposito, Stacey 
Edwards) as potential brides are littered throughout, but they come off as 
more of a missed opportunity than anything. That is, except for the vignette 
involving Brooke Shields, who gives the most finely tuned comedic performance 
in the whole film, as the money-grubbing, chain-smoking Buckley. In her quick 
5-minute part, Shields sparks the film out of its comatose state, and for 
that, I am thankful.
Littering the rest of the curious cast are a group of veteran actors (Edward 
Asner, Hal Holbrook, James Cromwell, Peter Ustinov) who are there for little 
more than window dressing, and never develop their similar roles into diverse 
characters; Artie Lange (1998's "Dirty Work"), as Jimmie's best friend; and 
Marley Shelton (1998's "Pleasantville"), as Anne's younger sister, who gives 
the only likable supporting performance. Most of Zellweger's scenes are 
actually with Shelton, and they have a sort of chemistry that is lacking 
between Zellweger and O'Donnell. 
The film reaches its climactic pinnacle when Jimmie finds himself being 
chased through San Francisco by a mob of potential brides after a story on 
him runs on the front page of the newspaper with the heading, "Would You 
Marry This Man For $100-Million?" Lifted directly from its inspiration, the 
1925 Buster Keaton screwball comedy, "Seven Chances," this scene is a visual 
treat, but when you start to put reasoning behind it, it becomes more 
apparent how very stupid it really is. 
At the last minute, Jimmie and Anne rekindle their flame, but one must ask 
why Anne would even remotely want to marry him. Renee Zellweger, so 
delightful in 1995's "Empire Records," 1996's "Jerry Maguire," and 1998's 
"One True Thing," tries out a noticeably more lighthearted film here, rather 
than all of the heavy movies she has made of late, but her Anne never is able 
to break out of just being "The Girl." Besides, Anne's IQ drops in the final 
fifteen minutes, as she races to find Jimmie and marry him. Why would she 
want to do such a thing? Jimmie proves throughout that he is a commitment-shy 
lunkhead, and the fact that he would even try to forget about Anne and marry 
someone else for the money just reveals how truly shallow a person he is. The 
fact of the matter is, Jimmie is a character with next to no redeeming 
qualities, and he and Anne finally getting married at the end signifies to me 
a depressing conclusion, rather than a happy one. Using some common sense, it 
is clear Jimmie is neither mature nor reliable enough for marriage, and Anne 
is headed for a miserable ten years, followed by a swift divorce.

Title
Review for Iron Giant, The (1999)
Directed by Brad Bird.
Voices: Eli Marienthal, Vin Diesel, Jennifer Aniston, Harry Connick Jr., 
Christopher McDonald, John Mahoney, Cloris Leachman, M. Emmett Walsh.
1999 - 85 minutes.
Rated PG (for brief, mild profanity and mature themes).
Reviewed August 1, 1999.
The praise Warner Brothers' new animated film, "The Iron Giant," has been 
getting is phenomenally positive, with a few critics who have gone as far as 
to call it a classic, the best animated film in a long time, and WB's first 
successful venture into the world of animation (after dismal results with 
"The Quest for Camelot" and "The King and I"). Thus, going into the movie 
theater was a hopeful, relatively assured experience; I was ready to like, 
and embrace, the film, just as long as it was as special as everyone has been 
saying. It isn't, and actually surprised me in how lacking the whole film was 
in almost every respect, despite its more mature themes than the usual 
animated flick. For me, at least, WB's losing streak continues, even if it is 
worlds above the dreadful "The King and I."
Based on the 1968 novel by Ted Hughes, "The Iron Giant" begins as a giant 
robot from outer space crashes into the ocean during a hurricane, but is able 
to reach land unscathed. Rumors begin to circulate around the tiny New 
England town of Rockwell, Maine, circa 1959, about a huge creature that a 
sailor allegedly glimpsed while out on the waters. Hiding within the tall 
forest directly above the town, the robot, named the Iron Giant, is equipped 
with weapons all over his body, basically programmed as a destroying machine, 
but due to a dent in his head caused from falling to Earth, he doesn't 
remember this. When 10-year-old Hogarth Hughes (voiced by Eli Marienthal) is 
home alone one night watching a scary movie (his mother, voiced by Jennifer 
Aniston, sometimes has to work late at the local diner), the television 
abruptly goes to static and, investigating, Hogarth discovers that their 
antenna has been eaten, and a large path has been made into the woods behind 
his house. Following it, he meets the Iron Giant, whom he is frightened of at 
first until he realizes he is a kind robot that just needs a little 
discipline. This unlikely pair soon become close buddies, but Hogarth fears 
their friendship will be threatened if anyone else finds out about him, 
especially when oily government agent Kent Mansley (voiced by Christopher 
McDonald) sets out to find the unidentified being from another planet.
While it can be appreciated that "The Iron Giant," directed by Brad Bird, 
features several adult themes that you do not usually find in animated films 
(including serious talks about death, faith in God, and the nuclear 
holocaust), and we are thankfully spared singing characters and cute (read: 
annoying) animal sidekicks, the film is disappointing and flawed for many 
reasons. For one, the movie feels overlong while you are watching it, even at 
a scant 85 minutes, but in retrospect, virtually nothing occurs outside of 
the major storyline between the robot and the young boy. Unfortunately, on 
this level alone, even amidst its tranquil nature and innocence, the film is 
almost shameful in its extreme similarities with the 1982 classic, "E.T." 
Replace a small alien with a giant robot, tranport the time period back some 
22 years, and turn the three-dimensional, well-developed human actors into 
one-dimensional, thinly-written animated characters, (mix well) and you've 
practically got the same movie.
The character of Hogarth's mother is an example of a wasted, thoroughly 
undealt-with creation. Working as a waitress and obviously struggling to 
raise her son on her own, a possible subplot is briefly brought up in which 
you expect to learn more about her and her personal problems, but apparently 
director Bird felt that anything revolving outside of the cliched robot 
storyline would make children squirm. I beg to differ, however, since Bird is 
ambitious enough to discuss several heavy topics, and send out worthy 
anti-gun and anti-violence messages, and the children in the audience didn't 
make a peep. Aside from the robot himself, the film is refreshingly 
realistic, and because of this, children will be more likely to relate to the 
characters and situations, while adults will appreciate the distinct period 
flavor, including how, during the Cold War, school children were instructed 
to climb underneath their desks in case a nuclear bomb was to hit. If the 
film had gone a little bit further in portraying this particular era, 
including using, perhaps, an array of popular '50s tunes to underscore the 
goings-on, it might have been more enjoyable on this level.
"The Iron Giant" is not a complete washout (it's a little too aspiring for 
that), but remains a missed opportunity. The film strains to follows the 
cookie-cutter basics of the plot, in which "boy-meets-robot, 
boy-befriends-robot, 
boy-must-bid-farewell-to-robot-when-his-safety-is-threatened," and not once 
strays from this well-worn path. The entrance of agent Kent Mansley is 
irritating and a throwaway stock villain character, while the other 
supporting animated figures play as more of an afterthought. Finally, young, 
precocious Hogarth must briefly say goodbye to his beloved friend in the 
supposed-to-be-heart-tugging climax, but all I could really think about at 
that moment was, "I've seen this all before, and to much more powerful 
effect." Animated feature or not, "The Iron Giant" attempts to stray from the 
beaten path of Disney, but really, who is Warner Brothers kidding? I'll take 
Disney's superior animated entertainment, "Tarzan," over this any day of the 
week.
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Mod Squad, The (1999)
Directed by Scott Silver.
Cast: Claire Danes, Giovanni Ribisi, Omar Epps, Josh Brolin, Dennis 
Farina, Michael Lerner, Steve Harris, Mariah O'Brien.
1999 - 94 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, partial nudity, and sexual 
situations).
Reviewed March 27, 1999.
One of the problems with "The Mod Squad," otherwise known as a cool, or 
"hip" group of people, is that the three main characters never earn that 
sleek, exclusive title. Oh, sure, they make think they're cool, but 
there is never any evidence that they actually are, and when one minor 
character asks them at the end, "what do you all think you are? Some 
sort of mod squad or something?," it felt contrived and phony, a 
desperate attempt to make some sort of revelance come from the name.
Based on the cult Aaron Spelling crime-drama series that ran from 
1968-1973, the show and film's premise is simple enough: three troubled 
youths, recovered drug addict Julie Barnes (Claire Danes), ex-arsonist 
Linc (Omar Epps), and goofy robber Pete Cochran (Giovanni Ribisi), agree 
to help out the San Francisco police and become undercover cops (minus 
any sort of weapons) in place of serving time in jail. You'd think the 
work would be a sort of community service but I guess not, since the 
three young adults are obviously paid enough to own their own 
apartments. Anyway, getting back to the story at hand, the three are 
assigned by their superior, Capt. Adam Greer (Dennis Farina), to scope 
out a night club that may or may not be involved in a prostitution ring. 
Soon, Greer has been murdered, and thinking that they may be blamed for 
the crime, Julie, Linc, and Pete set out to find the real culprits.
"The Mod Squad" is such a terminally thin, virtually motionless action 
film that it is only luck it contains many things surrounding the 
convoluted plotline that actually are worthwhile. Claire Danes, a 
wonderful actress who began her acting career with the best television 
drama of the '90s, "My So-Called Life," which met a premature burial but 
can still be found on MTV and home video, has appeared in several 
feature films since then, but none have been able to rise to her 
ability. Although beautiful and obtaining a hard-edged amiableness in 
many of her roles, judging from her latest picture, she should try and 
choose her projects better. Giovanni Ribisi, also a talented actor (just 
watch 1998's indie "First Love, Last Rites," and the recent "The Other 
Sister" if you don't believe me), I'm afraid is beginning to get 
typecast as the "silly" character used for comic relief. Here, that is 
exactly what Ribisi does, and it is the way he is instructed to act that 
began to grate on my nerves in the first half, although he was able to 
flesh out his character a little bit towards the end. Finally, Omar 
Epps, so very good in 1995's "Higher Learning," really doesn't have that 
much substantial material to work with, but still gives a respectable 
turn. Together, the three work fetchingly as a team, and this is the 
film's one saving grace, even if it still, unfortunately, isn't able to 
buoy the proceedings so that the film can be necessarily recommended. 
Some sort of pseudo-relationship arises near the end between Danes and 
Ribisi, but the movie never follows through with it, leaving the whole 
subplot to be a rather pointless waste of time. Aside from these three 
actors, the other characters mostly show up, read some lines, leave, and 
cash a paycheck. Michael Lerner should especially be embarrassed since 
he is given a ridiculous scene in which he forces Epps to dance with 
him. Huh? Where did that come from?
Even if "The Mod Squad" never proves to be what I would call stylish or 
cool, the funky music score, by BC Smith, definately is. Mixing '90s 
music with a groovy '70s-style score that often sounds suited for a 
blaxploitation movie, was a far more original and effective technical 
choice than anything else in the movie. One particular scene that jumped 
startlingly to life thanks solely to the music was a protracted 
comic-action sequence set at a carwash.
Meanwhile, the suspension of disbelief is tried many times throughout, 
with the apartment and Lerner-Epps dance sequence examples already 
given, as well as in the action finale in which Danes and Ribisi jump 
out of a car going at least 55mph onto the hard pavement, only to have 
Danes jump up and begin run as if nothing had just happened. Nevermind 
the fact that we had just gotten finished seeing her stunt double smash 
onto the road like a pancake. Also, one of the on-going jokes during the 
climax is the references to the "Lethal Weapon" series. "I feel like I 
should say we're getting too old for this s***," Pete says. "At least we 
aren't going to end up in some old, abandoned warehouse," Julie chimes 
in. And guess what? That is the exact place that they end up at! At once 
passingly clever, this sort of humor really doesn't work well in films, 
since it is both predictable and obviously a strain for original ideas.
During the running time of "The Mod Squad," I saw three promising young 
actors with a surprising amount of chemistry together, but nonetheless 
wasting their times; some entertaining music that fit the picture well; 
a few honest character scenes that made me yearn for more time to learn 
about the people; and a story that is as old as the hills, with all of 
the so-called "twists" being telegraphed far in advance, particularly in 
dealing with Julie's old boyfriend (Josh Brolin) who miraculously comes 
back into her life. For all of its virtues, "The Mod Squad" does not do 
justice to its "Mod" title. Basically, it really is just a cliched 
"Lethal Weapon"-ish action movie masquerading as something more.

Title
Review for Men Cry Bullets (1997)
Directed by Tamara Hernandez.
Cast: Steven Nelson, Honey Lauren, Jeri Ryan, Harry Ralston, Michael 
Mangiamele, Bob Sherer, Sabrina Bertaccini, Trish Elliot, Hugh Bogan, Fred 
Kenyon, Edith Shatz.
1999 - 106 minutes (Opens in 8/99).
Not Rated (equivalent of an R for violence, profanity, gore, nudity, and 
sexual situations).
Reviewed July 12, 1999.
Independent director Tamara Hernandez's feature film debut, "Men Cry 
Bullets," is a quite provocative piece of work for one reason: in telling the 
story of a physically and emotionally abusive, love-hate relationship, it 
turns the cliche on its head by making a gender-swith and having the female 
as the dominant, forceful one, and the male as the passive, sensitive one. 
"By reversing the genders in the film and showing the victim as a weak man 
and the abuser as a violent woman," speaks Hernandez, "I tried to express to 
men what it feels like to be a vulnerable girl, and to shed fresh light on 
the seductively insidious nature of abusive recognizable brutes." This 
potential gimmick ultimately works well in the finished product of 
Hernandez's film, and is ably equipped to encompass such a thing in order to 
create a believable story that, as in many abusive relationships, is headed 
for tragedy. 
The film begins on the night of the innocuous, young Billy's (Steven Nelson) 
first performance in a club, posing as a drag queen. Dressed as his late 
mother (in flashbacks to his childhood, we see the abuse she took from his 
unstable father), Billy goes onstage and starts to hit it off until he is 
humiliated by the precarious, loudmouthed 33-year-old writer, Gloria Hunter 
(Honey Lauren), who assaults him when her boyfriend gets up on the stage to 
dance with him. Somehow drawn to Gloria, even after experiencing her juvenile 
ways, Billy goes to see her at her home, where she still lives with her 
parents and has a pig that she calls her child. Gloria half apologizes to 
him, she gets him to fix her breakfast, and then while out in the shed, she 
rapes him. Horrified and upset, Billy nonetheless begins an infatuation with 
her, and for brief, isolated moments, they appear to be a happy couple. 
Things grow more complicated with the appearance of Gloria's debutante 
cousin, Lydia (Jeri Ryan), a beautiful blonde who gradually forms the final 
part of a love triangle destined for failure and affliction.
"Men Cry Bullets" is an involving dark comedy-drama that, occasionally, is at 
least a little too offbeat and odd by a half, particularly in the final 
half-hour, which includes a drunken, fantasy-like three-way sex scene, a 
potential poisioning, and murder. The ending is especially unsatisfying, 
bringing the conflict to a close but, at the exact same time, creating new, 
more complicated problems that are never explored before the end credits 
roll. 
For the first 70 minutes, however, the film works wonderfully, particularly 
due to Honey Lauren's dazzling performance. As the venemous, wicked Gloria, 
she adds unexpected dimension to the "villain" role by making her an 
alternately spiteful and likable woman. At times, when Gloria is not 
exploding into fits of rage, we are able to half understand her position. 
After all, she is edging into her mid-30s, still lives at home, does not have 
anyone to love except her pig, and is seeing a psychiatrist. It is also 
apparent that she respects her parents but, simply put, she is nothing but a 
child inside, albeit a dangeous one.
Steven Nelson has the right looks to be believable as Billy, an innocent man 
who also is often childish and haunted by his past, but unlike Gloria, keeps 
his feelings bottled up inside rather than taking them out on others. The 
problem with Nelson is that, in comparison to Lauren, he does not captivate 
the viewer as he should, nor did he really make me care for him. Oddly 
enough, I did care about the fate of Gloria, most likely because she was a 
more easily identifiable and multi-layered character.
Rounding out the three principles is Jeri Ryan (of TV's "Star Trek: Voyager") 
as the southern belle, Lydia. Ryan is often very funny, and runs with her 
flightly, unconciously egotistic lines of dialogue. The key to Lydia not 
turning into a stuck-up, dispicable character is that she really does care 
for her cousin, Gloria, and even admires her for her forthrightness. When 
Billy and Lydia become friends, and he starts to understand that he needs to 
say goodbye to his relationship with Gloria, Lydia makes a kind-hearted offer 
for him to come back with her when she returns to her southern home. Ryan is 
the most well-centered character of the three, and therefore, somewhat helps 
to keep the film from flying completely off the deep end in the over-the-top 
penultimate sequences.
"Men Cry Bullets" is a flawed motion picture, and yet it works despite its 
many problems. Digging underneath the surface, the film is basically about 
two unhappy people (Billy and Gloria) who have their own sets of serious 
problems and are both lonely individuals, but whose wildly diverse 
personalities do not mix, no matter how hard they try. Writer-director 
Hernandez is a promising talent who sometimes needlessly gets a little arty 
(such as pointlessly intermixing color and black-and-white photography), and 
who loses track of her realistic focus in the latter half, but never 
condescends to the characters or the audience. "Men With Bullets" is a tough, 
if uneven film, perfectly admirable for a first film from a new director, but 
something tells me Hernandez has stronger, more balanced stories to tell in 
the future, and those will be greatly anticipated by myself.
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Whipped (1999)
Directed by Peter M. Cohen.
Cast: Amanda Peet, Brian Van Holt, Jonathan Abrahams, Zorie Barber, Judah 
Domke.
2000 - 85 minutes
Rated R (for profanity and sexuality).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, September 2, 2000.
A misogynistic and angry movie passing itself off as a raucous comedy, 
"Whipped," directed by Peter M. Cohen, features almost nothing worthy of 
recommending it. The five central characters are unlikable and despicable 
players who get off on using others for nothing more than sex, and whose 
whole lives revolve around this one fact. None of them are ever attempted to 
be developed as fully thought-out people, nor do they have any interests 
outside of what is strictly required by the, albeit slim, storyline. You 
wouldn't think that a writer or director would have the courage to film a 
romance with nary an ounce of heart or soul, but Cohen has done just 
that--and fails miserably at every turn.
The film centers on four Manhattan-based best friends in their 20's who 
apparently do not like each other at all, and meet every Sunday at a local 
diner to discuss their sexual conquests from that week's past. Brad (Brian 
Van Holt) is a hot-shot dimwit who believes he is God's gift to women; Zeke 
(Zorie Barber) is an arty club-goer who spends his time reading and having 
threesomes; Jonathan (Jonathan Abrahams) is less experienced with women, but 
more experienced than his friends when it comes to lube; and the tic-infested 
Eric (Judah Comke) used to be like his other three friends, but is now 
unhappily married. 
Everything changes for each of the bachelors one week when they all meet a 
wonderful young woman whom they surprisingly start to like. What they don't 
expect is that they have all met the same woman--the strikingly beautiful and 
articulate Mia (Amanda Peet). Each of them care enough for her and their 
potential relationships that they mutually agree with Mia when she suggests 
that she be allowed to continue seeing all three of them at the same time, 
since she likes them all equally. What they fail to recognize is that Mia, an 
obvious player herself, has an ulterior motive for dating them all.
While there is nothing wrong, in essence, with making a film about a group of 
womanizers (and in this case, also a manizer), writer-director Cohen almost 
immediately derails the whole undertaking when it becomes clear that he has 
absolutely no insight to give, whether it be about the characters or the 
general plot, nor has he written one person who is the least bit intelligent 
or warm-hearted. It is difficult--okay, nearly impossible--to get involved in 
a movie if there is no one to identify with or care about. The superficial 
beings that populate "Whipped" apparently originated on another planet, as 
there are few signs of human emotions ever presented.
As for its comedic aspect, the amount of laughs that result from viewing this 
thankfully brief 85-minute trifle could probably be counted on one hand, and 
the majority of those come from something occurring that is so wacky and 
off-the-radar that you can't help but chuckle at their sheer stupidity.
As the four jackasses, Brian Van Holt, Jonathan Abrahams, Zorie Barber, and 
Judah Comke are adequate at best, although considering the one-note pricks 
that they were asked to play, 'adequate' is about as good as these actors 
could ever hope for. Who is absolutely bewitching, however, is the bright 
Amanda Peet (the scene-stealer in 2000's otherwise glum "The Whole Nine 
Yards"). Peet's Mia isn't really much more likable than the guys featured in 
the movie, particularly once her own dastardly plans are revealed, but she 
takes her thinly veiled character and runs with it. Once Peet moves away, 
once and for all, from such wastes of time as "Whipped," she has the charisma 
and ability to be a major star and a talented actress.
Peter M. Cohen should be thanking Amanda Peet this instant for being the sole 
reason "Whipped" is receiving a generous one-and-a-half star rating from me, 
because it certainly has nothing else of worthwhile quality. Having seen the 
movie, I wonder what Cohen was hoping to achieve with such a cold, lifeless 
directing debut. Has he been burned so many times by both men and women that 
he simply hates the human race, in general? Or does he merely delight in 
portraying people of no substance and little feeling, doing things that are 
cruel and hurtful to others, all at the expense of a cheap laugh? On second 
thought, "Whipped" is the perfect title for this movie, because everyone who 
is suckered into a theater showing this rubbish will feel just that--whipped.

Title
Review for Eaten Alive (1976)
Directed by Tobe Hooper.
Cast: Neville Brand, Mel Ferrer, Carolyn Jones, Marilyn Burns, William 
Finley, Kyle Richards, Robert Englund, Stuart Whitman.
1976 - 96 minutes.
Rated R (for violence, profanity, nudity, sexual situations, and gore).
Reviewed October 11, 1998.
By Dustin Putman 
Dustin Putman's Film Reviews ">Http://members.aol.com/filmfan16/index.html>
In 1974, director Tobe Hooper made what some consider one of the best 
modern horror films ever made, "The Texas Chain Saw Massacre," which was 
about a group of teens vacationing in the country who one-by-one find a 
farmhouse in the middle of nowhere, and are systematically slaughtered 
by a family of cannibals. To be sure, it was a superbly-made, terrifying 
horror film.
Hooper's sophomore effort, "Eaten Alive," which had a bigger budget but 
is lesser-known, repeats this same basic formula. If you replace the 
farmhouse with a hotel, you've got a pretty good idea exactly what it is 
about, as a homicidal maniac slaughters his guests with a scythe and 
then throws them into the swamp behind his house, which contains a 
crocodile from Africa.
By reading the premise, "Eaten Alive" may sound a little goofy, and in a 
way, it is, but it is also stylishly filmed, and the production design 
is quite impressive, as it creates a creepy atmosphere for the hotel 
which obviously is a soundstage. One thing that sets it apart from being 
a "regular" slasher film is that Hooper certainly did try to make a good 
movie, but that also leads to the problem with the film, which is that 
Hooper also hoped lightning would strike twice with filming what could 
be seen as a basic remake of his early masterpiece, and it simply isn't 
at that level.
"Eaten Alive" isn't nearly as effective as "The Texas Chain Saw 
Massacre" because it is missing that film's feeling of terror. This 
movie is more stylized, but it has lost its grit and realism. The plot 
also is much more far-fetched, since the audience must believe that a 
hotel in the middle of the woods in a rural area would constantly be 
getting customers throughout the night, including a family with a dog in 
tow (don't even ask what happens to that poor pooch). 
The other problem with "Eaten Alive" is that the villain (Neville Brand) 
is never developed, and so we never know who he is or why he has gone 
off the deep end. He has no motive except that he is crazy and likes to 
feed his crocodile. The victims are also quite stupid, and do all of the 
wrong things while being chased by the killer. And that crocodile, by 
the way, is very phony looking.
"Eaten Alive" isn't a bad horror movie, by any means. It is actually a 
servicable one, much better than most. Another added bonus is seeing an 
early Robert Englund (Freddy, from "A Nightmare on Elm Street"), as a 
horny young customer, and Kyle Richards (Lindsay from the original 
"Halloween") as a little girl vacationing with her family who stop at 
the ill-fated inn. But it is at the story level of "Eaten Alive" that 
the movie gets bogged down the most, and even though it was made 22 
years ago, it was definately not a step up for Hooper after making such 
a big splash with "The Texas Chain Saw Massacre."

Title
Review for American Pie (1999)
Directed by Paul Weitz.
Cast: Jason Biggs, Chris Klein, Thomas Ian Nicholas, Eddie Kaye Thomas, Mena 
Suvari, Tara Reid, Alyson Hannigan, Natasha Lyonne, Shannon Elizabeth, Seann 
W. Scott, Eugene Levy, Jennifer Coolidge, Chris Owen, Lawrence Pressman, 
Molly Cheek.
1999 - 95 minutes
Rated R (for raunchy humor, profanity, nudity, and sexual situations).
Reviewed July 11, 1999.
Like last year's sleeper hit, "There's Something About Mary," or "South Park: 
Bigger, Longer & Uncut," first-time director Paul Weitz's "American Pie" is 
an outrageous comedy that gets its kick out of being as raunchy and shocking 
as ever, in the confines of an R-rating. It's unfortunate, however, that 
"South Park" was just released because no movie, I think, could measure up to 
the tastelessness that that film had. Still, amidst all of the buzz on 
"American Pie" concerning its envelope-pushing humor, in essence what we 
really have here is a surprisingly sweet sex comedy that, unlike many recent 
"teen"-oriented pictures, is frightening in its realism of teen life. There 
are no blatant cliques to be found in the film's Michigan high school of East 
Great Falls, at least not of the popular type, no overly snotty teens that 
are as one-dimensional as a drawing on a piece of paper. No, instead what we 
have are just anonymous high school students dealing day-to-day with their 
raging hormones and budding relationships. Sure, there are the jocks (who, 
interestingly, play lacrosse rather than football); the singers in the glee 
club; the band, just as in a real high school, but their personalities are 
rarely ever exaggerated to fit a certain mold. That is exactly the element of 
"American Pie" that was most appreciated, but don't get me wrong. It's a 
laugh-riot, too.
The premise is very simple: Four friends about to graduate from high school 
in a few weeks make a pact to lose their virginity by prom night, 
particularly when it appears that Sherman (Chris Owen), one of the nerdiest 
people in school, had sex at a party. The film's main character of the four 
is Jim (Jason Biggs), a likable, horny lug who nonetheless fails miserably 
with practically every person of the opposite sex he runs into, and is 
constantly being caught by his parents pleasuring himself. He first sets his 
sights on the beautiful foreign exchange student, Nadia (Shannon Elizabeth), 
but plans go awry when he has an embarrassing encounter with her that is 
accidentally transmitted via internet to the whole town. Desperate for a date 
to prom, he settles on the band geek, Michelle (Alyson Hannigan), whose every 
sentence that comes out of her mouth starts with, "and this one time, at band 
camp..." 
Oz (Chris Klein) is the "jock" of the four friends. He plays lacrosse, and 
whenever with a woman, feels like he has to throw a bunch of corny lines her 
way. Hoping to meet someone, he joins the chorus and finds that he actually 
begins to like it, and like the sweet, innocent Heather (Mena Suvari), as 
well. Something Oz doesn't anticipate in their relationship, though, is that 
he would really begin to care for her, and grow a more honest heart, which he 
also starts to do.
Kevin (Thomas Ian Nicholas) is the only one in the group with a steady 
girlfriend, Vicky (Tara Reid). As he tells it, they've only gotten to third 
base, but are beginning to have serious thoughts about going all the way. But 
first, Vicky wants to hear him say, "I love you," three words that Kevin 
personally feels should not be thrown around lightly.
And, finally, Finch (Eddie Kaye Thomas) is a clean freak who runs home from 
school each day just to go to the bathroom ("Have you seen the facilities 
they have here?!"). All of the girls at the school begin swarming around him 
mysteriously, thanks to some rumors that the wordly Jessica (Natasha Lyonne), 
the advice-giving non-virgin of the group, is paid to spread around to help 
Finch out.
In the pantheon of teen comedies, "American Pie" doesn't come close to 
measuring up with the '80s John Hughes flicks, like "Sixteen Candles" (still 
my favorite), "The Breakfast Club," or "Ferris Buellers Day Off," nor is it 
quite as satisfying overall as the recent "10 Things I Hate About You," but 
this film is actually different than those. Focusing more on the 'sex' 
aspect, rather than the romance one (even though there is a bit of that too), 
"American Pie" is more reminiscent of the various '80s raunch-fests, like 
"Porky's" or "The Last American Virgin." The one vital difference, however, 
is that this latest picture is unusually intelligent and cleverly written for 
the disreputable genre, and has a lot of heart, even as someone is portrayed 
as unknowingly drinking a beer someone has just sexually released themselves 
in.
As Jim, Jason Biggs is a real find, an everybody guy that many people his age 
will most likely be able to relate to, including the desperation of a boy of 
17 or 18, and the humility he gets when his caring father (a very funny 
Eugene Levy) is constantly finding him in the most uncompromising positions 
(including, yep, in the infamous "pie scene"). 
Also, those actors that should be additionally noted (this movie is going to 
make many of them stars, I suspect) are Chris Klein, who is absolutely 
charming here, just as he was in last spring's brilliant high school satire, 
"Election." Klein's impending romance with Heather, played memorably by Mena 
Suvari, is the film's direct emotional center, and one of the most important 
things to attribute to the pic's success. Natasha Lyonne ("The Slums of 
Beverly Hills") is underused, but clearly one of the most talented in the 
cast, and every scene she is in shines. 
But the one person who stands out from among the crowd, who creates the 
unforgettable character I will easily remember for years to come, is Alyson 
Hannigan (TV's "Buffy the Vampire Slayer"), as the annoying flutist who never 
stops talking about her experiences at band camp. Hannigan is a comic 
delight, a marvel to behold who should gain a lot of further film work thanks 
to this thought-to-be dim character who is hiding a secret of her own.
If only "American Pie" had been about a half-hour longer, the film's rating 
may have skyrocketed up to an even higher plateau, which is rare for a 
small-budgeted teen comedy. With so many characters, many of them are not 
developed to their full potential, but there is no doubting that they are all 
fine up-and-coming talents. But still, for the debut directing/writing team 
of Paul Weitz and Adam Herz, and for the umpteenth film just this year alone 
that climaxes at the high school prom (if you are thinking right now what I'm 
thinking about that last phrase, you're very naughty), "American Pie" manages 
to come off as, dare I say it, somewhat fresh. Forget those safe, little 
PG-13 teen movies. As Hannigan said in an interview, a teenager's life is 
NC-17 rated, and far from PG-13. Credit Weitz and Herz for realizing this, 
and for Universal Pictures not backing down on the R-rating, as the film 
never once talks down to its target audience, but listens to its characters 
and portrays them in an oh-so-real light. 
Oh, I almost forgot! A particular line of dialogue towards the end comes 
straight out of left field and is so utterly shocking, especially for the 
"innocent" character, that I suspect it will be quoted by the teen generation 
for many, many years, and is worth the full price of admission alone. It also 
happens to be the biggest laugh I've had at the movies all year.
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Walk on the Moon, A (1999)
Directed by Tony Goldwyn.
Cast: Diane Lane, Viggo Mortensen, Anna Paquin, Liev Schreiber, Tovah 
Feldshuh, Lisa Jakub, Julie Kavner.
1999 - 106 minutes
Rated R (for profanity, sex, and brief nudity).
Reviewed April 25, 1999.
"A Walk on the Moon," actor Tony Goldwyn's directing debut, is similar 
in place and time to 1987's far superior "Dirty Dancing." Both are set 
in the nostalgic '60s, during the summer, in the Catskills, and feature 
a female protagonist finally able to come into her own. But while "Dirty 
Dancing" got me involved in the characters and the beautiful setting, "A 
Walk on the Moon" is a smaller, slighter, and less-involving drama.
Set during the crucial summer of '69 when man first walked on the moon 
and the infamous Woodstock took place (both of which are conveniently 
portrayed here), Pearl Kantrowitz (Diane Lane) is an unsatisfied 
31-year-old woman who married her high school sweetheart, Marty (Liev 
Schreiber), when she was still a teenager and accidentally got pregnant. 
Despite having certain goals and dreams, Pearl and Marty both decided to 
take responsibility for their actions and be good parents. While on a 
summer-long vacation in the Catskills, Marty, a television repairman, is 
only able to come up on the weekends since there is a mad rush for t.v. 
sets due to the impending moon landing, leaving Pearl; her rebellious 
14-year-old daughter, Alison (Anna Paquin), who is just discovering and 
getting involved in boys; her precocious 5-year-old son; and her 
children's grandmother (Tovah Feldshuh), to fend for themselves during 
the week. By chance, Pearl meets Walker Jerome (Viggo Mortensen), a 
travelling "blouse man" whom, to her utter surprise, she sees as a light 
at the end of a dark tunnel, and starts an affair with, therefore 
putting her marriage and children's trust into jeopardy.
"A Walk on the Moon" is an overall unsatisfying domestic drama that 
feels like it begins in mid-stream, without any proper introduction to 
the characters, and it took me the film's first hour to actually get 
into the story. Even then, with only 45 minutes to go, the characters 
themselves always seemed to be standing at a far distance from me, and 
it was difficult to understand the motives of the central character, 
Pearl. We are supposed to believe that she is taken aback by Walker, but 
he is never written as a fully developed character, but more of a 
symbol, and therefore the whole plotting comes off as a mere contrivance 
in order to give us a story of "self-discovery."
If anything, the performances certainly can't be faulted. Diane Lane, a 
wonderful actress who began a promising career in the early '80s with 
such films as "The Outsiders" and "Rumble Fish," before resorting to 
low-rent or underused roles, has finally been given her first 
substantially satisfying in recent years. Lane proves a sympathetic 
heroine, even when she is making some very numskull decisions that are 
difficult to understand. In what comes off as one of the few successes 
in an otherwise largely unrealized screenplay, by Pamela Gray, the 
character of Marty is portrayed as not simply the "husband," but a real 
person who is genuinely good, even when considering that he sacrificed 
his own life for his family, and Liev Schreiber is up to every 
challenge. Giving the film's most assured and poignant performance is 
Anna Paquin, already an Academy Award winner (for 1993's "The Piano"), 
and at 16, she has already become one of the best actresses of her 
respective generation. A subplot involving Paquin's character of Alison 
discovering romance for the first time is supposed to come off as a 
catalyst to Pearl's blossoming affair, but not nearly enough time is 
devoted to her. Paquin is given the best scenes, however, including a 
bravura one in which Alison confronts her mother concerning her affair, 
and another in which she has a loving, truthful conversation with her 
father. Viggo Mortensen is the one weak link in the central roles, but I 
suspect this is due to his underwritten role of the "blouse man." There 
is no room given for Mortensen to create a definite personality, and 
director Goldwyn unwisely chooses to add a bunch of pointless sex scenes 
to stand as character development. And the likely winner of best 
performance by an actress in an unseen role goes to Julie Kavner as the 
resort's P.A. announcer, who is constantly announcing things over the 
intercom, including even Alison's first period!
Regardless of the obvious low budget, the film verifiably recreates 
Woodstock in a breathtaking sequence in which, allegedly, 300 people 
were transformed into hundreds of thousands via computer digitization. 
It ends up being an anticlimax, though, and before we are given a chance 
to see it, the film hurriedly moves on to something else.
"A Walk on the Moon" unmistakably feels like a rough cut of a possibly 
good movie. There's a fulfilling one lurking around in there somewhere, 
but the film feels too rushed and, because of this, no emotional 
momentum is allowed to build up. I liked Pearl, and I liked Alison, and 
Marty, but I'd like them even more in a better overall film. Not only 
does the story in "A Walk on the Moon" feel like a plot device, but it 
is also tiresome and unoriginal. So many similar motion pictures have 
been made, and more successfully, that this one only pales in 
comparison. That's too bad, because, even though not alive during the 
decade, I do have a fondness for the '60s.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Mrs. Dalloway (1997)
Directed by Marleen Gorris.
Cast: Vanessa Redgrave, Natascha McElhone, Rupert Graves, Michael 
Kitchen, Alan Cox, Lena Headey, Amelia Bullmore, Sarah Badel, Oliver 
Ford Davies, Katie Carr, John Standing, Robert Hardy, Margaret Tyzack, 
Phyllis Calvert.
1998 - 97 minutes.
Rated PG-13 (for brief nudity).
Reviewed October 10, 1998.
I've never really enjoyed period pieces because, most of the time, I 
don't think they are done very well. Usually, they seem to lack the 
urgency that they desperately need so that they become interesting. In 
"Mrs. Dalloway," unfortnately, there is no such luck.
At the start of "Mrs. Dalloway," which is set over a period of one day 
in 1923, the title character (Vanessa Redgrave), an aging, recently 
divorced woman living in England, is preparing for a party that she will 
be holding that night. Throughout the day, she reflects back to the life 
she once knew when she was a young woman (portrayed by Natascha 
McElhone), and had the chance to marry a spontaneous, loving man (Rupert 
Graves), but chose instead to play it safe with an uncaring beau. 
I rented "Mrs. Dalloway" basically because I thought it might be 
interesting, since it is set during a 24-hour period, but what I didn't 
count on was for it to be constantly distracting. The film switches 
countless times from 1923 to when she was younger, to the point that it 
started to feel muddled and painfully episodic. By having the story cut 
away so often to other things (and a few subplots I haven't mentioned), 
I could never get caught up in Mrs. Dalloway's ultimate search for 
happiness. And the way that another story involving a shell-shocked WWI 
soldier is interwined with the main one felt convoluted and obvious.
The performances in "Mrs. Dalloway" are not to be faulted. Redgrave is 
believable as Mrs. Dalloway, and she looks startlingly like McElhone, 
who plays her in the flashbacks. Another performance I admired, but who 
was underused, was Katie Carr, as Redgrave's young daughter.
Since the structuring of the story was needlessly drawn out and 
unnecessary, I didn't grow to care about any of the characters, and at 
the end, when "Mrs. Dalloway," attempts to be moving, it left me cold. 
    - Copyright 1998 by Dustin Putman
      Dustin Putman's
Film Reviews > 

Title
Review for Playing by Heart (1998)
Directed by Willard Carroll.
Cast: Angelina Jolie, Gena Rowlands, Sean Connery, Gillian Anderson, 
Ryan Phillippe, Dennis Quaid, Jon Stewart, Madeleine Stowe, Ellen 
Burstyn, Anthony Edwards, Jay Mohr, Patricia Clarkson, Natassja Kinski.
1998 - 121 minutes.
Rated R (for profanity and sexual situations).
Reviewed February 8, 1999.
"Playing by Heart" is an always-entertaining and fairly thoughtful film 
on the subject of love, and how everyone hopes for it in one way or 
another. Obviously borrowing the structure of a Robert Altman film, such 
as 1975's incomparable classic "Nashville" and 1993's "Short Cuts," 
"Playing by Heart" does not reach the overall ambitiousness of those two 
pictures, but is nicely done all the same.
In Altmanesque fashion, "Playing by Heart" introduces us to various 
people one at a time living in L.A. and, switching back and forth 
between them, their personal stories begin to play out. Inevitably, 
these seemingly unconnected characters will somehow come together during 
the climax, and also not surprising is that the several stories vary in 
quality.
By far the most effective and involving, and thankfully the one that is 
given the most screen time, involves Joan (Angelina Jolie), a talkative, 
witty college student who, one night, meets Keenan (Ryan Phillippe), a 
good-looking and quiet clubhopper. Although she strikes up a 
conversation with him, and thus begins to pursue him, he blatantly 
states to her that he doesn't date, even though he obviously likes her 
very much as well. Heartfelt and realistic, this section of the picture 
is also helped considerably by the wonderful performances from the 
effervescent Jolie, who definately has "rising star" written across her 
forehead, and Phillippe, who gives his best performance to date. 
Whenever these two wholly original characters appeared on the screen, 
things would suddenly brighten up a notch, and I always looked forward 
to seeing them in their next scene.
Also highly moving, if not given quite as much time as I would have 
liked, concerns Mildred (Ellen Burstyn), who opts to stay with her son, 
Mark (Jay Mohr), in the hospital where he is dying from AIDS. Gradually, 
several truths are let out in the open between mother and son, and the 
sequences between them were handled very well by the performers, 
particularly Burstyn, who has a heartbreaking scene towards the end 
where she holds her ailing grown child for the last time. 
Third on the success meter, and also intelligently written and often 
funny, deals with lonely, but scared, thirtysomething Meredith (Gillian 
Anderson), a theatrical director who is afraid to get involved in a 
romantic relationship, even when she meets the "too-good-to-be-true" 
Trent (Jon Stewart). With this film, Anderson was so affirmed and 
believable in her character that I did not think of "The X-Files," in 
which she stars, once. Stewart also proves he is definately someone to 
watch, a comedian who in the last two months has had two dramatic 
feature roles, the other being as a threatening science teacher in "The 
Faculty." Adding a great deal of comedic support to this story, as well, 
must go to Meredith's huge dog who, in one amusing sequence, jumps up on 
Trent revealing that he is as big as a grown man. "Suddenly, I am 
feeling a bit inadequate," Trent slyly quips.
In the fourth plotline, Dennis Quaid stars as Hugh, a man who, night 
after night, drifts from bar to bar making up elaborate fictional 
stories about his wife and children to tell to women (including Patricia 
Clarkson and Natassja Kinski). Although slight, a few interesting 
moments arise, including one scene where, at the end of his ropes, he 
goes to a gay bar posing as a homosexual and lets out his feelings to an 
understanding transsexual. 
Out of all of the characters, the two matriarchs are Hannah (Gena 
Rowlands) and Paul (Sean Connery), a married couple about to celebrate 
their 40th wedding anniversary, coming to terms with Paul's recently 
discovered brain tumor and questions of his fidelity twenty-five years 
before. I was never really able to get involved in this particular 
story, even though, once again, many brightly written moments were able 
to seap through now and again, including an on-going joke about how Paul 
is always foolishly giving away the endings of movies Hannah happens to 
be watching on television. Rowlands is one of the biggest talents among 
her elder peers, and she is able to bring a great deal of humanity to 
her underwritten role. Likewise for Connery, who has made his first 
serious film in a long time (I'm sure he would like to forget that "The 
Avengers" ever happened).
Among all of these alternating characters, the only story that is a 
total waste, has to do with Gracie (Madeleine Stowe), a 40-ish woman who 
constantly is meeting a man (Anthony Edwards) at a hotel and indulging 
in a strictly sexual relationship, despite both of them being married. 
Luckily, this story only very sporadically appears, so it doesn't really 
affect the film as a whole even though I am not quite sure why it wasn't 
just completely scrapped. Stowe can be a wonderful actress, and is saved 
from being all-in-all wasted due to an earnest, somewhat-redeeming scene 
during the epilogue, in which all eleven main characters are revealed to 
be somehow interconnected (although I will not dare give away the exact 
details).
Even with its occasionally uneven structure, "Playing by Heart" 
ultimately turned out to in no way be a disappointment because when the 
film was good, it absolutely sparkled, thanks to the fast and quirky 
dialogue and the mature way in which the characters were handled. The 
Joan and Keenan story, especially, was good enough that an entire film 
could have easily just been about those two. In the first scene, Joan 
reminisces about a man she once knew who told her, "talking about love 
is like dancing about architecture." Tellingly, "Dancing about 
Architecture" was the original title of "Playing by Heart," but the line 
remains to stand for a lot about the way we, as human beings, all 
naturally yearn to love and be loved, even during its unavoidable ups 
and downs. 

Title
Review for Bless the Child (2000)
Directed by Chuck Russell.
Cast: Kim Basinger, Jimmy Smits, Holliston Coleman, Rufus Sewell, Angela 
Bettis, Christina Ricci, Ian Holm.
2000 - 105 minutes
Rated R (for violence, gore, profanity, and drug use).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, August 12, 2000.
There's no easier way to say it than "Bless the Child" is a very bad movie. 
The film, directed by Chuck Russell (1987's "A Nightmare on Elm Street 3: 
Dream Warriors"), joins an increasing number of recent religious-themed 
horror pictures that include 1999's "Stigmata" and "End of Day," and while 
neither of those were cause for any sort of praise, at least they knew what 
genre they were in and how to keep the pacing actually moving. No such luck 
with "Bless the Child," which gets off to a shaky start with a heartrendingly 
earnest scene between two sisters (one of which is a drug addict), and then 
goes downhill from there as the proceedings become buried deeper and deeper 
in inane and preposterous plotting.
Maggie O'Connor (Kim Basinger) is a lonely, divorced nurse living alone in a 
New York apartment building when, a few days before Christmas, finds her 
younger sister Jenna (Angela Bettis), whom she hasn't seen in a long time, at 
her doorstep with a newborn baby. Strung out on drugs, Jenna runs away before 
Maggie can try to get her help, and is left to raise the child as a surrogate 
mother and an aunt. 
Switching forward in time, six-year-old Cody (Holliston Coleman) has been 
diagnosed with Borderline Autism, but Maggie is beginning to suspect she may 
not have that at all, but some genuinely unique gift. In the school yard one 
day, Cody seemingly mends a seriously hurt bird, which eventually flies away 
from her hands. And she always seems to be talking to unseen entities, a 'la 
"The Sixth Sense." 
Enter Eric Stark (Rufus Sewell), head of the New Dawn Foundation, a recovered 
drug abuser who has put all of his excess strength into helping others who 
have lost their way in life. Despite being a well-publicized figure, FBI 
agent John Travis (Jimmy Smits) has not yet been able to piece together the 
complex puzzle that links Eric directly with a series of gruesome child 
murders that have been committed recently in the city. And as Black Easter 
(Easter Eve), which is the day Satan is to be reawakened, slowly rolls 
around, it is up to Eric, who has now hooked up with Jenna, to find Cody and 
brainwash her into believing in the forces of evil. 
Why, might you ask, do they really need Cody? Hell if I know. It's fairly 
safe to say that screenwriters Thomas Richman, Clifford Green, and Ellen 
Green are the only ones who could ever possibly make sense of this silly 
hogwash. "Bless the Child" is an admittedly difficult film to summarize 
because it is so marred in ludicrousness and overplotting that, to attempt 
making any sort of explanation just leads to more diw-witted twists that need 
to be clarified. 
Academy Award winner Kim Basinger (1997's "L.A. Confidential") is an actress 
who has been widely criticized in the past for her questionable talents, but 
even before her Oscar win in 1998, I have always liked her. Basinger brings a 
genuine honesty to her film roles that not many actors can fully attest to, 
and can do comedy just as well as drama. Basinger must have known the trouble 
she had gotten herself into with this picture, then, since she is too often 
overly sincere in her line readings, or looks to have just awoken from a deep 
slumber. Either way, Basinger has turned in one of her most mediocre 
performances to date, in, undoubtedly, one of her weakest films.
Almost everyone plays second fiddle to Basinger's Maggie, and not many 
supporting players manage to stand out from the crowd. Young Holliston 
Coleman, however, is a real find, and dodges all dangers of becoming an 
unctuous child actor. Rufus Sewell (1998's "Dark City") is appropriately 
threatening and makes for a nasty villain, but he is too promising of an 
actor to be wasting his time wading through such inconsequential material. 
The same goes for Angela Bettis (1999's "Girl, Interrupted"), as Jenna, and 
Christina Ricci (1999's "Sleepy Hollow"), who does a professional job with 
her five minutes of screen time, and then gets out while the going is still 
good. Ricci is a fine actress, one of the more promising of her generation, 
so why she chose to appear as a drug addict whose only purpose is to explain 
the plot to us through frivolous dialogue remains a mystery--unless her 
no-doubt meaty paycheck played a role in getting her cast. Meanwhile, Jimmy 
Smits is a crushing bore without anything of interest to do or say.
"Bless the Child" is an amazing feat for a big-budget Hollywood 
horror-thriller. The movie is overblown and highly unsatisfying, completely 
dull and visually dreary throughout, without any provocative characters, plot 
developments, or visual effects (which, by the way, look cheesy), and only 
one suspenseful sequence (set atop a bridge). Director Chuck Russell may have 
done occasionally respectable work in the past, but his luck has finally run 
out here. Russell proves to have no sense of how to film a scene and make it 
work, and drags everything out to the point of genuine nausea. 
Rule #1 in the annals of Horror Movie Filmmaking 101 is, "Don't make a boring 
horror movie." Rule #2 is, "Don't make an unscary horror movie." Rule #3 is, 
"The storyline must be brought to life in a way that will make the viewer 
believe in what is occurring." Rule #4 is, "Some visual filmmaking flair must 
be present." And Rule #5 is, "If you realize you've failed on Rules #1-4, for 
the love of God, do not unleash the now-so-called 'horror' movie upon the 
unsuspecting public!" "Bless the Child" falls into the trap of Rules #1-4, 
but as proven by the release of the film, as well as this review, director 
Russell didn't have the good sense to pay attention to the most vital rule of 
all. I think we all know which one that is.

Title
Review for Other Sister, The (1999)
"The Other Sister" is one of the most genuinely sweet love stories to 
come along in quite some time. Well-directed by Garry Marshall, the 
film, if anything, puts to an even larger shame the false sentimentality 
and writing of the recent "Message in a Bottle," for here you actually 
do believe that the two central characters are in love without having to 
suffer through one unbelievable tragedy after another.
At the start of "The Other Sister," Carla Tate (Juliette Lewis), a 
mildly retarded young woman in her early 20s, has just obtained a 
certificate from a special school she has gone to for a large chunk of 
the latter part of her life. Returning to her family's wealthy San 
Francisco home, and to her overprotective, but loving mother (Diane 
Keaton) and more understanding father (Tom Skerritt), Carla announces 
that she wants to be a veterinarian's assistant one day and also wants 
to go to the local Polytechnic school, even though it is primarily for 
people without a mental disability. On the first day there, she meets 
Daniel (Giovanni Ribisi), who also is mentally disabled, at the 
registration center and helps him out when someone calls him a "retard." 
Thus begins a delicate relationship between Carla and Daniel, both of 
which can understand the other person unlike anyone else, since they are 
both very much alike in their ways of thinking. Carla is intrigued to 
find out early on that Daniel has an apartment of his own, which his 
father is paying for while he is in school, and she decides that it's 
time she get an apartment herself. 
It is difficult to describe the "plot" of "The Other Sister," since the 
film wisely has decided to be more of a character study between two 
people who, yes, do have a disability, but are able to love each other 
just like anyone else can. It is this aspect of the film that I 
appreciated the most, because the screenplay, by Garry Marshall and Bob 
Brunner, does not look upon or treat the characters of Carla and Daniel 
as "different," nor do they want to make us feel pity for them. Quite 
the contrary, they are regarded as regular people who do have a handicap 
to deal with in their lives but not when dealing with each other. The 
dialogue between the two also never feels anything short of exact and 
accurate, and through their actions we quickly are allowed to care very 
much about them, while we also can laugh with joy at their veritable 
innocence.
Juliette Lewis, always an interesting and talented actress (1991's "Cape 
Fear," 1993's "What's Eating Gilbert Grape," 1996's "The Evening Star"), 
gives a tour de force performance after being absent from the screen 
since 1996, and she proves here in spades that she is nothing short of a 
brilliant actress, one of the best of her generation. To substantiate 
this point, take a look at her in this film, and then view her as an 
unstable serial killer in 1994's "Natural Born Killers." If Lewis could 
not be classified as diverse, no one can, and if Academy Award members 
did not have such frustratingly short attention spans, Lewis would 
certainly garner a Best Actress nomination come next year, and there is 
no doubt in my mind that she would have this year if the picture had 
been released in December. To avoid short-changing Giovanni Ribisi, he 
also gives a completely believable performance and amazingly has a lot 
of chemistry with Lewis. As Carla's mother, Diane Keaton develops her 
character to be one that we don't always agree with since, after all, 
she is so overprotective, but also one that we can relate to and 
understand her reasoning behind certain judgements. And also lighting up 
the proceedings, even with a relatively small part, is Poppy Montgomery 
as one of Carla's sisters, who was the highlight of last year's 
otherwise badly-made comedy, "Dead Man on Campus." When, or if, 
Montgomery is ever cast in a lead role, I have no doubt that she will be 
able to pull it off, since she has already marginally salvaged one poor 
film and has made an impression here with only a limited amount of 
screen time.
Throughout "The Other Sister," the more dramatic moments are always 
skillfully done and, thankfully, never overly dramatic. In one 
particular scene where Daniel discovers he failed his school class, the 
film wisely uses a light emotional tone, avoiding simple melodrama, and 
therefore comes off as a far more effective and touching moment. Without 
giving away anything, another heartbreaking sequence, and one that 
admittedly did bring a few tears to my eyes, involved Daniel saying 
something very much inappropriate in front of a crowd, which brings 
Carla to a state of confusion, anger, and tears, and the following scene 
set in a parking lot between the two could not have been as powerful 
without the performances that director Marshall was able to get out of 
Lewis and Ribisi.
Although perhaps a bit overlong (with a running time of 130 minutes, a 
few scenes could have easily been edited out without losing anything 
substantial), "The Other Sister" is probably the most winning and joyful 
film I have seen so far in 1999. The love story element got me deeply 
involved in the characters, and the handling of the mental disability 
angle was subtle and intelligent. But what I will remember most, and 
will continue to remember throughout the year, is Juliette Lewis' 
flawless, lovely performance. Not even the nearly incomparable Meryl 
Streep could have done it any better, and that is, for sure, a testament 
to Lewis' wonderful abilities.
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Snow Day (2000)
Directed by Chris Koch.
Cast: Mark Webber, Schuyler Fisk, Zena Grey, Emmanuelle Chriqui, Jean Smart, 
Chevy Chase, Chris Elliott, Pam Grier.
2000 - 89 minutes
Rated PG (for toilet humor).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, February 12, 2000.
The magic that arises when children across the country listen eagerly to the 
radio after a snowfall to see if school has been canceled for the day is 
brought vibrantly to life in "Snow Day," a mildly entertaining diversion 
that, nonetheless, features at least three stories that do not mesh well when 
strung together, as they are clearly aimed at different age groups. Directed 
by Chris Koch, the film is a valiant effort that will only charm most 
audiences for one-third of the time, based on the viewer's age, and this is 
unfortunate, as the talent to make a truly winning family picture is present 
throughout.
The town of Syracuse is having a disappointing winter, with nary a snow storm 
in sight. But then something unexpected happens in the air pressure and the 
residents awake to find their outside surroundings blanketed in a heavy layer 
of snow. School is announced to be closed for the day, and for some of the 
members of the Brandston family, their lives will be changed--for the 
good--by nightfall. 
Story #1 involves teenage son Hal Brandston (Mark Webber), who is infatuated 
with high school beauty Claire Bonner (Emmanuelle Chriqui), and takes finding 
her ankle bracelet as a sign that they were meant for each other. Helping him 
out is his best friend, Lane (Schuyler Fisk), the girl in his life he fails 
to see he is really meant for. Preteens and teenagers are the target audience 
of this story, and it is the sweetest subplot in the film, terribly 
predictable, but consistently entertaining and equipped with a fetching 
innocence. Mark Webber is strong as the protagonist of this tale and the 
narrator of the film, but it is his female counterparts who steal the show. 
Schuyler Fisk, who is Sissy Spacek's daughter, proves that she very well 
could prove to be just as talented an actress as her mother, and is 
absolutely lovely as Lane. And the way in which the Claire character is 
handled is impressive and noteworthy, as she isn't simply written as the 
"seemingly unobtainable object," but as a real person who is charmed by Hal's 
persistence in winning her over. Emmanuelle Chriqui is a fresh face I look 
forward to seeing in the future.
Story #2 is far less successful, and aimed for the ages 5-11 bracket, as 
young Natalie Brandston (Zena Grey) sets out to stop the infamous Snow Plow 
Man (Chris Elliott), a maniacal worker for the city hell-bent on clearing 
each and every street by day's end. Syracuse schools have never been closed 
for snow two days in a row, and Natalie is determined to change that. While 
there are a couple intermittent laughs within this story, it is cliched and 
juvenile, and much of the humor is lame. Chris Elliott has a lot of fun as 
the villainous Snow Plow Man, but Zena Grey, as Natalie, is the type of child 
who rubs me the wrong way. Unctuous and annoyingly loudmouthed, Grey does not 
win any sort of plaudits from me.
Finally, Story #3 deals with the Brandston parents' adventures individually, 
so there  actually could qualify as being a Story #4, as well. Tom Brandston 
(Chevy Chase) is a news weatherman whose boss (Pam Grier) is always insisting 
he dress up in extravagantly silly costumes, in hopes that it will pull in 
viewers, when all Tom wants to do is be taken seriously in his profession as 
a meteorologist. Tom's wife, Laura (Jean Smart), is a workaholic whose job 
takes away from being able to be the involved parent she aspires to be. 
Snowed in and unable to go to work, Laura spends the day with her youngest 
son, and rediscovers why being a parent should come before her job. These 
subplots are tolerable, and a step up from Story #2, but generally slight and 
their payoffs are telegraphed far in advance. In the actor department, Chevy 
Chase is wasted and rarely given a snappy line of dialogue; Pam Grier is 
crazy to have even considered appearing in such a throwaway role; and Jean 
Smart is likable and entertaining.
When all is said and done, "Snow Day" fails because it is so resolutely 
uneven. It is unclear what director Koch was attempting by mixing all of 
these different stories for different ages, unless he was hoping he could 
possibly attract a wider audience and, thus, make more money. He may just 
succeed on that level, in getting them into the theater, but the film itself 
is a strange experience. While keeping an innocuous tone throughout, "Snow 
Day" is unsure what it wants to be, and never firmly finds its footing.

Title
Review for Message in a Bottle (1999)
Warner Brothers; rated PG-13 (mild violence, sexual situations); 132 minutes
Screenplay: Gerald Di Pego (from the novel by Nicholas Sparks)
Cast: Kevin Costner, Robin Wright-Penn, Paul Newman, Illeana Douglas, Robbie
Coltrane, Jesse James, John Savage.
I'm not an overly cynical guy.  There have been many glossy Hollywood romances
that have carried me away with their romanticism over the years.  However, I
have my limits and I also have standards.  This brings us to the subject at
hand: Message In a Bottle, the big ticket romance that Warner Brothers'
unleashed upon the movie going public just in time for Valentine's Day.
The story, what little of it that there is, involves boring Chicago Tribune
reporter Theresa Osborne (Robin Wright-Penn) dealing with her recent divorce
and trying to raise her young son Jason (Jesse James).  During a brief stay
somewhere in New England she finds the titular message in a bottle while on a
morning run by the ocean.  The letter, written to a mystery woman named
Catherine, instantly captivates her. Upon her return, Theresa shares it with
her best friend Lina (Illeana Douglas), her boss Charlie (Robbie Coltrane),
and the entire city of Chicago (the newspaper publishes an article about it).
It turns out that the message was written by grieving widower Garret Blake
(Kevin Costner) and so Theresa travels to North Carolina and tracks him down.
He turns out to have a colorful father (Paul Newman) but is otherwise
perfectly dull and overly obsessed with sailing.  This is somehow attractive
to Theresa and the two begin their awkward courtship.  Of course she doesn't
tell him that she found his letter, she wants to but the rules of this type of
film require him to find out later (preferably right after they first make
love).  This way Garret can get very angry and the relationship can be
threatened.
The discovery of the message and Garret's discovery that Theresa discovered
the message are really the only two noteworthy events that happen during the
nearly two and a quarter hour running time of this film.  There's a truly lame
subplot about Garret's relationship with his dead wife's family (he gets into
a bar fight with her brother, played by John Savage) and then the necessary
tear-jerking ending.  A fun way to pass the time is to take bets on exactly
who will die, although it becomes pretty clear by the second reel.  The actual
death sequence is one of the most ridiculously forced, and unintentionally
humorous, sequences filmed since... well, since Costner's The Postman (1997).
Message In a Bottle is one slow moving film.  Last year audiences were offered
endurance tests such as The Horse Whisperer and Meet Joe Black but both of
those films resemble Jerry Bruckheimer productions next to this.  They also
had redeeming qualities in the form of quality performances and some stand out
technical work.
Message In a Bottle has a decent enough cast but they're fighting the material
all the way, and losing badly.  Costner and, especially, Wright-Penn are both
likable and attractive enough to cheer for but their characters are simply too
boring.  They also fail to generate any kind of real romantic chemistry.
The supporting players are given very little to do.  The reliable Douglas is
particularly wasted.  Old pro Newman gives his all and occasionally threatens
to kick some life into this dead horse of a film.  A confrontational scene he
has with Costner near the end is especially well played.  However, too
frequently he just reminds us how unexciting our lead characters are.
The film is very polished on the technical side to be sure but it only works
to undercut the story.  Gabriel Yared, who previously set the romantic moods
of The English Patient (1996) and City of Angels (1998) with his scores,
overdoes it a bit here.  Caleb Deschanel's camera makes everything look a
little too beautiful.  Do the offices of the Chicago Tribune really need to
look heavenly?  The editing by Steven Weisberg is troubling not only
considering all that could have been cut out but is also simply messy at
times.
The real offender here is screenwriter Gerald Di Pego.  Working from a best-
selling novel by Nicholas Sparks (which I have not read but have been told is
on the same literary level as The Bridges of Madison County), Di Pego creates
one of the most uninspired scripts of recent times.  Its strict adherence to
clichs brings to mind such disasters as I Still Know What You Did Last Summer
(1998).  There simply isn't an original scene in this film.  The dialogue is
rarely better than laughable and this is only accentuated by the excessively
long pauses every character takes while speaking.
This is director Mandoki's first film since When a Man Loves a Woman (1994),
the solid Meg Ryan/Andy Garcia romance.  He's simply going through the motions
with this.
Message In a Bottle is easily the worst of the several romantic offerings
available in theaters at the moment and vies with What Dreams May Come (1998)
as one of the most misguided romances of the decade.

Title
Review for States of Control (1998)
Directed by Zack Winestine.
Cast: Jennifer Van Dyck, John Cunningham, Stephen Bogardus, Ellen Greene, 
Jennie Moreau.
1999 - 84 minutes.
Not Rated (equivalent of an R for profanity, nudity, and sex).
Opens 10/99 (limited release).
Reviewed July 21, 1999.
Zack Winestine's "States of Control" is a frustrating and disappointing film, 
and yet, I feel guilty writing such criticisms at this exact moment because 
for the first 70 minutes of this 84-minute indie drama, it was edging up to 
become a major contender on my top ten list of the year, come next January. 
The film is, next to Stanley Kubrick's masterpiece, "Eyes Wide Shut," one of 
the most provocative motion pictures I've seen in the last year, as it deals 
with a woman struggling to break free from the artificial materialism that 
the world around her has so stringently begun to depend on. 
Lisa (an eye-opening, perfectly-cast Jennifer Van Dyck) is an unsatisfied 
married woman in her early-30's who works at a small theater company in 
Manhattan. Her relationship with her husband, Abel (Stephen Bogardus), is 
seriously faltering, both for the passionless, controlled time they spend 
with one another, and because of Abel's impotency. Purposefully not sleeping 
and writing in her journal at all hours of the night about her internal 
struggle for spontaneity, Lisa's feelings are best identified by Paul (John 
Cunningham), a stern older man who steps in as the director of the company's 
latest play, and who is very truthful to Lisa about everything (he believes 
the novel she has spent years on is worthless; he constantly does not allow 
Lisa to talk about her past and he speaks none about his own because he 
believes it makes for boring conversation, etc.). Left alone at night for 
long periods of time while Abel is at work, and sexually starved herself, 
Lisa finally picks up enough courage to go into an adult video store and buy 
a porno flick, taking it home and watching it. Additonally, she is firmly 
against most technological advances and longs for the days when things could 
be more simple. While at a music shop with her friend, she states that it is 
getting more difficult to find records: "Once LPs came out, everything became 
background music."
"States of Control" is, indeed, a difficult film to identify. A truly offbeat 
character study of a woman, the movie obviously is anything but a big-studio 
picture, as it follows Lisa through a series of different vignettes and 
relationships, and relies on the excellent, often funny dialogue rather than 
big plot developments. Director Zack Winestine, making his first 35mm feature 
film, has written a multi-layered, engrossing screenplay and carries the 
camera well, too, as he paints a desolate, overly ordinary picture of New 
York City that mirrors the way Lisa's life will remain if she doesn't fight 
for the right to make her own decisions. In short, she is utterly sick of 
trying to make everyone else happy, and desperately wants to finally do what 
she wants to do.
The movie gains a lot of laughs from the on-target dialogue alone, such as 
when she is looking around in the adult video store. Aiding the help of a 
male customer on how he chooses which movie to get, she asks, "what do you 
look for in the films you buy? Is it a particular actor, or the story?" 
Another equally witty dialogue exchange is between Lisa and Paul when they 
are eating at a restaurant. After Lisa reveals she has written a mediocre 
novel, Paul asks if he could borrow it to read. "You won't like it," Lisa 
assures him, to which Paul quickly replies, "well, at least then we will have 
something in common." It is this sort of fine-spun dialogue that I delight in 
when I'm looking for a comedy, as opposed to non-stop physical comedy and 
gags (although, let it be known, I also absolutely love 1980's "Airplane!" 
and the whole "Naked Gun" series). 
As many supposedly liberating things that Lisa does in the course of the 
film, however, they only lead to disappointment and an even further need for 
self-fulfillment. Concerning the adult video she takes home to watch, she 
finds the experience anticlimactic. When a photographer friend takes her on 
one of her intimate shoots, Lisa can't go through with the sexually revealing 
things she is expected to do with the male model. A one-time affair with Paul 
ends with him not wanting to talk to her afterwards while they're in bed, 
even though Lisa has something important she wants to say. 
All of these failed attempts at freedom lead to the film's last fifteen 
minutes. Before this, it would be safe to say that I was loving every minute 
of the movie, only to be severely let down by the denouement. Predicting that 
the conclusion would stay on an even level with the rest of the movie, I 
expected something a bit less drastic to happen, shall we say, than what 
finally occurs. It would be unfair to give away the particulars of the 
ending, but it was extremely unconvincing, to say the least, and director 
Winestine's only major misstep. "States of Control," as a whole, is an 
astute, thought-provoking film, but the ending left me just as dissatisfied 
as Lisa is throughout the movie, in her journey to not follow by the rules of 
today's superficial society.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut (1999)
Directed by Trey Parker.
Cast: Trey Parker, Matt Stone, Isaac Hayes, George Clooney, Mike Judge, 
Minnie Driver.
1999 - 82 minutes
Rated R (for cartoon violence, non-stop profanity, sexual situations, nudity, 
and everything else under the sun).
Reviewed July 1, 1999.
If you've seen the popular animated television series, "South Park," which 
airs on cable's Comedy Central, you'll know that each and every episode's 
purpose is to be as offensive as possible, thus generating laughs of 
near-disbelief, and these unbelievable storylines ultimately collide with 
often shocking adult language, particularly for television. Nothing, however, 
could prepare you for the vulgar, perverse, outrageous, raunchy, 
filthy-mouthed experience that is "South Park: Bigger, Longer & Uncut," the 
very first big-screen adaptation of the sitcom, directed by Trey Parker. No 
doubt only saving itself from the NC-17 (No Children Under 17 Admitted) 
rating because it's a cartoon rather than live-action, the R-rated film is a 
full-out, and well-articulated, attack on the bogusness of the MPAA (Motion 
Picture Association of America) rating system, no doubt due to Parker's 
unfortunate experience with them last year when they rated his comedy, 
"Orgazmo," NC-17, even though it had next to no sex and even very little 
harsh profanity.
As afficionados can attest to, the protagonists of "South Park," a wintry 
town up north, are a group of potty-mouthed elementary school friends, Stan, 
Kyle, Cartman, and Kenny (whose speech is always muffled due to the tight 
hood of his jacket, and who dies in a freak accident on each episode, to the 
exclamation of his friends, "Oh my god, they killed Kenny"). As the film gets 
rolling, the four boys are excitedly off to see the very first Canadian-made 
"Terrence and Phillip" movie, based on their own favorite T.V. show about two 
childish men who fart a lot. Distraught when they are turned away by the 
theater worker due to its R-rating, they successfully pay a homeless man to 
get them into the movie, and three hours later, after sitting through an 
endless stream of shocking curse word upon curse word , come out of the 
theater with, shall we say, an increased and rather colorful vocabularly. 
When word gets out about the controversial film, and when all of the children 
of South Park have been transformed from "innocent" kids into 
profanity-spewing monsters, the parents, headed by Kyle's witch with a 
capital "B" mom, create an organization called "Mothers Against Canada," 
believing that the titled country is at fault for the corruption of today's 
youth. Soon Terrence and Phillip find themselves facing execution, and it is 
up to the young South Park gang to band together to set them free and make 
their elders listen to reason. Meanwhile, Kenny, who is inevitably killed 
early on and sent to Hell after not being admitted beyond the pearly gates 
(and naked angels) of Heaven, discovers that Satan and the recently-deceased 
Saddam Hussein are full-fledged lovers plotting to take over the world of the 
living the minute the guilty television duo are murdered. 
What may surprise "South Park" fans is not only how far this film goes over 
the deep end of tastelessness, but that it is a musical, albeit a demented 
Disney-style one. Filmmaker Trey Parker (who also does many of the voices 
along with partner Matt Stone) has had a talent of creating memorable tunes, 
from 1997's bloody comedy, "Cannibal: The Musical," to "Orgazmo," and here he 
has succeeded once again. Some of the catchy showstoppers include "Uncle 
Fu**a," which literally caused me to laugh so hard I teared up, to "Kyle's 
Mom's a Bitch," whose lyrics are hysterically translated into several foreign 
languages, to "I Can Change," a solemn solo song sung by Saddam Hussein, who 
wants to prove to Satan that he cares about more than just meaningless sex 
with him.
Loaded with a non-stop barrage of exaggerated profanities, including at least 
100 uses of the F-word alone, the film goes so far in the opposite direction 
of how "cute 'n' cuddly" animated films are supposed to be made, you can't 
help but simply laugh with an equal measure of shock and glee at the overall 
craziness, as well as brazenness, of it all. 
Also, as is usual with the show, the film has targeted many celebrities, both 
living and dead, and has used them as the butt of a many insulting jokes. 
Most uproarious honors go to the Baldwin brothers, Brooke Shields (voiced by 
Minnie Driver), the late George Burns, and especially Winona Ryder (who is 
portrayed doing something truly unthinkable with a round of ping pong balls). 
Nary a target is left unabused by director Parker: politicians, right-wing 
extremists, organizations, gays, Jews, religion, small-town family "values," 
and at the forefront, the rating system. Usually a bad sign signifying an 
absence of thought, the movie also includes as many sex, language, bathroom, 
and fart jokes to last a lifetime, and to my amazement, they actually work 
here because there is a bit of sly wit behind the more showy humor.
I'd love to say "South Park: Bigger, Longer & Uncut" is a great movie, both 
for its forthright willingness to gain laughs and courageousness in the 
mainstream film industry, but there are several problems to be had. For one, 
at an already-brief 82 minutes (which may seem rather pat), the picture 
overstays its welcome and runs out of a lot of steam in its climax. It never 
grows boring or even tedious, but the jokes (or at least the ones that work) 
slow down quite a bit. Tight editing of maybe ten minutes might have done the 
trick to keep the pace, and fun, at a maximum level. There was also a minor 
height of disappointment in that one of the show's most rib-ticklingly 
hilarious characters, Mr. Hanky, the Christmas Poo, is nowhere to be found. 
One of the series' running characters, Chef (voiced by Isaac Hayes), also 
doesn't obtain an ample amount of screen time, and in a movie filled with 
music, is unfairly not given one song to sing. A rousing rendition of his 
classic "Salty Balls" would have definately done the trick. 
Still, it is extremely difficult to adapt a 30-minute cartoon of the same 
brand of extreme humor to almost an hour-and-a-half, but Parker has done a 
fabulous job under the circumstances, proving that not only is he good with 
voices, but is also a fine director and a smart writer who knows how to steal 
laughs from an audience. Something tells me that not only will fans of "South 
Park" like this first foray into feature films, but those unfamiliar with the 
series will also quickly catch on to the hard-edged humor and end up being 
won over themselves at the sheer stupidity of it all. I'm not sure a second 
"South Park" movie would be a good idea (after all, what could possibly be 
done the next time around that wasn't done here?), but as it stands alone, 
you almost certainly couldn't find a funnier, or (disregarding its mediocre 
finale) more entertaining, movie out in theaters right now.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Dr. Dolittle 2 (2001)
Directed by Steve Carr.
Cast: Eddie Murphy, Kristen Wilson, Raven-Symone, Kyla Pratt, Lil' Zane, 
Kevin Pollak, Jeffrey Jones; voices of Steve Zahn, Lisa Kudrow, Norm 
MacDonald.
2001 - 81 minutes
Rated PG (for mild profanity and sexual innuendo).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, June 23, 2001.
"Dr. Dolittle 2," a pointless sequel to the 1998 hit, is superior to its 
hideously misguided predecessor, and yet it's still pretty bad. Aimed more 
squarely for children than the original (this one is rated PG; the original 
was PG-13), it is harmless and fluffy, with a few scattershot moments of mild 
amusement. It is also painfully routine, more often boring than not, and 
instantly forgettable. 
Dr. John Dolittle (Eddie Murphy), the famous veterinarian who has the gift of 
being able to understand what animals say, is back, along with his lawyer 
wife, Lisa (Kristen Wilson), and two children, Charisse (Raven-Symone) and 
Maya (Kyla Pratt). When a forest is threatened to be torn down by a nasty 
land developer (Jeffrey Jones), Dr. Dolittle is given a month to perform the 
impossible: take a circus bear (voiced by Steve Zahn) and get him to mate 
with a country bear (Lisa Kudrow).
Written by Larry Levin and directed by Steve Carr (2000's despicable "Next 
Friday"), "Dr. Dolittle 2" is placed firmly in the category of "unnecessary 
sequel." The premise of saving land from being torn down is as old as the 
hills, and doesn't help matters; certainly a more original idea could have 
been concocted if a follow-up had to be made. 
The various interactions between the doctor and the animals are predictable 
and too often tiresome. While children may enjoy much of this, it doesn't 
successfully carry over for the adult audience, which all good family films 
do. Better is a subplot involving the rocky relationship between the doctor 
and his 16-year-old daughter, Charisse, who has begun to date. This section 
of the movie does away with the main attraction of the animals, but it also 
offers up a fairly accurate, if PG-rated view, of the growing pains of an 
adolescent. It is surprising to see Raven-Symone, who once played little 
Olivia on TV's "The Cosby Show," all grown up, and she certainly has the 
charisma of an actress with a definite future in films.
As for Eddie Murphy, does he really have nothing to do anymore than make 
sequels to successful first pictures? Last year it was the perfectly 
dreadfully "Nutty Professor II: The Klumps," and now it is "Dr. Dolittle 2." 
Since he is so clearly upstaged by the animal performers, and doesn't get 
nearly enough comedic material for himself, Murphy's role could have been 
played by anyone and it wouldn't have made a bit of difference. Likewise, the 
film itself could have never been made, and it wouldn't have been missed. If 
anything, it could have saved millions of wasted dollars.
   - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
     http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman
http://www.all-reviews.com/reviewers/dustinputman.htm
http://www.atnzone.com

Title
Review for Psycho (1998)
Directed Gus Van Sant.
Cast: Vince Vaughn, Anne Heche, Viggo Mortensen, Julianne Moore, William 
H. Macy, Chad Everett, Rance Howard, Robert Forster, Philip Baker Hall, 
Rita Wilson, James LeGros, Anne Haney.
1998 - 108 minutes.
Rated R (for violence, partial nudity, sexual situations, and blood).
Reviewed December 5, 1998.
By Dustin Putman 
Dustin Putman's Film Reviews ">Http://members.aol.com/filmfan16/index.html>
Ever since a "recreation" of Alfred Hitchcock's infamous 1960 classic, 
"Psycho," was announced earlier this year, many fans of the original 
yelled blasphemy and were outraged that anyone would attempt a remake. 
But, of course, this wasn't just any remake, because acclaimed director 
Gus Van Sant firmly stated that the new version would rigidly follow the 
original's screenplay, although it would be set in 1998, and that his 
purpose was to freshly introduce a classic to a new generation. Up until 
its release, rumors flew by, questioning what the differences would be 
in this 1998 version. And in keeping with its predecessor, Van Sant 
didn't even screen it for critics in advance, just as Hitchcock didn't 
38 years ago.
Ultimately, there is one question in all "Psycho" fans' minds: Is this 
film better than the original? The answer is no, not quite, but to my 
shock, it is just about as good of a remake as could have possibly been 
expected. 
For a full synopsis of the storyline, my review for Psycho (1960) is 
recommended, but simply to recount the plot, a young banker by the name 
of Marion Crane (Anne Heche) steals $400,000 (it was $40,000 in the 
original) and while on the run, picks the wrong motel to spend the night 
in, headed by the boyish young man, Norman Bates (Vince Vaughn).
"Psycho '98," which I will refer to this film as for the rest of my 
review to avoid confusion, surely does follow Joseph Stefano's original 
screenplay, and is a bold experiment on Van Sant's part. No film has 
ever been remade shot-by-shot, but, for the most part, "Psycho '98," is. 
And since the original was such a masterpiece, the things an audience 
must go on this time around are the elements surrounding the script, 
such as the technical credits, acting, style, etc. Luckily, "Psycho 
'98," is a startling success, a film that is impressive in almost every 
department.
Van Sant has assembled a great line of actors in this film, and although 
the tempting thing to do would have been to mimic the original actors, 
they all smartly choose to add their own interpretation and spin to the 
characters, and thus, we actually do grow different feeling for the 
people than in the 1960 version. Anthony Perkins has been such a staple 
of, "Psycho," that no one could ever replace him as Norman Bates, but 
Vince Vaughn must be applauded for going in a totally different 
direction with the character, and dare I say, nearly equalling Perkins. 
Vaughn's Norman has the ability to be threatening, but I also felt far 
more sympathy for him in this film. Anne Heche is also very good as 
Marion Crane, and although Janet Leigh might have been a little better, 
Heche was more likable. Julianne Moore, as Marion's sister, Lila, 
replaces Vera Miles and is interesting because she is so much more 90's. 
She is even introduced wearing a walkman. Viggo Mortensen, as Marion's 
boyfriend, taking over for John Gavin, also does a full 180 degree turn 
on the character, giving him a cowboy attitude. Rounding out the five 
central characters is William H. Macy, outstanding as Detective 
Arbogast, actually improving upon Martin Balsam's portrayal (although he 
was fabulous, as well).
There are lots of nice, eerie touches throughout that add to the film. 
For example, the shower scene, far more graphic this time around, is 
actually more suspenseful than in the original. The set-up wisely goes 
on longer, as we see the door open and a figure walk into the bathroom, 
as we see through the shower curtain. Unlike the original, where the 
murder happens abruptly, the figure pauses for a few moments through the 
shower curtain, before...well, you know. The actual murder set-piece 
also puts a new spin on things, and is harrowing, to say the least. The 
other murder sequence, set on the staircase, is also extremely 
effective. As Arbogast is stabbed, there are quick flashes of disturbing 
images, such as a cow in the middle of a desolate road about to be hit 
by an automobile. This stylish decision, thanks to Van Sant, is 
atmospheric and ingenious. Finally, the climax set in the fruit cellar 
surpassed all of my possible expectations, and the unveiling of Norman's 
mother really was frightening. 
There are things that occur in, "Psycho '98," that Hitchcock could not 
have possibly done in 1960, because of the censors, but that add to the 
Norman Bates character. For example, while Norman peers through a hole 
in the wall at Marion undressing, he begins to masturbate, and it was 
actually touching. I couldn't believe how moving it was. Also, in the 
climax, while Lila is looking through the house, she goes into Norman's 
room, which resembles a twisted children's bedroom, equipped with toy 
soldiers, stuffed animals, and a porno magazine hidden in a drawer. It 
was subtle elements like this that made me start to care for Norman 
Bates, who is obviously a very confused, lonely man. 
Major kudos, aside from the performances, must go to the alternately 
beautiful and moody production design by Tom Foden, the disturbing, 
original cinematography by Chris Doyle, and, of course, the 
incomparable, pounding music score by Bernard Herrmann, which was 
flawlessly adapted by Danny Elfman.
So with all of this praise, why isn't "Psycho '98," quite as good as the 
original? Well, the Lila character wasn't quite as memorable as when 
Vera Miles did the role, although this is no fault of Moore's. And the 
black & white photography of Hitchcock's could never possibly be 
replaced by color. 
Although this new, "Psycho," is, in my mind, the best horror film of the 
year, I have a feeling that most people unfamiliar with the original 
will not like it very much. I have no doubt in my mind that some 
dimwitted teenagers are going to go into this thinking it will be a 
"Scream"-style slasher film, and they will be sorely disappointed. 
Although those types of movies have a rightful place in the horror 
genre, "Psycho," is better, because it is not all about killing (there's 
only two murders in the film), but instead is about the style and 
characters. Watching this film, I was struck by the extended dialogue 
scenes between some of the characters, which are so much more developed 
than most films of today's times. Director Gus Van Sant took a risky 
chance in remaking what is considered one of the greatest horror 
pictures ever made, and he has succeeded in all departments, actually 
improving upon the original in a few select aspects. Nothing will ever 
be able to take the place of Hitchcock, that is for sure, but I was 
amazed and awestruck at just how close Van Sant actually came to doing 
just that.

Title
Review for 3000 Miles to Graceland (2001)
Directed by Demian Lichtenstein.
Cast: Kurt Russell, Kevin Costner, Courteney Cox, David Kaye, Christian 
Slater, David Arquette, Bokeem Woodbine, Kevin Pollak, Howie Long, Ice T, 
Thomas Haden Church, Jon Lovitz.
2001 - 125 minutes
Rated R (for graphic violence, profanity, and sex).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, February 24, 2001.
Had "3000 Miles to Graceland" captured the lightweight, happy-go-lucky tone 
of its superior theatrical trailer, it might have been something special. 
Trashy and silly, yes, but more satisfying than what we have been served: a 
violent, gruesome, almost unrelentingly mean-spirited ride through a 
Tarantino-esque landscape of color characters, witty writing, double-crosses, 
and more than a little bloodshed. It pales in comparison to the best of the 
genre, however, as it contains about three plot twists too many, about twenty 
minutes of excessive material that would have been better left cut out, and 
such unremittingly grim and violent sequences that it ends up leaving a 
bitter aftertaste in your mouth.
The movie opens as five ex-convicts set out to rob a Las Vegas casino holding 
an Elvis Presley convention. Dressed as Presley himself so as to blend in, 
they manage to escape with $2.3 in cold, hard cash, but not before a bloody 
massacre that leave many, many police officers, as well as civilians, dead. 
Back at their hideout in a seedy desert motel, it becomes clear that 
arrogant, chain-smoking badguy Murphy (Kevin Costner) plans to walk away with 
everyone else's loot. With three of them killed, the other remaining partner, 
Michael (Kurt Russell), manages to steal the money and sets off for a money 
launderer, with Murphy in hot pursuit. Tagging along for the ride with 
Michael is Cybil Waingrow (Courteney Cox), who has already managed to bed him 
twice in the last 24 hours, and her precocious, thieving son, Jesse (David 
Kaye).
In Quentin Tarantino's own "Pulp Fiction" or "Jackie Brown," which are 
clearly two of the prime models for "3000 Miles to Graceland," there were 
characters who were flawed, but easy to root for. In other words, they didn't 
always do the right things, but were believable and, most of all, human. 
Here, some of the people filling up the screen are supposed to be the heroes, 
but none are particularly that likable, and even the nicest one (played well 
by Courteney Cox) does things throughout that are rather despicable. At one 
point, she even takes off with the money herself, leaving her own son behind 
with Michael, who is the only other "good" character to be found. While she 
reasons out this plot point later on, and does manage to become sympathetic 
again by the final act, it still does not take away how inexcusable her 
behavior has been. 
For its two-plus hours, "3000 Miles to Graceland" is pretty entertaining 
stuff. Fairly well-written and directed with a sure hand by Demian 
Lichtenstein (in his feature-film debut), the movie often used quick-cuts and 
interesting camera angles without its high style ever becoming glaring or 
pretentious. The storyline is overly familiar, but fun to watch, for the most 
part, although it does tend to become repetitive and ends up overstaying its 
welcome.
What does drag the film down, though, is the unnecessary violence that pops 
up every few minutes. From the early shoot-out at the casino, to the gory 
climactic battle, the movie is needlessly, almost unrelentingly brutal, in 
its depiction of death and destruction. This especially doesn't gel since 
much of the picture wants to be a zany road comedy, and the rest wants to be 
a heartfelt romance. Every time Murphy shoots up a few more innocent people, 
the whole enterprise screeches to a somber halt, leaving you unsure of how 
you are supposed to be feeling when the comedy appears immediately afterwards.
Even if Murphy's nonstop evil personality doesn't always fit, Kevin Costner 
(2000's "13 Days") injects much life into him. Releasing off an air of 
head-sure, macho badness, Costner has never played a character quite like 
this one, and he seems to relish the chance. Likewise, Kurt Russell (1998's 
"Soldier") is very good, adding some depth to a part that probably wasn't as 
apparent on the written page. His budding relationship with Cybil works 
solely because he and Cox have a great amount of chemistry onscreen, and work 
well together. Aside from this, it plays like more of a plotting device than 
a natural romance between two dysfunctional people. It turns out that 
Courteney Cox (2000's "Scream 3") is the best of all, delivering a snappy, 
energetic portrayal of a beautiful single mother who longs for a little 
danger (and maybe a man and some extra cash) in her life. 
The supporting cast includes Christian Slater (2000's "The Contender"), David 
Arquette (2000's "Ready to Rumble"), and Bokeem Woodbine (1998's "Caught 
Up"), as the three ill-fated men who help to rob the casino with Michael and 
Murphy; Kevin Pollak, Ice T, and Thomas Haden Church as Federal Marshals out 
to capture them and get the stolen money back; and Howie Long (1998's 
"Firestorm") as a further accomplice to the crime that sets everything into 
motion. All do fine jobs with what they are given, which, admittedly, isn't 
very much.
Despite all of its strong points (including an exciting car chase that is 
better than anything in 2000's "Gone in Sixty Seconds"), "2000 Miles to 
Graceland" remains an uneasy, uncomfortable balance between a comedic romp 
and something remarkably darker. Ultimately, screenwriters Richard Recco and 
Demian Lichtenstein are never quite able to find that missing link that might 
have bridged the gap between the major flaws in its storytelling and tone, 
and the exuberant energy that so achingly tries to break free, but never 
quite does.
   - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
     http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman
http://www.atnzone.com

Title
Review for Star Trek: Insurrection (1998)
Directed by Jonathan Frakes.
Cast: Patrick Stewart, Jonathan Frakes, Levar Burton, Brent Spiner, 
Michael Dorn, Donna Murphy, Gates McFadden, Marina Sirtis, F. Murray 
Abraham, Anthony Zerbe.
1998 - 103 minutes.
Rated PG (for mild violence).
Reviewed December 13, 1998.
By Dustin Putman 
Dustin Putman's Film Reviews ">Http://members.aol.com/filmfan16/index.html>
I have never been a "Star Trek" fan, and, to tell the truth, out of the 
five films in the series that I have seen (1,2,3,8,9), I have disliked 
all of them. I do, however, always go into one of these with an open 
mind, and the ninth film in the series, "Star Trek: Insurrection," is no 
exception.
Dropping almost completely the hard-core sci-fi element of the previous 
one in the series, "First Contact," "Insurrection," tells the story of a 
planet that holds only 600 people, known as the Ba'ku, as well as the 
Fountain of Youth. At the start of the picture, the villagers go under 
attack by a second alien species, known as the Son'a, who want to push 
all of the Ba'ku out so that their own race will not die out. Also 
attacking the Ba'ku is Data (Brent Spiner), a robot from the Star Trek 
Enterprise. After returning to Jean-Luc Picard (Patrick Stewart) and the 
gang on their space ship, no one can understand why Data was somehow 
taken over by another force. So several of the Star Trek members travel 
down to the planet of the Ba'ku, where Picard meets up and starts to 
fall in love with one of the inhabitants, a sultry, kind alien woman 
(Donna Murphy), who is over six-hundred-years-old, but looks to only be 
in her thirties.
"Star Trek: Insurrection," is a completely unoriginal and cheap-looking 
installment in the series, and is a big step down from, 1996's "First 
Contact," which at least appeared to try to make something a bit 
different. In, "Insurrection," however, it plays like a low-rent episode 
of the television show, due to the small-scale, generic storyline, and 
an emphasis on one-liners rather than excitement. The film was filled 
with nearly non-stop comedy, and worse yet, most of it fell flatter than 
a cartoon character that drops off a cliff. Meanwhile, when there were
 action sequences, they were not at all interesting or inventive, 
relying on that old reliable ticking timer that counts down very, very 
slowly. This plot device, which is seen in just about every action film 
made nowadays, is getting old fast. Are filmmakers so bankrupt of 
ingenuity and ideas that they must always have a timer ticking away 
during the climax?
Another element of, "Star Trek," films in general is that Picard seems 
to always have to have a love interest, but then she always miraculously 
disappears when the next film is made two or three years later. Although 
Donna Murphy, who falls victim to this thankless love interest role 
here, is actually one of the few characters that we get to know in the 
103-minute running time, Alfre Woodard was far superior in, "First 
Contact." She should have returned for this one, but I don't blame her 
for not wanting to waste her time with this movie's disappointing and 
often lifeless screenplay, by Michael Piller.
"Star Trek: Insurrection," is perhaps the weakest film in the "Star 
Trek," series, although I have not seen what is widely considered the 
worst, "Star Trek V: The Final Frontier." "Insurrection," is the type of 
"safe" sequel that will bewilder non-fans, since it is so low-tech 
compared to most of today's blockbuster action films (although most of 
these are honestly not very good, either), and should disappoint the 
loyal Trekkies, since it could have easily been better if the makers had 
realized that the screenplay needed to go through a few more drafts. On 
second thought, they probably should have completely thrown the script 
out. That way, they could have come up with a story that at least had a 
sign of intelligence and freshness. 

Title
Review for Center Stage (2000/I)
Directed by Nicholas Hytner.
Cast: Amanda Schull, Zoe Saldana, Susan May Pratt, Ethan Stiefel, Sascha 
Radetsky, Shakiem Evans, Ilia Kulik, Peter Gallagher, Donna Murphy, Eion 
Bailey, Debra Monk.
2000 - 114 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, May 13, 2000.
2000 has been a fairly dreadful year, thus far, in movies. Week after week, 
new releases are presented to the country, and week after week, it seems, the 
pictures aren't worth the celluloid they were made on. Sooner or later, a 
film was going to finally be released that would really get me excited, that 
would cause me to sit up straight and take notice. It wasn't a matter of 
"if," but "when." Unexpectedly, "Center Stage," by acclaimed director 
Nicholas Hytner (1996's "The Crucible"), is an often remarkably exhilarating 
and surprisingly insightful dance drama, perhaps the most impressionable and 
well-made in its genre since 1987's "Dirty Dancing." 
Wisely, in casting the movie, Hytner opted to give the majority of roles to 
real-life dancers, so as to be more free and alive in the choreography, not 
having to use camera tricks and quick jump-cuts when an actor's stand-in is 
brought into the sequence. This filmmaking decision pays off splendidly 
because, although it was initially risky casting novice actors/pro dancers in 
the major roles, Hytner has gotten fine performances out of each of them, 
along with their stunning expertise in understanding and flowing with the 
music.
"Center Stage" begins with a select group of young dancers being chosen to 
move to New York City to practice at the prestigious American Ballet Academy, 
where only three men and three women will eventually be picked at the close 
of the year to become members of the American Ballet Company. Jody Sawyer 
(Amanda Schull) is a wide-eyed 17-year-old who decides to put college on hold 
in order to go to the ABA, and follow through with the dream she has had 
since she was a child. Once there, Jody becomes close friends with roommate 
Eva (Zoe Saldana), also freshly chosen for the Academy, who has what it takes 
to be a professional dancer, but has an overly direct attitude problem that 
defers her chance of working her way onto the good sides of her instructors. 
Their third, and final, roommate is Maureen (Susan May Pratt), a highly 
talented ballerina who has been at the Academy since age 9, but who doesn't 
even want to be a dancer, instead trying to fulfill her mother's (Debra Monk) 
wishes and dreams.
Of the three, it is Jody who has the most willingness to practice and be the 
best that she can be, but is told right off the bat by one of her hard-edged 
instructors (Donna Murphy) that her feet and body type are all wrong. Once 
there, Jody is smitten by Cooper (Ethan Stiefel), a young instructor and 
nearly perfect dancer who leads her into believing he likes her, even though 
he only wants to use her. More earnest and caring to Jody's feelings and 
future is Charlie (Sascha Radetsky), a fellow dancer who, nonetheless, is 
rebuffed when Jody mistakenly believes it could work out between Cooper and 
herself. Meanwhile, Eva befriends gay dancer Erik (Shakiem Evans), while 
Maureen begins to realize how much more satisfying life could be for her 
without having dancing on her shoulders, when she starts a relationship with 
a handsome, sweet-natured waiter (Eion Bailey).
"Center Stage" is an exceptional film in more ways than one. Most notably, 
the dance sequences, which include ballet, rock dance, and salsa, are 
showstopping, alive with astonishing energy and genuine excitement, 
adjectives rarely able to be put to rightful use in present-day film reviews. 
Since most of the players have dance experience, they clearly understand the 
power that this art form has the ability to project, and all of them deliver 
a sense of joy of dancing. Some of the more unconventional setpieces are the 
highlights, including one played to the hard-edged, rocking beat of the Red 
Hot Chili Peppers' "Higher Ground," and a climactic scene between Schull, 
Stiefel, and Radetsky that is brilliantly choreographed and veritably 
effective, as it closely mirrors their relationships in real life.
Amid the dancing is, indeed, several stories that are played out, and what is 
so surprising is how well-handled each of the characters are. Jody, the 
film's main protagonist, comes-of-age in the course of the picture, not 
exactly by making the transition from child to young woman, but by learning 
what is most important, and wising up to the frequently harsh ways of the 
world. When she dances in the finale, we are indubitably able to see what 
kind of a determined, intelligent person Jody has blossomed into in the last 
year. Amanda Schull, in her film debut, is not only a beautiful face, but 
also a natural actress, and the type of likable person that one enjoys 
following throughout the film.
As Eva, Zoe Saldana is a standout. Brought up in Boston, Eva adores ballet, 
but her attitude and unwillingness to follow by a strict set of rules puts 
her at a clear disadvantage with the other dancers she is, in essence, 
learning with and competing against. 
Out of all of the main younger people in the film, only Susan May Pratt is an 
actress, rather than a dancer. Previously seen in 1999's "10 Things I Hate 
About You" and "Drive Me Crazy," Pratt is given her meatiest role to date. As 
Maureen, a girl just beginning to learn why it is that she has been so 
unhappy in her life, Pratt equips herself quite nicely, and is given one 
truthful scene between she and her boyfriend, played well by Eion Bailey, 
that is touching in an honest way, rather than one that is purposefully 
attempting to be melodramatic.
As far as the girls' male counterparts go, Ethan Stiefel, as the unreliable 
Cooper, and, especially, Sascha Radetsky, as the winning Charlie, are 
outstanding in both their respective roles, which are refreshingly not 
paint-by-numbers, as well as on the dance floor. Peter Gallagher, as a 
sympathetic dance instructor, as well as Donna Murphy and Debra Monk, as 
Maureen's overbearing mother, appear in supporting adult roles.
Despite the seriousness and candid view of much of its subject matter 
(including eating disorders, the literal pain that goes into ballet 
practicing, and the cutthroat atmosphere of dance academies), where "Center 
Stage" ultimately sparkles is in its pure entertainment value. Although not 
one to usually "cut a rug," the film opened up my limited interest in dance 
and, dare I say it, had the power of making me attracted to the act of doing 
it. Perceptively written by Carol Heikkenen and vibrantly directed by Hytner, 
"Center Stage" is the most energetic film so far this year, and one that has 
every right to be placed alongside "Fame," "All That Jazz," and "Flashdance," 
in the annals of dance film classics.

Title
Review for 8MM (1999)
Directed by Joel Schumacher.
Cast: Nicolas Cage, Joaquin Phoenix, James Gandolfini, Catherine Keener, 
Peter Stormare, Anthony Heald, Amy Morton, Myra Carter.
1999 - 125 minutes.
Rated R (for extreme violence, sexual situations, nudity, and 
profanity).
Reviewed February 27, 1999.
Who could have possibly predicted that the antichrist director who all 
but buried the "Batman" franchise with the last two installments, Joel 
Schumacher, could strike back triumphantly and almost fully redeem 
himself with "8mm," which is perhaps his best film to date. Of course, 
Schumacher has been good before (1990's "Flatliners," 1993's "Falling 
Down," 1996's "A Time to Kill"), but nothing he has made has quite been 
this dark, intelligent, and disturbing, as it delves deeply into the 
world of S&M, porn, and the infamous myth of snuff films.
Every time Tom Welles (Nicolas Cage), a surveillance expert, comes home 
to his loving wife, Amy (Catherine Keener), and baby girl, it seems that 
he always has to leave again to carry out another job. Amy cares for 
him, and knows that the large amount of money he makes is going to help 
them out a great deal, and as their baby's college money, but hates when 
he leaves them alone. At the start of "8mm," Tom is hired by the 
recently widowed, elderly Mrs. Christian (Myra Carter), after she finds 
a ghastly Super-8 snuff film in her husband's safe that allegedly shows 
a solemn teenage girl being brutally murdered by a large man dressed in 
black leathered S&M garb. "I want to know if this atrocity is true," 
Mrs. Christian says, and offering him an enormous sum of money, Tom, who 
is equally upset and outraged at what is on the film, leaves his family 
again to go in search of the girl on the film, and to find out if she 
was actually killed, or if it was staged. The first thing Tom discovers 
is that the brand of film it was made on has been out of manufacturing 
since 1992, and while searching through the millions of missing persons 
reports at the police station, Tom, to his amazement, finds the 
information about the girl, named Mary Ann. This revelation leads him to 
the girl's lonely, depressed mother (Amy Morton), and after finding Mary 
Ann's hidden diary in which she last wrote to her mother about running 
away and going to Hollywood, Tom sets off to L.A. and into the world of 
adult films, where he meets Max California (Joaquin Phoenix), a helpful, 
smarter-than-expected young man who works at one of the porno shops and 
offers to help him out.
Written by Andrew Kevin Walker (who wrote the equally downbeat "Se7en"), 
it is rare for a decidedly big-budget mainstream film to have the 
courage to delve deeply and thoughtfully into such risky and unsettling 
territory, but that is exactly what "8mm" does. There is no doubt many 
people who will be completely turned off by this superb, unconventional 
motion picture, and that it actually recieved an R-rating by the usually 
strict MPAA is particularly surprising. There isn't much in the way of 
gore, but the movie is very, very violent, and at times is almost too
 difficult to take because of the somber, controversial subject matter.
"8mm" is probably the smartest film I have seen that deals with the sick 
nature of S&M and snuff, and although at times graphic, director 
Schumacher thankfully does not exploit the goings-on, but instead, is 
wise to deal with it in a ruminant manner, unveiling the very 
frightening and unstable minds of certain people's psyche. Adding 
another thought-provoking layer to the story involves the central 
character of Tom who is a caring family man at the start, but as he 
becomes involved more and more in this "other" shady world, ultimately 
finds himself being pushed to the limit, even having to contemplate 
murder himself, and somewhat unsure if he can ever return to the life he 
once knew.
There is one scene, in particular, in "8mm" that must rank as one of the 
most nail-bitingly suspenseful film moments in recent memory, a 
seemingly endless and scary scene played exclusively to the repetitive, 
atmospheric sound of a record player's hand repeatedly running over the 
rough grooves at the end of a record. Director Schumacher milks this 
sequence for all its worth, as he does on several other occassions, and 
thus helps to make "8mm" all the more effective and tense. Also helping 
immeasurably is the odd, marvelously orchestrated music score by Mychael 
Danna. Strangely enough, while watching the film, due to where certain 
things take place, it actually reminded me off watching an actual snuff 
movie, and I have unfortunately seen one, a feature film entitled 
"Snuff" from the 1970s that was banned in several countries and depicted 
a woman being butchered in the dispicable final reel (this "murder" was 
later decided to be a fake, albeit realistic, reenactment). 
The performances are all rather memorable, with Nicolas Cage once again 
acting as the likable, if flawed, character that we follow throughout. 
Also notable are Phoenix, in a role that is easily more satisfying and 
fully-developed than some of his recent ventures, such as in "U-Turn" 
and "Clay Pigeons;" James Gandolfini as a seedy porn producer; and Amy 
Morton, who has a touching turn as the victim's grieving mother. 
Catherine Keener, outstanding in all of her independent film, such as 
1996's "Walking and Talking," 1998's "The Real Blonde," and 1998's "Your 
Friends & Neighbors," helps to breathe unexpected life into the 
relatively thankless role of Tom's wife (although she is given a few 
moving moments in the latter section).
As far as I am concerned, "8mm" has only one noticable flaw and that is 
the slightly disappointing climax set in a cemetary during a rain storm. 
By choosing to go this route, the film suddenly moves into cliched 
thriller territory, but is preserved, thanks to the perfect concluding 
scenes that are nothing short of satisfying. Not only is "8mm" 
Schumacher's best film, but it is Cage's most assured work since his 
Oscar-winning role in "Leaving Las Vegas," and the screenplay by Walker 
is brave and astute, turning what could have been a cheap-thrills freak 
show into what will most likely go down as one of the most daring and 
attentive films of the year.
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Insider, The (1999)
Directed by Michael Mann.
Cast: Russell Crowe, Al Pacino, Christopher Plummer, Diane Venora, Phillip 
Baker Hall, Debi Mazar, Hallie Eisenberg, Lindsay Crouse, Gina Gershon, 
Michael Gambon, Bruce McGill, Stephen Tobolowsky, Rip Torn, Lynne Thigpen.
1999 - 158 minutes
Rated R (for profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, November 7, 1999.
Controversial even before its release, "The Insider" has recently been under 
fire for its mostly accurate, but allegedly dramatized telling of events that 
took place in 1996 between the news show "60 Minutes," its television station 
CBS, and the tobacco industry. "60 MInutes" reporter Mike Wallace is one of 
many that has let his displeasure known, due to what he says are embellished 
details in the film, as well as the unfavorable depiction of himself. Based 
on the widely argued Vanity Fair article by Mary Brenner, "The Man Who Knew 
Too Much," filmmaker Michael Mann (1995's "Heat") has crafted a highly 
charged drama that, despite featuring next to no action, occasionally shifts 
over to being a sort of heart-stopping paranoid thriller. 
The events that surround the goings-on in 1996 begin somewhere around the 
time middle-aged Jeffrey Wigand (Russell Crowe) is fired from his job as an 
executive for a tobacco company. Jobless and with a housewife (Diane Venora), 
two young children, one that has acute asthma, and a nice home, to support, 
Jeffrey Wigand is sought out by "60 Minutes" producer Lowell Bergman (Al 
Pacino), who is working on a story about the question of whether tobacco is 
addictive, which the companies say aren't. At first trying to avoid Lowell, 
Jeffrey finally decides to hold an interview with "60 Minutes" for a paycheck 
that he really needs, despite his contractual obligation that says he won't 
ever say anything that might put Brown & Williamson in hot water. The 
revelation that Jeffrey holds, however, could very well ruin him and destroy 
CBS if they run the interview he holds, in which he reveals that the company 
knew all along cigarettes were addictive and had begun to add various other 
chemicals so as to give them more of a kick. 
For all of its very serious, disputatious subject matter, the strength of 
"The Insider" lies not with the premise, but in the excellent treatment it is 
given. In essence, a docudrama, and perhaps carrying a story more suitable 
for television, director Mann has transformed it into a 2 3/4-hour motion 
picture opus that is filled with the sort of rich details and highly felt 
characters that only a great director could come up with. 
The first half is told mostly from the point-of-view of Jeffrey Wigand, a 
recovering alcoholic, but caring husband and father, whose life ultimately 
takes a disheartening turn when his family starts to receive ominous death 
threats and are suddenly overrun by the media, signaling their separation 
and, later, divorce. Jeffrey is played by the 35-year-old Australian actor 
Russell Crowe (1996's "L.A. Confidential"), and what an amazing performance 
he gives. Abandoning his usual good looks and gaining over 20 lbs. for the 
role, Crowe is not only wholly believable as a man nearly twenty years his 
senior, but he virtually disappears into his character, equipped with a 
pitch-perfect American accent. Better yet, he portrays Jeffrey Wigand as a 
flawed, but sympathetic man whom you know cares for his family, but also is 
dedicated to telling the truth, despite his possible downfall. 
The focus then shifts midway through to Lowell Bergman, and when this occurs, 
the picture admittedly loses some of its punch. The conflict that Lowell 
faces is certainly an intriguing one, as he is devastated to discover that he 
was the antagonist that caused Jeffrey's collapse, and begins to grow 
doubtful of the validity of "60 Minutes," but Lowell simply isn't as fully 
written as Jeffrey. With a wife (Lindsay Crouse) and two teenage sons of his 
own, Lowell puts himself in Jeffrey's place and realizes he did a careless 
thing without thinking about the consequences. As Lowell Begman, Al Pacino is 
his usual captivating self, and is well-cast, but it really isn't much of a 
stretch for him, in comparison to a handful of his other roles.
The supporting cast is filled to the brimming point with first-rate talent, 
from Christopher Plummer's bravura turn as Mike Wallace, to Diane Venora's 
poignant portrayal of Jeffrey's trophy wife who wishes for something more, to 
young Hallie Eisenberg as Jeffrey's daughter, who has abandoned her famed 
Pepsi commercial spots to show that she is a natural young actress.
The largest compliment that can be given to "The Insider" is in showing the 
questionably dark corners that people can back themselves into. Director Mann 
has a gift with depicting the threat and danger of average, everyday 
surroundings, and is aided by one of the most impressive examples of 
cinematography so far this year, only equaled by "American Beauty." Director 
of photography Dante Spinotti benefits from intermittently using visually 
stunning colors amid the washed out hues of modern suburbia and New York 
City, as well as in using handheld cameras that put the audience in the 
moment, and tight close-ups. Two astounding sequences come to mind that 
should be noted, the first set at a desolate golf driving range late at 
night, and the latter involving a noise one of Jeffrey's daughters hears 
outside. Suspenseful and even a little eerie, those are two adjectives that, 
in lesser hands, you'd never hear being mentioned in a review about a film of 
this genre. Furthermore, the pulsing music score, by Lisa Gerrard and Pieter 
Bourke, is dynamite.
By the last half hour, "The Insider" had begun to wear out its welcome, 
introducing further subplots and unneeded scenes, and neglecting a few of the 
characters I would liked to have seen given more closure, particularly 
Venora. But still, Mann, a master filmmaker who admittedly doesn't know when 
to hit the edit button, has made a film that is both powerful and 
thought-provoking. Whether much of it is accurate or not to the real-life 
story remains to be seen, but as a film, even one that has taken several 
liberties in search for the truth, it is an electric drama.

Title
Review for Pay It Forward (2000)
Directed by Mimi Leder.
Cast: Kevin Spacey, Helen Hunt, Haley Joel Osment, Jay Mohr, James Caviezel, 
Angie Dickinson, Kathleen Wilhoite, Jon Bon Jovi.
2000 - 122 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity, violence, and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, October 21, 2000.
It is common nature to eventually repay someone who does a good deed for you. 
But what if, in a perfect world, that very act of kindness led you to, 
instead, pay that very good will to three other people, under the condition 
that they will do the same for three more? Idealistic? Yes. But that is the 
key notion present in "Pay It Forward," a brilliantly acted, but dramatically 
inaccurate drama, saccharinely directed by Mimi Leder (1998's "Deep Impact"). 
There is rarely a kind of film more disappointing than those that strive for 
excellence, and have what it takes to be successful, but come up far short, 
misplacing emotional honesty with audience manipulation. For every moment of 
true poignance and effectiveness, there are three that ring with a resounding 
falseness that stops the whole picture in its tracks.
It is the first day of the seventh grade, and intelligent latchkey kid Trevor 
(Haley Joel Osment) is intrigued when his hard-edged, but caring, social 
studies teacher Eugene Simonet (Kevin Spacey), whose severe scars on his face 
mask his fear of ever getting close with anyone, presents the class with an 
extra credit assignment--find a way to change the world, and put that idea 
into play. Whereas the rest of his classmates choose to begin recycling and 
picking up trash alongside the road, Trevor takes the assignment very 
seriously, devising the idea of paying it forward, in which you do something 
important to change someone's life with the understanding that they will do 
the same for three other people, and those three do the same for three more, 
and so on.
Trevor's first act of kindness is taking a heroin-addicted homeless man 
(James Caviezel) off the streets and giving him shelter in his garage, 
unbeknownst to his working-class mother, Arlene (Helen Hunt), who rarely gets 
to see Trevor, as she works two jobs (one at a Las Vegas casino, and the 
other as a waitress) and drinks herself to sleep every night. Arlene loves 
Trevor unconditionally, but he holds her in contempt for her dishonesty about 
her alcoholism. With the fear that his no-good, abusive father (Jon Bon Jovi) 
will eventually come crawling back to her, Trevor next decides to set Arlene 
and Mr. Simonet up, in hopes that both of their inner pain and suffering will 
make them a perfect match for each other.
Meanwhile, set four months later, Los Angeles news reporter Chris Chandler 
(Jay Mohr) gets his car totaled, only to have a kindly man give him a new 
Jaguar, no strings attached. This unbelievable financial sacrifice leads 
Chris to discover the Pay It Forward Movement, which he eventually tracks all 
the way to Las Vegas, where Trevor resides and has no idea his idea has 
spread across the country.
Based on the popular novel by Catherine Ryan Hyde, "Pay It Forward" 
intermittently succeeds solely due to the powerhouse performances from the 
three leads. After all, they get no help from the uneven screenplay, by 
Leslie Dixon, which is unconvincing in its romance between Arlene and Eugene, 
a subplot that gradually becomes the center of the movie. Had the emotionally 
wounded Arlene and Eugene struck up a friendship and, together, helped each 
other to come to terms with the problems and mistakes that they had made in 
their lives, the film would have been infinitely more effective than the 
melodramatic, totally unnecessary romance that comes to the forefront.
Kevin Spacey (1999's "American Beauty") and Helen Hunt (2000's "Dr. T and the 
Women") are well-cast as the conflicted Eugene Simonet and the struggling 
Arlene, respectively. Both actors are at the top of their games here, with 
Spacey always lending an assured, realistic presence to his roles, and Hunt 
never being better. Hunt, especially, has gone all out to present us with a 
decidedly unattractive portrayal of a woman who is torn between the love for 
her child and the addiction to alcohol that she can't seem to kick. Never 
once afraid to look physically worn-out and wretched, Hunt gives a brave and 
touching performance, one of the very best of the year.
In his first cinematic venture since his Oscar-nominated turn in 1999's "The 
Sixth Sense," 12-year-old Haley Joel Osment is nearly flawless. Unlike the 
vast majority of child actors, who are too precocious for their own good, and 
whom you can always catch acting for the camera, Osment delivers such 
unaffected work that he even puts to shame many A-list adult actors. "The 
Sixth Sense" wasn't at all a fluke; Osment is the real deal.
The supporting players run the gamut from emphatic to misguided. Angie 
Dickinson (2000's "Duets") is a standout as Arlene's mother, a bag lady who 
is surprisingly satisfied with where her life is at, or just comes off that 
way to hide her pain and regret as both a mother and a person. Jay Mohr 
(1999's "Go") can be a fine actor, but his role of reporter Chris Chandler, 
who tracks down the source of the Pay It Forward Movement, is utterly 
superfluous, and every time his scenes show up, you can't help but think how 
this whole subplot slows the main story down, and could have been edited 
completely from the movie without making the slightest bit of difference. 
Finally, James Caviezel (2000's "Frequency") does what he can with his few 
scenes, while Jon Bon Jovi (1998's "No Looking Back") appears in little more 
than a cameo.
The concept of paying it forward is surely a fresh one, and although it 
probably would never work in the real world, the movie remains hopeful and 
strong-spirited. What is so disheartening, then, is that its reliance on plot 
contrivances keep weighing down all that is good about the film. 
Additionally, the downbeat ending is nearly unforgivable, (minor spoiler ahead
) sparing one of the characters' lives for the sole purpose of getting the 
audience to grow weepy. Had the death been the least bit respectably or 
realistically done, then it might have been all right, but the approach that 
is taken comes off feeling like a thoroughly artificial twist. It puts the 
final nail in the coffin of "Pay It Forward," an already-flawed motion 
picture that could have added up to so much more than it ultimately does.

Title
Review for Muse, The (1999)
Directed by Albert Brooks.
Cast: Albert Brooks, Sharon Stone, Andie MacDowell, Jeff Bridges, Mark 
Feuerstein, Martin Scorsese, James Cameron, Jennifer Tilly, Rob Reiner.
1999 - 97 minutes.
Rated PG-13 (for mild profanity and brief, partial nudity).
Reviewed August 28, 1999.
Writer-director Albert Brooks continuously makes sharp, meticulously-written 
comedies, and that he has refused to reform over the years to "potty" humor 
in the vein of Jim Carrey or Adam Sandler is a commendable decision. Brooks 
can't win 'em all, though, as proven by his latest picture, "The Muse," a 
Hollywood satire, which lacks the warmth and human interest of 1996's 
"Mother," the zany entertainment of 1985's "Lost in America," and the 
whimsical aspect of 1991's "Defending Your Life." Sloppy and superficial, 
"The Muse" has some sizable laughs in its 97-minute running time, but midway 
through it veers off-course and becomes repetitive, with a final twist at the 
end that is completely unjustified and a strong sign of last-minute 
reshooting and tinkering. If the last ten minutes are the way Brooks 
originally wrote and envisioned them, then my question to him is: "What were 
you thinking?!"
50-year-old high-profile screenwriter Steven Phillips (Albert Brooks) is at 
the end of his ropes. A past nominee of an Academy Award, right after winning 
the Humanitarian Award for his career he is told by a harsh studio executive 
(Mark Feuerstein) that his past couple scripts weren't very good, and that he 
has "lost his edge." Talking with his friend, Jack (Jeff Bridges), a thriving 
fellow screenwriter, Steven is told about his secret for keeping successful: 
he has a muse, supposedly one of the actual daughters of Zeus, whose job is 
to inspire the customers she takes on. Jack convinces the muse to take on 
Steven as her next major client, and before they even meet, Steven is 
instructed to bring her a gift from Tiffany's wrapped in a blue box. The muse 
in question happens to be Sarah (Sharon Stone), a greedy, pampered woman who 
nonetheless is likable in her absolute straightforwardness, and who really 
does begin to inspire Steven concerning his next script, a comedy to star Jim 
Carrey set in an aquarium. When he is caught by his concerned wife, Laura 
(Andie MacDowell), buying a present at Tiffany's and shopping for groceries 
(including Tampons), she is reasonably apprehensive when he says he has a 
muse, but before long, she and Sarah have met and immediately hit it off, 
with Sarah even convincing Laura to go into business as a cookie baker. And 
by the time Sarah has moved into his home and taken over his bedroom, Steven 
finds his life ultimately being overrun, and starts to question if Sarah 
should stick around for much longer. 
"The Muse" would have made a fast, enjoyably smart 45-minute short film, but 
at over twice that length, its story is so thin that the film begins to go 
through the worn-out, repeated motions, until it reaches the point of no 
return in the last few scenes, which become too contrived to be believed for 
a second. It's as if the movie was written and directed by Brooks, but 
through the post-production process, an evil editor with dastly designs for 
Brooks decided to cut off his ending and replace it with something so 
ludicrous and messy that it would destroy his film as a whole and leave a bad 
taste in every audience member's mouth.
For awhile, the film really works well. The satiric moments about Hollywood 
are winning and sometimes hilarious, as when Steven goes to Universal Studios 
to have a meeting with a guy named Spielberg, but is only allowed into the 
lot if he walks. "That's like nine miles from here!" Steven remarks to the 
security man at the front gate. "Yeah, it is pretty far," he replies. A cameo 
by actress Jennifer Tilly (playing herself) is also very funny, with a sly 
one-liner concerning her last film, "Bride of Chucky." And it was amusing to 
see such filmmakers as Rob Reiner, Martin Scorsese, and James Cameron make 
walk-ons and make "all-in-good-fun" jabs at themselves. These jokes, of 
course, would work better if you know a lot about film and Hollywood, in 
general, because if you aren't sure what Cameron or Scorsese look like (or, 
saddeningly, if you've never even heard of them), their scenes will go 
straight over your head. On the basis of similar movies that make fun of the 
same subject matter, "The Muse" at least works better than the decade's worst 
major motion picture, the laughless, inane 1998 stinker, "Burn Hollywood 
Burn: An Alan Smithee Film."
The highlight of "The Muse" is easily Sharon Stone's winning, spunky 
performance, who hasn't really ever appeared in a big comedy before. Her 
comic talents have been proven somewhat with 1984's "Irreconcilable 
Differences" and 1999's "Gloria," but it is here that Stone goes all out and 
runs with her showy role, which is possibly an Oscar-caliber effort. As 
Sarah, Stone mostly remains a figure throughout, rather than a 
three-dimensional creation, but this is important since the motives of the 
character are supposed to remain mysterious. With perfect comic timing and a 
stunning presence, this is Stone's strongest turn since 1995's "Casino."
Albert Brooks, as usual, plays the same type of character he always plays, a 
neurotic, insecure man that spits out clever one-liners like they're going 
out of style. He was more likable, however, in his last film, "Mother." Andie 
MacDowell is fine as Brooks' wife, Laura, but tellingly, is not given much to 
do, and her relastionship with Steven is never satisfactorily portrayed or 
written. At least she does something, which isn't the case with Jeff Bridges, 
so much better in July's "Arlington Road," who is criminally wasted in the 
role of Steven's best friend. Bridges shows up every once in awhile, recites 
a few ho-hum lines, and makes his exit without much of a chance to make any 
sort of impression.
The clear potential that "The Muse" possesses only makes the final product 
even more of a disappointment. As with his character of Steven, Brooks has 
finally run out of steam in his screenplay for this film, and the ending, 
which doesn't really solve or wrap up anything, leaves you questioning what 
the whole point was. Some jokes work wonders, other fall flat (Bridges' 
tennis scene comes to mind), and all the while it is Stone who walks aways 
unscathed. That final twist that the film concludes on, though--it is an 
outrage, and it is a cheat.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman.
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for World Is Not Enough, The (1999)
Directed by Michael Apted.
Cast: Pierce Brosnan, Sophie Marceau, Robert Carlyle, Denise Richards, Judi 
Dench, Robbie Coltrane, Desmond Llewelyn, Maria Grazia Cucinotta, Ulrich 
Thomsen, John Cleese, Samantha Bond, Michael Kitchen, Colin Salmon, Serena 
Scott Thomas, John Seru, Claude-Oliver Rudolph.
1999 - 128 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for violence, mild profanity, and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, November 20, 1999.
While "The World is Not Enough" is only the third 007 film I've seen (the 
other two being 1995's "Goldeneye" and 1997's "Tomorrow Never Dies"), the 
formula has already begun to wear awfully thin. For any James Bond fan, there 
is, no doubt, a sort of comfort in walking into the theater because you know 
there will be a flashy opening sequence, followed by the obligatory opening 
credits of silhouettes of slinky women while the title song (performed by a 
musician or band) plays on the soundtrack. You know there will be at least 
two or three fast-paced action scenes each hour, that there will be a good 
girl and a femme fatale, that Bond will sack a few babes, and will get his 
kicks out of using all sorts of contraptions and weapons. You know there 
will, of course, also be a maniacal villain who has his heart set on mass 
destruction, and that he will be defeated in the grand finale, where James 
Bond will live happily ever after (at least until the next film in the 
franchise, coming to a theater near you in the fall of 2001).
Directed by Michael Apted, who has a gift for swinging from studio efforts 
(this, 1994's "Nell") to documentaries (his long running "7 Up" series; "42 
Up" is currently in limited release), "The World is Not Enough" is superior 
to the last two aforementioned Bond movies because, while still painfully 
generic in many ways, also has some less obligatory elements that surprised 
me. The film is relatively fast-paced and Apted sets up an action set-piece 
with impressive expertise and excitement. Meanwhile, the characters, 
performances, and dialogue range from delightful to downright horrid. In a 
nutshell, it's akin to cotton candy; you consume it with interest for its 
duration, but there is nothing that is particularly filling about it, and 
you're left either wanting more or nearly forgetting that you even ate it.
After the showstopping prologue that takes us from Bilbao, Spain, to across 
the waters of London, and finally, up in a hot-air balloon, things settle 
down as the actual story sets in. James Bond (Pierce Brosnan) is assigned by 
M (Judi Dench, in a juicier role than her ridiculous, Oscar-winning, walk-on 
cameo in 1998's "Shakespeare in Love") to protect Elektra King (Sophie 
Marceau), a stunning, young woman whose recently deceased father owned an 
extravagant oil pipeline, and who is suspected of being hunted down by the 
crazed Renard (Robert Carlyle). You see, Elektra was once kidnapped by Renard 
and narrowly escaped, but since then he has been shot through the skull, 
causing him to grow more physically powerful by the day, even while he is 
dying little-by-little. 
"The World is Not Enough" rarely strays far from its well-worn path of 
predictability, but there are a few virtues to mention. For one, Renard is 
unusually memorable and stirring for the villain role, and we even get to 
briefly see his softer side in a romantic scene. The success of the villain 
this time around, I think, owes itself less to the mediocre screenplay, 
written by three people(!), Neal Purvis, Robert Wade, and Bruce Feirstein, 
and more to the acting chops of Robert Carlyle, who is a character chameleon. 
Carlyle, adding a second dimension to, essentially, a one-dimensional role, 
can play a normal joe (1997's "The Full Monty"), a psychotic cannibal (1999's 
"Ravenous"), or a wacko intent on destroying the world at the role of a 
camera.
Faring best is the alluring, saucy Sophie Marceau, as Elektra King. Eluding a 
cool intelligence about her, Marceau is not only the most fascinating 
character in the film, but whenever she shares a scene with him, uncovers the 
turgid blandness of Pierce Brosnan. Having no one else to compare Brosnan 
with since he is the only Bond I've ever seen, he nonetheless is a giant bore 
of an actor who constantly sleepwalks through the same types of roles. Quite 
often while watching the film, I would almost forget all about the James Bond 
character, even though he was in almost every scene, because his costars 
rarely ever failed to upstage him. 
That is, except for Denise Richards, vacuously spouting out inane lines that 
she couldn't sell to save her life, as Dr. Christmas Jones ("Don't even think 
of making any jokes; I've heard them all"), a brilliant scientist. Richards, 
the weakest link in last summer's highly underrated "Drop Dead Gorgeous," is 
given nothing to do here, but maybe that's for the best. The fact that 
director Apted wants us to believe she is an atomic scientist is laughable 
unto itself, although that is probably appropriate in the context of the 007 
series. What isn't so forgivable is her casting altogether; Marceau makes 
such an astounding Bond girl that Richards' performance only flounders even 
more in comparison.
The final nail in the coffin of "The World is Not Enough" is its sheer 
calculation in the story department. The James Bond series is little more 
than a conveyer belt that  continuously goes around and around, never 
changing its tried-and-true course. For some 007 fans, this may be enough, 
and it really is an improvement over the previous two. Thankfully, Apted 
spares us the Talking Villain cliche that was so prominently featured in 
"Tomorrow Never Dies," but that's about all he spares us. For casual viewers 
who are not interested in James Bond, skip "The World is Not Enough," which 
offers zilch in the originality arena, go see "Sleepy Hollow," instead, and 
thank me later. You're welcome, in advance.

Title
Review for Torch Song Trilogy (1988)
Directed by Paul Bogart.
Cast: Harvey Fierstein, Brian Kerwin, Matthew Broderick, Anne Bancroft, 
Karen Young, Ken Page, Charles Pierce, Eddie Castrodad, Axel Vera.
1989 - 120 minutes.
Rated R (for profanity and sexual situations).
Reviewed November 9, 1998.
"Torch Song Trilogy," based on a popular Broadway play by Harvey 
Fierstein, is an earnest, emotionally accurate, but seriously flawed 
drama. 
The film is a character study of Arnold Beckoff (played without a false 
note by Fierstein), a man working as a drag queen who always knew he was 
gay, and wasn't afraid to show it. Beginning in 1971 after a small 
prologue, Arnold meets Ed (Brian Kerwin) at a bar and they immediately 
hit it off, but Ed immediately lets it be known that he is also 
interested in women, even though we sense it is only because he is 
afraid to come out to his family and friends. After things get too 
complicated for Ed, he leaves him, and Arnold is seeked out by a much 
younger fasion model, Alan (Matthew Broderick), who meets him at the 
club where Arnold works as the drag queen. Things begin to look up for 
Arnold, but tragedy strikes just as he begins to believe that he finally 
has found true love. Although on the surface, Arnold seems very secure 
with his sexuality, we begin to sense that he is hurting very much 
underneath because he knows that his mother (Anne Bancroft) secretly 
wishes he had never been born.
"Torch Song Trilogy" would be an examplary motion picture, if not for 
its many problems. It is serious and well acted by all, but the gay 
characters are mostly stereotypical, which is a surprise, since 
Fierstein, a homosexual in real life, wrote it. All of the people are 
portrayed as very promiscuous, and although this may have been the case 
in the 70's, before AIDS surfaced, it still feels a little too trite.
Another problem is that time moves way too fast throughout. At some 
points, three to five years will pass between certain scenes, which 
disappointed me since a lot of major events had happened, we find out, 
off-screen. This is no doubt because the film had to come in at two 
hours, but it still felt a little rushed. Many of the plot points could 
also be easily predicted, especially the untimely fate of Alan, which is 
clumsily telegraphed well in advance. 
Many moments in "Torch Song Trilogy," do ring true, however, despite its 
faults, and I suspect it is largely due to Fierstein brilliant 
performance. I have never seen him have such a juicy role before, and he 
pulls it off flawlessly. Karen Young, in a supporting role as Ed's 
sympathetic wife, also adds a lot of humanity to all of her scenes, 
although I wish she would have had more to do. A confrontational 
penultimate sequence is also very well-done, between Fierstein and 
Bancroft.
"Torch Song Trilogy" is full of good intentions, and has a fair share of 
strong points, so it is especially disappointing that Fierstein hadn't 
changed some of the weaker elements in the screenplay. I don't know how 
this material worked on a stage, but as a film, it is well-done in many 
respects, but could have been much more.
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for I Still Know What You Did Last Summer (1998)
Directed by Danny Cannon.
Cast: Jennifer Love Hewitt, Brandy, Freddie Prinze Jr., Matthew Settle, 
Mekhi Phifer, Jennifer Esposito, Bill Cobbs, Jeffrey Combs, Jack Black, 
Muse Watson.
1998 - 96 minutes.
Rated R (for violence, gore, profanity, and drug use).
Reviewed November 14, 1998.
By Dustin Putman 
Dustin Putman's Film Reviews >
So much for sweet returns. After smart horror films were starting to be 
made again after the exploitative 80's slasher movies, starting with 
1996's "Scream," and followed by "Scream 2," "Urban Legend," and the 
original, "I Know What You Did Last Summer," a film like, "I Still Know 
What You Did Last Summer," was bound to be made sooner or late. It is a 
perfect example of the exact reason why horror films temporarily burned 
out, and that is because they reached for the lowest-common-denominator 
in filmmaking, favoring non-stop deaths and gore for suspense, and 
trading in fleshed out, likable characters for one-dimensional nitwits. 
It has been exactly one year since Julie James (Jennifer Love Hewitt) 
suffered through the ordeal of being terrorized by Ben Willis, a 
psychopathic fisherman whom her friends and she accidentally hit in the 
middle of the road, and then, thinking he was dead, dumped him into the 
ocean. Since then, Julie has relocated to Boston University, and 
although often paranoid and haunted by bad dreams, she has been able to 
put her life back together. When Julie's friend, Karla (Brandy), is 
called up by a radio station and answers correctly what the capital of 
Brazil is, she wins a vacation to the Bahamas for four people, which 
also includes Karla's horny boyfriend, Tyrell (Mekhi Phifer), and Will 
(Matthew Settle), who Karla sets Julie up with after her own boyfriend, 
Ray (Freddie Prinze Jr., also returning from the original), doesn't show 
up. When they reach the secluded island, they discover it is the last 
day of the open season, and will be stranded there for the 4th of July 
weekend with a few employees to fend off a violent storm headed for 
them. Of course, Julie, her friends, and the workers aren't the only 
ones there, as the murderous Ben Willis, dressed in fisherman garb, 
returns to seek revenge on Julie once and for all.
It is a sad state of affairs when a movie like, "I Still Know What You 
Did Last Summer," is made. I am a very big fan of horror movies, and so 
it is especially disheartening to find out that this sequel to 
"IKWYDLS," which I am a fan of, is almost an exact replica of a "Friday 
the 13th" movie. While the original focused more on the story and 
characters, as well as genuinely suspenseful moments, thanks to the 
screenplay by Kevin Williamson (who didn't return to write the sequel, 
and it shows), "I Still Know..." has no story to speak of, and is so 
vacuous of ideas, that the filmmakers, were forced to have a murder 
occur every five minutes just to keep the audience interested. Also gone 
are any signs of character development, and since every single character 
died before I got to know them, all I was left with was to stare at the 
screen, indifferent to what was going on. While I cared about the fates 
of the characters in the original, it made no difference to me in this 
sequel who lived and died. They were all paper-thin and pointless, 
except to become victims to the lethal hook of the fisherman.
Another element that made the original so memorable were some superbly 
crafted set-pieces, like the store sequence with Sarah Michelle Gellar, 
but there are none to speak of in this sequel (although they do come 
close at one moment with Brandy). Since so many people were killed every 
couple minutes, the suspense and scares evaporated faster than salt in 
water. Also of note is the mystery of the second killer, and accomplice 
to Ben, but it is obvious from the first frame who it is, and so I 
couldn't even have fun at that, like I did in the "Scream" movies and, 
"Urban Legend."
It figures that just as slasher films were starting to get some 
recognition again, a film would come along and ruin it for everyone 
else. Maybe the people who made, "I Still Know What You Did Last 
Summer," should have realized that in order to make a good movie, you 
must have a screenplay---or at least one that isn't such a black hole 
for thoughts and ideas. The ending of the film inevitably leaves the 
door wide open for a third part, but judging from this amazingly 
lackluster first sequel, everyone involved should have quit while they 
were still ahead. 

Title
Review for Cats & Dogs (2001)
Directed by Lawrence Guterman.
Cast: Jeff Goldblum, Elizabeth Perkins, Alexander Pollock, Miriam Margolyes.
Voices: Sean Hayes, Tobey Maguire, Alec Baldwin, Susan Sarandon, Michael 
Clarke Duncan, Jon Lovitz, Joe Pantoliano.
2001 - 90 minutes
Rated PG (for mild violence).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, July 6, 2001.
Judging from the theatrical trailers and TV ads, "Cats and Dogs" should have 
been a good movie. It should have been original, energetic, witty, and, most 
of all, a love letter to dog and cat lovers everywhere. But it isn't. A 
family movie that is too juvenile to impress adults (you know, the way the 
recent "Shrek" did), and far too meanspirited to be heartwarming or sweet, 
"Cats and Dogs" is a surprisingly ill-advised misfire that surely won't be 
garnering many devoted fans above the age of single digits.
The title says it all--the film is a 90-minute battle between cats and dogs 
over world domination. Mr. Tinkles (voiced by Sean Hayes) is a beautiful, 
white Persian cat who everyone thinks is cute, but actually is the 
no-holds-barred leader of the feline population. When word gets out that he 
plans to steal the anti-dog-allergy serum that a human scientist (Jeff 
Goldblum) has created, it's up to the scientist's new puppy (voiced by Tobey 
Maguire) and his camaraderie of fellow dogs to stop the fiendish Mr. Tinkles.
Directed by Lawrence Guterman, "Cats and Dogs" is not particularly enjoyable, 
and it's only intermittent smiles are produced from the adorableness of the 
animals, rather than the dim-witted screenplay by John Requa and Glenn 
Ficarra. Dull and by-the-numbers, there are no characters (human or pet) that 
gain our sympathies or that we grow to like, and the only creativity to be 
found is merely hinted by the overall premise of cats against dogs.
There is also an obvious bias over the dogs in the picture, all of which are 
presented as the "good guys." The cats, on the other hand, are scheming, 
manipulative, and nasty, so the movie doesn't even play fair. How are 
audiences able to have fun in deciding who to root for when the cats are so 
blatantly characterized as the villains? Aside from Sean Hayes' inspired 
voiceover work for Mr. Tinkles, the other animals are giant bores, including 
those played by such well-known thesps as Susan Sarandon, Alec Baldwin, and 
Tobey Maguire.
The human cast is nearly non-existent, both in terms of screen time and 
development. Jeff Goldblum (1998's "Holy Man") must be down on his luck these 
days; how else can you explain him taking a wasted role reminiscent of Rick 
Moranis' in 1989's "Honey, I Shrunk the Kids," and then not even being any 
good? Elizabeth Perkins (2000's "28 Days"), as Goldblum's wife; Alexander 
Pollock (1999's "Resurrection"), as their son; and Miriam Margolyes (1999's 
"End of Days"), as Mr. Tinkles' annoying maid, are equally slumming it with 
parts that anybody could have played just as well, or better.
The frequent attempts at humor in "Cats and Dogs," including yet another riff 
on "The Matrix," are strictly amateurish, and aside from the clever first 
scene, no attempt even seems to have been made to take advantage of its 
ingenious storyline. Ultimately, the only mercy that is given to audiences 
unfortunate enough to end up in a theater showing "Cats and Dogs" is that 
it's only 90 minutes. Without an ounce of entertainment value, anything more 
would have, quite honestly, been torture.
   - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
     http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman

Title
Review for Little Nicky (2000)
Directed by Steven Brill.
Cast: Adam Sandler, Harvey Keitel, Rhys Ifans, Patricia Arquette, Tommy 
"Tiny" Lister Jr., Rodney Dangerfield, Reese Witherspoon, Allen Covert, Kevin 
Nealon, John Lovitz, Quentin Tarantino, Michael McKean, Clint Howard, Ellen 
Cleghorne, Dana Carvey, Ozzy Osbourne.
2000 - 84 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for violence, nudity, sexual situations, and profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, November 11, 2000.
Adam Sandler movies are easily an acquired taste--aside from almost all young 
teenage boys, who eat them up--and with every film he makes where he plays a 
normal guy whose ability to make audiences laugh comes from his charisma and 
talent, there are at least two movies that rely on him to be quirky and 
intellectually deficient, complete with a speech impediment. "Little Nicky," 
directed by Steven Brill, falls into the latter, lesser category, as his 
title character walks with a hunched-over back, has a crooked mouth, and, 
yes, a speech impediment. Sandler can be a great comic, but only with the 
right material, and when he doesn't try so hard. Here, he is afforded no help 
by the lame, forgettable screenplay that he cowrote with Tim Herlihy and 
director Brill. Is "Little Nicky" funny? Sometimes. But in the annals of the 
wildly popular Sandler flicks, this one falls into the same league as 1998's 
"The Waterboy"--better than 1995's stupefying "Billy Madison," but not as 
good as 1996's "Happy Gilmore" or 1999's "Big Daddy," and worlds below his 
one great picture, 1998's "The Wedding Singer."
Although he has a wonderful relationship with his father, the Devil (Harvey 
Keitel), Little Nicky (Adam Sandler) is a sweet, good-natured soul who 
doesn't seem to have much of the dark side in him, despite living in hell. 
With his father's 10,000-year reign to the purgatorial throne drawing to a 
close, it is up to him to choose one of his sons to succeed him. The only 
problem is, the Devil doesn't feel like his oldest boys, Adrian (Rhys Ifans) 
and Cassius (Tommy "Tiny" Lister Jr.), are mature enough to handle it, and 
Nicky is far too "heavenly." Adrian and Cassius, outraged at their father's 
decision, escape to New York City and plan to derail all laws, creating a 
Hell on Earth. 
With his body already beginning to deteriorate, the Devil sends Nicky out 
into the world above to find Cassius and Adrian and get them to drink from a 
magic-lamp-like flask that will suck and trap them in it for eternity. 
Partnered up with a wise bulldog named Mr. Beefy (voice by Robert Smigel), 
Nicky rents an apartment with an in-the-closet Broadway show fanatic (Allen 
Covert) and begins to search for his brothers. He even meets a cute fashion 
design major named Valerie (Patricia Arquette), all the while starting to 
feel strong emotions he's never felt before. 
Aside from the whole Heaven and Hell angle, "Little Nicky" is nearly a carbon 
copy, in terms of plot developments and stock characters, of all of Sandler's 
starring-role filmography. There is always a sidekick or two, with at least 
one of them gay, and there is a token love interest that he has a falling-out 
with due to a misunderstanding, but whom get back together before the end 
credits. There even is a person or two who stand in the way of the main 
character's wants and dreams. While the tried-and-true formula isn't solely 
relegated to movies with Adam Sandler, it is finally beginning to wear out 
its welcome. We've seen all of this before, and done much better and with far 
more charm ("The Wedding Singer"). Here, even the romance between Sandler and 
Patricia Arquette comes off as a slight, unfeeling subplot that isn't given 
hardly any screen time to develop.
With Sandler doing his usual schtick, there is some admitted fun in the large 
supporting players. Arquette, as the mousy Valerie, is winning, but given 
very little to do, while Harvey Keitel and Rodney Dangerfield, as the Devil 
and Lucifer, are very funny. Dangerfield, especially, gets a few zinger 
lines, including a clever placement for his getting "no respect" motto. Jon 
Lovitz, as a peeping tom who dies in the opening scene, left to be sexually 
violated by a giant black crow for all of eternity, is priceless, and his 
brief subplot in the opening is comically superior to anything else in the 
movie. Kevin Nealon, as a demon who grows a pair of buxom breasts on the top 
of his head, is eccentrically repulsive. 
Saving the best for last, the effervescently gifted and beautiful Reese 
Witherspoon shows up near the end as Sandler's loving and ageless mother, a 
heavenly angel who hangs out with her Valley Girl-style friends, and steals 
the show. Why Witherspoon agreed to be a part of such a waste of a movie is 
unknown, but for her ten minutes of screen time, she steals your heart and 
manages to tickle your funny bone in a fresh and innocent way. Aside from 
her, the film leaves you feeling oddly unclean with its repugnant premise and 
settings.
Laden with cheesy special effects galore, and not without a seemingly 
required helping of toilet humor and sexual innuendo (Adolf Hitler, for 
example, gets a pineapple showed up his backside while wearing a maid's 
uniform at four o'clock every day as his punishment). "Little Nicky" is 
marginally enjoyable, and not exactly a downright failure, but it is 
uninspired. A divergence for the eyes and little else, the movie has the 
ability to stay with you for about as long as its slim 84-minute running 
time, and then exits from your memory. Not exactly a sign of comedic 
brilliance, or a sign of being that good at all.
    - Copyright 2000 by Dustin Putman
      Reviews by Dustin 
Putman - http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman

Title
Review for Thin Red Line, The (1998)
Directed by Terrence Malick.
Cast: Sean Penn, Jim Caviezal, Ben Chaplin, Nick Nolte, Elias Koteas, 
John Cusack, Adrien Brody, Woody Harrelson, John C. Reilly, Miranda 
Otto, John Travolta, Dash Mihok, David Harrod, Nick Stahl, George 
Clooney.
1998 - 166 minutes.
Rated R (for violence, gore, profanity, brief nudity, and sexual 
situations).
Reviewed January 21, 1999.
Terrence Malick, widely regarded as one of the most visually stunning 
film directors of all time, made two films in the '70s, "Badlands" and 
"Days of Heaven," respectively, and then completely vanished for many 
years. His first film in twenty years, "The Thin Red Line," set during 
World War II, is like no other war picture I have ever seen; one of 
extraordinary beauty that goes beyond the norm of simply setting up 
characters and battles (even those the film does have these) and into a 
plain of astonishing metaphysics.
In a surprising turn from a regular movie set during a war which usually 
begins in the depths of a battle, "The Thin Red Line" starts out with an 
unidentified man (Jim Caviezal) gently walking around and observing a 
Melanesian village, where the natives all appear to be in a state of 
deep harmony. As I watched this striking prologue, the film really was 
able to fill me with a strange feeling of inner peace, especially in a 
small, moving scene where he has a warm conversation with one of the 
female natives who is holding her tired, young child. Eventually, this 
peaceful tranquility is interrupted with an oncoming war ship, and we 
discover that the man is actually the AWOL soldier, Private Witt, who is 
being picked up by his gruff commanding officer, Lieutenant Colonel Tall 
(Nick Nolte), and Sergeant Welsh (Sean Penn). The ship is headed for 
Guadalcanal, and soon we are placed directly in the middle of the 
infamous battle, where the soldiers alternate through voice narration in 
pondering some of their deepest thought about their lives and human 
nature, in general.
Due to the timing of the film, comparisons are inevitable between "The 
Thin Red Line" and last summer's "Saving Private Ryan," although they 
are actually quite different in style. While "Saving Private Ryan" 
contained graphic battle scenes, the film itself was undoubtedly more 
mainsteam and accessible for regular audiences, due to its neatly 
written characters and story, as well as the occasionally 
oversentimental emotions (after the success of "Patch Adams," I have 
realized how much most Americans love corny, melodramatic situations). 
"The Thin Red Line," on the other hand, plays like a lyrical poem, much 
more meditative and thought-provoking in its ideas and treatment. Not 
only that, but even though it is not as bloody as "...Ryan," I found 
myself much more enthralled with this picture, particularly in its 
reflective storytelling techniques and seemingly more realistic overall 
depiction of war.
"The Thin Red Line" has been almost unanonymously acclaimed by critics, 
but it has been seldomly criticized for its use of narration, which is 
said throughout the film by eight different characters, telling us their 
personal thoughts. Some critics object to the scholarly and overtly 
mature thoughts that are swarming in the soldiers' heads, which I find 
to be a rather offensive complaint towards those who have ever fought in 
a war. The truth is that humans naturally have many, many thoughts 
constantly in their minds, and I find it wholly believable that people 
under such life-threatening circumstances would think and question 
themselves about things of such importance and meaning.
For a large majority of its almost three-hour running time, "The Thin 
Red Line" is set in the midst of the battle of Guadalcanal, and it is 
here that we get to know the wide array of characters. Terrence Malick 
acquired a huge cast of people, both known and unknown, and it was only 
in the editing room that he structured the film, while trying to cut a 
rumored million feet of film down to three hours. Because of this, 
previously expected storylines were completely dropped and some cast 
members totally disappeared from the final cut, such as Bill Pullman and 
Lukas Haas. Regardless of this fact, and the unorthodox way that the 
characters enter and exit the picture without much of an introduction or 
farewell, I was pleasantly surprised that I still was able to get to 
know the people, even if it only was from body language or subtle 
observation. Ben Chaplin is, perhaps, the most effective in the cast as 
a soldier who often is reminiscing about his angelic wife (Miranda Otto) 
back home. As Witt, Jim Caviezal also makes an impression due to his 
brilliant performance in the opening section set at the Melanesian 
village. After "Affliction," Nick Nolte does another high-powered turn 
as the always-hollering Lt. Col. Tall, and obviously put his heart and 
soul (as well as his voice box) into the role. Finally, Woody Harrelson 
is heartbreaking as the doomed Sergeant Keck, and Elias Koteas 
poignantly portrays the scared and confused Capt. James Staros, who 
fears risking the lives of his men when ordered to ascend farther up the 
hill upon the Japanese enemies. The only flaw in the cast (and it isn't 
the actor's fault) is George Clooney, who appears right at the end and 
comes off as an example of pointless casting in order to get another 
"big name" star.
Coming away from "The Thin Red Line," I was not only struck by the 
intriguing questions the film brings up, but also the unforgettable 
images that appear throughout. As a visual stimulant, the recent "In 
Dreams" and this film certainly do the trick unlike anything else I've 
seen in a long time. As the camera gracefully moves among the giant, 
swaying blades of grass, the film causes you to feel like you have 
physically entered into the exotic setting. Other images of equal 
pulchritude include the shots of the sun gleaming through the trees; the 
bamboo stalks blowing in the wind; an alligator slowly descending into 
the depths of a river; and a fatally wounded baby chick wrestling around 
on the ground for dear life. For a mainstream audience used to 
conventional fare, "Saving Private Ryan" will most likely seem superior 
in their eyes because this film is more deliberately paced. However, for 
those viewers interested in a phenomenally more challenging piece of 
work, "The Thin Red Line" is the way to go. Along with Oliver Stone's 
"Platoon," "The Thin Red Line" is easily the best war film I have seen 
and, just in the way that Malick takes WWII and then is able to 
transform everything into a more meaningful tapestry about human nature, 
is an amazing triumph that proves what a master Terrence Malick is at 
his craft. Hopefully, he won't wait until the year 2018 to make his next 
masterwork.

Title
Review for Boys and Girls (2000)
Directed by Robert Iscove.
Cast: Freddie Prinze Jr., Claire Forlani, Jason Biggs, Amanda Detmer, Heather 
Donahue, Alyson Hannigan, Monica Arnold.
2000 - 92 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, June 17, 2000.
Freddie Prinze, Jr. has said in recent interviews that the reason he made a 
string of teen movies in the last two years is because, in a sense, his goal 
was to create a trilogy of films that his generation could relate to, and 
appreciate. The opening part of the film threesome, "She's All That," was a 
cliched and rather uninspired high school dramedy that had a cast of fresh 
faces, but stereotyped each and every one of them. "Down to You" was the 
second film, inferior to "She's All That," and ruined by a mess of a 
screenplay and Prinze, Jr.'s amateurish performance. The final part of the 
trilogy, "Boys and Girls," is the best of the three, intelligently written 
and with just a little more going on in its head than the usual film of its 
type. It also can be noted as Freddie Prinze, Jr.'s very first movie in which 
he is actually pretty good in it. Usually striking frequent false notes in 
each of his performances, he has finally come into his own as an actor here, 
and it's a good thing, for the cast of "Boys and Girls" is its strongest 
asset.
Ryan (Freddie Prinze, Jr.) and Jennifer (Claire Forlani) first met on an 
airplane when they were 12-years-old, both flying alone en route to Los 
Angeles. The free-thinking Jennifer had just gotten her first period, and her 
graphic talks of it both confused and disgusted the anal-retentive Ryan, with 
their conversation eventually leading into a string of insults. Their next 
encounter was four years later in high school, with Jennifer now a 
cheerleader and Ryan the football team's mascot. 
No matter how different Jennifer and Ryan were, their paths always seemed to 
cross, and it does again two years later when Ryan enters into the University 
of California in Berkeley, where Jennifer is a sophomore. Primarily spanning 
the first three years of Ryan's college experience, he and Jennifer gradually 
become best friends, their varying personalities a perfect fit to help each 
other out in their relationships when they most need it. Ryan is a structural 
engineering major, with his life all mapped out, whereas Jennifer is a Latin 
major with absolutely no idea how she could use such a thing to get a job in 
the future. Jennifer is afraid of commitment because of all of the times she 
has been burned by guys, while Ryan just wants someone who he can love 
unconditionally, and who is right for him. What isn't clear to Jennifer, 
however, is that the one that could really make her truly happy is right in 
front of her--the kind of guy who could be the love of her life, as well as 
her dearest friend.
"Boys and Girls" is predictable, but that is to be expected. What does come 
as a surprise is how much this Generation X and Y-aimed comedy-drama has in 
common with Woody Allen's films, most notably 1977's "Annie Hall." Despite 
the advertising campaign that makes "Boys and Girls" appear to be an ensemble 
picture, the film is essentially a two-character show, with Freddie Prinze, 
Jr. and Claire Forlani taking up almost all the screentime. All supporting 
characters are purposefully inconsequential catalysts that aid in taking Ryan 
and Jennifer through the journey that inevitably brings the two together. 
This style of storytelling works because it adds a layer of realism to the 
proceedings, where people can come in and out of your life before you have 
time to stop and realize it.
Besides the aforementioned Prinze, Jr., Claire Forlani (1998's "Meet Joe 
Black") surpasses the unextraordinary material to bring Jennifer an added 
dimension I suspect wasn't present in the screenplay, by "The Drews." Forlani 
is the type of classy actress you would never associate with teen movies, but 
here she is, in a role that is admittedly unlike any she has taken on before. 
Together, Prinze, Jr. and Forlani make for an appealing couple with not a lot 
of fiery chemistry, but delightful as close buddies.
While Jason Biggs (1999's "American Pie") has been highly touted in the ads 
for "Boys and Girls," he is not onscreen nearly as much as you would be led 
to believe. As Hunter, Ryan's girl-crazy, compulsively-lying roommate, Biggs 
is the comic relief of the film, and is well-cast. The same goes for Amanda 
Detmer (2000's "Final Destination"), as Jennifer's socially inept friend, 
Amy, who relies on a therapist to make the brunt of her decisions. Detmer 
brings added energy to her scenes, and is a likable presence throughout. 
In a return to the big screen after her stunning debut in last year's "The 
Blair Witch Project," Heather Donahue is very funny as Megan, Ryan's 
straightforward girlfriend who approaches him about going out and makes it 
clear that "I always zoom in on what I want." Donahue is only in a few 
scenes, but makes a lasting impression, causing you to wish she could have 
garnered more to work with. Finally, Alyson Hannigan (1999's "American Pie") 
and musical artist Monica Arnold briefly appear in cameos as, respectively, 
Ryan's high school sweetheart and one of Hunter's fleeting flings.
At times a bit overly talky, and oddly feeling as if it might have been 
better equipped as a stage play, "Boys and Girls" is, nonetheless, a 
well-made romance that may not always work, but is appreciatively 
overambitious in its ideas about relationships and the opposite sex. It's 
better to aim high and only occasionally achieve its goals, I think, rather 
than merely accepting the bare minimum in character and story 
developments--something the majority of so-called "teen" films fall right 
into the trap of, without looking back.

Title
Review for Mumford (1999)
Directed by Lawrence Kasdan.
Cast: Loren Dean, Hope Davis, Jason Lee, Mary McDonnell, Alfre Woodard, Zooey 
Deschanel, Pruitt Taylor Vince, Martin Short, David Paymer, Jane Adams, Ted 
Danson, Elisabeth Moss.
1999 - 111 minutes
Rated R (for nudity and profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, September 25, 1999.
"Mumford" would appear to have a great deal going for it, and it does. An 
extraordinary ensemble cast, resembling that of writer-director Lawrence 
Kasdan's marvelous previous efforts (1983's "The Big Chill," 1991's "Grand 
Canyon"); a director who has proven his filmmaking skills many times before; 
and the fact that it would be primarily character-driven, all gave reason to 
expect that this would be a bright, winning, and intelligent comedy. Little 
by little, as the film played itself out, it became abundantly clear that 
"Mumford" is a prime example of a movie that is played out entirely on the 
surface, with not a thought or idea beneath the characters' exteriors. What 
Kasdan has done here is taken a step way down; where his two aforementioned 
pictures earned points for their knowing human observations and realism, 
"Mumford" is strictly a television sitcom masquerading as a feature film, and 
is instantly forgettable once the end credits begin to roll.
The peculiarly-named psychologist, Dr. Mumford (Loren Dean), showed up in the 
quaint, Mayberry-style town of Mumford only three month ago, and the 
residents are already starting to flock to him, whether they really need 
therapy or not. Sharing a home with self-named cafe owner Lily (Alfre 
Woodard), Mumford has the gift to be able to really listen to what people 
have to say, and more often than not can completely understand and sympathize 
with their problems. Some of his patients include Althea (Mary McDonnell), a 
compulsive shopper who is married to a jerk (Ted Danson) and has two worried 
teenage kids; a pharmacist (Pruitt Taylor Vince) with such low self-esteem 
that he is constantly making up fantasy stories about a large guy with big 
abs; Nessa (Zooey Deschanel), a rebellious, pretty young girl; and a lawyer 
(Martin Short) who talks and talks but doesn't seem to have anything worth 
saying. Seeked out by Skip Skipperton (Jason Lee), an appealing, young 
technology genius who also happens to be a billionaire and the creator of the 
Panda Modem, Mumford quickly becomes good friends with him. Later, a possible 
romance flares up when he is won over by the innocent, kind-hearted Sophie 
(Hope Davis), who has come to him for help on curing her of her Chronic 
Fatigue Syndrome. At first a little stand-offish, Mumford and Sophie begin to 
spend some time together, and as they become closer and closer, Sophie's 
exhaustion gradually vanishes. 
If "Mumford" sounds rather aimless and with very little of an actual plot, 
that's because it is. For 111 minutes, the film is non-stop dialogue, usually 
between two characters at any given time, and while this has the chance to 
work wonderfully (see 1995's charming "Before Sunrise," in which two 
twentysomething strangers get off a train in Vienna and spend the day and 
night together before going their separate ways), "Mumford" is bogged down by 
a paper-thin, artificial screenplay, by Kasdan, that never stops feeling 
"written," and thoroughly mishandles its wide array of characters. The film 
wanders around without any clear destination, and with very few story or 
character developments, and therefore, grows monotonous by the half-way mark. 
It's difficult to dedicate any sort of rooting interest in a group of people 
who, for the most part, are either uninteresting creations or disappointingly 
wasted.
With such a strong cast, one wonders what the principle actors were so 
attracted to with this particular film. On the positive side, there isn't a 
mediocre performance to be had. On the negative side, the characters are 
never given a chance to spring to life, because its potential simply is 
nowhere to be found on the written page. Loren Dean, who appears in almost 
every scene as Mumford, is low-key and remarkably appealing, one of the most 
promising, fresh performances this year. His character of Mumford, however, 
always seems to be standing at arm's length from the audience, and we never 
really get to know him, aside from the obligatory background info that is 
told in an overlong, patience-testing flashback. 
Hope Davis, the stunningly versatile actress from such pictures as 1997's 
"The Daytrippers," 1998's "Next Stop Wonderland," and 1999's "Arlington 
Road," is likable as always as the weary, recently-divorced Sophie. Dean and 
Davis work well together and have a lot of chemistry, but each of their 
scenes seem like nothing more than character filler, rather than the natural 
dialogue that one usually speaks. Their eventual romance, unfortunately, 
feels too orchestrated on the screenplay level to set off any fireworks.
Jason Lee (1997's "Chasing Amy"), as Skip, forms a nice rapport with Dean, 
and the friendship that is developed between the two is the film's most 
effective element. Lonely and constantly used by people who only like him for 
his money, Skip chooses Mumford to be his buddy because he knows that he 
wouldn't judge him on a materialistic level, and is overly enthusiastic about 
the technological inventions he is always cooking up. 
Also of note is the effervescent Alfre Woodard, an always-engaging and 
criminally underappreciated actress who, coincidentally, had a meatier, more 
satisfying role in Kasdan's powerful "Grand Canyon;" and Zooey Deschanel 
(daughter of famed director of photography, Caleb Deschanel), in her film 
debut, who has a natural charisma and authenticity that is absent from every 
other character in the film. Making no impression in even slighter, 
criminally empty roles are Jane Adams, so astounding in 1998's "Happiness," 
as the town's other psychologist; David Paymer as a resident psychiatrist; 
and Ted Danson, who has all of one scene as McDonnell's husband.
Everything leads up to a courtroom scene that, thankfully, isn't as 
manipulative as it is just-plain contrived. By the conclusion, the majority 
of the central characters have either fallen in love with someone, or have 
become emotionally at ease due to their connection with another, but it is 
distastefully unjustified. Kasdan has chosen to paint his characters with the 
broadest, most general strokes possible, and has forgotten to do one thing: 
develop them. "Mumford" is an intellectually vacant and pointless excursion 
to a town that is almost frightening in its artificiality. In fact, I 
wouldn't have been particularly surprised had "The Brade Bunch" made cameos 
as Mumford's next-door neighbors.

Title
Review for Shining, The (1980)
Directed by Stanley Kubrick.
Cast: Jack Nicholson, Shelley Duvall, Danny Lloyd, Scatman Crothers, Joe 
Turkel, Barry Nelson, Anne Jackson.
1980 - 144 minutes.
Rated R (for violence, gore, profanity, and nudity).
Reviewed September 1998.
For the average person, director Stanley Kubrick is probably best known 
for his upcoming film entitled "Eyes Wide Shut," featuring Tom Cruise 
and Nicole Kidman, which had taken over two years for him to complete. 
For an avid filmgoer, Kubrick is perhaps more known for his classic 
motion pictures, such as 1964's "Dr. Strangelove" and 1971's "A 
Clockwork Orange." His step into the horror genre, however, came in 1980 
with his loose, but exquisitely told, terrifying adaptation of Stephen 
King's novel, "The Shining." At the time of its release, King 
enthusiasts were disappointed because the film version had many 
differences from the book, but I doubt anyone can deny its overall power 
to scare.
With a running time of 144 minutes, it is obvious that this is no 
ordinary horror picture, but one that aspires to be an epic, and it 
definately is for the genre. Jack Nicholson stars in a tour de force 
performance as Jack, a writer who, at the start, is a family man who 
takes a job as caretaker at the Colorado Overlook Hotel for the winter. 
He is warned early on by the hotel's manager that the winters in the 
mountains are treacherous, and often the heavy snowfall closes up the 
roads for months. Soon Jack, his wife, Wendy (Shelley Duvall), and their 
little son, Danny (Danny Lloyd) are left alone at the huge, desolate 
hotel, and as the weeks go by, the snow grows heavier, and Jack gets a 
bad case of writer's block, he slowly, but surely begins to go crazy. 
Meanwhile, it begins to get obvious that the hotel itself is indeed 
haunted, and as young Danny rides his bike through the endless 
corridors, he starts to get visions of terrible things to come, such as 
an elevator opening up to a tidal wave of blood. He also starts to see 
two mysterious twins who seem to be roaming the hotel, side-by-side. If 
you haven't seen "The Shining," then I wouldn't dare give away how 
everything develops, but it is safe to say that by the last 45 minutes, 
all hell breaks loose. 
"The Shining" is a deliberately paced, but endlessly creepy, horrifying 
motion picture. From the first shot of the camera moving overhead as a 
car drives down a road, to the shots within the hedge maze outside the 
hotel, the film has some of the most beautiful, atmospheric 
cinematography, by John Alcott, I have ever seen. Other technical 
credits are also superb, including the extremely eerie, memorable 
instrumental music score by Herbert Von Karajan, and the unforgettable 
production design by Roy Walker.
It is the overall experience of "The Shining," however, that makes it 
such a great film. The slow pace at the start is actually an asset, 
because it gradually grows momentum as Nicholson starts to grow more and 
more crazy, until the movie totally takes off in it's last hour and 
turns into a funhouse of horrors. One particular scene is especially 
disturbing. Without giving it away, it involves Duvall and a person in a 
dog costume.
Nicholson's performance in this movie is probably my favorite that he 
has given, because he has the ability to have a very menacing present. I 
think it has something to do with his voice and his eyebrows. Duvall is 
very good as his sympathetic wife, and is a very good screamer when she 
has to be. Aside from Nicholson, however, the standout of the cast is 
surely Scatman Crothers, as the cook of the hotel who tells Danny at the 
beginning that he has the "shine," which is the ability to see the 
future. In my opinion, he was sorely overlooked for an Oscar nomination 
in 1980.
"The Shining" is also very much thought-provoking, particularly the 
closing scene, and is one of the greatest horror films ever made. It is 
also a movie not easy to forget, and proves that when done well enough, 
and with a great deal of care, a horror movie can rise to a plane all 
its own.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Patch Adams (1998)
Directed by Tom Shadyac.
Cast: Robin Williams, Monica Potter, Bob Gunton, Philip Seymour Hoffman, 
Peter Coyote, Irma P. Hall, Ellen Albertini Dow.
1998 - 110 minutes.
Rated PG-13 (for profanity).
Reviewed December 14, 1998.
Written by Dustin Putman Dustin Putman's Film
Reviews>
"Patch Adams," is highly reminiscent of the wonderful 1990 film, 
"Awakenings," also starring Robin Williams. There are many similarities, 
as well. Both films are based on true stories; they both take place, 
partially, in 1969; they are both set in a hospital; and they both mix 
humor and drama. Maybe this is one of the biggest problems with, "Patch 
Adams," since it is far inferior to, "Awakenings," which felt so much 
more realistic and honest. That isn't to say that, "Patch Adams," is a 
bad film, though. Actually, I enjoyed it quite a lot up until the highly 
disappointing climax.
Robin Williams stars as Patch Adams, a depressed man who, at the start 
of the film, checks himself into a mental hospital after an attempted 
suicide. After helping his roommate get over his fear of squirrels, 
which he imagines have surrounded the room, Patch is suddenly cured, 
realizing that making others feel better through humor helps his own 
problems to disappear. Sure enough, two years later, Patch starts a 
medical school in Virginia, and begins sneaking into the hospital and 
having fun with all of the patients, some of which are terminally ill. 
Although he firmly believes that making other people laugh helps them to 
feel better, the hospital board disagrees, putting his plans of becoming 
a doctor into jeopardy.
For the majority of its running time, "Patch Adams," was very enjoyable 
for a number of reasons. The characters were all superbly handled, and 
written very well. Philip Seymour Hoffman was a standout as Williams' 
college roommate, who begins to grow envious of him when Patch starts to 
get some of the highest grades in the class, even though he does not 
seem to ever study. The character could have been a throwaway role, but 
Hoffman turns a potentially one-dimensional character into a completely 
believable person who is very serious about becoming a doctor, and is 
struggling to get by. Another element I liked in the film was its smooth 
mixture of comedy and drama. Although often funny, Williams never went 
overboard as he occasionally does, and there were a few gentle, quiet, 
and touching moments. A subplot involving the blossoming romance between 
Williams and a serious pre-med student (Monica Potter) was smartly 
written, and the payoff caught me totally by surprise, even if its 
strains at drama, in this respect, came off as slightly obvious. 
Before the climax arrived, I liked the movie, but did not love it. The 
workings of the plot were a little too conventional and predictable for 
my taste. However, when the ending came, the whole effect of the movie 
was pretty much ruined. Without giving away what happens, it concluded 
with a courtroom scene that was so falsely sentimental and cliched that 
I felt rather betrayed at its severe reaches for cheap melodrama. It was 
at the point that I knew for a fact how everything was going to end, and 
it saddened me to think that the screenwriter, Steve Oedekerk, took such 
an easy way out. 
When all is said and done, "Patch Adams," is an earnest attempt at 
making a film that is both comedic and moving, and as a vehicle for 
Robin Williams, it is perfect. Williams, along with his last two 
pictures, "Good Will Hunting," and, "What Dreams May Come," has proven 
that he is an actor with a lot of range, and doesn't always have to be 
silly. But coming out of, "Patch Adams," I had this strange feeling 
that, although based on a true story, the film took extreme liberties in 
order to construct it into a more managable film for mainstream 
audiences. This is quite unfortunate, since, "Patch Adams," clearly held 
so much promise. 

Title
Review for Haunting, The (1999)
Directed by Jan De Bont.
Cast: Lili Taylor, Liam Neeson, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Owen Wilson, Bruce 
Dern, Marian Seldes, Todd Field, Alix Koromzay, Virginia Madsen, Charles 
Gunning.
1999 - 113 minutes.
Rated PG-13 (for violence, mild profanity, and a bloodless beheading).
Reviewed July 24, 1999.
A spooky, haunted mansion. Four characters trapped within the locked gates of 
the property. An 80-million-dollar price-tag. Can't miss, eh? Oh, but it can; 
just leave it up the hack director Jan De Bont ("Speed" is his one good 
movie, but what's his excuse for its sequel or "Twister?") to take 
practically all traces of character development, excitement, horror, and 
common sense out of what could have been a sort of horrifying "Poltergeist" 
for the millenium, and turn it into a tedious excursion into visual effects 
that never look very believable or threatening to begin with. 
Loosely based on the 1959 novel by Shirley Jackson, "The Haunting of Hill 
House," and subsequently, the 1963 film adaptation, Jan De Bont has unwisely 
decided that this '99 version of "The Haunting" should abandon the previous 
film's psychological aspect in which you never actually saw the dangerous 
entity, in place of visually showing us a house that has come alive, thanks 
to spiffy effects. Believe me; it sounds better than the final product, 
which, when it all gets right down to it in the third act, is a hugely 
disappointing anticlimax that leaves you asking, "that's all there is?" 
Eleanor Vance (Lili Taylor) is a lonely young woman who is coping with the 
recent death of her domineering mother, whom she has had to take care of for 
the past eleven years, and her older sister (Virginia Madsen) is threatening 
to take her apartment away from her. Finding an ad in the newspaper in which 
Dr. David Marrow (Liam Neeson) is seeking out insomniacs for research who 
will be paid $900 a week with free room and board, Eleanor eagerly signs up. 
Once arriving at Hill House, a heavily gated and locked, brooding mansion of 
epic proportions, Eleanor becomes in awe of the sheer size of the place, with 
the 50-foot doorways, secret passageways, people and animal statues, a 
walk-in fireplace, and a swirling room made of glass and mirrors that plays 
carousel music when the door is opened. Also showing up for the experiment is 
Theodora (Catherine Zeta-Jones), a bisexual artist and city gal; Luke (Owen 
Wilson), the comic relief; and Dr. Marrow's assistants (Alix Koromzay, Todd 
Field). What the group doesn't know is that Dr. Marrow is actually doing a 
study on fear, and has taken them to this creepy architectural triumph that 
has quite a twisted past to observe their reactions to any 
out-of-the-ordinary trick he plays on them. What Dr. Marrow doesn't 
anticipate is that the place really is haunted by the now-deceased past 
resident, Hugh Crane (Charles Gunning), who once murdered a bunch of children 
whose souls, to this day, are stuck within the woodwork of the house. 
"The Haunting" has a great set-up. Perhaps too good, since it sets up the 
viewer in the first thirty minutes for a highly-anticipated funhouse of 
thrills and chills in the finale, which ultimately never comes. As Eleanor 
and Theo first meet and explore the monstrous hallways and rooms before the 
other guests arrive, not only is the film enthralling, but the dialogue is 
snappy and fun. We also see that there are many opportunities to be had if 
the house really is going to come alive by the end. Helping out the opening 
section is the extravagant production design by Eugenio Zanetti, which really 
is a sight to behold, and paints the house as a character all its own. 
Indie-staple Lili Taylor is the star of the film in one of her few studio 
pictures, the ravishing Catherine Zeta-Jones is present, and so is Liam 
Neeson. So much talent! And yet, the movie goes straight down the crapper 
after the aforementioned first act.
A day after seeing the picture, one main question plagues me: with such an 
atmospheric setting with so much obvious potential, how could director De 
Bont fail so miserably on every cinematic level? The middle section of the 
film is slow-paced and uninteresting (save for the only suspenseful scene in 
the movie, and the only "haunting" sequence in which we never actually see 
anything), and yet we stick with the film because we know that all hell is 
literally going to break loose in the climax. Well, the action, special 
effects and "horror" sure do kick in in the final act, but the movie somehow 
never takes off. Once a certain part would pick up speed, it would abruptly 
slow to a halt, and then jumpstart, and then stop again, and then...you get 
the picture. As for the effects, they are relatively underwhelming, never 
actually real-looking, and aren't used to their fullest potential. And, 
finally, the only horror to be present was from hearing the horrifically bad 
dialogue uttered each time someone would open their mouth.
Every actor in "The Haunting" is clearly above this mediocre material. Poor 
Lili Taylor, one of the most generally underrated actresses of today, is the 
only one given an actual character to work with, but as the movie limps to 
its end, she was gradually forced to say some of the most sickeningly 
cornball lines of dialogue I've ever witnessed ("Its not about you. It's 
about family!"). I'm sorry, but not Meryl Streep, not Jodie Foster, not the 
most talented actress in the whole wide world, whoever that may be, could get 
away with these lines without sounding ridiculous. When Catherine Zeta-Jones 
(so captivating in "Entrapment") enters the picture, I thought she was going 
to single-handedly steal the picture with her spicy character and dialogue. 
Not so. After 45 minutes, Zeta-Jones practically disappears into the 
background, running around without anything substantial to do or say. Liam 
Neeson, as in his lackluster turn in "Star Wars, Episode 1: The Phantom 
Menace," is doing nothing but cashing a paycheck, and even Owen Wilson made 
no impression (I found myself more entranced by his oddly-shaped nose that 
actually looks like an inappropriate phallic symbol, since there was no 
actual character there to work with). And how about Dr. Marrow's assistants? 
Well, on the first night of the stay, one of them is hurt and so the other 
one drives her to the hospital, promising to call to let everyone know if she 
would be alright. You're never gonna believe this, but we don't hear from 
them again. Let it be known that the one assistant is played by Todd Field, 
who also appeared in the Kubrick masterpiece, "Eyes Wide Shut," and in this 
movie has a literal total of about three or four lines of dialogue! Here's 
another giant inconsistency: when the two assistants drive off, Dr. Marrow 
unlocks the gate with a key, but at the end of the movie when they are at the 
gate trying to get away from the angry spirits, he doesn't even think to use 
it!
"The Haunting" is one of the most misguided big-screen diversions to come 
along in some time, considering the clear potential it has. Here we have what 
could have been a creaky, scary, haunting, big-budget extravaganza, and yet, 
De Bont misses every single chance he gets to frighten us (well, ok, there 
was one scene, concerning a skeleton, that had the whole audience, including 
myself, jump out of their seats, but that was just more of a shock than an 
actual scare). Meanwhile, the actors stand around struggling to bring some 
sort of life to characters that are lifeless, and the audience is bored out 
of their skulls, unless they decide to make fun of the movie, which is a 
definite option to consider. What a shame! The tagline for "The Haunting" is 
"It's Summer. It's Hot. Time For a Movie That Gives You a Chill." Yep, at 
least they got that right. Its name is "The Blair Witch Project," and it was 
made for approximately 1/40,000 the budget of "The Haunting." So much for 
putting money to good use.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman.
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Return to Me (2000)
Directed by Bonnie Hunt.
Cast: David Duchovny, Minnie Driver, Carroll O'Connor, Bonnie Hunt, James 
Belushi, Robert Loggia, David Alan Grier, Joely Richardson.
2000 - 115 minutes
Rated PG (for mild profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, April 10, 2000.
One could say that romantic comedies are a dime a dozen, and yet, they never 
truly grow old, even when the workings of the plot, and the machinations of 
the romance, are fairly run-of-the-mill. Most people, male and female, 
whether they will admit it or not, gain a certain pleasure by watching 
characters fall in love on the silver screen. There are certain ingredients, 
however, that are vital to the making of a winning romance: the couple must 
be charming and have chemistry together, the writing sharp, the love story 
believable, and the film must create an urge among the audience to see the 
inevitable happen. 
"Return to Me," comedian-actress Bonnie Hunt's directorial debut (she also 
stars), has most of these assets--its two central stars, David Duchovny and 
Minnie Driver, are delightful here; the screenplay has quite a few very funny 
moments; and the whole package has such an innocence about it that to say it 
isn't a good movie, I fear, may cause me to appear to be a grump. But the 
picture does, unfortunately, have several problems that often shields its 
central romance from being in the forefront of the action onscreen, and 
somehow amidst it all, the magic is lost by the final fifteen minutes. Oh, 
yeah; if there's one thing a romance needs to have, it's a satisfying, 
entertaining conclusion, and "Return to Me" is absent of such a quality that 
might have boasted it over into the category of a surefire success.
Set in Chicago, the film begins as Bob and Liz Rueland (David Duchovny, Joely 
Richardson), a happily married couple, are attending a fundraising event for 
the Lincoln Park Zoo, where Liz, who has a great love and compassion for 
animals, works. On the way home, there is an automobile accident and Liz 
passes away, to the absolute devastation of Bob. Meanwhile, also at the 
hospital, is Grace (Minnie Driver), a young woman who is on her death 
bed--either she finds a heart and has a transplant to save her life, or she 
will die. She gets one at the last minute, and one year later, has fully 
recovered to go about her life like any other healthy person, but with a 
noticeable scar running down her chest that forever reminds her of how 
thankful she always should be to be alive.
One evening, after Bob is convinced into getting out of his house and joining 
his friend (David Alan Grier) on a double date to "O'Reilly's Italian 
Restaurant," he is absolutely smitten with their lovely waitress, who happens 
to be Grace, and whose caring grandfather (Carroll O'Connor) owns the place. 
After returning later that evening to pick up his cell phone, which he 
accidentally left there, he runs into Grace again, and after talking, Bob 
takes the next step into getting on with his life--he asks her out on a date. 
Grace joyfully accepts (she hasn't had too many dates in her life, and is 
insecure about how her possible suitors will react when she tells them she 
has had a heart transplant). From there, a relationship blossoms, with 
neither knowing about their true fateful connection. Through a series of 
circumstances, Grace makes the discovery, but fears that if she tells Bob 
about his deceased wife's heart beating within her body, she may lose him 
forever.
The premise of "Return to Me" may be farfetched (how likely do you really 
think it would be that a donor's husband would unexpectedly run into the 
patient whose life was saved?), and the developments in the story easily 
telegraphed from beginning to end, but one shouldn't go to a film of this 
type looking for such things. As long as you believe in the characters, it 
shouldn't be a problem. In the case of Bob and Grace, both are likable, 
realistically drawn people who clearly deserve their happiness. While they do 
not meet until the second half of the first hour, their scenes together are 
nicely done, and credit director Bonnie Hunt for being an assured filmmaker. 
"Return to Me" is fluffy--perhaps too fluffy--and it certainly won't be 
mistaken as the work of someone who has been in the directing business for 
long, but Hunt gets the job done.
Since her first role in 1995's "Circle of Friends," Minnie Driver has done 
nothing but impress with each of her film appearances, so her work here is 
not so much of a shock. Like Grace, she is absolutely enchanting. What does 
surprise is David Duchovny's standout performance. Viewed almost solely as 
Mulder on TV's "The X-Files," Duchovny takes the role of Bob, someone clearly 
different from his small screen persona, and proves that he very well has 
what it takes to be a perfectly respectable leading man. In the early scenes, 
after Liz has died, Duchovny heartbreakingly brings across the true loss of a 
loved one, and in the second half, proves that he also has nice comic timing, 
as does everyone else here. Bonnie Hunt, especially, as Grace's best friend 
Megan, is hysterically funny with her on-target delivery of her lines. James 
Belushi ably supports Hunt as her nice-guy lug of a husband.
Where "Return to Me" falters is in a few of its technical choices, such as 
the old-fashioned, self-titled song, by Dean Martin, annoyingly placed in 
several scenes, including a key dramatic moment, and in its handling of the 
supporting characters in relation to the romance. Hunt has littered her film 
with so many attention-getting inhabitants that their quirkiness threatens to 
drown out the central storyline. While the entire cast is very good, it is 
Bob and Grace who should be the focus, but so much attention is made to 
everyone else that they occasionally take away precious screen time in which 
the romantic developments between the two could be strengthened.
While "Return to Me" plays out, you are not bored, but you also are not as 
satisfied as you could be, because its presentation, aside from the 
aforementioned dealing of the death of Bob's wife, is so soft-focused and 
lacks urgency. And just when you think the movie is over, things come to a 
sudden halt and the epilogue drags on for another fifteen minutes, leading up 
to very little that couldn't have been solved with some tighter editing. As a 
romance, "Return to Me" is mildly engaging, but severely uneven. Some parts 
practically scream for the cutting room floor, while the love story seems 
undernourished. There is a lot of promise with what there is of it, but not 
enough to support the needless excess that revolves around them.

Title
Review for Eye of the Beholder (1999)
Directed by Stephan Elliott.
Cast: Ewan McGregor, Ashley Judd, Patrick Bergin, k.d. Lang, Genevieve 
Bujold, Jason Priestley.
2000 - 110 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, sexual situations, and brief nudity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, January 29, 2000.
Picture this: It's the last weekend of January 2000, and every film I have 
seen in theaters that was released this month has been bad (i.e. "Next 
Friday," "Supernova," "Down to You"). They say that the first month of the 
year is a motion picture dead zone for quality, but I am still understandably 
growing worried. But then I stumble upon a rather peculiar film, one that may 
be uneven on certain levels and, by no means, not imperfect, but that is 
simply too audacious and original to ignore, and leaves me thinking about it 
for the remainder of the evening and the next day. The name of that movie is 
"Eye of the Beholder," directed by Stephan Elliott (1994's "Priscilla, Queen 
of the Desert"), and when a wealth of movies in the genre are so disposable, 
as you can just forget all about them once they are over, this one actually 
has a mind to go along with its mysterious storyline, and could easily be one 
of the most thought-provoking thrillers in a long while. 
"Eye of the Beholder" takes a lot of risks, particularly for a film that is 
being released wide on opening weekend. Because it doesn't take the road you 
would always expect from a thriller; because Ashley Judd is not playing the 
completely virtuous heroine; because the film is relatively deliberate in its 
pacing and there isn't very much action, per se; and because Elliott relies 
on stylish camera techniques and the visual aspect of the story, as opposed 
to buildings blowing up and dialogue spelling out the plot developments for 
you, the picture is in danger of isolating many mainstream audiences 
expecting another "Double Jeopardy." That's too bad, for those interested in 
a more unconventional film that doesn't always play by the rules will find 
themselves rewarded with a deeper, more texturally layered thriller than they 
are usually accustomed to.  
The ball gets rolling when a British intelligence agent in Washington, D.C., 
known by his code name, Eye (Ewan McGregor), is assigned to track down the 
22-year-old son of a government official, who is suspected of being 
blackmailed by an inscrutably alluring woman (Ashley Judd). Spying on them at 
the son's home, Eye becomes the only witness to his murder, as the woman 
repeatedly stabs him to death and then disposes of his body in a nearby lake. 
Eye, whose wife and child were allegedly "lost," still envisions his young 
daughter around him, and thus, feels inexplicably drawn to this woman who, 
herself, is clearly lost, and begins to follow her everywhere she goes, from 
NYC to San Francisco, to Death Valley, to Philadelphia, to Chicago, to 
Alaska, all the while leaving death in her wake. Wanting to know more about 
her, Eye learns from an unusual therapist (Genevieve Bujold), who used to 
care for her, that her real name is Joanna Eris, and it was she who taught 
Joanna how to constantly disguise her true self, both physically and 
emotionally. But Joanna is a confused, almost tragic figure, even while 
being, more or less, a serial killer, and there are hints throughout that her 
relationship with her own father as a child was relatively unstable.   
Although a thriller, "Eye of the Beholder" also offers an utterly odd, yet 
effective romance, as Eye realizes Joanna is a murderer, but somehow deeply 
sympathizes with her. Since Eye is missing a child, and Joanna is a lost 
soul, there is an instant connection on his part, and Joanna strangely feels 
it too, even when she doesn't even know he is following her, and has never 
met him. Basically, both Eye and Joanna are little more than enigmas at the 
beginning, but the more that is learned about their unfortunate pasts and 
their beings, the more easily understood both of their actions are. And 
without giving anything away, when Eye and Joanna inevitably do meet, there 
is an unmistakable poignancy that charms us, all the while making us nervous 
since we know Joanna is capable of doing many bad things, even when she 
doesn't want to.
Kudos to writer-director Stephan Elliott and director of photography Guy 
Dufaux for making a motion picture that is such an invigorating treat for the 
eyes, and a testament to their imaginations. When the setting changes from 
one place to the next, for example, the camera zooms in on that particularly 
city's snow globe and enters right into it, until what is in the globe 
transforms effortlessly to the real place. Eye voyeuristically spies on 
Joanna with his advanced audio and video equipment, and occasionally the 
camera will be centered on the grainy television of Joanna's hotel room, 
until it goes right into the T.V. and ends up literally in her room. "Eye of 
the Beholder" is a stylistically brilliant film, never ceasing to impress 
with its gorgeous, energetic visuals.
While Eye and Joanna are satisfactorily developed throughout, some of their 
motivations remain a little sketchy, leaving it up to the viewer to decide 
the "why's" for themselves, which sometimes works but here just feels like 
minor plot holes. Joanna, who occasionally breaks down crying after doing 
away with another innocent victim, is a severely unhinged woman, but why is 
that? And what does her killing spree substitute that is missing in her life? 
When Eye keeps seeing his daughter and carrying on conversations with her, it 
works well because of its eerie supernatural implications, but doesn't give 
us enough of a reason for why he can see her. Does he imagine it because of 
his otherwise solitary existence? Or is he delusional? These questions and 
others are unavoidably brought up because we never learn the answers, but 
better to be left pondering a film after it is over, rather than forgetting 
it altogether, which is what the majority of today's thrillers do.
Ashley Judd is a class act in every film she appears in, and she is even able 
to turn mediocrity into something slightly more successful than it has any 
right to be ("Double Jeopardy"). Since her stunning debut performance in 
1993's "Ruby in Paradise," Judd has been on an unbroken road to stardom, and 
does not disappoint here. Joanna is a flawed woman (after all, she does kill 
people), but she desperately wants to change and lead a normal life, and Judd 
turns her into a likable character, or at least one that we care about. 
Midway through, Joanna has a run-in with a kind, older blind man (Patrick 
Bergin) at the airport, and because he cares about her without having to see 
her, she falls in love with him. There is a touching scene in which Joanna 
explains to him that he may be older, but she loves him no matter what 
because her physical appearance doesn't matter to him. In other words, he 
will never be able to see the "monster" she has let herself become in life.
Ewan McGregor has a less showy role, since he is voyeur to his subject, which 
is Joanna, but McGregor is worlds above his misguided, underwritten turn in 
"The Phantom Menace." He believably is able to project the loss of his loved 
ones, and while the idea of him falling in love with this killer he has 
followed but never even met is, perhaps, difficult to swallow, it 
surprisingly makes sense. Gazing warmly at Joanna from afar, Eye longs to be 
with her, to comfort her sort of as a father figure, and McGregor creditably 
helps to make this plot development work. 
In supporting roles, Genevieve Bujold is excellent, even while only given two 
scenes, as she turns her character into more than just a one-dimensional 
figure. Pop singer k.d. Lang shows up as Eye's friend and embassy contact, 
and proves to hold a real screen presence. And Jason Priestley is 
appropriately slimy and intense as a drug addict who picks Joanna's up in the 
desert when her car breaks down.
The final scene in "Eye of the Beholder" is one I haven't quite figured out 
my feelings on yet. It is certainly not an upbeat, mainstream conclusion, and 
will turn off many viewers, but in its own way is just the right way to end 
the film. Both Joanna and Eye have very little to live for, except for each 
other, which makes the proceedings all the more lamentable. They are at the 
end of their ropes, desperately attempting to cling to one another even when 
they don't have the means to do such a thing. "Eye of the Beholder" is a 
sleek, impressively well-made movie, a lyrical flower in a bed of January 
thorns, if you will. It is simply too admirable a film on too many levels to 
be thrown to the wayside.

Title
Review for Any Given Sunday (1999)
Directed by Oliver Stone.
Cast: Al Pacino, Jamie Foxx, Cameron Diaz, Dennis Quaid, James Woods, Aaron 
Eckhart, Ann-Margret, Matthew Modine, Lela Rochon, Lawrence Taylor, Lauren 
Holly, LL Cool J, John C. McGinley, James Karen, Elizabeth Berkley, Jim 
Brown, Charlton Heston.
1999 - 170 minutes
Rated R (for profanity, nudity, and mild violence).
Reviewed December 23, 1999.  
Thus far, several reviews for "Any Given Sunday," Oliver Stone's fully 
charged ode to professional football, have stated that only those viewers who 
are fans of football will be able to enjoy it. Strange, then, that I think 
the exact opposite. Although I didn't like "Any Given Sunday" and I despise 
football, it is certainly one of the major pictures of its type that has a 
large chance to be enjoyed by several different sections of the adult 
population, whether they care for the sport or not. Stone does not dwell on 
the football-playing scenes and his rapid-fire editing is so quick that what 
is happening on the field is often nearly unintelligible. Taking a look at 
the politics that go on behind the lines, the picture is occasionally savvy 
and perceptive. But where it ultimately fails is in Stone's usual 
"everything-but-the-kitchen-sink" attitude. While this approach sometimes 
works to benefit one of his movies (1994's "Natural Born Killers"), it 
quickly grows tedious here, signaling not originality from the accomplished 
filmmaker, but clear pretentiousness.
A behind-the-scenes expose of a fictional team in the NFL, the Miami Sharks, 
Al Pacino headlines the marvelous, all-star cast as Tony D'Amato, the 
frustrated head coach of the team whose longtime career is beginning to 
crumble around him. For one, he is constantly disagreeing with the team's new 
manager, a determined young woman by the name of Christina Pagniacci (Cameron 
Diaz), who has recently acquired the team from her highly regarded father. 
Things fire up between the two when star quarterback Jack Rooney (Dennis 
Quaid) gets injured, and Christina wants him to be gotten rid of for good, 
and have talented hotshot rookie Willie Beaman (Jamie Foxx) take over. The 
Sharks are on a dismal losing streak and Christina, new to the profession, 
will stop at nothing to get positive results as the playoffs wind down, 
partially out of trying to please her deceased father, and also because she 
is quickly losing sight of the things that are most important in her life.
The no-holds-barred editing and cinematography, by Salvatore Totino, of "Any 
Given Sunday" wear out their welcome from the very first scene and the camera 
only intermittently stops long enough to capture a full scene. Striking and 
undoubtedly flashy, but also needlessly unnecessary, this style by Stone 
occasionally holds a purpose in his other films, but here, is only used to 
cover up what is basically a highly cliched and predictable sports movie. A 
170-minute epic that could have been 120 minutes, the story is very thin, and 
there are so many characters that are so pointless to the story, they could 
easily have been cut completely out. Then there are other characters that do 
hold some sort of purpose, but screenwriters John Logan and Oliver Stone 
don't even appear to be making any attempt to develop and flesh them out, and 
their subplots are entirely dropped in midstream, not to be brought up again. 
Consequently, the climactic big game is just about as conventional as they 
come, albeit with razzle-dazzle editing that makes each quarter of the game 
go by in two minutes each. If anything, those who aren't football fanatics 
can take ease in knowing Stone does not meddle on the actual game, much more 
preferring to center on what goes on after the action on the field is over. 
Entirely predictable from start to conclusion, only the final scene during 
the end credits divulges a surprising plot development.
If severely flawed on many levels (this is one of Oliver Stone's weakest 
films), the performances are the glue that keeps everything from fully 
self-destructing. Al Pacino is superior here than in the role he is currently 
getting more attention for, in Michael Mann's "The Insider," as he isn't 
playing a character quite as much like his usual persona. 
Proving why I now firmly believe she is one of the most intelligent and 
talented actresses in their twenties, Cameron Diaz more than holds her own 
with Pacino in several head-on verbal battles with each other. As Christina 
Pagniacci, she is the type of woman who knows what she wants, but is still a 
little naive in her decisions, and it is the one character with an effective 
emotional arc. Diaz could have come off as a one-dimensional witch with a 
capital "B," but unlike the other throwaway roles, her's is the one that is 
most carefully handled.
In two wasted supporting turns, Lela Rochon and Elizabeth Berkley add 
much-needed flare and a human element into the story, as Willie's neglected 
girlfriend and a high-priced hooker that spends a night with Tony, 
respectively. Rochon is so likable and her character so nicely defined (under 
the circumstances) that it is a shame nothing more is done with her. Berkley, 
who has come a long way in her acting skills since her starring role in 
1995's "Showgirls," is wonderfully charismatic and surprisingly involving, 
even in only two scenes. 
All other actors are top-notch, as well, but sadly, are not given anything 
notable to do. Aaron Eckhart, Dennis Quaid, James Woods, Matthew Modine, 
Lauren Holly, Charlton Heston, even LL Cool J--they are all fine thespians 
who perform their roles just about as well as could possibly be expected, but 
are mostly headscratchers in the writing department. 
"Any Given Sunday" is a fast-paced, entertaining drama that, 
little-by-little, grows problematic when you stop to think long enough about 
its specifics. Stone is an innovative director most of the time, but has hit 
a brick wall with his latest picture, trying to cover up its flaws with 
personal technical expertise and forgetting about the substance part of the 
equation. The problem is, the flash-cutting style of a Jerry Bruckheimer 
production (such as 1998's "Armageddon" and 1997's "Con Air") is something I 
have no patience for, and is especially distressing when you realize someone 
as intelligent in his craft as Stone has resorted to such desperate 
gimmickry. 

Title
Review for Gladiator (2000)
Directed by Ridley Scott.
Cast: Russell Crowe, Joaquin Phoenix, Connie Nielsen, Oliver Reed, Derek 
Jacobi, Richard Harris, Djimon Hounsou, Spencer Treat Clark, Ralf Moeller.
2000 - 154 minutes
Rated R (for violence, blood, and mild sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, May 6, 2000.
Being trumpeted as the first big "event" picture of the summer of 2000, 
Ridley Scott's "Gladiator" is a robust, lumbering, often very exciting, 
extremely well-acted, and long, action-adventure, the first movie of its type 
to be set in Rome in over three decades. In fact, the film has been made on 
such an enormous scale (with a price tag of $103-million) that it's difficult 
not to be completely swept away in its high-style effectiveness and technical 
grandeur. Despite the sparkling presences of the film's three lead actors, as 
well as the many rousing battle set-pieces, "Gladiator" is a flawed motion 
picture, and one that, for all its flashiness, comes off as a mild 
disappointment. It is still a good film, but only marginally so, and easily 
could have been a great one.
Opening in 180 A.D., Maximus (Russell Crowe), an acclaimed Roman general, has 
sent his group of men into battle against the Germanics, in the final fight 
to defeat the empire's enemies. Set against the backdrop of the fog-induced, 
murky Bavarian forest, just as nightfall approaches, Maximus carries on his 
battle plan, and amidst the carnage, lives to see their victory. A much-loved 
and admired militarian who hasn't seen his wife and young son for 
two-and-a-half years, Maximus has become the sort of adopted son of Emperor 
Marcus Aurelius (Richard Harris), who offers him the chance to be the ruler 
of Rome when he passes away, despite the title expectancy going to his own 
flesh-and-blood son, Commodus (Joaquin Phoenix). 
Once the cowardly Commodus discovers his father's decision, he promptly 
murders him and demands that Maximus and his family be executed at once. 
Following his escape and the discovery that his home has been burned down and 
his wife and son brutally murdered, Maximus is captured by slave traders and 
sent to the provinces to act as a gladiator for the citizens' entertainment. 
Known as "The Spaniard," he surprisingly manages to defeat everyone that 
steps in his way, and is, finally, sent back to Rome, where he must carry out 
his newly enslaved life. But Commodus, the new emperor of Rome who believes 
Maximus has long since been killed, does not know that the masked mystery man 
the crowds have been cheering for in the Coliseum, is the man he most 
despises.
Unlike most action-adventures, "Gladiator" has a heart, along with its 
visceral thrills, thus allowing the audience to not only get involved in the 
sword fights and battle scenes, but also in the fates of the major 
characters. It also strengthens its entire impact and adds dimension to a 
story that otherwise might have come off being ineffectual and thin-skinned. 
As Maximus, 35-year-old Russell Crowe has once again made a 180-degree 
transformation from his Oscar-nominated last character, the 57-year-old 
Jeffrey Wigand in 1999's "The Insider." Toned, alluring, and exceptionally 
convincing, Crowe has created another largely memorable character, one that 
is not your typical action hero, but a man who seems real--who can get hurt 
and even killed, and is bound to not always be able to save the day, no 
matter how talented of a gladiator he is.
In his strongest role to date, Joaquin Phoenix, usually cast as punk or dense 
types (see 1995's "To Die For" and 1999's "8mm"), really gets to show off his 
acting chops, and is plausibly threatening and powerful as the scheming 
Commodus. As Commodus' sister, Lucilla, Connie Nielsen (2000's "Mission to 
Mars") is superb, managing to hold her own in each of her scenes, right down 
to her final one, which is a marvelous display of acting. The way she reacts 
in her last moments onscreen come off as strikingly genuine and real, and 
Nielsen unveils herself to be a talent worth watching.
The cinematography, by John Matheson, is sweeping and unforgettable, using 
the most out of its widescreen format. However, many sequences are overly dim 
and more than a little grimy looking. The brighter scenes, however, 
particularly the angelic ones set back at Maximus' home, as well as all of 
the scenes at the Coliseum, are dazzling in their visual glory. Also making 
an impression is the memorable music score, by Hans Zimmer and Lisa Gerrard, 
perfectly capturing the feel of a Roman epic.
Where "Gladiator" loses some of its luster is in its overlong running time, 
which could have easily been nipped and tucked here and there without losing 
anything substantial with its characters or the story, at hand. Moreover, 
certain sections run on a little too long, and the fight scenes begin to grow 
repetitive by the final half-hour. 
What ultimately saves "Gladiator," making it a film worth seeing, is the 
intensity and power of the climax, a tour de force fight to the death between 
Commodus and Maximus, with unforeseen results. It is moments like these that 
prove what a natural craftsman and possibly underrated filmmaker Ridley Scott 
(1982's "Blade Runner") is. "Gladiator" may be guilty of needless excess, but 
when it really works, it's an unadulterated adrenaline rush.

Title
Review for Masquerade (1988)
"Maquerade," is one of those films where the characters are not always 
who you think they are, and one in which double crosses is its key plot 
point in which everything else stems from. Made in 1988, this film 
preceded the more recent overabundance of these types of films, but it 
is exactly the same, although not nearly as skillful as some of the best 
examples in the well-worn genre.
The film begins with Olivia Lawrence (Meg Tilly), an extremely wealthy 
and single young woman, graduating from college. We learn all of her 
money has come from the deaths of both of her parents, and she was also 
left eight houses throughout the world. She lives in a mansion in the 
New York bay area, and legally cannot throw out her mother's last 
husband (John Glover), a greasy slimeball who is always bringing various 
strange women home with him. Right after graduation, Olivia meets two 
men, a friend from her childhood (Doug Savant) who is now a police 
officer, and the handsome yacht captain, Tim Whalan (Rob Lowe), who 
unbeknownst to Olivia, also has another girlfriend on the side. 
Should Olivia trust Tim? Does he really love her, or just after her 
inheritance? And how is her friend from the past connected with 
everyone, if he is at all? These are some of the mysteries brought up 
in, "Masquerade," a film that sounds potentially more interesting than 
it actually is. One of the picture's main problems is that all of the 
characters are left at a distance from the audience, and so no one is 
able to truly gain our sympathies, or to even give us much of an opinion 
on any of them to begin with. I did not find myself being enthralled in 
the story, because it felt more like a dream that a person can only 
remember parts of, and so they tell you about it with big chunks of the 
plot missing. Developments in the narrative occurred, and yet the film 
seemed to be drifting by things without any attention to the elements 
around them, as if the twisting storyline was the only important key to 
making a successful film.
Meg Tilly has shown that she is a fine actress, just like her younger 
sister, Jennifer. Look no further than 1983's "The Big Chill," or 1985's 
"Agnes of God," and you will see a versatile, always impressive, actor 
at work. In, "Masquerade," however, Tilly either chose or was directed 
to act like a passive female, and this was a highly misguided choice. 
Since she doesn't appear to be using her mind to figure out the sinister 
things going on around her, then how does director Swaim expect us to 
root for her? Rob Lowe and Doug Savant, who may or may not be working in 
cahoots with each other, are OK, but honestly nothing more than two 
pretty faces. John Glover, usually an outstanding character actor 
(1989's "Longtime Companion"), plays an obvious one-dimensional villain 
for his relatively short-lived appearance. Finally, both other female 
performers, Kim Cattrall, as Lowe's on-the-side girlfriend, and Dana 
Delaney, as Glover's companion, like Tilly, are written at a 
condescending level, and are treated unfairly as nothing more than women 
whose primary goal is sex. I wonder if Swaim intentionally wrote all of 
his women characters to act like dimwits, or if it just happened that 
way, because he certainly does not flatter them in any way.
It is amazing how quickly-paced things occur in, "Maquerade," and yet, 
how slow-moving it actually feels to watch. On my first viewing, I found 
my mind constantly wandering from the proceedings because nothing was of 
any substantial interest to me. It was only on my second run-through of 
the film, immediately afterwards, that I actually understood what all of 
the character's motives were. If anything, "Masquerade," is an 
appropriate title. Just like the storyline, the film itself tries to 
desperately cloak itself so its viewers don't realize how very little 
worthwhile material is actually present.
      - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
        Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Soldier's Daughter Never Cries, A (1998)
Directed by James Ivory.
Cast: Leelee Sobieski, Kris Kristofferson, Barbara Hershey, Jesse 
Bradford, Luisa Conlon, Samuel Gruen, Anthony Roth Costanzo, Dominique 
Blanc, Jane Birkin, Harley Cross, Isaac de Bankole, Virginie Ledoyen.
1998 - 125 minutes.
Rated R (for profanity).
Reviewed December 10, 1998.
"A Soldier's Daughter Never Cries," is the first James Ivory-directed 
film I can recall that is set after the 1930's. Granted, this bit of 
information doesn't really hold very much importance, but I am glad that 
Ivory has made something a little bit away from his norm, and it paid 
off.
The film starts off during the 1960's, where the Willis', an American 
family living in France, adopt Benoit (Samuel Gruen), a young boy whose 
real mother was only fifteen when she gave birth to him. Bill Willis 
(Kris Kristofferson), a writer, and his wife, Marcella (Barbara 
Hershey), are just about the best parents he could hope for. They are 
caring, considerate, and generally good people. Their daughter, Channe 
(Luisa Conlon), is just about Benoit's age, and although she is, at 
first, put off by a new member in the family, she quickly becomes 
attached to her new brother. In these opening sections, not much occurs 
in the way of a clear-cut story, but it is deceptive. By choice, 
Benoit's name is changed to Billy, to sound more American. Channe gets 
into trouble at school when she forges her father's signature. She also 
has a peculiar run-in with a boy around her tender age of eight who 
makes sexual advances towards her. Life goes on.
It is in the last ninety minutes when, "A Soldier's Daughter Never 
Cries," grows the most momentum and becomes especially heartfelt and 
truthful. About seven years pass, leaving Channe and Billy to now be 
young teenagers (now played by Leelee Sobieski and Jesse Bradford). When 
signs that Bill may be forming a heart disease, the family moves back to 
the United States, and as he desperately tries to finish a book he has 
been writing before he dies, Billy grows distant from everyone, and, not 
knowing how to act as a young adult, Channe becomes highly promiscuous 
at school. 
Through everything that occurs during the film, the element that most 
stands out is the warm, unconventional relationship between Channe and 
her father, who does not look down on Channe when he discovers she has 
been having sex, but instead, sympathizes and understands what she is 
going through. In one particularly startling, perfectly realized moment, 
Bill tells Channe and her boyfriend to stay at their house for the 
night. "I'd rather you be under my roof and doing it properly, rather 
than being in the backseat of a car," he says. Bill is the type of 
father who cares so much for his children, that he would risk anything 
for them, and we really get a sense of the love that he feels for 
Channe, and vice versa. In another touching scene, after Channe has gone 
to a party for New Year's Eve, leaving her family at home, she calls her 
father right after it turns midnight to wish him a happy new year, 
knowing that he very well may not be around the following year.
It is in the individual moments and particular performances that make, 
"A Soldier's Daughter Never Cries," a much better film than it might 
have been if, say, a Hollywood studio had made it. The film deals with 
many serious subjects, but never grows heavy-handed, nor predictable, in 
its telling of the story. It is easy to throw in a lot of sappy 
melodrama into a drama, but it is far more effective to stay true to the 
film and always remain realistic, and that it what this picture does. 
The film is broken into three chapters, which is a nice, but 
unnecessary, touch. The first chapter, "Billy," tells of when Channe and 
Billy are young children; the chapter, entitled "Francis," focuses on 
Channe, now a teen, and her strong friendship with Francis (Anthony Roth 
Costanzo), a boy who remains faithful to Channe, even though he knows 
they will never be more than buddies; and the final chapter, called, 
"Daddy," centers on the family after they return to the United States. 
It is the second two chapters that are the most successul, as the 
opening section is more about the set-up of the characters. "Francis," 
is strenthened a great deal by its gentle relationship between Channe 
and Francis, as well as Costanzos memorable and accurate performance. In 
one particular scene that stands out, Channe gets her period while in 
class, and Francis works her through the problem so that she will get 
out of the class without anyone else knowing what has happened.
The performances in the film are all natural and beautiful to watch. I 
cannot recall Kris Kristofferson having such a humanistic role before, 
and he couldn't have been better. Barbara Hershey, at first, seems to be 
playing one-note until the climax, in which we learn much more about 
her, and she is given some well-written scenes with her two children. 
But as good as all of the performances are, it is Leelee Sobieski ("Deep 
Impact") who is a standout. In her portrayal of Channe, Sobieski is so 
honest and unaffected that, for me, it stopped being a performance and 
became a real character, as if she were in a documentary. It is one of 
the most effortless performances I have seen from a youth, and she 
deserves an Oscar nod for her work here.
"A Soldier's Daughter Never Cries," although occasionally uneven, is one 
of the best films I have seen in a while that has to do with family, and 
gets most of the details right. The things that are dealt with, in 
lesser hands, may have turned into a television "Movie of the Week," but 
director James Ivory obviously knew what he was doing when he made this 
film. It is also evident that Ivory felt a deep connection with the 
material, as if it were somewhat autobiographical. The movie rarely 
feels written. Although, perhaps, there could have been more of a 
driving force behind everything that happens throughout, it in no way 
dampered my feelings for the film. "A Soldier's Daughter Never Cries," 
is a powerful film about families, in general, and the many problems 
they face each day.

Title
Review for Bride of Chucky (1998)
Directed by Ronny Yu.
Cast: Jennifer Tilly, Katherine Heigl, Nick Stabile, John Ritter, Alexis 
Arquette, Kathy Najimy; voice of Brad Dourif.
1998 - 90 minutes.
Rated R (for violence, gore, profanity, and doll sex).
Reviewed October 17, 1998.
Although the original "Child's Play" was an intelligent, surprisingly 
well-crafted horror film, I have never been that big a fan of the 
series. I mean, it's hard to make a 3-foot doll scary, and by the time 
1991's "Child's Play 3" rolled around, the series felt pretty much dead 
and buried. But old slasher series' die hard, and since there has been a 
recent horror resurgence, it was inevitable that Chucky would indeed be 
back for a third sequel.
"Bride of Chucky" has a genuinely goofy premise, and is far more 
original than the other sequels. The film starts off with Tiffany 
(Jennifer Tilly), a bit of trailer-park trash, who gets ahold of the 
remains of the mostly destroyed Chucky doll, which holds the soul of her 
old boyfriend, Charles Lee Ray. She sews the parts back together and 
resurrects Chucky who, in exchange, murders Tiffany and transports her
 soul into a female doll. They realize that in order to get out of the 
doll bodies, they have to get a necklace that Charles is buried with in 
a small town in New Jersey. Through a series of circumstances, these two 
murderous, feuding dolls hitch a ride with a teenage couple, Jude 
(Katherine Heigl) and Jesse (Nick Stabile), who have run away to be 
together. Did you follow all that?
"Bride of Chucky" has one of the most absurd plots of the year, and some 
sequences are downright silly (a sex scene involving the Chucky and 
Tiffany dolls immediately springs to mind), but I have to admit that I 
do admire the filmmakers for trying something a little bit different, 
rather than recycling the same exact storyline for each sequel. In fact, 
the film is basically a "Chucky" road movie, which is actually quite 
intriguing, but it never really follows through with its aspirations. 
Just as in the recent, "Halloween: H20," the movie felt much too short, 
as if there was a rush to get to the ending. If another ten to fifteen 
minutes had been added to the running time, it would have been much more 
satisfying.
I must honestly admit, however, that there is a lot to like in the film. 
For one, the screenplay is far more sharply written than the other 
sequels in the series, and there are a lot of clever in-jokes and sharp 
lines of dialogue. The beginning, for example, is set in a building 
where all of history's killers' remains are locked up, and before we get 
to Chucky, the camera passes by a hockey mask and the Michael Myers 
mask. 
Another element I liked in the film is the realistic love-hate 
relationship between Chucky and Tiffany. Even though they are dolls, 
they act exactly like humans do, and are always fighting, but still love 
each other. They are some very funny exchanges between the two 
throughout, particularly a conversation where they discuss Martha 
Stewart.
For being a third sequel in a reputable slasher series, it is amazing 
some of the talent they were able to get. Director Ronny Yu is 
highly-acclaimed in China, and this is his American debut. Tilly is 
almost always a wonderful actress (and has even been nominated for an 
Academy Award), and she brings a lot of energy to the first act of the 
film, when she is in human form. The cinematography by Peter Pau is 
richly textured and well-done.
But if you look at "Bride of Chucky" as a horror film, which it is, that 
is where the film fails. There is so much zaniness in the story and 
dialogue that it is not the least bit scary or suspenseful (except for 
one scene involving Tilly and Alexis Arquette, as her gothic boyfriend). 
The movie also never takes off the way it should, and although it was 
surely on its way to getting to that next plateau, it never made it 
because it was simply too abrupt. If you are looking for a scary horror 
film during this Halloween season, then my recommendation would be to 
see "Urban Legend," which is far, far better. Although the filmmakers 
wanted "Bride of Chucky" to be more along the lines of recent 
genre-bending horror flicks, such as "Scream," what they basically have 
made is yet another 80's slasher film. You know, the type that usually 
wouldn't even get grandma's ticker going. 

Title
Review for Outside Ozona (1998)
Directed by J.S. Cardone.
Cast: Robert Forster, Kevin Pollak, Penelope Ann Miller, Lois Red Elk, Taj 
Mahal, Meat Loaf, Sherilyn Fenn, Beth Ann Styne, David Paymer, Lucy Webb, 
Kateri Walker, Swoosie Kurtz.
1998 - 99 minutes.
Rated R (for violence, gore, profanity, nudity, and sexual situations).
Capsule Review - July 19, 1999.
"Outside Ozona" is a peculiar mixture of several different film genres, 
including the "road movie", a comedy, a drama, and a thriller. Oh, and a 
violent serial killer is also on the loose. Set over one very eventful night, 
the film delves into the lives of several characters passing through the 
desert town outside of Ozona, Arizona, including a lonely truck driver 
(Robert Forster); a trailer trash couple (Kevin Pollak, Penelope Ann Miller) 
travelling to Las Vegas; two bickering sisters (Sherilyn Fenn, Beth Ann 
Styne) on their way to their father's funeral; a hitchiker with car trouble 
(David Paymer); and a kind native american woman (Lois Red Elk) taking her 
dying grandmother (Kateri Walker) to see New Mexico. Alternately original, 
overstuffed, convoluted, and intriguing, writer-director J.S. Cardone has 
created an ambitious film, to be sure, but one that never quite takes off.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Keeping the Faith (2000)
Directed by Edward Norton.
Cast: Edward Norton, Ben Stiller, Jenna Elfman, Anne Bancroft, Eli Wallach, 
Milos Forman, Rena Sofer, Holland Taylor, Lisa Edelstein, Brian George, Ron 
Rifkin, Ken Leung.
2000 - 129 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, April 15, 2000.
"Keeping the Faith," actor Edward Norton's directorial debut, is an ambitious 
romantic comedy that succeeds on the charm of the three principle actors, as 
well as in the surprisingly smart writing by Stuart Blumberg, a rarity in 
today's films. It is also a little rough around the edges, and far too long, 
in desperate need of at least a fifteen minute trim, which could effortlessly 
be done without any impact at all in the story or its effectiveness. Things 
can't always be perfect, and "Keeping the Faith" is far from it, but in terms 
of its pure sweet-naturedness, it is one of the better adult romances to come 
around the pike in a while, and more satisfying than the recent, overly 
slight "Return to Me."
Taking off from the old "the-priest-and-the-rabbi-walk-into-a-bar" joke, ever 
since childhood, Manhattanites Brian (Edward Norton) and Jake (Ben Stiller) 
have been best friends. As they grew up, Brian decided to turn to Catholicism 
and became a priest, while Jake, who is Jewish, opted to become a rabbi. As 
young teenagers, they were close buddies with Anna Reilly, a pretty tomboy 
whom they were devastated to see move away when her father got a job offer on 
the other side of the U.S. Switch forward fifteen years, Brian and Jake are 
elated to receive a phone call from Anna (Jenna Elfman), now a high-powered, 
workaholic businesswoman, who is going to be dropping into NYC on business.
Once reunited, it is just like old times for the trio, who, while their lives 
have taken them in alternate directions, remain compatible and close. Anna is 
intrigued in Brian's required celibacy, while, at the same time, he is 
starting to grow the first truly romantic feelings he can remember. 
Meanwhile, Anna and Jake fall in love, but decide to keep it a secret from 
Brian, so as to not damage their camaraderie. There are other obstacles in 
the way of their feelings, too, including Anna's planned departure back to 
San Francisco once her business deal is finished, as well as Jake's religion 
requiring him to marry a Jewish girl--something that Anna is not.
Unlike most romances, the outcome of "Keeping the Faith" is not immediately 
foreseen because the problems stacked against the characters are more serious 
and important than the usual films in the genre, and the way all of the plot 
threads are handled is thoughtfully done. Issues involving religion and 
personal beliefs are focused upon and never second-guessed, keeping in hand 
an open mind throughout.
Edward Norton, Jenna Elfman, and Ben Stiller are a match made in Heaven, each 
one complimenting the other in both the chemistry and talent departments. 
Norton and Elfman, especially, have a radiance about them, and it is a fresh 
change of pace to see Norton in something lightweight and conventionally 
enjoyable. In her best role to date (superior to 1999's "Ed TV"), Elfman has 
what it takes to be a delightfully engaging film actress, with all of the 
qualities that has made Meg Ryan one of the queens of romantic comedies. 
Finally, Stiller, in a role oddly reminiscent of the one he played in 1998's 
"There's Something About Mary," rounds out the trio, and is very good as a 
man who can't help falling in love with Anna, but who fears rejection from 
everyone in his religious community, including his loving, but 
set-in-her-ways mother (Anne Bancroft).
Nevertheless, "Keeping the Faith" can't help but occasionally step wrong. The 
opening fifteen minutes rely too heavily on slapstick, and it is only when 
the adult Anna arrives in New York does the film settle down and firmly find 
its frothy, yet involving, tone. This leads to the second, and most major 
quiff, which is that, for a frothy romance, the picture doesn't know when to 
quit. Appearing as if director Norton and editor Malcolm Campbell didn't want 
to part with a second of footage, the pacing grows to meander by the start of 
the final one-third, just when any normal film of this kind should be 
reaching its conclusion.
What finally decides the fate of "Keeping the Faith" is its utter likability, 
and well as in the relationship that is built between Brian, Anna, and 
Jake--you believe that they are best friends who care for each other very 
deeply because the actors are so effervescent in their performances. Due to 
their magnetism and winning personalities, you find yourself rooting for all 
three of them to find some sort of middle ground where they can all manage to 
be happy, without hurting the others' feelings. "Keeping the Faith" may not 
be a great film, but it sure is an amiable enough way to spend a few hours.

Title
Review for Town That Dreaded Sundown, The (1976)
"The Town That Dreaded Sundown," is not a film that relies on a 
narrative, as much as it is a wholeheartedly visceral experience, in 
which it is not the characters that stand out, but the situations. Based 
on a true story that took place in Texarkana, Texas, circa Spring 1946, 
a town becomes horrified when two young people are attacked one night at 
a Lovers' Lane by an inexplicable hooded killer. They narrowly survive 
the ordeal, but the people of the town, not used to such violent crimes 
taking place so close to them, enter into a frenzy, terrified that he 
might strike again. Exactly twenty-one days later, two more lovers are 
found in a similar setting, but this time viciously murdered. 
Immediately, Deputy Sheriff Norman Ramsey (Andrew Prine) and Texas 
Ranger J.D. Morales (Ben Johnson) are brought onto the case, fearing a 
possible pattern is starting every three weeks. Nicknamed "The Phantom 
Killer," the community goes into panic as the slayer goes into overdrive 
during that Spring, only to vanish without a trace thereafter.
We learn very little about the characters, whether it be the police 
officers or victims, and, in fact, one of the supporting policeman is 
played inapprorpriately as a comic device to most likely lighten the 
subject matter up. Instead, "The Town That Dreaded Sundown," goes for a 
quasi-documentary feel throughout, as the crimes are documented, and 
that is why the film is successful. What is so absolutely fascinating 
about the case is that it was, and still remains, a completely baffling 
occurrence in which no one ever found out who the "The Phantom Killer," 
was. And there is also the mystery about what finally happened to him 
after he abruptly stopped his murder spree.
The film is matter-of-factly narrated throughout, which was a wise 
choice. It largely makes the film seem more real, and it is helped out 
by the exact way the story is played out, as the film alternates 
throughout from the investigation to sequences of shocking power as the 
murders are vividly and brutally reenacted. One particular scene 
involving the prolonged, unsettling torture of a teenage girl in the 
woods, is, no doubt, tough to watch and frightening, but it is not 
filmed as a means of pointless exploitation, but rather as an example of 
how accurately drawn and realistic Director Pierce wanted the film to 
be. 
By the conclusion of, "The Town That Dreaded Sundown," a brief 
confrontation between the authorities and the killer occurs, but nothing 
comes of it, as the "Phantom" vanishes afterwards without a trace. In 
the penultimate moment, we are left to ponder not only the whereabouts 
of the culprit, but the effect that such an inconceivable crime can have 
on any one person. "The Town That Dreaded Sundown," leaves us with such 
striking moments of stark, raw terror, that it puts many less serious 
horror films to shame. After all, this crime actually happened, and just 
the thought of that is petrifying. 
      - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
        Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Meet Joe Black (1998)
Directed by Martin Brest.
Cast: Brad Pitt, Anthony Hopkins, Claire Forlani, Marcia Gay Harden, 
Jeffrey Tambor, Jake Weber.
1998 - 170 minutes.
Rated PG-13 (for profanity, mild violence, and sexual situations).
Reviewed November 24, 1998.
By Dustin Putman 
Dustin Putman's Film Reviews >
"Meet Joe Black," directed by Martin Brest (1992's "Scent of a Woman"), 
is a 170-minute remake of 1934's "Death Takes a Holiday," which ran 
78-minutes, and so judging from this, it might seem as if "Meet Joe 
Black," is an overly robust, needlessly long film, but it didn't seem 
that way at all. On the contrary, the film is a sleek, good-looking, and 
entertaining romance.
Set during the last week before his 65th birthday, wealthy media tycoon 
Bill Parrish (Anthony Hopkins) awakens in his New York mansion to sharp 
heart pains, and a mysterious, godly voice repeating the word, "yes." 
The next morning, after he is transported to Manhattan by helicoptor to 
go to work, with his physician daughter, Susan (Claire Forlani), she 
stops in at a coffee shop and strikes up a conversation with a handsome, 
smooth talking man (Brad Pitt). They are smitten with each other, but 
coming out of the cafe, he is hit and killed by a car, unbenownst to 
Susan. That night, Bill gets a visitor at his door in the form of the 
man at the coffee shop. The only difference is that, as he explains, he 
is Death, who stole Pitt's body and has come to take Bill away after he 
visits the world in human form for the first time to see how it feels. 
When Susan sees Pitt, now called Joe Black to hide his identity to 
everyone else, she realizes something is different about him, but begins 
to fall in love with him nonetheless. And as Joe follows Bill around and 
begins to learn things about the world, as well as care for Susan, 
everything inevitably is leading up to Bill's gala birthday party, which 
will be his last night before he dies and is lead away by Death. 
"Meet Joe Black," reminded me somewhat of "Dr. Jekyll and Mr. Hyde," not 
because of the story, but because the film is easily divided into two 
categories: scenes of schmaltzy melodrama, and moments of extraordinary 
power and honesty. Although the film could have easily been trimmed to 
two-and-a-half hours, "Meet Joe Black," really did not seem overlong to 
me. The pacing is slow and deliberate, to be sure, but it was never 
boring, and felt more true-to-life because of this. In fact, I got a 
great satisfaction out of watching the scenes unfold. Sure, they were 
drawn out a little bit, but it's better than watching the constant 
freneticism of a Jerry Bruckheimer action movie.
Going back to what I was saying before about the film being divided into 
two categories, "Meet Joe Black," sometimes would attempt to suck out as 
much sentimentality as possible just to get its audience to cry, and 
near the conclusion, the music swelled up so much that it began to feel 
too sappy for my taste. 
But then, there were scenes that were so truthful and real that I felt 
like applauding the filmmakers. Due to its length, at least one thing 
can be said for the film: all of the six central characters were written 
superbly into flesh-and-blood people. Each character was given scenes 
that really caused me to care about them, right down to the supporting 
ones. The greatest satisfaction I can get while watching a film is 
getting involved in the scenes and dialogue unto themselves, as if they 
were all separate short films. If these type of scenes are strung 
together, however, it can turn into genuine dynamite, and that is what, 
"Meet Joe Black," did.
Brad Pitt, who usually chooses more unconventional roles (not counting 
1989's slasher film, "Cutting Class"), proves here, like he has done in 
previous films, that he is more than just good-looking. Playing two 
different characters here, as the guy in the coffee shop, and Joe Black, 
he was truly endearing and likable. Anthony Hopkins, one of the best 
actors of this generation, is outstanding, as he has to juggle a 
character that seemingly has everything, but is forced to deal with his 
realization that his time on Earth is quickly coming to a close. Claire 
Forlani, in her first starring role, is a fresh new talent to look for 
in the future. She always seems to be filled with deep thoughts swarming 
around in her head, and has a lot of chemistry with Pitt. All of these 
performances are wonderful, and yet, the one performance that I thought 
surpassed all of the others was Marcia Gay Harden, who deserves a Best 
Supporting Actress Oscar nomination. Harden is given perhaps the most 
touching scenes in the film, as Bill's neglected older daughter, 
Allison. The most heartbreakingly true scene in the whole picture, in my 
opinion, involves the conversation between Allison and her father, as 
she tells him that she has always known she wasn't his favorite 
daughter, but remained happy because she still knew that she was loved 
by him. Harden flawlessly hits the right mark in every one of her 
scenes, and this is certainly her best film role since 1993's 
little-known gem, "Crush," not to be confused with the 1993 Alicia 
Silverstone thriller, "The Crush."
Judging from the many astonishing moments in the film, "Meet Joe Black," 
could have easily been one of the very best films of the year, if not 
for its occasional attempts at extreme mawkishness, and the ending, 
which felt a little bit far-fetched. Without giving anything away, the 
film might have left a more lasting, genuine impression if the last 
three minutes had been completely cut out. It was one of those frequent 
attempts at a happy ending that simply did not pay off. While not 
forgetting its faults, "Meet Joe Black" still remains a success, due to 
its intelligence and unforgettable performances, and is one of the 
better films of the 1998 Fall season, along with "Living Out Loud," and 
"Pleasantville." Unlike most big-budget Hollywood ventures, "Meet Joe 
Black," takes its time, does not hurry its story, and instead of 
condescending to its characters, refreshingly sees them as flawed, but 
sincere, three-dimensional people.

Title
Review for Gloria (1999)
Directed by Sidney Lumet.
Cast: Sharon Stone, Jean-Luke Figueroa, Jeremy Northam, Mike Starr, 
George C. Scott, Bonnie Bedelia, Cathy Moriarty, Sarita Choudhury.
1999 - 105 minutes.
Rated R (for violence and profanity).
Reviewed January 23, 1999.
One of the most blatantly obvious signs that often-acclaimed director 
Sidney Lumet's "Gloria," a remake of the 1980 John Cassavetes film, had 
absolutely no effect on me occurred when I was driving home from the 
theatre. Suddenly, I realized that since I had stood up from my theatre 
seat five minutes before, I had not thought once about the film I had 
just invested nearly two hours of my life in. When a movie is over, 
aren't we supposed to think about it for a while, and have a 
conversation about it with the acquaintances we have just watched it 
with? I thought so, but, for one, I saw this particular picture by 
myself, and #2, even if I had been with someone there wouldn't have been 
anything to talk about in the first place.
To be sure, "Gloria" begins with a stirring, rather poignant prologue in 
which a seven-year-old boy's family is brutally gunned down by mobsters, 
in search of a disc his father had with incriminating evidence on it. 
Right before the men broke in, of course, his father gave him the disc 
to escape with. Eventually, the boy, named Nicky Nunez (Jean-Luke 
Figueroa), is caught by the mobsters, and taken back to their apartment.
Meanwhile, Gloria (Sharon Stone) has just gotten out of prison for a 
crime she didn't commit and returns to her ex-boyfriend (Jeremy Northam) 
to recieve the money he promised her for covering up his crime. When he 
refuses to give it to her, and then hears the group of men talking about 
killing Nicky, she leaves with him in order to save his life, but not 
before holding the men at gunpoint, stealing all of their money, and 
forcing them to strip nude. Gloria is the type of fast-talking, 
smart-mouthed New Yorker who always seems to get involved with the wrong 
people, and she never expected to be stuck with a kid, but she has a 
heart of gold (don't they always in this type of movie) and is only 
trying to protect the boy, whom she quickly begins to form a close bond 
with.
The previous incarnation of "Gloria" by Cassavetes and starring the 
luminous Gena Rowlands, remains unseen by me, but was no doubt superior, 
even though I can't really imagine how this considerably dull story 
could be transformed into an entertaining one, regardless of the 
director or stars. There is no doubt in my mind that director Lumet has 
stuck closely to the original, but the film itself is simply lifeless, 
with only an occasional laugh popping up here and there so that it isn't 
completely unbearable to watch. I liked, for example, a very funny 
climactic sequence where Gloria is deciding whether to leave the school 
she has left the boy at, and keeps turning the car around, then driving 
a little ways, then slamming on the brakes and turning around again. 
These bright moments, however, appear long and far between, and the 
majority of the film deals with the budding relationship between Nicky 
and Gloria, which is both painfully predictable and by-the-numbers. 
Throughout, my mind was repeatedly asking the question, "who really 
cares?"
As Gloria, Sharon Stone has adopted an over-the-top Brooklyn accent that 
honestly doesn't sound realistic at all. In the beginning, in fact, I 
was amazed at how amateurish Stone's performance was, but as the film 
progressed she got better. Although not one of her better turns, Stone 
does have a comic flare that refuses to be ignored. Jean-Luke Figeroa 
was fine as Nicky and a little more natural than the usual child actors 
who are so precocious they make you want to gag. All other actors who 
appeared were considerably wasted, none more than Cathy Moriarty, an 
entertaining actress in her own right, who is billed fourth and has all 
of one scene, as Gloria's friend whom she turns to for help. 
Sony, the studio that released "Gloria," obviously does not have any 
faith in the film, and I don't blame them. They declined to screen the 
picture for critics, which is never a good sign, particularly with the 
high-profile people involved. Although how much money a movie makes does 
not determine how good it is (just look at the spectacular "In Dreams," 
which failed to even make the Top 10 last week), I have a suspicion 
"Gloria" is going to vanish from theaters faster than "Ishtar," judging 
from the opening night 7:00 p.m. showing I saw it at, where there were 
about ten to fifteen people present, counting myself. Although Stone can 
be an impressive actress (just watch her in 1995's "Casino" or 1996's 
"Last Dance" if you don't believe me) and Sidney Lumet can be a 
respectable director, there is no reasoning for why they thought the 
cliched story of "Gloria" was worth remaking or, for that matter, why 
Columbia Pictures agreed to finance it when they could have been making 
a picture that actually looked like it might have an inkling of a chance 
to be successful.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Dustin Putman's
Film Haven >

Title
Review for Bait (2000)
Directed by Antoine Fuqua.
Cast: Jamie Foxx, David Morse, Doug Hutchison, Kimberly Elise, David Paymer, 
Mike Epps, Robert Pastorelli, Jamie Kennedy, Tia Texada.
2000 - 119 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, and sex).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, September 16, 2000.
Ever seen 1998's "Rush Hour?" How about 1999's "Blue Streak?" Do these two 
films have anything in common with "Bait," the new action-comedy directed by 
Antoine Fuqua (1998's Chow Yun-Fat/Mira Sorvino-starrer, "The Replacement 
Killers")? Well, aside from all three being released the same exact weekend 
of each progressive year, they also star an African-American comedian in a 
plot dealing with characters out to steal, or get, money. "Bait," more than 
either of its still-cliched predecessors, is a complete hack job, bankrupt of 
original ideas and likable characters. Fuqua's one attempt at distinguishing 
his picture from the rest of the generic lot is his intentionally choppy and 
quick-paced cinematography, equipped with extreme close-up shots of the 
actors' faces and the action happening onscreen. Not only is this camerawork 
annoying, however, but director Oliver Stone is far superior at the same 
thing, and usually has a point to make along with his stylistic choices.
Alvin Sanders (Jamie Foxx) is a well-meaning small-time thief who, at the 
start of the film, has just been arrested once again for the theft of a bunch 
of prawns--extra large shrimp--in a seafood house. He is put into jail with a 
cellmate in the form of John Jaster (Robert Pastorelli), an ill man who was 
forced into helping the technologically brilliant and psychotic Bristol (Doug 
Hutchison) attempt a grand-scale robbery of gold equaling up to $40-million 
in currency. Before long, Jaster meets an unfortunate demise, and the U.S. 
Treasury investigator on the case, Clenteen (David Morse), suspects that 
Alvin must know more than he is letting on. Unbeknownst to Alvin, he is 
decided to become the bait of the still-at-large Bristol by having a tracking 
device cleverly placed within his jaw, and set free.
Meanwhile, Bristol malevolently decides that Alvin is the only living person 
who may know where the missing gold that was taken by Jaster is hiding, and 
sets out to not only stalk him, but threaten his girlfriend Lisa (Kimberly 
Elise) and 2-year-old son, the latter whom he has only just now discovered.
While never an inherently terrible movie, "Bait" digs itself a deep grave 
early on, simply by its own sheer mediocrity in every aspect. Aside from, 
perhaps, the charming appeal of Jamie Foxx (who otherwise deserves to not be 
wasting his time with such superfluous material), nothing stands out as being 
anything other than marginally tolerable, and more often than not is strictly 
of the "been-there/done-that" variety.
An obviously talented actor who shined in 1997's "Booty Call" and 1999's "Any 
Given Sunday," "Bait" is below the intelligence level of Jamie Foxx, and his 
character (an unlucky, often goofy guy struggling to put his life back 
together) a strict rehash of roles Chris Tucker, Martin Lawrence, and Eddie 
Murphy have played in the past. In the supporting cast arena, Kimberly Elise 
(1998's "Beloved") adds validity to the otherwise thankless part of Alvin's 
weary girlfriend Lisa, as does David Morse (1999's "Crazy in Alabama"), who 
resembles an older Russell Crowe. Finally, Doug Hutchison (1999's "The Green 
Mile") appears as the overly nasty and severe Bristol; Robert Pastorelli 
(1996's "Michael") serviceably plays the conflicted robbery accomplice, 
Jaster; and Jamie Kennedy (1996's "Scream") tiresomely retreads the same 
character he has played in at least three other movies--the computer whiz 
working to track someone down.
The screenplay, by Andrew Scheinman, Adam Scheinman, and Tony Gilroy, is 
predictably sloppy and uninspired, not to mention entirely far-fetched. The 
idea of placing a tracking device in someone's chin is not only absurd for a 
mostly reality-based film, but also right out of a sci-fi picture starring 
Arnold Schwarzenegger. The attempts at comedy, too, fail the majority of the 
time and are forgettable. In fact, "Bait" as a whole is exactly the same 
way--aside from Foxx's fetching energy, there is nothing present that is even 
notably intriguing or worthwhile for any viewer, aside from die-hard action 
fanatics. All involved should have known better.

Title
Review for Spanish Prisoner, The (1997)
Directed by David Mamet.
Cast: Campbell Scott, Rebecca Pidgeon, Steve Martin, Felicity Huffman, 
Ben Gazzara, Ricky Jay, Ed O'Neill.
1998 - 110 minutes.
Rated PG (for brief violence).
Reviewed October 24, 1998.
David Mamet's "The Spanish Prisoner," is a puzzle of a film, one that 
starts off simply enough but begins to stack story development upon 
story development, and twist upon twist until we really actually have to 
be paying close attention to be able to follow everything. This is not a 
flaw with the film, though. It is a compliment, because "The Spanish 
Prisoner" is a thinking-person's film, and the complex story flows so 
effortlessly that it just goes to show how brilliant Mamet is as a 
writer.
The film begins as a man (Campbell Scott), on a business trip in the 
Cayman Islands with his colleagues, proposes "The Process," a highly 
secretive plan that will make his company very wealthy. While there, he 
meets a friendly businessman (Steve Martin), whom he begins to have 
doubts about after he returns to his home in New York City. But what is
 he hiding, if anything?
The delight in watching "The Spanish Prisoner," doesn't so much have to 
do with the intricate plot, but more about the sly, entertaining 
interactions that the characters have with each other, thanks to the 
exquisite dialogue, which is nothing short of flawless. I could listen 
to these people talking all day, and never get bored.
Because of the dialogue, most of the main stars are given particularly 
juicy roles. I can't recall Campbell Scott having this good of a role 
before, and it is a refreshing change of pace for Steve Martin, who is 
usually featured in comedies. Rebecca Pidgeon, as one of Scott's 
colleagues and a potential love interest, is a standout. She is given 
the most likable character, but also some of the best lines, and she has 
a natural charm about her. I definately look forward to seeing her in 
future films.
"The Spanish Prisoner," never particularly steps wrong, but, without 
giving its many secrets away, a negative development with one of the 
characters was a disappointment, and I truthfully felt kind of betrayed. 
But of course, it was followed with one of the films best lines that I 
wouldn't dream of spoiling. 
David Mamet doesn't direct that many films, but he is so distinguished 
as a screenwriter that if you are familiar with his work, you would 
certainly be able to recognize his signature dialogue. He is a class-act 
talent that is incomparable. 
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for House on Haunted Hill (1999)
Directed by William Malone.
Cast: Geoffrey Rush, Famke Janssen, Taye Diggs, Ali Larter, Chris Kattan, 
Peter Gallagher, Bridgette Wilson, Lisa Loeb, James Marsters, Jeffrey Combs.
1999 - 90 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, and gore).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, October 30, 1999.
"House on Haunted Hill," like the startlingly similar "The Haunting," which 
was released last July, is a frustrating experience more than a frightening 
one. There are differences between them, to be sure. While "The Haunting" was 
more sophisticated, with a superior cast, a budget of around $80-million, and 
a kid-friendly PG-13 rating, "House on Haunted Hill" is a gory, atmospheric, 
$20-million, R-rated spookathon. What the two films do have in common, 
however, aside from the basic plot mechanisms, is a sense of real promise 
early on, only to abysmally fall apart in the cheesy, special-effects-laden 
climax. Both directors, William Malone and Jan De Bont, clearly spent a great 
deal of time getting the mood and "look" of their films exactly right, and 
yet they forgot that not only is the setup often times scarier than the 
payoff, but that in order to care about a movie like this, you have to want 
to root for the characters. No such luck here. Oh, and both films are 
receiving from me a none-too-positive 1 1/2-star, though "House on Haunted 
Hill" is probably a little better, simply because it has the courage of its 
convictions to make an actual horror movie, rather than "The Haunting," which 
was akin to taking a ride in the Haunted Mansion at Disney World.
After a memorably stylish opening credits sequence and a brief prologue set 
in 1931, in which all but five patients at a sprawling psychiatric hospital 
die in a mysterious fire, the film really takes off with the first appearance 
of Steven Price (Geoffrey Rush), a twisted amusement park entrepreneur. 
Holding an interview with a local news reporter (singer Lisa Loeb, in the 
most engaging performance of the whole film), she questions exactly why the 
newest rollercoaster is supposed to be so scary, and Steven physically shows 
her and her cameraman (James Marsters) why. As we are taken on the ride with 
the characters, the film plays with your mind and offers genuine surprises 
and excitement not seen once the main storyline comes into focus. 
On a dark, foreboding night, five strangers are lured into a mansion that is 
sprawled upon a cliff overseeing the ocean--the same one that the fire took 
place at in 1931. Four of the people--former pro football player Eddie Baker 
(Taye Diggs), physician Donald Blackburn (Peter Gallager), washed-up gameshow 
host Melissa Marr (Bridgette Wilson), and supposed-to-be CEO of a film 
company Jennifer Jenzen (Ali Larter)--have all gotten an invitation to attend 
the birthday party of Steven Price's gold-digging wife Evelyn (Famke 
Janssen), and along with the cautious owner of the property Watson Pritchett 
(Chris Kattan), become trapped in the building once inside. It is here that 
Steven makes everybody a proposal: stay in the house all night long, without 
dying, and they each will be rewarded with a $1-million check. The catch, it 
turns out, is that the house really is being haunted by the maniacal doctor 
(Jeffrey Combs) who was killed in 1931, and that all five guests are 
unknowingly related to the five inmates who survived decades before. 
Admittedly, "House on Haunted Hill" has a zinger of a premise, a sort of 
ghastly rendition of 1993's "Indecent Proposal," in which people were asked 
if they'd cheat on their spouse for one night, and a million smackers, with 
Robert Redford. After the marvelous first fifteen minutes, the picture's 
interest quickly unravels because the stick-thin characters that inhabit the 
film are thoroughly repugnant people who either you want to die, or don't 
particularly care either way. 
But then, once the two sole virtuous characters (played well, under the 
circumstances, by Taye Diggs and Ali Larter) make their way down into the 
decrepit basement to look around, the film gradually starts to grow very 
creepy, at least more so than last week's godawful "Bats." The middle section 
of the film is surely the best, offering up haunting (no pun intended) images 
that are truly disturbing and surprisingly psychological in nature. Very 
little violence is shown onscreen, nor are there many blatant visual effects 
that mar its effectiveness. Sitting back and watching the film, it occurred 
to me that maybe, after all, this late-Halloween offering might actually have 
something to offer. One particular sequence, in which Melissa is 
investigating the house and comes to an empty room that, through her video 
camera, shows a doctor and two nurses working on a mental patient who 
suddenly stop and stare straight at her, is scarier than the whole 
2-hour-plus "The Haunting." 
The film ultimately begins to sour soon after, as the interplay between 
Steven Price and Evelyn not only is cold-hearted and off-putting, but also 
disastrously acted by the usually talented performers Geoffrey Rush and Famke 
Janssen. Descending on its shameful downward spiral, plot twists that come 
off as more dubious than unpredictable begin arising, the psychotic ghost of 
the doctor completely disappears from the proceedings, and indiscernible 
visual effects take over, foolishly revealing its low budget. Topping things 
off are a despicable, ragtag group of victims whom you practically learn 
nothing about throughout, unless they are uncovered to be involved in one of 
the late plot developments. The ending, especially, leaves you begging the 
question, "Is that it?!"
With an ominously unforgettable production design and appropriately brooding 
cinematography, by Rick Bota, watching "House on Haunted Hill" is like going 
to a restaurant where the food looks delectable, but tastes awful. There are 
several hints of the subjectively horrifying experience the film might very 
well have been, along the lines of "The Blair Witch Project" or "The Sixth 
Sense," but director William Malone and screenwriter Dick Beebe botch the 
results. It's about time filmmakers realize that character and story are more 
important than special effects, particularly when you obviously don't even 
have the money to make the effects the least bit believable to begin with.

Title
Review for King and I, The (1999)
Directed by Richard Rich.
Voices: Miranda Richardson, Christiane Noll, Martin Vidnovic, Ian 
Richardson, Darrell Hammond, Allen D. Hong, David Burnham, Adam Wylie, 
Sean Smith.
1999 - 90 minutes
Rated G (no objectionable material).
Reviewed March 21, 1999.
In the last two weeks of filmgoing, not one, but two films have 
contained characteristics that only the worst director of all-time, Ed 
Wood, could be proud of. The recent "Wing Commander" turned out to be 
one of the very worst movies of the whole decade, while in the new 
animated film, "The King and I," a quality-butchering remake of the 
famous Rodgers and Hammerstein musical, one sequence changes from day to 
night between shots. This foolish mistake might be at least a little 
understandable in a live-action picture, but keep in mind that this 
particular movie wasn't even filmed, but drawn!
In a children's adaptation that sticks to the bare minimum in the story 
department, there truthfully isn't much do discuss in the way of a 
premise, except that a 19th-century schoolteacher named Anna (voiced by 
Miranda Richardson) arrives at the kingdom of the stern King of Siam 
(Martin Vidnovic) to teach his eight children, while the King's evil 
brother, Kralahome (Ian Richardson), plots to destroy him, as well as 
his oldest son, so he can become the King and take over the palace.
To get a taste of how desperate for ideas "The King and I" actually is, 
take, for example, the ludicrous opening scene in which Kralahome 
creates a giant water serpent to cause Anna to shipwreck. Does Anna 
naturally shudder in fear? No, not at all. Why, she decides it would be 
a perfect time to sing the upbeat and delightful song, "I Whistle a 
Happy Tune!" Unfortunately, the film goes even further downhill from 
there, and the only element that kept it from becoming a thoroughly 
unbearable experience was the memorable, if one-dimensional, character 
of Anna, a head-strong woman who speaks up when she disagrees with 
things, and deeply believes in what is right and wrong. Amazingly, 
however, Anna disappears for long stretches of time to concentrate on 
the dull, predictable subplot involving the King's son and his 
blossoming romance with a kind-hearted servant whom he is forbidden to 
be with. Multiple awards for anyone who can guess what happens with this 
couple by the movie's end...
If animated films are expected to be money-makers, they've got to have 
at least something going for them, and obviously Warner Brothers doesn't 
have anything going for them. The animation itself is strictly 
amateurish and Saturday morning cartoonish; at several moments the songs 
are nearly drowned out by the loud, forgettable music score; and the 
overall story follows the basic slapdash formula of all animated films: 
a female protagonist; a male love interest who needs reforming; some 
cuddly animal sidekicks; and a dark, canniving villain that has magical 
powers, not to mention a clumsy, bumbling sidekick. Sigh. As the 
characters repeatedly say to the point of near-monotony throughout, 
etc., etc., etc.

Title
Review for Sleepy Hollow (1999)
Directed by Tim Burton.
Cast: Johnny Depp, Christina Ricci, Miranda Richardson, Mark Pickering, 
Michael Gambon, Christopher Walken, Jeffrey Jones, Lisa Marie, Michael Gough, 
Christopher Lee. 
1999 - 105 minutes
Rated R (for mass beheadings, blood, and a sexual situation).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, November 20, 1999.
Looking back on my childhood, one of the most vivid memories in the world of 
film or television that I have is watching the 30-minute animated film, "The 
Legend of Sleepy Hollow," based on the haunting Washington Irving story, 
around Halloween. I haven't seen it in many years, but it has been engraved 
into my mind for always. After many years of rumors and delays, the 
live-action version, "Sleepy Hollow," has finally arrived, and it is a visual 
masterpiece, dark and eerily beautiful in its cinematography and production 
design, and sumptuous in its costumes. But seriously, what did you expect 
coming from the genius mind of filmmaker Tim Burton, who excels in creating 
brilliant new worlds and feasts for the eyes? 
What "Sleepy Hollow" isn't is an adaptation of the Irving story. Aside from 
the key plot point of a headless horseman who prowls the countryside of the 
farming community, Sleepy Hollow, circa 1799, the film is only very loosely 
related to its source material. The main character, Ichabod Crane (Johnny 
Depp), is the same, but he has been transformed from a gangly schoolteacher 
into a constable who investigates the murders that have been plaguing Sleep 
Hollow, each one of the victims' heads severed and missing.
The element that the film does evoke from the story, which I have read 
countless times, is its overall atmosphere and mystery, and the somehow 
disturbing nature of its premise. Burton could have easily gone the "safe" 
root and made a PG-13 movie where each of the beheadings are shown offscreen, 
but that would be cheating. He realizes that since the whole story revolves 
around a phantom who lops off people's heads, he at least owes it to his 
audience to show every swing, slash, and chop. As is, the MPAA has given the 
picture, which is in the true tradition of the classic, campy Hammer films, 
an R-rating, but despite the frequent blood, there isn't anything graphic 
about it, and a 13-year-old would unquestionably be able to handle the murder 
scenes.
Certain images will stay with me for some time to come: the indelible opening 
scene amidst a scarecrow-filled cornfield; the fog that subtly sweeps in 
around the candlelight as the Horseman approaches; the gloomy autumn forests; 
the lyrical, slightly askew flashbacks to Lady Crane; and Christopher Walken, 
frightening and perfectly cast as the Horseman before his own death, complete 
with razor-sharp teeth and demonic eyes. Kudos must go out to director of 
photography Emmanuel Zubezki and production designer Rick Heinrichs for their 
astounding work that deserves to be remembered at Oscar time. Burton alum 
Danny Elfman should also be mentioned for his lavish, stirring music score.
As much as it has potential, "Sleepy Hollow" is ultimately one of Burton's 
weakest films, not as emotionally satisfying as 1990's poetic "Edward 
Scissorhands," not as entertaining and memorable as 1988's "Beetlejuice," and 
nowhere near the classic that 1985's comedic tour de force "Pee Wee's Big 
Adventure" is. Putting into consideration that I've liked every major Burton 
film except 1989's original "Batman," this is not as much of a criticism as 
it is an observation. "Sleepy Hollow" is a fine horror film that would have 
fit better with Halloween than Thanksgiving, but is, nonetheless, a creative 
achievement.
Where the film might have been improved is in its screenplay, by Andrew Kevin 
Walker, which feels a little rushed and doesn't give most of the characters 
enough material to work with. In "Edward Scissorhands," for example, each 
role, right down to the smallest one, was distinct and impressionable. Here, 
they are painfully thin, and you never really get a sense of who they 
are--that is, except for the three main characters. 
Johnny Depp, working with Burton for the third time (after "Edward 
Scissorhands" and 1994's "Ed Wood"), gives, coincidentally, his third 
performance that really stands out from the rest. Depp wisely chooses not to 
imitate the description of Ichabod described by Washington Irving, instead 
keeping him in spirit and creating his own individual personality.
Christina Ricci, who in the last two years has shed her child image to become 
a respectable adult actress, is angelic and suitably innocent as Katrina Van 
Tassel, the exact antithesis of her slutty, meanspirited character of Deedee 
in 1998's "The Opposite of Sex." Previously appearing in the Burtonesque "The 
Addams Family," Ricci, like Depp and Winona Ryder, is an ideal casting choice 
for a Burton film. 
Finally, Miranda Richardson, as Lady Van Tassel, Katrina's stepmother, is 
spellbinding once her part comes to the forefront in the climax. When a key 
twist occurs near the end, the film stood on that fine line that could have 
easily wavered into the deep end of corniness, but it avoids this unfortunate 
fate and remains nothing less than thrilling.
"Sleepy Hollow" is a horror-fantasy that all involved should be 
wholeheartedly proud to be a part of. In today's times, new visions and 
landscapes are difficult to come by, but every few years, Tim Burton comes 
through and proves there are sights that have never been seen before on such 
a breathtaking level. "Sleepy Hollow," like 1992's "Bram Stoker's Dracula," 
is an invigorating, sophisticated horror film that confirms you don't need a 
group of dimwitted teens being stalked and slashed to be successful.

Title
Review for Ninth Gate, The (1999)
Directed by Roman Polanski.
Cast: Johnny Depp, Emmanuelle Seigner, Frank Langella, Lena Olin, Barbara 
Jefford, Jack Taylor.
2000 - 133 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, sex, and nudity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, March 11, 2000.
"The Ninth Gate," an alleged mystery-thriller from famed, yet controversial, 
director Roman Polanski (1968's "Rosemary's Baby," 1974's "Chinatown"), is a 
wildly overlong 133-minutes sludge through well-worn territory and 
predictable twists and turns, seemingly leading up to a whopper of an ending. 
But the ending never arrives; the screen just fades to white, then to black, 
and the credits roll, before you have even seen anything that would make you 
care one way or the other about the fate of the protagonist and the 
predicament he is in.
Boris Balkan (Frank Langella), a wealthy collector of Lucifer-themed relics 
in New York City, hires seedy book dealer Dean Corso (Johnny Depp) for a 
well-compensated mission: travel to Europe, weed out the other two copies of 
a treasured, potentially dangerous book he owns, the 17th-century satanic 
text entitled "The Nine Gates of the Kingdom of Shadows," and investigate 
which of the three copies is the original. Containing the power to summon the 
Devil, Corso must work fast to find them, for whoever owns one of the books 
may very well be plotting the end of the world.
Based on the novel, "El Club Dumas," by Arturo Perez-Reverte, "The Ninth 
Gate" drags out its only somewhat intriguing investigation to ridiculous 
lengths, slowly--and I mean slowly--moving from one scene to the next. It is 
only in retrospect that you realize just how superfluous much of the film is, 
as Corso learns very little throughout, and is so dense that the viewer 
always knows more than he does (which isn't much to know, to begin with). 
Following an appropriately deliberate prologue and a superbly realized and 
entrancing opening credits sequence, with a memorably sumptuous music score 
by Wojciech Kilar, the film goes straight into downtime, and stays there for 
over an hour, treading through tedious scenes of meaningless exposition that 
don't get Corso anywhere further in his search.
The second hour of the film picks up considerably, as you finally are treated 
to scenes that incredibly seem to be leading somewhere, even when they 
aren't. There are a few chase sequences placed within the running time to add 
a little action to the arduous proceedings, and, more effectively, a handful 
of highly effective and tautly directed setpieces. One late moment that will 
intentionally be left vague as to not reveal one of the very few disturbing 
developments, involves Balkan in a dark and atmospheric castle, black clouds 
forbiddingly looming overhead. All of the striking images the film has to 
offer, by the way, are thanks to the always-impressive cinematography of 
Darius Khondji (whose work on 1999's "In Dreams" was snubbed of an Oscar 
nomination).
For such a world-class filmmaker, Polanski gets little support from his 
actors, almost all of whom turn in amateurish performances, as if they were 
performing in their very first movie (which is far from the truth), or had 
just received the script five minutes prior to when filming commenced (which 
may be the case, based on the evidence here). Johnny Depp appears to be 
playing the movie for laughs, and isn't having much fun doing it, while Lena 
Olin, as the alluring previous owner of one of the books, slinks her way 
through her scenes and doesn't pay attention to such a thing as "good" 
acting. Of the major characters, only Emmanuelle Seigner, who happens to be 
Polanski's younger wife, spices up the goings-on. As a mysterious traveler 
that keeps running into Corso during his trip, and then finally is revealed 
to know more about "The Nine Gates" than meets the eye, Seigner adds 
much-needed life to a picture that, without her and a few select technical 
credits, would be as dead as a doornail.
"The Ninth Gate" wants to be a horror movie, and Polanski apparently is 
attempting to recapture the acclaim he received from his first satanic-themed 
motion picture, "Rosemary's Baby," but he has no such luck. That 1968 classic 
chiller offered an outstanding performance from Mia Farrow, and was filled 
with a lumbering sense of dread and fear, two things that are largely absent 
from "The Ninth Gate."    

Title
Review for Nashville (1975)
Directed by Robert Altman.
Cast: Lily Tomlin, Gwen Welles, Henry Gibson, Geraldine Chaplin, Ronee 
Blakely, Ned Beatty, Barbara Harris, Keith Carradine, Karen Black, 
Shelley Duvall, Jeff Goldblum, David Arkin, 
Barbara Baxley, Timothy Brown, Robert Doqui, Allen Garfield, Scott 
Glenn, David Hayward, Michael Murphy, Allan Nicholls, Dave Peel, 
Christina Raines, Bert Remsen, Keenan Wynn.
1975 - 159 minutes.
Rated R (for profanity and nudity).
Reviewed September 1998.
Director Robert Altman's "Nashville" has been widely hailed as one of, if not
the greatest film of the 1970's, and it is just that. The film is a sprawling,
flawless, epic mosaic of five days in the lives of 24 characters in the
country music capital of the world. Altman later made other pictures with a
huge cast of characters, such as 1993's "Short Cuts" and 1994's "Ready to
Wear," but this film is like no other I have 
ever seen for one major reason: it plays exactly, and I mean exactly like real
life. 
For people more into conventional movies, look elsewhere, because many things
happen that aren't explained, and that can't be explained, because there are
things in life that just happen, without any explanation, and just as in real
life, things happen to characters, and characters simply do things naturally.
Within the five 
day frame of "Nashville," which clocks in at 159 minutes, most of the
characters never really get to know each other. Their lives occasionally cross
paths, and in some cases, characters may run into others that later on may
unknowingly change the fate of their lives. The wide range of people in the
film consist of country singers, political aides, inhabitants of Nashville,
and visitors who have come to see the country shows. For most of the running
time, there are rarely huge plot 
developments, or twists, and when they do come, they come from the characters,
not the plot itself. This style of filmmaking rarely is done, and most of the
time, it is done badly. But Altman directs with such a sure hand, and has
written such a truthful, vigorating, original screenplay that "Nashville" is
an emotional powerhouse, and a one-of-a-kind motion picture experience.
It would be difficult to describe all of the characters here, except in the
general way that I have already done. Instead, I'd like to talk about the many
layers of "Nashville." The movie doesn't follow the 24 characters, as much as
it observes them in everyday life, which I think is much more effective. By
simply "following" them, there is a greater chance that we might just learning
something in the process about human nature, and I think this film succeeds at
that too. 
Another layer is that country music isn't the only focus during the five days
that the characters are there, but there is also a political election going
on. These two elements of music and politics intermingle throughout, as do the
people, as they walk in and out of each other's lives.
The performances are flawless in "Nashville," as is the music, which won the
Academy Award for Best Song ("I'm Easy"). Some of the standouts in the cast
are Lily Tomlin, who plays an unhappy housewife with two deaf children;
Geraldine Chaplin as a naive British journalist who has travelled to Nashville
to film a documentary; Ronee Blakely as a country artist who has a nervous
breakdown; and Gwen Welles as a waitress who dreams of becoming a singer, but
has no talent at all.
"Nashville" is a masterpiece in every sense of the word, and it is one of the
most important movies ever made. The picture may be set in Nashville,
Tennessee, but it has a much wider scope, and the last scene is as
heartbreaking, surprising, and hopeful as any moment ever captured on film. 
There are no so-called "likable" characters, because Altman paints each one as
a real person with both virtues and flaws, but it is so "real" that we are
able to sympathize with everyone's plight. "Nashville" is about America in
general; it is about our hopes, our dreams, and our disappointments in life.
         - Copyright 1998 by Dustin Putman
           Dustin
Putman's Film Reviews> 

Title
Review for I Woke Up Early the Day I Died (1998)
Directed by Aris Illiopulous.
Cast: Billy Zane, Sandra Bernhard, John Ritter, Tippi Hedren, David Ward, 
Nicollette Sheridan, Christina Ricci, Steven Weber, Will Patton, Karen Black, 
Tara Reid, Jonathan Taylor Thomas, Eartha Kitt, Rick Schroder, Michael 
Greene, Kathleen Robertson, Taylor Negron, Abraham Benrubi, Conrad Brooks, 
Ann Magnuson, Andrew McCarthy, Ron Perlman, Max Perlich, Summer Phoenix, Rain 
Phoenix, Carel Struycken, Vampira, Kathleen Wood.
1999 - 91 minutes (Opens 9/3 at NYC's The Screening Room).
Not Rated (equivalent of a PG-13 or R for partial nudity and violence).
Reviewed July 14, 1999.
Well, here's an odd little number with an interesting history. Written by the 
late, not-great Edward D. Wood (director of two of the worst films ever made, 
"Plan 9 From Outer Space" and "Glen or Glenda"), "I Woke Up Early the Day I 
Died" was one of his long-lost screenplays that was recovered years ago, but 
his widow, Kathleen Wood, would not agree for anyone to produce it until a 
director was found that would stay very close to the written page. The person 
for the job happened to be Aris Illiopulous, and in translation to the 
screen, the director has made a movie without a line of spoken dialogue, and 
with an all-star cast who constantly ham it up in pure Ed Wood fashion. Aside 
from Billy Zane, every actor appears only for a brief cameo, each of which 
are so unsatisfying that the fresh stars (Christina Ricci, Jonathan Taylor 
Thomas, Rick Schroder, Tara Reid), veteran performers (Tippi Hedren, John 
Ritter, Will Patton), and camp divas (Eartha Kitt, Karen Black, Nicollette 
Sheridan) come off as mere distractions that hurt, rather than help, the film 
as a whole.
The picture begins as a mental hospital inmate, billed as The Thief (Billy 
Zane), dresses in a nurse's uniform and escapes. Looking for money, he shoots 
and kills a loan shark at a bank and instantly becomes a wanted man. While at 
what he thinks is the funeral of the loan shark, The Thief spies on the four 
mourners (Sandra Bernhard, Tippi Hedren, Michael Greene, John Ritter) whom he 
later suspects stole the money he hid in one of the graves, and stalks each 
one, hoping to find his money. Or something like that.
"I Woke Up Early the Day I Died" goes off in all sorts of directions after 
this basic set-up, as we also briefly (and I mean very briefly) meet cops 
(Andrew McCarthy, Steven Weber, Rick Shroder), a preacher (Will Patton), a 
teenage hooker (Christina Ricci), an undertaker (Carel Struyken) and his 
assistant (Max Perlich), a boy and girl at a beach (Jonathan Taylor Thomas, 
Summer Phoenix) who find a dead body after it plunges off a cliff, a singer 
(Eartha Kitt), a bar waitress (Tara Reid), and a ballroom woman (Nicollette 
Sheridan). I couldn't really explain too much more of the story in fear that 
it would simply get far too confusing, but suffice to say, the film concludes 
on the day The Thief gets up early before he dies. 
Empty would be the perfect word to describe this obviously extremely 
low-budget picture (which Zane also produced). Although it is questionable if 
the film really is exactly like the Ed Wood script, it certainly has the look 
and feel of one of his godawful, but lovingly-made features from the '50s and 
'60s, which is actually a negative thing. As much as Wood loved the art of 
film, the truth was that he had no real talent, and this latest incarnation 
only proves such a thing, as the story and plot developments are inept, 
hollow, and vacant of any human emotions. Never do we identify with The 
Thief, or even understand who he really is, and everyone else is a famous 
person who made the film for no sane reason, since the movie never gives them 
a chance to do anything but camp up the proceedings (as if they already 
weren't camped-up enough).
Writing this approximately four days since I saw the film, it has already 
become foggy in my memory, so don't count on having it stick in your mind for 
more than the 90-minute running time. If anything, "I Woke Up Early the Day I 
Died" is an interesting failure. Choosing not to include any words (aside 
from the lyrics on the soundtrack which, by the way, are pretty memorable 
songs, more so than the movie) was a fairly courageous move on Illiopulous's 
part, and I also liked the idea of having portions of the script occasionally 
superimpose over a scene, so as to fill us in on what exactly is going on. 
It's just too bad that the talented array of actors assembled for this 
production have nothing to do but walk on and walk off; with a good script, 
they could have brought us a, no doubt, showstopper. As is, "I Woke Up Early 
the Day I Died" comes off as a gimmicky experiment that does not pay off, and 
is unable to rise above the thin material. Like all of the films Ed Wood 
directed, this new movie is a pure and simple dud. 
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Clockwatchers (1997)
Directed by Jill Sprecher.
Cast: Toni Collette, Parker Posey, Lisa Kudrow, Alanna Uback, Helen 
Fitzgerald, Stanley DeSantis, Jamie Kennedy, Kevin Cooney, Paul Dooley, 
Bob Balaban.
1998 - 93 minutes.
Reviewed November 15, 1998.
Jill Sprecher's "Clockwatchers," is my favorite type of film. It is a 
film that effortlessly observes characters and situations in an everyday 
setting, and feels as if you could be watching a documentary because it 
is so real.
At the start of, "Clockwatchers," Iris (Toni Collette), a shy, 
frumpy-looking young woman, starts a job at a credit office as a temp 
secretary, and is able to break out of her weak shell thanks to meeting 
and becoming friends with three other temps at the office---the 
rebellious Margaret (Parker Posey), who shows Iris the ropes; Paula 
(Lisa Kudrow), a beautiful woman who always claims she is in the middle 
of acting jobs, but we sense is just trying to cover up her unhappiness; 
and Jane (Alanna Ubach), who is about to marry an insensitive guy who 
tries to buy her things everytime he does something wrong. As the film 
follows these four completely original and intriguing characters, an 
underlying story develops, involving a mystery worker at the office who 
is stealing the belongings of everyone else. Could one of Iris' friends 
be behind the crime, or is it Cleo (Helen Fitzgerald), an unusual, 
silent character who has just been brought into the company as vice 
executive?
"Clockwatchers" is a jewel of a film, and it was so refreshing to watch 
the characters and their various interactions with each other that I 
totally got caught up in it. 
Thanks to the smart, perceptive screenplay, also written by Sprecher, 
and the performances by all four leads, the characters easily were able 
to come alive. Collette is outstanding as the repressed person in the 
group who slowly grows stronger as she becomes friends with the other 
three. Posey is winning and humorous, as a woman who hides behind a 
shield of one-liners and sarcasm, blocking herself from everyone else. 
And Kudrow is startlingly touching as the blonde bombshell who knows she 
isn't getting what she expected out of her life.
The mystery that surrounds the picture does not feel at all like a 
gimmick, even though it very well could have, and is highly 
unpredictable and surprising, and the final revelation is quiet and 
moving.
Credit also must go to the way that the film portrays the life of an 
office worker. For temp secretaries, their days are filled with long, 
empty hours of sitting, being bored, and doing petty chores such as 
copying applications and stapling papers. We rarely ever get to see this 
sort of close observation in a work setting on film, and it was 
fascinating from the first frame to the last.
If there is any sort of problem with "Clockwatchers," it is that more 
could have been done with the supporting characters, but this does not 
at all put a dent in the effectiveness of, "Clockwatchers," which is an 
affirming, confidant first film from Jill Sprecher, a talent I hope we 
get to see a lot more of in the future.
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Dogma (1999)
Directed by Kevin Smith.
Cast: Linda Fiorentino, Ben Affleck, Matt Damon, Chris Rock, Jason Mewes, 
Kevin Smith, Salma Hayek, Jason Lee, Alan Rickman, George Carlin, Alanis 
Morissette, Janeane Garofalo, Betty Aberlin, Bud Cort.
1999 - 125 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, and blood).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, November 14, 1999.
At the opening of director Kevin Smith's latest opus, the 2-hour-plus 
"Dogma," there is a seemingly never-ending disclaimer (that turns into a 
hysterical joke) about how the following film should be taken as nothing more 
than a fantasy, and that religious groups (and movie critics) should take it 
as such. While "Dogma" is, in fact, obviously a fantasy with heavy religious 
themes concerning Catholicism, the main reason the disclaimer was tacked on 
was because this movie is, to put it simply, a long, rambling, intentionally 
corny train wreck of ideas and plot strands. If there had been no such 
disclaimer at the beginning, audience members would likely be booing at the 
screen five minutes in at its overall badness. On second thought, maybe being 
bad was half the point. I don't know why, but maybe.
Here's the rubbish (read: plot): Two fallen angels from Heaven, Loki (Matt 
Damon) and Bartleby (Ben Affleck), plot to be relinquished of their sins and 
allowed back through the pearly gates by walking through the arch doorways of 
a church in New Jersey as it's being hallowed. Enter Bethany (Linda 
Fiorentino), a worker at an abortion clinic who has recently been struggling 
with her faith in God. Appearing before her in a ball of fire until she takes 
the fire extinguisher to him is another angel (Alan Rickman), who tells her 
that she has been chosen to travel to NJ and stop Loki and Bartleby, for if 
they step foot in the church, it could mean the end of civilization as we 
know it. Along to aid in Bethany's quest is the 13th black apostle Rufus 
(Chris Rock), the heavenly muse Serendipity (Salma Hayek), and, of course, 
Jay (Jason Mewes) and Silent Bob (Kevin Smith).
The first fifteen minutes of "Dogma" are its best; so entertaining and rich 
in energy that I questioned whether it would be able to stay at that level 
for a couple hours, which it ultimately does not do. Jumping off and running 
as a spoof in the "Airplane!"/"Naked Gun" tradition, the introduction to Loki 
and Bartleby is screamingly funny, particularly their run-in with a nun 
(played to the comic hilt by Betty Aberlin), whom they encourage should take 
the money she has collected in her cup and buy herself something nice. The 
intro to Bethany is equally inspired and appropriately wacky, especially in 
her late-night chat at a Mexican restaurant with the angel who hands her her 
mission. "Are we in Mexico?" Bethany asks when they magically appear there. 
His reply: "No, we're at the Mexican restaurant right down the street from 
your house." 
The proceedings in "Dogma" become shaky soon after, when Rufus literally 
falls from the sky and offers an extra hand in stopping the two angels, whom 
have recently gone on a killing spree of sinners as they travel to the NJ 
church. The tone of the picture changes gears here from being a crazy 
slapstick into simply being a cheesy, comedic hodgepodge, in which the 
majority of the jokes fall flat. While consonantly inventive, writer-director 
Smith's off-kilter mood quickly stops being particularly humorous and just 
grows overly tedious, with several particularly tough-to-endure dry patches, 
and a pointless interlude with a creature made of excrement.
While several of the conversations within the film are thought-provoking in 
their implications, "Dogma" is, otherwise, as light as a feather, with only 
the exciting, fresh cast keeping things afloat. Real-life friends Matt Damon 
and Ben Affleck, reuniting once again after 1997's "Good Will Hunting," have 
a chemistry on-screen that you rarely see, and their working together gives 
them an added spark. They are playing angels, however, so their performances 
stem from their philosophical, occasionally violent, personalities. Linda 
Fiorentino, in the central role, is the only thesp who remotely takes herself 
seriously, and her own internal struggles with her belief system is the most 
intriguing element of the whole film. And Salma Hayek, although having very 
little to do, is not only handed an amusing striptease scene, but also takes 
a stab at the comedy. Her best line: "I am the creator of 19 out of the 
top-20 highest-grossing movies of all time. You know the one with the boy at 
home by himself who had to stop those burglars and he put his hands on his 
face and went, 'Ahhh!'? Well, I don't know who made that crap." Annoying as 
can be is comedian Chris Rock; let's just say his jokes on racism are getting 
old very fast, and a little of Rock goes a long way.
Slightly too vulgar for its own good (Smith is head-over-heels in love with 
the F-word in every other line of dialogue, and it doesn't work well in the 
context of this film) and severely uneven on the screenplay level, "Dogma" is 
a petty little movie that can be pushed aside in the Kevin Smith collection, 
in hopes that next time he will make a movie more along the lines of his more 
biting 1994 "Clerks" or, his best film, 1997's phenomenal "Chasing Amy." 
Cameos by Alanis Morissette, as God, who turns out to have a goofy sense of 
humor, and Janeane Garofalo as Bethany's abortion clinic co-worker, are fun 
and, in the former's case, memorably funny, but what is the point of their 
appearances? "Dogma" is not supposed to be taken seriously, which is as it 
should be, but it's supposed to at least be worth the effort of going out and 
spending money to see it. It isn't.

Title
Review for Halloween (1978)
Note: In celebration of the holiday, I offer to you an archive review I wrote 
of John Carpenter's 1978 classic, "Halloween," in October of 1998. Not to 
toot my own horn, but just rereading this review made me (1) cringe, (2) 
notice how much my writing has strengthened in the last two years, and (3) be 
thankful I've gotten better, and not worse :)  If you can get past the fairly 
inept writing of yours truly, it should be known that my feelings for 
"Halloween" will always remain the same, and I urge you that, if you have 90 
minutes of nothing to do tonight, and you have never seen the film, go out 
and rent it and have yourself a frighteningly good time. If you have already 
seen it, watch it again. Happy Halloween!!!
Directed by John Carpenter. 
Cast: Jamie Lee Curtis, Donald Pleasence, Nancy Loomis, P.J. Soles, Charles 
Cyphers, Brian Andrews, Kyle Richards, Nancy Stephens. 
1978 - 93 minutes
Rated R (for violence, sexual situations, brief nudity, and profanity). 
Reviewed October 26, 1998.
I have probably seen John Carpenter's horror masterpiece, "Halloween," more 
times than any other film (the first time being when I was all of 
4-years-old), and it will always be the best horror film ever made, in my 
eyes. None of its six sequels (and counting) have been able to even remotely 
capture the style and brilliance of the original. I simply cannot imagine a 
genre picture being better than this one. 
"Halloween," starts off with a prologue set in 1963, all done in an 
elaborate, one-take POV shot, in which 6-year-old Michael Myers grabs a 
butcher knife, makes his way upstairs, slips on a clown mask, and goes into 
his teenage sister's room and stabs her to death.
Switch to October 30th, 1978, Myers, now an adult, escapes from a mental 
hospital, returns to his hometown of Haddonfield, and on Halloween night, 
goes on a murder spree, singling out three friends, Laurie (Jamie Lee 
Curtis), Annie (Nancy Loomis), and Linda (P.J Soles), two of which are 
babysitting. Meanwhile, Michael Myers' psychiatrist, Dr. Sam Loomis (Donald 
Pleasence), knows he will strike again, and goes searching for him.
John Carpenter's "Halloween," is the quintessential horror film, perfectly 
executed, atmospheric, suspenseful, and terrifying. Yes, it is a "slasher" 
movie, but I'd like to think that it is so good that it surpasses that 
dubious label. 
There are many reasons why "Halloween," was and still is an effective film. 
One of the big reasons is Carpenter's clever use of the foregrounds and 
backgrounds of all of his shots. If you look really good at the backgrounds 
of all of the scenes, you will often see something lurking around, including 
Michael Myers himself. Many pictures have copied this approach, but none have 
been able to do it so successfully.
Another reason it is so enthralling is that the story is very, very simple, 
and is actually a sort of "slice-of-life" movie, when dealing with the 
teenage girls. There are no "big" scenes between them. Instead, it just sort 
of observes them in their normal life. It just happens to be while they are 
being stalked by a serial killer. In recent horror movies, there is always a 
mystery to who the killer is, and this 90's-style approach is getting old 
fast, even though I am a big fan of "Scream," "I Know What You Did Last 
Summer," and "Urban Legend."
"Halloween" also has the most memorable music score I've ever listened to. 
Like 1960's "Psycho," the score, when heard, is always paired with this 
movie, and even those people who have never seen it probably can hum it. It's 
sort of like in, "Psycho." Many people remember the shower scene, even if 
they've never actually seen the movie.
Despite being a slasher film, "Halloween" surprisingly has next to no gore or 
on-screen violence. Because of this, it proves that horror pictures do not 
need to have graphic violence to be a scary experience (something 1981's 
highly inferior, "Halloween II," should have realized). 
As most people know, this is the film that made Jamie Lee Curtis a star, not 
to mention being labeled a "Scream Queen," and this is actually one of her 
best performances, even though it was her feature debut. Donald Pleasence, 
who died in 1995 after making, "Halloween: The Curse of Michael Myers," also 
was linked to his role as Dr. Loomis more than any other in his life. P.J. 
Soles, as the promiscuous, big-mouthed Linda, is often very funny, and a 
standout. And Michael Myers...well...no slasher villain will ever be able to 
compare to him. 
John Carpenter's "Halloween," is a nearly flawless thriller, but it is also 
simply a great motion picture. Period. It is everything a film in this genre 
should be: intelligent, stylish, and horrifying. "Halloween," is a 
one-of-a-kind, unforgettable experience. Watch it in a pitch black room while 
you're home alone one night, preferably on the namesake holiday. I dare you.

Title
Review for Pearl Harbor (2001)
Directed by Michael Bay.
Cast: Ben Affleck, Josh Hartnett, Kate Beckinsale, Alec Baldwin, John Voight, 
Dan Aykroyd, Cuba Gooding Jr., William Lee Scott, James King, Tom Sizemore, 
Mako, Catherine Kellner, Sara Rue, Jennifer Garner, Colm Feore, Ewan Bremner, 
Greg Zola. 
2001 - 183 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for violence, profanity, and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, May 25, 2001.
Telling a love story amidst a tragic, historical backdrop isn't a new 
conceit. In 1998, James Cameron's "Titanic" captured the attention of 
audiences everywhere to make it not only the highest-grossing film in 
history, but also the Oscar winner for Best Picture. "Titanic" was clearly 
the most notable model for director Michael Bay (1998's "Armageddon") and 
screenwriter Randall Wallace (1995's "Braveheart") when they set out to make 
the $135-million, 3-hour-plus "Pearl Harbor." Unfortunately, all of its 
striking similarities only serve to expose "Pearl Harbor" for what it really 
is: a pale imitation of a brilliant, modern-day classic.
Rafe McCawley (Ben Affleck) and Danny Walker (Josh Hartnett) are top-notch 
bomber pilots, circa 1941, who have been best friends since their 
Tennessee-based childhood. Their life is changed with an encounter with 
beautiful nurse Evelyn Johnson (Kate Beckinsale). Rafe is clearly smitten, 
and after a glorious four weeks together, they are hopelessly in love. Soon, 
Rafe is gone to Great Britain to participate in combat, only to end up 
presumed dead after his plane is shot down. Turning to each other for 
comfort, Danny and Evelyn, now stationed at Pearl Harbor in Hawaii, begin 
their own romance, not yet knowing that Rafe is alive, after all. By the time 
Rafe walks back into their lives, causing turmoil in each of their respective 
relationships, December 7, 1941--"a date that will live in infamy"--is about 
to begin.
The thought of Michael "bang-bang-blow-things-up" Bay attempting a 
serious-minded, historical motion picture was disconcerting, at first. Bay, 
whose strong suit is most definitely not realism and three-dimensional 
characters, is acclaimed for making "popcorn" movies with quick edits and 
non-stop action, not a historical recreation of one of the most distressing 
occurrences in U.S. history. "Pearl Harbor" could have been a filmed disaster 
of a real-life disaster. It could have been an embarrassment for all of the 
creative forces involved in its production. And, most of all, it could have 
stood as a terrible, Hollywoodized disservice to a slice of American history. 
It turns out that it is, thankfully, none of these things, although it does 
have its own problems.
The movie can easily be divided into three sections, with each offering up 
varying degrees of success. The opening 90 minutes lay out the development 
and basic groundwork for the three central characters--Rafe, Danny, and 
Evelyn--as their unfortunate love triangle falls into place. The disastrous 
Japanese attack on Pearl Harbor takes up the next 35-40 minutes of screen 
time, as we follow each character's heroic role in the battle. And the 
remaining 50 minutes bring us back to settle the love story, as the aftermath 
of the Pearl Harbor attack is dealt with and General Dolittle (Alec Baldwin) 
puts into effect the 1942 raid on Tokyo.
The tragic, powerful love story of "Titanic" was so very effective because it 
dealt with characters who were deeply involved in the sinking of the cruise 
liner, and whose relationship and lives were changed because of it. Jack and 
Rose, played by Leonardo DiCaprio and Kate Winslet, stood for all of the 
passengers aboard the fateful maiden voyage of Titanic, and therefore, they 
meant a great deal more to the viewer. In "Pearl Harbor," the love triangle 
that arises does not garner the same potency, due to the flawed screenplay, 
and the fact that the outcome of the relationship has literally nothing to do 
with what happened at Pearl Harbor. The romance simply is not very 
convincing, and occasionally clangs with the real-life accounts of the months 
leading up to World War II.
In the world that writer Randall Wallace inhabits, human beings say things 
like, "Every time I see a sunset, I'll think of you," and "You've captured my 
heart." The dialogue is intermittently so cringe-inducing that you feel bad 
for the actors who have to utter those howlers, followed by a period of time 
in which you question why they didn't laugh at Wallace and tell him to 
rewrite it to match what real people might naturally say. Whenever one of the 
protagonists says such cheeseball lines, which luckily isn't so often that it 
completely destroys the movie's dignity, it sends the whole romance angle 
into jarring orbit.
More strong is the friendship between Rafe and Danny, whose bond ultimately 
can't be broken by the conflict of a woman in the middle. As portrayed by Ben 
Affleck (2000's "Bounce") and Josh Hartnett (2001's "Town & Country"), the 
outcome of their relationship is far more poignant and compelling than that 
of them and Evelyn, because the platonic love that they share for one another 
is so honestly felt. 
All three main performers should be commended for taking what could have been 
stock roles, and turning them into seemingly real people, even when they are 
saying silly lines. Affleck's Rafe is a little too smarmy at the onset, but 
the view of him gradually warms up as the film progresses, and Affleck does 
well with his cocky charm. Josh Hartnett is even better as good-ol'-boy 
Danny, whose quiet, unforced innocence is unmistakably engaging. Rounding out 
the trio, Kate Beckinsale (1999's "Brokedown Palace") brings an intelligent 
sweetness to Evelyn that could be superior to both of her male counterparts. 
It is too bad, then, that her part of the story--that of the love 
story--works the least successfully.
In supporting roles, James King (2001's "Blow") and William Lee Scott (2000's 
"Gone in Sixty Seconds") are very good as a fellow nurse and fighter who fall 
head over heels for one another, with ill-fated results. Jon Voight (1999's 
"Varsity Blues") is emphatic as wheelchair-bound President Franklin 
Roosevelt, while Alec Baldwin (2000's "State and Main"), Dan Aykroyd (2000's 
"Loser"), and Mako (1997's "Seven Years in Tibet") make equally memorable 
impressions. On the flip side, Cuba Gooding Jr. (2000's "Men of Honor"), 
whose role of a real-life cook on one of the U.S. ships at Pearl Harbor who 
shot down two Japanese fighter jets, is superfluous and far too brief to make 
a notable impact. Gooding Jr. is a fine actor, but his appearance simply pads 
out the running time an extra ten minutes.
The centerpiece of "Pearl Harbor" is, of course, the Japanese invasion, and 
it does not disappoint. Suspenseful and frighteningly real, this is the one 
section in which director Bay made the correct choice in not hamming the 
proceedings up. With stark photography, tight editing, and magnificently 
rendered visual effects by Industrial Light & Magic, this middle interlude is 
certainly the highlight for sheer entertainment value. Incidentally, though, 
it is the only section in need of more palpable emotions. Ships are blown up 
and countless lives are lost, but viewer reaction to this is oddly mote, 
perhaps because of how fast it moves from one scene to the next.
"Pearl Harbor" is a difficult movie to review. It is in no way a great movie, 
but it also is far from bad. There is a lot to recommend, from the 
performances, to the two war sequences, to a climactic scene that is simply 
heartbreaking, but there are also a fair share of detractors. The film 
presses on for just over three hours with no clear destination or purpose, 
and the supposed-to-be cathartic final scenes are hampered by a needless, 
misguided narration that seems to cheapen the realities of World War II. 
Nonetheless, the calamitous events that occurred on December 7, 1941 are 
boldly brought to cinematic life, and it demands to be seen. "Titanic," it 
surely is not, but "Pearl Harbor" has enough finer points to pass as a good 
film that could have been better.
    - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
      http://www.all-reviews.com/reviewers/dustinputman.htm
http://us.imdb.com/reviewsby?Dustin+Putman
http://www.atnzone.com

Title
Review for Random Hearts (1999)
Directed by Sydney Pollack.
Cast: Harrison Ford, Kristen Scott Thomas, Charles Dutton, Kate Mara, Bonnie 
Hunt, Dennis Haysbert, Sydney Pollack, Dylan Baker, Richard Jenkins, Paul 
Guilfoyle, Susanna Thompson, Peter Coyote, Lynne Thigpen, Ariana Thomas, Bill 
Cobbs, Susan Floyd, Edie Falco.
1999 - 131 minutes
Rated R (for brief violence, profanity, and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, October 9, 1999.
"Random Hearts" is a motion picture clearly holding so much promise that, 
when midway through it throws its thought-provoking notions to the wind in 
order to develop a thoroughly unconvincing love story, you can't help but 
feel cheated. Tech credits are at the top of their game all-around, from Dave 
Grusin's appropriately atmospheric, jazzy music score that boasts as a 
counter for the character's uneasy feelings, to Philippe Rousselot's 
gorgeously polished cinematography that paints its attractive 
settings--Washington, D.C., New Hampshire, and Miami--with palpably vibrant 
flavor. All performances are impressively handled, as well, and the editing 
is mostly tight and well-paced, if slightly overlong. The film itself, 
however, is floundered by the heavy-handed romantic subplot that eventually 
becomes the main focus, and since we don't believe for a second the 
coldly-detached relationship, all tension evaporates in no time.
Adapted from a novel by Warren Adler and directed by Academy Award Winner 
Sydney Pollack (1985's "Out of Africa"), "Random Hearts" opens with an 
emotionally stirring first act, as we individually meet two strangers 
far-divided by their profession and status, yet will soon be drawn together 
under dire circumstances: Dutch Van Der Broeck (Harrison Ford), a 
happily-married D.C. cop in the internal affairs department, and Kay Chandler 
(Kristen Scott Thomas), a congresswoman who is in the midst of a bid to be 
re-elected. Throughout the day the film opens on, the big news on the 
television is the fatal airplane crash of a 747 headed for Miami that plunged 
into the Chesapeake Bay. Dutch thinks nothing of it, until he receives his 
wife's message on their home answering machine, letting him know she was 
unexpectedly called to do a catalogue shoot in Miami, and would be gone for 
the weekend. Acquiring her co-workers' help, Dutch discovers that there was 
no planned model shoot in Miami, and that, on the plane, his wife was seated 
next to a man--Kay's husband--and was listed on the ticket as Mr. Chandler's 
spouse. Devastated to think that the woman he thought he knew for years had 
been hiding countless secrets from him all along, Dutch seeks out Kay to tell 
her, but she makes it perfectly clear that she has a teenage daughter (Kate 
Mara) and a high-profile career to protect, and any information that leaks 
out about the affair will make front-page news on the D.C. papers.
That's the first hour. Dutch and Kay's first meeting surprisingly comes at 
the 60-minute mark, and what follows only comes off as little more than a 
gimmick to create romantic sparks in a story that it is truly unnecessary in. 
Both unknowingly travelling to Miami to check out the hotel their spouse's 
were to have met at, Kay and Dutch meet up, and after a night of 
salsa-dancing and alcohol "on the rocks," Kay breaks down crying in the car, 
and what does Dutch do? He probably tries to comfort her, you say? Nah! 
Instead, he roughly grabs her and they start to kiss and grope each other, to 
which Kay's immediate response is, "well, that was fun." As Dutch becomes 
more and more embroiled in his mission of finding out the particulars of his 
wife's affair, and Kay struggles to keep the press and her daughter from 
finding out the sordid truth, they look to each other for companionship, and 
indulge in a close, loving relationship that nonetheless must be kept a 
secret--at least, until she has lost the election, if she does.
The basic premise of "Random Hearts" should have been merely a jumping-off 
point to develop an engrossing, highly-charged drama about the issues of 
infidelity, death, and human relationships, and it honestly couldn't have 
been better in its opening sections. That Dutch keeps hearing about the crash 
on the news, and yet is oblivious to the fact that his wife has been killed, 
is deeply poignant, and his growing suspicions that the woman he loved was 
not the woman he thought he knew, is a fascinating concept, handled with 
precision and taut direction by Sydney Pollack. The portrait of Kay's prime 
discovery, in contrast, is also quite realistic. She is upset, of course, but 
in true political fashion, hides most of her feelings from the public, and 
tries to give off a strong exterior, when she is crying inside.
Once Dutch and Kay come together and first lock lips, the authenticity of the 
story vanishes, and the so-far contemplative, provocative tone dissolves 
into, more or less, the type of film Roger Ebert often labels a "Shaggy Dog 
Love Story," in which a romance is treated in the most cliched, overwrought 
manner, and is melodramatic simply for the purpose of being melodramatic. If 
this, the weakest aspect of the picture, still is stronger than the hideously 
corny romance in the recent "For Love of the Game," that still is a rather 
small compliment, and the only one I can give it. Like Kevin Costner and 
Kelly Preston, but to a slightly lesser extent, it is never believable that 
Harrison Ford and Kristen Scott Thomas are falling in love. Kay's 
characterizations, especially, make no sense and are hypocritical, as she is 
cold to Dutch one minute, and falling into his arms the next, then angry 
again. Has Hollywood recently been grossly misinformed that the way to get an 
audiece to care about a "love story" is to portray the characters as not 
being able to stand each other? To make an even more general criticism, Dutch 
and Kay never appear to be naturally swept away by each other; instead, they 
seem to be doing it for the sole purpose of moving the gradually 
deteriorating plot along.
Through its startling ups and downs, it is the powerful performances from 
Harrison Ford and Kristen Scott Thomas that keep the film afloat. With most 
of the supporting players wasted (save for Kate Mara's refined, quietly 
touching role as Kay's 15-year-old daughter), the show depends almost 
entirely on the charisma of Ford and Thomas. They have zero romantic 
chemistry on-screen, sorry to say, but when apart, give superior performances 
to almost anything else I've seen them in. Dutch's feelings of resentment and 
anger at his own cluelessness over his wife's "other life," are all the more 
effectively-drawn due to Ford's sometimes underrated acting chops. In a role 
not quite like any others he's played, and a far cry from his stock action 
pictures, Ford holds his own against Thomas, an always-sparkling actress who 
has the power to be both funny and firmly affecting.
When "Random Hearts" is good, it really is exceptional and unusually 
intelligent for a studio picture, but when it is mediocre (that would be the 
whole last 70 minutes, save for the final scene), it makes you downright 
frustrated. The screenplay, by Kurt Luedtke, is an extremely uneven one. With 
a first hour of such obvious power, how could Luedtke have taken such a 
disappointing u-turn? If the film had stayed on the more-than-promising 
course it originally was on before its derailment, the picture would have had 
the capability of being one of the best films of the year, and with someone 
such as Atom Egoyan (1997's "The Sweet Hereafter") at the helm, it 
undoubtedly would have been. As is, "Random Hearts" has one-half of terrific 
material, and then resorts to the ultimate betrayal: formulaic filmmaking.

Title
Review for Autumn in New York (2000)
Directed by Joan Chen.
Cast: Richard Gere, Winona Ryder, Elaine Stritch, Anthony LaPaglia, Sherry 
Stringfield, Vera Farmiga, Jill Hennessy.
2000 - 105 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, August 12, 2000.
Ever seen 1970's "Love Story," where Ryan O'Neal had to come to terms with 
his love, and the impending death, of the sickly Ali McGraw? How about last 
spring's "Here on Earth," in which Chris Klein was forced to cope with Leelee 
Sobieski's bout with cancer? Joan Chen's "Autumn in New York" is yet another 
in a growing trend of romantic weepies, in which two people fall 
head-over-heels in love, but find themselves being torn apart by one of their 
inevitable deaths to a token, movie-style illness. Despite MGM's decision to 
not screen the picture for review for critics, which causes much controversy 
and talk in Hollywood about how bad it must be, it's with at least partial 
happiness to report that it really isn't that awful. In fact, "Autumn in New 
York" isn't bad at all, and while much of the film simply doesn't work based 
on its worn-out plot mechanics and extremely uneven screenplay by Allison 
Burnett, the actors manage to raise the film up a notch from being a disaster 
to merely a passable, flawed time-waster.
Will (Richard Gere) is a womanizing 49-year-old restauranteur who catches a 
glimpse of the angelic Charlotte (Winona Ryder) celebrating her 22nd birthday 
with some friends at his restaurant. Their eyes meet, and after a brief 
meeting, he can't get her out of his mind, despite the sizable age 
difference. Following an invite to a high-profile gala and a wonderful night 
together, a romance ensues between the two, although Will is quick to point 
out to the poetry-loving, child-like Charlotte that "the only thing I can 
offer you is this--right now." Ah, but Charlotte's got a secret which she 
quickly divulges to him so "there will be no chance for confusion later on." 
Charlotte's got a rare heart problem, and she has very little time left to 
live. So as their love blossoms further, and her time on Earth grows shorter 
by the day, Will becomes determined to find a possible surgery that will cure 
her, or at the very least, prolong the inevitable.
It honestly isn't giving anything away to say that Charlotte is dying, 
because not only do the televisions ads hint around the subject, but it is 
revealed no more than thirty minutes into the film. The decision to uncover 
Charlotte's "secret" so early on is one of the film's problems, because since 
Will now knows about her illness, all scenes between the two revolve strictly 
around their noticeable age difference and/or her heart problem, and little 
time is spent actually getting to know the characters. Relatedly, when 
Charlotte first announces she is sick, the rest of the picture becomes 
effortless to telegraph in advance, so for the remainder of the film all you 
can do is sit and wait for the climactic death bed sequence.
Richard Gere and Winona Ryder are lovely together, and it is their hefty 
acting chops that manage to carry us through the story, predictable as it is. 
Gere's Will is an earnest man who, nevertheless, has a wandering eye and an 
unfaithful sexual prowess, despite his love for Charlotte. In essence, she 
helps him become a better man so that, when she finally slips away, he will 
be able to eventually find a loving, committed relationship with someone 
else. Ryder's Charlotte is a sweet-natured, idealistic soul with just enough 
quirks to become the most original and interesting character in the film. The 
28-year-old Ryder has always been a radiant actress, and she handles her role 
with just the right amount of caring and wide-eyed innocence that makes her 
fully believable as a 22-year-old.
As written by screenwriter Burnett, the supporting cast is disappointingly 
developed and leave either no impression or just enough that it makes you 
wish they were around for more than a scene or two. The one exception is 
Elaine Stritch, both humorously biting and touching as Charlotte's 
grandmother, whom she lives with. The rest of the actors aren't given the 
chance to do much, and they cause the entire movie to rest upon the shoulders 
of Ryder and Gere, who seem oddly shut off from the rest of the world because 
of this problem.
Like all romantic film weepies, director Joan Chen wants nothing more than to 
pluck the heartstrings of the audience, but somehow, as the cards stack up 
more and more against the fate of Charlotte, the movie progressively grows 
ineffectual, and the final scene between Will and Charlotte is ham-handed and 
oddly indifferent.
"Autumn in New York" is a respectable enough love story that holds so much 
promise, yet doesn't seem to have had the screenplay kinks worked out before 
shooting commenced. If anything, the lush cinematography by Changwei Gu is 
resplendent, lovingly painting Manhattan with a fury of beautiful autumn 
leaves and marvelously colorful landscapes. If I didn't know any better, I'd 
think this is what Woody Allen's black-and-white "Manhattan" would have 
looked like had it been in color. It's just too bad the particulars of the 
film itself don't even come close to matching that one-of-a-kind 1979 
masterpiece.

Title
Review for Arlington Road (1999)
Directed by Mark Pellington.
Cast: Jeff Bridges, Tim Robbins, Hope Davis, Joan Cusack, Robert Gossett, 
Spencer Treat Clark, Mason Gamble.
1999 - 117 minutes
Rated R (for violence and profanity).
Reviewed July 10, 1999.
"Arlington Road," directed by Mark Pellington, is one of the most 
pulse-pounding paranoia thrillers I have seen, a horrifying, tautly-paced 
film dealing with a person who begins to suspect menacingly dark undertones 
in a seemingly joyous place. Although the theatrical trailer for the film 
unfairly gives away many of its secrets (shame on the studio, Screen Gems!), 
you might just be surprised about how unpredictable much of it remains, right 
up until merely moments before the developments occur. 
Michael Faraday (Jeff Bridges) is a grieving father of a 9-year-old son, 
Grant (Spencer Treat Clark), whose beloved wife, part of the feds, was killed 
in a case gone awry a year or two before. A professor for global terrorism, a 
subject he is truly and passionately intrigued and outraged by, at George 
Washington University, Michael has begun the process of repairing his 
broken-up life, and has gotten a nice girlfriend, Brooke (Hope Davis), who 
cares for him but realizes she will never be able to measure up to his late 
wife. One day while driving home in his suburban neighborhood, Michael comes 
across a young boy (Mason Gamble) staggering along in the middle of the road, 
one of his arms severely charred up from a freak firecracker accident. 
Rushing him to the hospital, Michael is met with much gratitude from the 
boy's parents, Oliver (Tim Robbins) and Cheryl Lang (Joan Cusack), whom 
Michael learns live right across the street from him. As Grant begins to come 
out of his shell when he becomes best friends with the Lang's son, Michael 
grows increasingly jealous and begins to suspect something fishy is going on 
when he finds Oliver's blueprints of an office building, when he says it is 
for a mall he is currently constructing. Due to the misfortune of his own 
wife, Michael isn't taking any chances, and soon has learned that Oliver 
Lang, which he changed his name to over fifteen years ago, was arrested for 
planting a bomb in a building when he was a teenager. To give away anymore 
would not be right, for there are many unexpected occurrences within the 
film's 117-minute running time that left me chilled right to the bone.
In its story arc, "Arlington Road" ultimately follows the tried-and-true, 
familiar pattern of many a thrillers. You know that the people around Michael 
will, at first, not buy into his serious suspicions, and that he will 
research the Lang's and discover more shocking secrets about them, and that 
there will be some sort of confrontation in the latter half. What you don't 
usually find in this type of thriller, however, is such a sympathetically 
written protagonist, and such a refreshingly high amount of energy that 
rarely ever lets up, as it leads you right to its devastating conclusion, 
which is such a decidedly downbeat but incalculable change of pace from the 
usual humdrum summer movies.
Thanks to the directing precision of Pellington (who fares much better here 
than in his previous film, 1997's "Going All the Way"); the tense, 
unequivocal screenplay by Ehren Krueger; the brooding cinematography by Bobby 
Bukowski, who really succeeds in portraying a supposedly peaceful suburban 
neighborhood in an obscure, threatening light; and the memorable, offbeat 
music score by David Lynch-regular Angelo Badalamenti, "Arlington Road" is an 
especially effective film that also turns out to be rather thought-provoking. 
In one of Faraday's college classes, he mentions that "people always want to 
blame one certain person just so that they can feel better," and this 
truthful statement looms eerily over the denouement. The characters of 
Michael and Brooke are also written intelligently enough so that when we 
realize that they are potentially being put into danger, their fates meant 
much more to me than the usual "thriller."
Jeff Bridges, a highly underrated actor who doesn't get as much notice as he 
should, probably because of some of his questionable film choices, is 
magnificent here, adding an appropriate mixture to his personality of love 
(for his son), depression (the death of his wife), and paranoia (of Oliver 
Lang). Bridges is asked to really push himself over the deep end in several 
scenes in his frustration to get others to realize what he firmly knows about 
the Lang's, and he is up to every challenge that comes his way.
Hope Davis, a remarkable, relatively new actress who has wowed me with the 
likes of the indie films, 1997's "The Daytippers" and "The Myth of 
Fingerprints," and 1998's "Next Stop Wonderland," is the film's performance 
standout. Her character of Brooke, who met Michael as a grad student at the 
university, is a realistic, three-dimensional creation because she loves 
Michael, but doesn't feel that she is being returned that emotion, and, in 
the beginning, can't understand why Michael is going to such great lengths to 
uncover criminals who very likely are innocent people. A startling twist 
occurs with her character midway through, which I would rather walk on sharp 
pins than give away, but it must be said that I was more filled with 
conflicting emotions of shock and disappointment than I have been in a very 
long time at the movies.
As the Lang's, Tim Robbins and Joan Cusack are perfectly cast. Robbins 
appears threatening even when he is acting like a happy-go-lucky family man, 
while Cusack, usually a comedic actress, is downright creepy as the 
too-good-to-be-true Cheryl. After seeing Cusack in this role, which is so 
convincingly portrayed, I fear I might have a little difficulty in the future 
deciphering Joan from Cheryl. Together, Oliver and Cheryl's relationship 
reminded me a great deal of the off-kilter 1989 horror satire, "Parents," in 
which a young boy suspects his buoyant parents are actually cannibals who 
murder people and perform sadistic rituals late at night while he's sleeping.
It's rare in today's times to find a motion picture that still can 
alternately surprise you, get you deeply involved in the characters, and put 
you right on the edge of you seat, but that is exactly what "Arlington Road" 
has done. It should be noted that this film has been delayed for several 
months, first to acquire a stronger release date, then to avoid any 
controversy due to the Columbine school shooting, but it was definately worth 
the wait. Aside from a few minor, questionable plot gaps, "Arlington Road" is 
a superb film dealing with paranoia that is not easily forgotten, and may 
even force you to question the characters of the people in your own life. Who 
knows what lurks right below the surface?
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Scary Movie (2000)
Directed by Keenen Ivory Wayans.
Cast: Anna Faris, Jon Abrahams, Shawn Wayans, Regina Hall, Shannon Elizabeth, 
Marlon Wayans, Dave Sheridan, Lochlyn Munro, Cheri Oteri, Carmen Electra, 
Kurt Fuller, David L. Lander.
2000 - 88 minutes
Rated R (for comic violence, gore, profanity, sex, male and female nudity, 
and extreme scatological humor).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, July 8, 2000.
A "Naked Gun/Airplane!"-style parody of the recent '90s resurgence of slasher 
movies was bound to happen sooner or later, and using the mother of them all, 
"Scream," as its major outline, one couldn't ask for a film much more funny 
or outrageously ballsy as "Scary Movie," mercilessly directed by Keenen Ivory 
Wayans (1988's "I'm Gonna Git You Sucka"). Borrowing major plot points, and 
then skewering them, from "I Know What You Did Last Summer," "The Blair Witch 
Project," "The Matrix," "The Usual Suspects," and, yes, "Scream," the act of 
watching "Scary Movie" is akin to getting, on average, five jokes, puns, and 
one-liners, thrown at you per minute. As is always the case with spoofs, not 
every comedic moment works, but so many are thrown at you, and there is such 
an unusually high success rate, that anyone open-minded about humor that is 
almost always in bad taste should have the most rib-ticklingly good time at 
the movies this year so far.
Occasionally a scene-for-scene lampoon of the original "Scream," "Scary 
Movie" has taken its basic plot, and added a prominent plot point from "I 
Know What You Did Last Summer," to unleash its rapid-fire line of gags. 
Carmen Electra opens the film in the Drew Barrymore role of Drew Decker, a 
high school student home alone who receives a phone call from a stranger. 
While jiffy popping some popcorn, they prattle on about their favorite scare 
movies, including Drew's personal favorite, the Shaquille O'Neal genie movie, 
"Kazaam!" Soon, however, the fun ends as she is being chased around her house 
by a killer in a ghostface Halloween costume. She inevitably is killed (but 
not before getting her clothes torn off and given the opportunity to strike 
some tantalizing poses while in the midst of her yard sprinkler; getting her 
breast implant stabbed out; and getting hit by her dad's car while he is 
receiving roadhead from her mother). If this already doesn't sound like your 
cup of tea, I hasten to add that this opener is only a relative taste of far 
raunchier things to come in the next 80 minutes.
The next morning, rumors are abuzz at B.A. Corpse High School, where the 
innocent virgin Cindy (Anna Faris) suspects the murder is related to a man 
she and her friends, including her boyfriend Bobby (Jon Abrahams); closeted 
football player Ray (Shawn Wayans) and his sassy girlfriend Brenda (Regina 
Hall); hunky Greg (Lochlyn Munro); and his lover, the snotty sex-on-legs 
Buffy (Shannon Elizabeth), accidentally hit with their car and dumped in the 
lake a year before, on Halloween. Soon, the six students are receiving 
threatening notes and being slaughtered one at a time, by someone who knows 
what they did. Also getting in on the action is cutthroat bitch reporter Gail 
Hailstorm (Cheri Oteri), who will go to any lengths to get her story, and 
Deputy Doofy (Dave Sheridan), Buffy's retarded brother.
The less you know going into "Scary Movie," the more unexpected and humorous 
it will undoubtedly be, so to discuss many of the brighter moments would be 
unfair. Suffice to say, if ever there was a movie that proves how unjustified 
the MPAA actually is, it is "Scary Movie." With no less than three scenes 
showing the male organ (one of which portrays it erect), and an unstoppable 
barrage of equally naughty behavior and images (does an "orgasmic explosion" 
mean anything to you?), the film has somehow passed as an R-rating, when much 
less extreme films have received (1998's "Orgazmo," 1995's "Showgirls") or 
been wrongfully threatened (1999's "Eyes Wide Shut") with an NC-17. Alas, 
"Scary Movie" turns out to, indeed, be scary--scary that director Keenen 
Ivory Wayans and screenwriters Shawn Wayans, Marlon Wayans, Buddy Johnson, 
Phil Beauman, Jason Friedberg, and Aaron Seltzer (whew!) had the courage to 
write such un-PC, potentially offensive material. That there are six writers 
involved in the film is usually a negative sign, but not this time. 
Apparently, all six had some really slam-bang, witty ideas and they morphed 
them all together into a sure-to-be-classic whole.
The whole cast of "Scary Movie" keep straight faces throughout, which is the 
right way to go. By making everything seem serious and real, it only proves 
more funny for the audience watching it. And if the sold-out audience whom I 
saw it with is any indication, there is going to be major repeat business 
just to catch all of the jokes that were easily missed the first time around, 
in part due to the loud, infectious laughter that swept over everyone. 
The token virginal heroine, Cindy, is played by newcomer Anna Faris, and her 
delicious, likable turn is as good as it possibly could have been. Also 
taking advantage of the chance to test out their comedic skills are Shawn and 
Marlon Wayans; the delightful Regina Hall (1999's "The Best Man"), as 
loudmouth Brenda, who gets her much deserved comeuppance in one of the 
picture's best scenes, when she causes an uproar at the local movie theater 
showing "Shakespeare in Love;" Shannon Elizabeth (1999's "American Pie"), who 
is distraught that her boyfriend is killed until she learns she has just won 
the town's beauty pageant as Miss Fellatio; and Dave Sheridan and the sadly 
underused Cheri Oteri (TV's "Saturday Night Live"), as Deputy Doofy and Gail 
Hailstorm, obvious takes on the David Arquette and Courteney Cox Arquette 
characters in the "Scream" movies.
"Scary Movie" is never anything less than silly, but amidst it all are some 
fairly knowing moments of social commentary, including material on race 
relations, homosexuality, the portrayal of teenagers in Hollywood movies, as 
well as sly truths about teenagers and young adults. After hitting the 
unknown man with their car and deciding to do away with the body, Buffy says 
to Cindy, "We'll just pretend it never happened. Like the time we were drunk 
and went down on each other." It may not be art, but it does have a ring of 
honesty to it.
When film parodies work, they really smoke, but it is a particularly tricky 
genre in which most attempts fail. For every "Airplane!," there is a "Spy 
Hard," a "Wrongfully Accused," and a "Jane Austen's Mafia!," and "Scary 
Movie" is one of the very, very few recent ventures that belong in the former 
category. If you are in the mood to go to the movies, have a great time and a 
lot of big guffaw laughs--oh, and if you aren't faint of heart--it would be 
absolutely foolish to pass up "Scary Movie."

Title
Review for Cherry Falls (2000)
"Cherry Falls," directed by Geoffrey Wright (1992's "Romper Stomper"), was 
filmed in 1999 in Richmond, Virginia, with a healthy budget, support from USA 
Films, and a top-notch cast that included Brittany Murphy (1995's 
"Clueless"), Jay Mohr (1999's "Go"), Jesse Bradford (2000's "Bring It On"), 
Michael Biehn (2000's "The Art of War"), and even a then-unknown D.J. Qualls 
(the skinny, nerdy boy in 2000's "Road Trip"). Originally scheduled for 
theatrical release in the summer of 2000, followed by a date change to 
September, the MPAA got in the way, threatening the picture with an NC-17. 
Recut five times before receiving an R rating, the movie ultimately premiered 
in the U.S. on the USA television network, even while it was doing healthy 
theatrical business overseas. The unfair, unjust censorship of America may 
have destroyed the chances of "Cherry Falls" being financially successful 
stateside, but now that it is out on DVD (in a double feature format that 
also includes the direct-to-video John Ritter thriller, "Terror Tract"), it 
would be foolish to pass up what is essentially the scariest, smartest 
slasher movie since 1996's "Scream."
In the small, idyllic Virginia town of Cherry Falls, teenage students of 
Thomas Jefferson High School have begun falling victim to a long-haired, 
fingernail-polish/high-heel-wearing killer who seems to be targeting virgins. 
When the town sheriff (Michael Biehn) suspects this pattern, he begins 
fearing for his own 16-year-old daughter, Jody (Brittany Murphy). With the 
school abuzz about innocence leading to death, a mass orgy party is planned 
where the slasher predictably makes a special appearance.
Stylish, suspenseful, and unusually intelligent for a genre movie, "Cherry 
Falls" is an excellent example of how to make a horror movie, in the vein of 
John Carpenter's 1978 classic, "Halloween," right. There is generous 
bloodshed to be had, and occasional violence, but the film is also equipped 
with emotional truths and realistic, believable characters. In the Jamie Lee 
Curtis role, the ever-talented Brittany Murphy places at least ten notches 
above the rest of the recent horror movie heroines. Murphy paints Jody with 
several different shades, and turns her into a three-dimensional individual. 
Jay Mohr also stands out as a much-liked teacher at school, as does Candy 
Clark (1985's "Cat's Eye") as Jody's loving, but confused, mother.
How Does It Look?
Presented in a 1:77:1 aspect ratio widescreen transfer, the picture on 
"Cherry Falls" sparkles with surprising detail for a relatively low-budget 
feature, and does absolute justice to the beautiful, atmospheric 
cinematography by Anthony B. Richmond. Black levels are very good, and the 
color of red, which is an ongoing theme, bursts off the screen. There is 
slight grain in several of the darker moments, but it is brief and remains 
undistractive. A highly impressive transfer.
How Does It Sound?
In the opening scene, the sound, in English 2.0, concerned me. The dialogue 
was difficult to understand with precision, and sounded muffled. Luckily, it 
was very likely the way the characters were speaking, because this problem 
cleared up immediately afterwards. While not overly dynamic (much of the 
movie is intentionally quiet, save for the action and suspense scenes), the 
music and dialogue play well off one another, neither ever overpowering the 
other.
Special Features?
Unfortunately, "Cherry Falls" offers no special features (unless you call 
"scene selections" bonus material). There isn't even a trailer, which is 
unfortunate, although there are production notes on the inside booklet that 
comes with the disc. An audio commentary would have been highly appreciated, 
but this movie's DVD treatment, much like its theatrical one, was obviously 
not taken as seriously as it should have been.
The Lowdown
While the special features are non-existent, "Cherry Falls" is such a good, 
overlooked movie that it is able to stand on its own. With it being offered 
as two movies for the price of one, with the full-length picture, "Terror 
Tract," and selling for only $24.99, the DVD is one that is recommended for 
all horror fans. In "Cherry Falls," you will find a slasher opus that does 
not disappoint.

Title
Review for Kid, The (2000)
Directed by Jon Turteltaub.
Cast: Bruce Willis, Spencer Breslin, Emily Mortimer, Lily Tomlin, Jean Smart, 
Chi McBride, Daniel Von Bargen, Dana Ivey.
2000 - 101 minutes
Rated PG (for mild violence).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, July 8, 2000.
The superfluously titled "Disney's The Kid" is a spin on one of the late-'80s 
most recycled premises, in which a character transforms from a child into a 
child in an adult's body overnight (1988's "Big"), or the souls of parent and 
child switch places (1987's "Like Father, Like Son," 1988's "Vice Versa"). 
The hook this time is that there is no role reversals or character switches, 
but that the adult and child versions of the same man come face-to-face. 
Bearing a striking resemblance in many ways to Penny Marshall's wonderfully 
magical "Big," it is easy to see how, with special handling and care, 
"Disney's The Kid" might have been able to rise to the former picture's 
level. Unfortunately, due to director Jon Turteltaub's and screenwriter 
Audrey Wells' syrupy treatment, both of whom stubbornly struggle at nearly 
every turn to make the film one children would be entertained 
through-and-through at, they botch the film's ambitious chances at greatness.
Like a train traveling full speed down a railroad track, Turteltaub's idea of 
making a successful children's fantasy is to keep moving, moving, moving, 
without pausing long enough to take a breather and getting to know the 
characters onscreen a little better. In fact, "Disney's The Kid" is almost 
annoying in the way it has been so obviously dumbed down in order to please 
the little kiddies in the audience and make a quick buck (that's Disney, for 
you).
Nearing his 40th birthday, Russ Duritz (Bruce Willis) is a workaholic image 
consultant who cares about little else other than himself, including his 
long-suffering partner and quasi-girlfriend Amy (Emily Mortimer). Following 
eerie instances in which he keeps imagining seeing a shiny, red plane flying 
in the air, and, at one point, follows a young child who was seen trespassing 
on his property into a restaurant, only for it to disappear into thin air 
after exiting the building, Russ suspects that he may be having a 
psychological issue. 
That's when the precocious 8-year-old Russ Duritz (Spencer Breslin) shows up, 
unsure how he got where he is but inexplicably linked to his grumpy 
40-year-old self. This time, however, Russ is relieved to learn that his 
personal assistant, Janet (Lily Tomlin), and Amy can also see the child, and 
becomes convinced that the chubby, little "Rusty" was brought here so that he 
can help him out with his own image, which cost him a fair amount of 
heartache throughout his school years. The more the two bond, though, the 
more the adult Russ starts to remember about a portion of his childhood that 
he has since blocked out, as it becomes increasingly clear the younger Russ 
appeared to help him come to terms with the one event in his life that 
changed him from an innocent boy into a hard-edged, unhappy man.
"Disney's The Kid" is a plodding motion picture whose blueprint is 
fundamentally predictable, causing an absence of interest to be invested into 
the plot particulars. Acquiring a troubling headache is another story 
altogether, as there is so much yelling and repetition in the opening half 
that it begins to get on your nerves. The last 45 minutes are more 
surprising, as the film slows down its quick pace to nowhere and gets a 
little serious. Without discussing the particulars, both versions of Russ 
find themselves facing the turning point in their life that changed them, and 
know that if they don't recognize the problem the second time around, their 
ill-omened future will be unavoidable.
In recent years, Bruce Willis has truly been branching out as an actor, 
appearing in everything from a horror film (1999's "The Sixth Sense"), to 
action (1998's "Armageddon"), to quirky comedy (1999's "Breakfast of 
Champions"), to screwball comedy (2000's "The Whole Nine Yards"), to human 
drama (1999's "The Story of Us"), to a family picture ("Disney's The Kid"). 
After years of being labeled little other than an action star, Willis has had 
a major career turnabout, proving that he is not only serious about his 
profession, but a fine actor, indeed. As the patronizing Russ Duritz, whose 
completely lost all signs of wide-eyed innocence and youth, Willis gives a 
genuinely touching performance. His counterpart, newcomer Spencer Breslin, is 
brightly unaffected, abandoning few signs of being an unctuous child actor.
As Amy, Russ' potential love interest, Emily Mortimer (2000's "Scream 3") 
sparkles. A natural talent and beauty, Mortimer gives Amy a much-needed 
warm-heartedness that balances out the cold Russ. The irreplaceable Lily 
Tomlin is also on hand in the underwritten role of Janet, Russ' assistant, 
and while she gives it her all and stands out in her few scenes, Tomlin is 
honestly too good to be wasting her time in throwaway parts like this. 
Finally, Jean Smart is a vibrant standout, developing her character of 
Deirdre, an aspiring newsanchor with an unexpected human connection to Russ, 
with an added level of realism that is truly refreshing.
When the climax finally arrived, it required a hint of subtle, yet powerful, 
resonance, much like "Big" did, and achieved. Ultimately, "Disney's The Kid" 
is rarely ever discreet in its emotions, and the finale is hampered, like 
much of what came before, by being just too cute and gushy for its own good. 
The final scene, between Russ and Amy, and played effectively to the tune, 
"(Your Love Keeps Lifting Me) Higher and Higher," on the other hand, does 
hold the subtlety required, and ends on a strong note. But the damage had 
already been done. Throughout "Disney's The Kid," I couldn't help but imagine 
how the film might have been drastically altered had only the cloying music 
score, by Marc Shaiman, been changed from its current kiddie origins to 
something more sophisticated and refined. In retrospect, the misguided score 
might have been all that needed to be modified for a mediocre film to be a 
good one. At every turn, "Disney's The Kid" screams out for that special, 
gentle touch, and the filmmakers sadly never realize it. Or maybe they just 
didn't care.

Title
Review for Affliction (1997)
Directed by Paul Schrader.
Cast: Nick Nolte, Sissy Spacek, James Coburn, Mary Beth Hurt, Willem 
Dafoe, Jim True, Marian Seldes, Holmes Osborne, Brigid Tierney, Sean 
McCann, Wayne Robson, Eugene Lipinski.
1998 - 114 minutes.
Rated R (for violence and profanity).
Reviewed January 8, 1999.
Paul Schrader's "Affliction" is such an angry and bitter motion picture 
that you can almost physically feel the emotional coldness that is 
brewing under the surface of the two central characters who are living 
in the wintry, snowy landscape of New Hampshire: a brutal, insensitive 
father (James Coburn) whose shockingly heartless and cruel character 
traits seem to be rubbing off on his son, Wade Whitehouse (Nick Nolte), 
a small-town sheriff in his fifties.
As "Affliction" opens, it is Halloween night, although it certainly 
doesn't appear to be, as the entire town is covered in a heavy blanket 
of snow. Wade is taking his young daughter, Jill (Brigid Tierney), to a 
Halloween party, but before the night is over, the unhappy Jill has 
called her mother and Wade's ex-wife, Lillian (Mary Beth Hurt), to come 
and get her. Wade is outraged by this action and is fed up of being a 
stranger to his daughter, so much so that he becomes set on aquiring an 
attorney to start a custody battle. The following day, a hunting 
accident involving one of Wade's friends goes awry, leaving the other 
man, who slipped on the snow and ice and shot himself, dead. Although 
there is no evidence that would lead anyone to believe otherwise, Wade 
is convinced that there was a conspiracy to murder him, and that maybe 
even the mob is in on it. Finally, there is a love interest in Wade's 
life, Maggie Fogg (Sissy Spacek), an understanding and caring waitress 
who only wants to make Wade happy. From the first shot of Wade, it is 
obvious that he has an edgy temper, and as the film progresses, we are 
treated to glimpses of his traumatic childhood, as he was constantly 
bullied and terrorized by his abusive and emotionally wounding father. 
There are slight traces of his father in Wade, to be sure, and he knows 
it himself, but seems trapped, not only in his life, but in what is 
quickly becoming an inevitable transformation into his father, whom he 
desperately hates.
"Affliction" reminded me of an equally brilliant previous film from 
1998, "The Celebration," which dealt with many of the same topics, such 
as the hurtful wounds and hatred in a family. Based on a novel by 
Russell Banks, whose other book, "The Sweet Hereafter," was adapted 
superbly for the screen in 1997 by Atom Egoyan, "Affliction" is a 
superior piece of work and an enormous accomplishment for director Paul 
Schrader, who wrote such film classics as 1976's "Taxi Driver" and 
1980's "Raging Bull," and specializes in the underlying dark emotions of 
the human psyche.
One of the pleasures I always get from a motion picture like 
"Affliction," although the subject matter is difficult at times, is its 
multi-layered story. It would be easy enough to create a film about a 
man losing his grip with saneness, but it is completely another thing to 
create multiple subplots, such as the hunting accident mystery, which 
may just be part of Wade's deterioration; his relationship with his 
confused daughter; and his romantic involvement with Maggie. All of 
these elements smoothly come together to form an extraordinary tapestry 
of the human conditon, and a more affirming character study of Wade, who 
is not a bad man, but finds his grim future inescapable.
As Wade, Nick Nolte gives, perhaps, the best performance of the year. He 
is flawless throughout, and seamlessly is able to convey all of his 
character's feelings to the audience without spelling it out with words. 
Wade is heartbreaking because of the reality that he knows he is headed 
for, but doesn't want to go to, and Nolte is certainly up to the 
challenge. Meanwhile, James Coburn is hateful and even terrifying as 
Wade's father, and whenever he appeared on screen I was taken over by a 
deep sense of dread at what he might say or do. If an actor can make you 
believe he is as mean and sick of a human being as Coburn does, it is a 
sign of an exceptional performance. Lending fine support are Sissy 
Spacek, who was refreshing to see after a considerable absense from the 
screen lately, and in her portrayal of Maggie Fogg, we sympathize with 
her plight as she sees the man she loves slowly begin to turn into his 
nightmarish father. And as Jill, Wade's daughter, Brigid Tierney gives 
an amazing performance, for we believe that she is her character, a 
young girl in the middle of her love, and fear, of her own father, and 
her longing to be in the confines of the safety of her mother. The film 
is occasionally narrated by Rolfe, Wade's younger brother (Willem 
Dafoe), who is living far away but briefly makes an appearance a little 
over an hour into the film.
Adding to the effectiveness of the picture is the simple, yet perfectly 
realized, music score by Michael Brook, and the blustery, atmospheric 
cinematography by Paul Sarossy, which grows to become an effective 
metaphor for the isolation that appears between the characters.
As I watched "Affliction," I was not quite sure where everything was 
headed, and the masterfully-done climax caught me by utter surprise, and 
left me with feelings of uneasiness, which was entirely appropriate 
since the film was only staying true to itself. All of the plot threads 
never seemed false or out of place, and I never once doubted the 
reasoning and emotions of the characters. Paul Schrader not only shows 
his grand abilities of directing the film, but also for writing its 
remarkable screenplay, which, I doubt, could have been any better. 
"Affliction" is one of the most powerful and heartwrenching films of 
1998. 
      - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
        Dustin
Putman's Film Haven >

Title
Review for Midsummer Night's Dream, A (1999)
William Shakespeare's A Midsummer Night's Dream   * * (out of * * * * )
Directed by Michael Hoffman.
Cast: Kevin Kline, Stanley Tucci, Calista Flockhart, Christian Bale, 
Rupert Everett, Michelle Pfeiffer, Anna Friel, Dominic West, David 
Strathairn, Sophie Marceau, Sam Rockwell.
1999 - 121 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for brief nudity).
Reviewed May 15, 1999.
"Hamlet," "Othello," "Romeo & Juliet," "Much Ado About Nothing." In the 
past several years a big screen adaptation of one of William 
Shakespeare's plays has been released at least every couple months, and 
with the huge success of Oscar-winner "Shakespeare in Love," many more 
adaptations are in the works, and the first out the gate is one of his 
lighter, fluffier comedies, the self-proclaimed "William Shakespeare's A 
Midsummer Night's Dream," which, unfortunately, is not nearly as magical 
as the lovely title implies.
The setting of this latest adaptation, directed by Michael Hoffman, has 
been transported from 17th-century England to 19th-century Tuscany, but 
strangely enough, the Elizabethan dialogue remains (although, in 
hindsight, this isn't as ridiculous a thought as 1996's "Romeo & 
Juliet," with Leonardo DiCaprio and Claire Danes reciting Shakespeare 
amidst an urban 1990s setting). The fantastical story goes like this: 
Helena (Calista Flockhart), a disspirited young woman who is 
head-over-heels in love with Demetrius (Christian Bales), the planned 
suitor of the beautiful Hermia (Anna Friel), who herself is in love with 
Lysander (Dominic West), follows each of them into the forest one 
midsummer's night on her bicycle (a new invention), determined to steal 
Demetrius' heart. Things don't go quite as planned, however, when they 
unwittingly step into the forest of the fairies, headed by Queen Titania 
(Michelle Pfeiffer) and King Oberon (Rupert Everett). Oberon seeks the 
aid of his horned assistant, Puck (Stanley Tucci), to collect a few red 
flowers whose juices have the power to turn each person who comes 
physically into contact with it to fall in love with the first person 
they see upon waking. So as both Demetrius and Lysander are put under 
the spell, both of which set their sights on Helena, who simply believes 
they are playing a cruel trick on her, an overacting troupe member who 
has come into the forest to practice his latest play finds himself 
turned into a donkey when he slips on a magic hat, and lusted after by 
Titania, who has also fallen under the flower's potion.
"William Shakespeare's A Midsummer Night's Dream" falls under one of the 
major shortcomings of all of Shakespeare's works, which is that he wrote 
tons and tons of carefully planned and intricate dialogue, but always 
failed at developing his characters, who remained at a distance from the 
material and were written in a general and vague manner. Aside from 
perhaps his 'Romeo & Juliet," none of his many plays I have read have 
gotten me to care even remotely about any of the characters, or even the 
story. To me, the Elizabethan dialogue always felt like a mere gimmick 
to be flashy, and this film version of "Midsummer" is no different. Not 
at any time during the film did I ever really feel willing to get 
involved in what was happening on-screen, and the romantic plights of 
the characters are so thinly written that it is impossible to care about 
them. 
If anything, "A Midsummer Night's Dream" is a lighthearted fantasy, and 
with such a bewitching title, those exact sequences set in the forest 
were the most dull and lifeless, without even a hint of enchantment. 
Much of the problem goes to the major technical problems, including 
surprisingly atrocious cinematography by Oliver Stapleton, who 
overlights ever night scene to such an extent that it often was 
confusing to whether it had changed to the daytime or not. The last time 
I was out in the woods during the middle of the night, I couldn't see a 
thing, but in this movie, there seems to be a constant bright sun 
shining down on everyone, despite the dark skies. The qualms don't stop 
there, as the production design by Luciana Arrighi is thoroughly 
artificial and distracting, never once looking like anything but an 
extravagant movie set in the confines of a large studio. In one scene, 
Puck rides into view on a giant turtle that is so fake-looking and 
obviously mechanical that I felt as if I was watching a movie from the 
'60s or '70s. All of these problems within the main section of the film, 
mixed in with the overall amateurish performances, had me actually 
longing, instead, for the infinitely superior 1982 Woody Allen farce, "A 
Midsummer Night's Sex Comedy," which was funny, whimsical, and 
involving, three things this current film is sorely lacking.
Acting-wise, the performances are all over the map. Faring best is 
Calista Flockhart (vanquishing her "Ally McBeal" character), who seems 
to understand the difficult dialogue so well that each word that comes 
out of her mouth is instantly accessible to understand. Flockhart's 
Helena is also the only character I gave one iota about, as she is a 
frustrated and unhappy woman who feels like she belongs to Demetrius, 
even though he doesn't care about her. Kevin Kline is sometimes winning, 
and at other times downright annoying, as the dim-witted Bottom. 
Finally, Stanley Tucci makes somewhat of an impression and is well-cast 
as the sprightly Puck, but what is his exact purpose in the movie other 
than to narrate the conclusion? 
On the opposite side of the spectrum is Michelle Pfeiffer's dismal 
performance as Titania. Pfeiffer is a fine actress, but Shakespearean 
she's not, as she recites her lines without any thought, energy, or 
feeling. In a recent interview, Pfeiffer mentioned how she didn't care 
for Shakespeare, and since she obviously doesn't know how to hold her 
own against her fellow thespian, it leaves you wondering just why she 
took this role in the first place. Rupert Everett, an exciting actor so 
wonderful in "My Best Friend's Wedding" is given nothing to do here but 
show off his body, and without any motivation or purpose (aside from 
setting the whole story into motion), his fairy character comes off as 
more of an afterthought. And Christian Bale has to be the most largely 
sought-after bore in the history of film. I don't know; maybe Helena was 
having a slight bout of insomnia and though that going out with him 
would cure her, er, problem.
The various romantic couplings during the long midsummer night leads not 
to an enjoyable conclusion (although it has a false one), but unwisely 
goes on for another twenty minutes with Bottom and company throwing a 
play of "Pyrimus and Thisby." What is supposed to be a charming, 
humorous sequence is actually a situation we've seen so many times 
before that it is not funny, only juvenile. Regardless of my many, many 
criticisms, I did not hate "William Shakespeare's A Midsummer Night's 
Dream." I hasten to add I didn't like hardly any of it at all, but it 
wasn't dispicable in the way that "Armageddon" or the recent "The Mummy" 
are. Director Michael Hoffman has made a respectable attempt at turning 
yet another Shakespeare play into a treasured motion picture, but 
ultimately fails to bring any sort of magic to the story or situations. 
If you hadn't already realized, "magic" was the one thing this movie 
desperately needed.
  - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
    Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Magnolia (1999)
Directed by Paul Thomas Anderson.
Cast: John C. Reilly, Melora Walters, Philip Baker Hall, Tom Cruise, Jason 
Robards, Julianne Moore, Philip Seymour Hoffman, Jeremy Blackman, William H. 
Macy, Melinda Dillon, April Grace, Michael Bowen, Alfred Molina, Ricky Jay, 
Felicity Huffman, Luis Guzman, Emmanuel Johnson, Henry Gibson, Miguel Perez, 
Brad Hunt, Jim Beaver.
1999 - 195 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, brief sex, and nudity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, January 8, 1999.
"Magnolia" is a mind-blowing masterpiece of a movie--heavy in drama, intense 
emotional material, characters, and underlying themes. At 195 minutes (that 
would be 3 hours 15 minutes), the film is a sprawling artistic triumph, 
displaying an amount of downright shocking originality and vigor that very 
few films ever hope to obtain. What I can't, nor never could attempt to 
explain, is how such an overwhelmingly ambitious, effortlessly fabricated 
motion picture could be made by a director who is 29-years-old and is only on 
his third film (the other two being the 1997 double-header, "Hard Eight" and 
"Boogie Nights," both of which are among the best films of that respective 
year). I'll never know his secret, but Anderson can now surely and without a 
doubt be named the most exciting and fresh filmmaker working today, a genius 
for the ages.
Only artificially resembling a Robert Altman ensemble picture (1975's 
"Nashville," 1993's "Short Cuts"), but acquiring a storytelling approach and 
technical style all its own, "Magnolia" is unlike anything I've seen before, 
and when you can assuredly say that, you really know the film at hand is, 
undoubtedly, a unique one. 
After an attention-getting prologue, in which three stories are briefly told 
that concern chance and coincidence, like rapid-fire we immediately are 
thrown into a whirlwind of characters whom we will then follow over a 24-hour 
period in the San Fernando Valley. Most are related to each other in some 
way, which we discover as the film progresses. Kicking things off is Jim 
Kurring (John C. Reilly), a truthful, religious police officer who is very 
lonely and looking for love. After traveling to an apartment building whose 
one resident has complained about the overly loud music and yelling coming 
from next door, Jim is immediately struck by the beautiful, but obviously 
somehow distraught young woman, Claudia Wilson Gator (Melora Walters). Both 
are attracted to each other right away, but little does he know that Claudia 
is a cocaine addict, and the ruckus came from her yelling at her estranged 
father, Jimmy Gator (Philip Baker Hall), who had dropped by earlier to tell 
her he just found out he has cancer and only has a few months to live. Jimmy 
Gator is a television host for the popular game show, "What Do Kids Know?," 
and as this particular episode proceeds during the evening, Jimmy is startled 
to discover that he is deteriorating faster than he thought, much to the 
distress of his wife, Rose (Melinda Dillon). 
One of the reigning whiz kid contestants is Stanley Spector (Jeremy Blackman) 
who, as the night progresses, realizes that everyone, including his gruff 
father (Michael Bowen), is treating him like an object, or an encyclopedia, 
when all he wants is to be looked at as an average kid. Back in the 1960s, 
the most publicized whiz kid for the show was Donnie Smith (William H. Macy), 
who still lives in the same city, but has just learned that he is about to be 
fired from his job at a furniture store. Excited about getting corrective 
teeth surgery, it is soon discovered that Donnie simply longs to be like the 
one he is in love with, a handsome, buff bartender (Brad Hunt) who has braces 
himself. 
As the game show wears on during the early hours of the night, being filmed 
on another cable station across town is sex guru Frank T.J. Mackey (Tom 
Cruise), a male chauvinist pig whose motto is "Seduce and Destroy." During an 
interview with a female reporter (April Grace) between the break of the show, 
Frank falsely states that his father is dead and has a positive relationship 
with his mother. In actuality, as a child, he was left to care for his ill 
mother while his father, the wealthy Earl Partridge (Jason Robards), left 
them and ended up marrying the much younger Linda (Julianne Moore). Now Earl 
is in the last stages of cancer, and as Linda grows more and more conflicted 
and guilty about getting the money in his will (she doesn't want it because 
she originally married him for his riches, but now has truly grown to love 
him), Earl's nurse, Phil Parma (Philip Seymour Hoffman), has been trying to 
reach Frank through the impossible hotline of his show, so that they might 
possibly be able to reconcile before his death.
Sort of like 1999's exciting German film, "Run Lola Run," "Magnolia" seems to 
always be on the move from one destination to the next, with the difference 
being that the latter picture actually has a noticeable amount of substance 
to match its liberatingly flashy style. For much of the film, the camera 
rarely stops moving, but it is not done in a way that becomes annoying or 
hints of hurried editing. Instead, like Anderson's previous "Boogie Nights," 
"Magnolia" is a motion picture alive and well, with energy to spare, and a 
clear and bold signification of the pure love for the art of moviemaking.
Intriguing is the way that certain things might happen, and then the next 
scene will go back in time to when the previous scene was occurring, and 
simply follow a different character. This can be detected most easily when 
the day slowly edges towards night, and in one scene it will be dark, while 
in the next the evening will only be approaching. Not only is P.T. Anderson 
(as he likes to be called) a marvelous director, but his writing matches it 
in every way. The screenplay, which is known to have been sparked not only 
from a collection of ideas that Anderson then interweaved together, but also 
in the 9 songs that singer Aimee Mann has contributed to the picture, is one 
that very well could have been uneven, since a couple stories are usually 
bound to be more interesting than others, but this does not happen this time. 
Every character and each one of their lives is sympathetically brought to 
vibrant life, and because of its highly appropriate three-hour-plus length, 
enough time is spent with each central individual to get to know, understand, 
and care about them.
Aimee Mann's songs have been previously remarked as being one of the film's 
very own characters, and I couldn't agree more. They are beautiful pieces of 
musical art on their own, and each one has its rightful purpose in the 
picture, especially in the extremely fitting places that Anderson has placed 
them. A tour de force sequence that is certainly one of the most brilliantly 
heartbreaking moments in any film from 1999, Aimee Mann's quiet "Wise Up," 
filled with equal measures of hope and utter despair, begins to play on the 
soundtrack, and each character, no matter where they are, sings a couple 
verses of the song. The outcome is extraordinarily powerful and an 
approximately five-minute stretch of film that will never be forgotten.
Anderson has a way with casting the best actors in the biz, and then pulling 
superior work out of them, and "Magnolia" is no exception. Across the board, 
the performances are astounding, and they all work so perfectly together, in 
the context of the film, that no one could be pin-pointed as being better 
than the next. Worth noting, though, is John C. Reilly's earnest Jim Kurring; 
Jeremy Blackman's impressive turn as young Stanley Spector; Philip Baker 
Hall, as Jimmy Gator, the game show host at battle with himself, and with his 
recently discovered cancer; Julianne Moore's poignant and misunderstood Linda 
Partridge; Jason Robard's fully accurate portrayal of the cancer-stricken 
Earl Partridge; Melora Walter's internally struggling, drug-addicted Claudia 
Gator; and Philip Seymour Hoffman's sincere, caring Phil Parma. Tom Cruise, 
although no better than anyone else, should be individually mentioned for 
taking on such a brave, admirable supporting role, as Frank T.J. Mackey. 
Never has Cruise had such a wildly diverse character as the one he has been 
gifted with here, and his only misstep at all comes in his final tearful 
scene, which is slightly overplayed. It's also a welcome change of pace to 
see the return of the underrated Melinda Dillon, who has virtually 
disappeared from the movie radar in recent years, but is touching and 
effective as Rose, Jimmy Gator's suspicious, grief-stricken wife.
Everyone in "Magnolia" is inevitably leading up to a certain moment in time, 
one which has less to do with what is going to happen to them, since their 
lives are already reaching a crossroad that many will fail at and not be able 
to cross, and more to do with the way chance and coincidence can change a 
person's whole life forever. Although I have been outraged to discover that 
the surprising ending has been discussed in detail in certain reviews, there 
is no way I would dare give it away for those who haven't been fortunate 
enough to see this luminous motion picture. Suffice to say, what does happen 
may appear to come right out of left field, but there are clues throughout 
the film, and I think what it symbolizes is the way that the characters' 
decisions and choices that they have made in their lifetimes are crushing 
down and squeezing the life out of them, to the point where there is nowhere 
left for them to go. While what happens destroys some people's lives even 
further, it also ultimately brings other characters together, and the final 
scene is one filled with a grand, incomparable sense of hope and happiness. 
"Magnolia" is surely a one-of-a-kind experience. It's difficult to fathom 
that Anderson could ever make another film as great as this one, but who 
knows? After seeing the enormous amount of talent he has, there's no doubt in 
my mind that he will continue to surprise, delight, and challenge his 
audiences well into the 21st Century. 

Title
Review for Pushing Tin (1999)
Directed by Mike Newell.
Cast: John Cusack, Billy Bob Thornton, Cate Blanchett, Angelina Jolie, 
Jake Weber, Vicki Lewis.
1999 - 124 minutes
Rated R (for profanity and sexual situations).
Reviewed April 24, 1999.
While watching the offbeat comedy-drama "Pushing Tin," I was involved in 
the characters and all of their plights. Leaving the theater, the only 
real thing in my mind was the literally flawless cast, filled to the rim 
with both Academy and Golden Globe winners. I liked most of what I saw, 
but it was also difficult not to acknowledge how much stronger it might 
have been with just one more screenplay rewrite.
Starting off as a film set in the world of air traffic controllers at 
New York's Terminal Radar Approach Control (TRACON), the central 
character, Nick Falzone (John Cusack), is at the top of his profession, 
effortlessly firing out airplane directions as if it was poetry at a 
near-constant rate. He has a loving wife, Connie (Cate Blanchett), who 
yearns for knowledge and thus has just begun a college art class, and 
two young children, one of which they have just learned has Attention 
Deficit Disorder (this pointless plot development is brought up briefly 
and then completely dropped). Eventually, Nick's world slowly begins to 
unravel when he has a negative run-in with the mysterious 
motorcycle-riding Russell Bell (Billy Bob Thornton), and then discovers 
that he has just gotten a job as an air traffic controller. While at a 
barbecue get-together with friends, Nick is surprised, to say the least, 
when he discovers that the 40-year-old Russell has a beautiful sexpot 
20-year-old wife, Mary (Angelina Jolie). After comforting the upset Mary 
at a grocery store and having dinner with her, Nick finds himself 
sleeping with her, but immediately afterwards regrets it and gradually 
begins to feel more and more guilty towards Connie. Meanwhile, he also 
starts to grow jealous as Connie and Russell hit it off and become 
buddies, fearing that they might make the same mistake that he made with 
Mary. 
In hindsight, after seeing the film, it is clear that "Pushing Tin," 
directed by Mike Newell ("Four Weddings and a Funeral"), probably seems 
like a better movie than it actually is for one simple reason: the 
performances from the top-notch cast are nothing short of marvelous. 
While the film certainly has a memorable premise, it quickly puts its 
originality on the backburner for a more conventional romance which, 
honestly, is fine by me since the relationship between Cusack and 
Thornton is sorely underdeveloped and flat. This subplot could have 
easily been more effective, however, but it was in the thin screenplay 
by Glen and Les Charles where the film failed. While all of the other 
characters are brought into a three-dimensional perspective, Russell is 
left noticably vague, more of an enigma than an actual participant in 
the story. This obviously leads to some very major problems, considering 
that what was supposed to be one of its strongest elements was in the 
feud between Nick and he. Instead, Russell is seen as mostly a good guy, 
albeit a poorly-written one, and their problems stem solely from the 
jealousy of Nick. 
As previously mentioned, faring best are certainly the performances from 
a line of brilliant actors who all are able to inject unexpected life 
into the people they portray (aside from Thornton, so unforgettable in 
1998's "A Simple Plan," who just doesn't have anything to do here). In 
what is perhaps his best role since 1989's thoughtful "teen" 
comedy-drama, "Say Anything," John Cusack, like Nick, is in top form. 
With his doe-eyes and puppy dog face, Cusack really hasn't aged much in 
the last fifteen years, and is able to sympathetically convey Nick's 
flaws and emotions, as he quickly realizes that, because of one 
thoughtless night with another woman, he has put his relatively happy 
marriage into serious jeopardy. Cate Blanchett, fresh off her amazing 
performance in the otherwise mediocre "Elizabeth," has transformed 
herself from the Brit that she is into a New Jersey housewife, complete 
with one of the most unaffected and natural accents I can remember. Not 
only that, but Blanchett is given the most purely human and likable 
character, and handles every scene perfectly, including the heartfelt 
and inevitable sequence in which she finds out Nick has cheated on her. 
Finally, Angelina Jolie, snubbed of an Oscar nod for 1998's "Playing by 
Heart," proves once again why she is currently one of the best and most 
exciting young actresses working today. Although her character of Mary, 
like Russell, is thinly written and completely disappears in the second 
half, Jolie is fortunately still given a few scenes to show her stuff 
and make the audience care about her.
You know, it's funny how much I cared about everyone in "Pushing Tin," 
how much I wanted them to be happy and relinquish themselves of their 
many mistakes and problems. But then, it's unfortunate how subpar the 
rest of the movie really is. For every intelligent and well-handled 
scene, there were several that were way off the map, including pretty 
much the whole last twenty minutes, with Nick and Russell going out to 
an airport runway and having the force of a landing plane overhead cause 
them to spin right off the ground into a sort of circular tornado motion. 
Silly me; I was led to believe, by what came before this, that what I was 
watching was supposed to be reality-based. With such an entertaining 
array of performances, it's almost enough to marginally recommend 
"Pushing Tin," but not quite. It is at the screenplay level that ultimately 
leaves these fine actors without a plane to fly them home.
Special Note: In the aftermath of the Columbine High School Massacre in 
Littleton, Colorado, it was fairly shocking how closely some plot points 
in the film came to the tragic occurrence. Not only is there a bomb 
threat scene, complete with police, SWAT teams, news reporters, and 
helicoptors, but later on we find that one of the men trapped in the 
building, Russell, has moved to Colorado. 
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Final Destination (2000)
Directed by James Wong.
Cast: Devon Sawa, Ali Larter, Kerr Smith, Seann William Scott, Kristen Cloke, 
Amanda Detmer, Chad E. Donella, Daniel Roebuck, Roger Guenveur Smith, Brendan 
Fehr. 
2000 - 95 minutes
Rated R (for violence, gore, and profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, March 18, 2000.
Have you ever wondered if death is something that simply happens naturally, 
at any given moment, in life? Or if it is an occurrence that is predetermined 
by some much larger force within the world, or outside of it? These 
thought-provoking questions are the subject of "Final Destination," which is 
the most riveting horror-drama since 1999's "The Sixth Sense." Stylishly 
filmed and tautly directed by "X-Files" alum James Wong, the film deals with 
several fairly heavy topics that are discussed truthfully by teenage 
characters (in accurately written "teen-speak," rather than overwrought, 
highly intellectualized dialogue that even Harvard scholars wouldn't use), 
all the while developing into a darkly foreboding, severely eerie thriller 
that successfully leaves you uneasy from the horrifyingly real opening twenty 
minutes to the less-successful, but still suspenseful epilogue.
At the start of the film, 17-year-old high school senior Alex Browning (Devon 
Sawa) is about to leave with his 40-student French class for a field trip to 
Paris. Progressively getting a case of preflight jitters, he spots several 
mysterious "coincidences," including the departure time being 9:25, the same 
as his September 25 birthday, as well as hearing the John Denver song "Rocky 
Mountain High" over the sound system in the airport bathroom. "John Denver 
died in a plane crash," Alex grudgingly mutters to himself. Once seated, Alex 
suddenly gets a horrific premonition about the plane exploding upon takeoff, 
and after causing a ruckus onboard, he, as well as six other students and a 
teacher, are thrown off. Arguing in the airport lobby, Alex's suspicion comes 
true when the plane really does explode in flight, killing all 300+ 
passengers, including the rest of their classmates.
As two investigators interrogate Alex about how he knew the plane was going 
to explode, the fellow survivors, whom he has saved, treat him in varying 
manners. Carter (Kerr Smith), the hotshot jock, holds him in contempt because 
he believes that it is only he himself who can decide his fate. Alex's best 
friend, Tod (Chad E. Donella), wants to stand by him but can't because of his 
fearful parents. The teacher, Mrs. Lewton (Kristen Cloke), is frightened by 
him, believing that it was he who somehow caused the disaster, as well as in 
a state of guilt for giving up her seat on the plane to a fellow coworker. 
Only outsider Clear Rivers (Ali Larter), who unboarded the plane due to a 
sudden connection to Alex's premonition even though she had never even spoken 
to him before, is sympathetic and thankful to him for saving her life.
That is only the setup of "Final Destination," and the less said about what 
follows, the better. Suffice to say, the film does, indeed, turn into a 
slasher film, albeit one that is more thoughtful than most, and replaces a 
knife-wielding maniac for the never-seen granddaddy killer of them all, the 
Grim Reaper itself.
The setpieces in any horror movie are the death scenes, and "Final 
Destination" surely boosts some of the most inventive ones to grace the 
silver screen in years. Graphic and brilliantly orchestrated in a Rube 
Goldbergesque manner, they manage to occasionally be so intense you don't 
know whether to shrink down in your seat, tap your feet in nervousness, or 
turn away. 
Devon Sawa, a rising star who put his physical comedy skills to good use in 
1999's underseen slasher-comedy, "Idle Hands," is even more of a charismatic 
presence here. The conflicting emotions he feels for his survival, which he 
comes to believe he wasn't meant to do, as well as the loss of the other 
passengers, is superbly and subtly acted on his part. One scene, in which he 
is watching a news report on the crash and slowly begins to break down is 
especially realistic and powerful. 
Ali Larter (1999's "Varsity Blues"), in the other central role, is also 
effective, as a girl whose life was going well until her father died in a 
convenience store shooting years before, leaving her stuck with an 
increasingly uncaring mother who married a loutish man--the exact opposite of 
her now-deceased father.
The other roles are not as fully written, and most remain rather 
one-dimensional. The movie is mainly Sawa's, however, and the rest of the 
actors equip themselves well in limited roles. Tony Todd (1992's "Candyman"), 
as an arcane morgue attendant, pops up for a five-minute cameo, but his 
appearance is rather supererogatory. And the aforementioned dialogue 
occasionally hits the bullseye, while at other times it hovers over being 
just a little too stilted and campy.
Ultimately, what is so good about "Final Destination" is that, within the 
confines of the slasher genre, writer-director Wong and screenwriters Glen 
Morgan and Jeffrey Reddick have created a premise that has never been seen 
before in this manner, and a film that has the ability to both surprise and 
frighten--two things that are rarely found in today's horror films. If 
anything, it's safe to say you will never ever look at flying in airplanes 
the same way again.

Title
Review for Tumbleweeds (1999)
Directed by Gavin O'Connor.
Cast: Janet McTeer, Kimberly J. Brown, Gavin O'Connor, Jay O. Sanders, Laurel 
Holloman, Ashley Buccille, Cody McMains, Lois Smith, Michael J. Pollard.
1999 - 100 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, November 26, 1999.
Writer-director Gavin O'Connor's "Tumbleweeds" bears more than a passing 
resemblance to another current film, "Anywhere But Here," starring Natalie 
Portman and Susan Sarandon. Higher-profile and with bigger stars, the latter 
Hollywood version, for once, is actually superior to its indie counterpart, 
particularly in its more intimate screenplay. That isn't to say "Tumbleweeds" 
is a failure, however, as it boasts remarkably natural performances from the 
two leading ladies. It is these two actresses, and a handful of memorable 
supporting work, that buoy the film above mediocrity as, ultimately, the 
story itself is overly familiar and occasionally by-the-numbers, especially 
in its portrayal of domestic abuse.
At the opening, 40-year-old Mary Jo Walker (Janet McTeer) is being assaulted 
once again by her nasty-tempered husband. He's her fourth hubby (she has 
problems saying, "no," to marriage proposals), but she also is not the kind 
of woman who will allow being mistreated. Soon after, she and her 
preadolescent daughter Ava (Kimberly J. Brown) have hit the road, like they 
always do when Mary Jo has man troubles, headed in no particular direction. 
They have never seen the beach, so they end up moving to San Diego, CA, where 
Mary Jo gets a job as an office secretary and Ava becomes fast friends at 
school with fellow classmates Zoe (Ashley Buccille) and Adam (Cody McMains). 
After a chance meeting with Jack Ranson (Gavin O'Connor), a truck driver who 
previously had helped fix their car, Mary Jo, once again, believes that Jack 
is "the" one, and before long, Mary Jo and Ava have moved in with him. Ava 
clearly doesn't like Jack; she can see right through his thin facade, and 
fears that if the relationship between her mother and him grows rocky, she 
will find herself uprooted to another town somewhere else.
As a mother-daughter tale, "Tumbleweeds" is meticulous and believable. The 
relationship between Mary Jo and Ava is so very unaffected because the 
screenplay, by O'Connor and Angela Shelton, knows exactly what goes on 
between a close parent and child. The dialogue exchanges between the two are 
also right on the money, as is the casting of the two central roles.
Janet McTeer, an English stage actress, is exceptional, not only pulling off 
a southern accent with nary a flaw in sight, but also transforming Mary Jo 
into a strong-willed woman whose best friend is her daughter, and gives her 
all the love and care a child should have. That isn't to say Mary Jo is 
perfect; she grows scared and dispirited if she doesn't have a husband or 
boyfriend at all times, and, inevitably, also seems to pick the wrong men. 
Mary Jo fools herself into believing a man stands for security and can fill 
up the missing hole in her personal character, but all it really does is 
cause her constant hardships. When things don't seem to be going well, Mary 
Jo simply packs up (and sometimes even leaves her belongings) and sets off 
for another town, never looking back.
Kimberly J. Brown, as Ava, has the more difficult role because she is the one 
who acts as the voice of reason for her mother. Ava is dedicated and loyal to 
Mary Jo, rarely ever complaining about her severely dysfunctional life of 
settling down and moving out, but she is also growing into a teenager, and 
realizes that running away isn't the answer for everything. Brown, a newcomer 
to feature films, is not at all a child actor who mugs in front of the 
camera, or attempts to steal a scene away from others. She doesn't need to, 
because she often does this without even trying. Brown compliments Ava as a 
girl on the edge of her teenage years, still in the learning process of 
boyfriends and kissing. Ava can sometimes act spoiled or bratty, but that 
only comes with the territory of being a child, and otherwise, is a likable 
character who we can't help but follow with a close eye through the story.
Lending fine support are two impressive supporting turns by Laurel Holloman, 
as Mary Jo's friend and coworker Laurie, and Jay O. Sanders, as Dan Miller, a 
kind widower who may be the perfect match for Mary Jo, if only she could see 
it. In the subplot involving Dan, the turnout isn't exactly as expected, but 
seems nothing if not truthful to the characters.
When Jack Ranson, played by writer-director Gavin O'Connor, enters the 
picture as Mary Jo's new blossoming boyfriend, the film instantly becomes 
more conventional and predictable. We, as the audience, know that Jack isn't 
quite as charming as he may appear to be at first glance, and it is 
inescapable that bliss will only last so long, and Mary Jo will want to get 
out of San Diego as quickly as possible. There then will be a confrontation 
where Ava will attempt to get her mother to understand they don't have to run 
away any longer, that she is her own person and her life shouldn't have to 
revolve around that of men. 
The way "Tumbleweeds" ends is understated and, looking back, very little is 
solved. Without giving anything away, it is unavoidable to wonder whether 
Mary Jo really will follow through with her new path in life or not, and 
Ava's blossoming sexuality is cause for concern. Ava may be the one that sees 
the mistakes her mother makes, but you have to question whether she might end 
up just like her when she gets a little older. "Tumbleweeds" is a delicate 
drama, short on plot but rich in memorable characters. It may have its fair 
share of shortcomings, but the stunning work by McTeer and Brown is cause for 
celebration, all by itself.

Title
Review for Mexican, The (2001)
Directed by Gore Verbinski.
Cast: Brad Pitt, Julia Roberts, James Gandolfini, J.K. Simmons, Bob Balaban, 
Gene Hackman, David Krumholtz, Sherman Augustus, Michael Cerveris, Richard 
Coca. 
2001 - 123 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, brief nudity, and gore).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, March 2, 2001.
The on-screen pairing of Hollywood A-listers Brad Pitt and Julia Roberts has 
been much publicized in the press, as well as the major selling point for 
"The Mexican," a romantic comedy-action-drama directed by Gore Verbinski 
(1997's "Mouse Hunt"). Those viewers expecting them to appear in every scene 
together will be sorely disappointed, as they are a whole country away from 
each other for at least ninety minutes of its running time. If they take this 
initial letdown in stride, however, and view the movie for what it is, they 
will find a quirky, smart gem of a movie that is not only fun to watch, but 
has quite a few meaningful things to say about life, love, and death.
Jerry Welbach (Brad Pitt) is having a lot of bad luck. A relative simpleton 
whose strong-willed, long-time girlfriend, Samantha (Julia Roberts), has just 
broken up with him after discovering he hasn't yet broken off his ties with a 
powerful crime lord, Jerry is now in Mexico to retrieve a prized, mystical 
pistol known as "the mexican." Things turn complicated when he witnesses a 
murder, has his rental car stolen, and gets into more and more high water 
with the people connected to his snatching the pistol.
Meanwhile, Samantha has hit the road to Las Vegas. While stopping at a 
shopping mall en route, she is kidnapped by Leroy (James Gandolfini), a 
sweet-natured hitman who plans to hold her hostage until he gets hold of the 
gun. At first, Samantha is angered at Jerry, whom she truly, unadulteratedly 
loves, for getting her into such a mess, but she begins to talk with Leroy, 
and starts up an offbeat, trusting friendship with him as she aids in helping 
him to discover his true self.
It is the one-of-a-kind, burgeoning relationship between Samantha and Leroy 
that forms the heart and soul of "The Mexican," as it gives the movie an 
amount of depth that it would have otherwise not had. With Jerry off in 
Mexico having dangerous misadventures of his own, the film alternates between 
the two star-crossed characters and their eclectic locations. While Jerry's 
portion is plot-heavy and relatively jokey, Sam and Leroy's steal the whole 
show, thanks to the bright writing, from a screenplay by J.H. Wyman, and the 
lovely camaraderie and chemistry that stars Julia Roberts (2000's "Erin 
Brockovich") and James Gandolfini (TV's "The Sopranos") have together. Their 
relationship is a strictly platonic one (Sam quickly zeroes in on the fact 
that Leroy is gay, but has several problems with connecting to others), but 
the way it builds and strengthens as the story progresses makes for a 
wonderfully human, good-natured piece of entertainment. 
As her Oscar-nominated turn in "Erin Brockovich" confirmed, once and for all, 
Julia Roberts is not only the biggest actress in the world, but also one of 
the most assured and talented. Taking on a part that has little in common 
with most of her previous big-screen ventures, Roberts sparkles as Samantha, 
a beautiful, ambitious woman who can't help loving Jerry, despite their 
seemingly never-ending problems. And James Gandolfini is a standout, creating 
and developing Leroy into one of the most memorable supporting characters in 
recent years. Leroy's progression in being able to start a relationship with 
a guy he meets in a coffee shop is understated and realistic, and the fear he 
has in having people find out his illegal profession is believably palpable. 
Gandolifini is on target throughout, and there could have, and almost should 
have, been an entire movie revolving solely around his character and Roberts'.
The Jerry section, while paling in comparison, is still involving enough to 
work, although the intentionally over-the-top spaghetti western-like music 
score, by Alan Silvestri, that plays consistently through much of his screen 
time quickly grows tedious. Brad Pitt (2001's "Snatch") holds up his own end 
of the picture as the occasionally dimwitted Jerry, and gets to show off his 
loose comedic skills in a way that he rarely gets to.
Appearing together for the opening five minutes, and not again until the 
final half-hour, Roberts and Pitt manage to create a romantic chemistry, 
nonetheless. We truly feel like they are in love with each other (after all, 
you only argue the way they do in this movie when you love someone this way), 
even when the Mexican border is keeping them apart. 
For all of its strong points, "The Mexican" makes a minor misstep in the 
final act, with a climax that doesn't seem all that necessary and is 
needlessly drawn out. The last twenty minutes could have been almost 
completely cut out, and it would have made little difference, aside from the 
action not flagging the way it does in this final product. Still, its 
overlong nature does not tarnish the powerful lasting impressions that "The 
Mexican" makes on you. It's a fine film, both funny and poignant, violent and 
biting, charming and purposeful. In other words, yet another completely 
respectable career choice for both Julia Roberts and Brad Pitt, as well as a 
star-making one for James Gandolfini.
 http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman
http://www.young-hollywood.com
http://www.geocities.com/halloweenfan2k/moviereviewcentral.html

Title
Review for Summer of Sam (1999)
Directed by Spike Lee.
Cast: John Leguizamo, Adrien Brody, Mira Sorvino, Ben Gazzara, Jennifer 
Esposito, Michael Rispoli, Bebe Neuwirth, Anthony LaPaglia, Mike Starr, Patti 
LuPone, Ken Garito, Brian Tarantino, Roger Guenveur Smith, Michael Badalucco, 
Spike Lee, Jimmy Breslin; voice of John Turturro.
1999 - 144 minutes
Rated R (for graphic violence, strong profanity, sex, nudity, and gore).
Reviewed July 3, 1999.
Spike Lee has always been an obviously talented director, creating inventive 
storytelling and technical techniques that have been nothing short of 
impressive. 1989's critically-heralded "Do the Right Thing" is still Lee's 
most praised work, but he has also made the successful likes of 1991's 
"Jungle Fever," 1992's "Malcolm X," 1994's "Crooklyn," and 1995's "Clockers." 
One of the downfalls in Lee's films that have been detected, however, is his 
unnecessary emphasis on sex and nudity when it has very little to do with the 
story at hand (for proof, just take a look at his frustratingly uneven 1998 
drama, "He Got Game"), as if his only reason for adding these elements is 
simply because he can. 
Spike Lee's latest opus, "Summer of Sam," marks a major turning point in his 
career because, with this picture, he has swayed away from his usual 
African-American characters to focus on a group of white Italian Americans, 
which was a vital decision in his evolution as a filmmaker. And, ultimately, 
this film's often extreme sex and nudity (which had to be slightly trimmed 
when the MPAA first stamped the film with an NC-17) serves a definite purpose 
when dealing with the characters' conflicts, invoking a certain place and 
time, and leads to one of the more powerful moments in this 
long-but-not-too-long 144-minute epic. 
Set during the hottest summer on record in New York City, in 1977, while 
serial killer David Berkowitz, the .44-caliber killer, later titled the Son 
of Sam from a letter he sent to writer Jimmy Breslin, was going on a rampage, 
murdering primarily women with shoulder-length brown hair. The movie may be 
named after the Son of Sam, but he, as well as his grisly acts, pose as 
supporting characters. Instead, the film is about that fateful and memorable 
summer, when NYC was ablaze in hysteria due to the killings, and when many 
frightened women were getting blond wigs or getting their hair dyed. It was 
also the summer when, as already mentioned, there was an extreme heat wave, a 
city-wide blackout, and mass looting. Amidst all of this are the central 
characters, living in the Bronx. Vinny (John Leguizamo) is a hairdresser who, 
night after night, goes out with his sweet wife, Dionna (Mira Sorvino), to 
various night clubs to dance the night away. What Dionna does not know about 
Vinny is that he is a compulsive cheater, feeling the need to have sex with 
seemingly every woman he meets except his wife. When Son of Sam strikes 
within moments of him leaving an area where he was having a quickie with 
Dionna's cousin in a parked car, Vinny believes that he is next on the 
killer's hit list, and takes it as a sign to change his philandering ways and 
become a good, faithful husband again. This vow, indeed, proves more 
difficult than he anticipates. The other running story thread in the film 
deals with Vinny's best friend, Ritchie (Adrien Brody), who returns to his 
old neighborhood after living in Manhattan, but to the surprise of all of his 
old buddies, has taken up with the punk movement, complete with spiked hair 
and a leather dog collar around his neck. An amateur musician for his band 
called Late Term Abortion, Ritchie hooks up with the neighborhood slut, Ruby 
(Jennifer Esposito), and secretly begins to dance at a gay porn theater and 
make pornos for the extra money. When two police investigators approach a mob 
boss (Ben Gazzara) to help them search for the mysterious Son of Sam, he 
turns them down, but opts to rally up a group of his own friends to make a 
list of suspects, gradually narrowing them down to a select few.
"Summer of Sam," like some of the very best films (Robert Altman's 
incomparable 1975 masterpiece, "Nashville," comes quickly to mind), is a 
wildly ambitious motion picture overflowing with characters and stories, all 
of which are somewhat pawns in the grand scheme of things to vividly and 
accurately portray a certain place, this time that "place" being NYC in the 
summer of 1977. Aided by Spike Lee's fresh, assured direction, "Summer of 
Sam" is an electrifying, high-charged drama that is easily one of the most 
engrossing films I've seen thus far in 1999. Moving at a dizzying pace from 
one character and predicament to the next, the film only stops long enough to 
carefully observe the people's interactions with each other, and even then it 
has energy to spare.
Watching the film, you are not merely watching what is going on, but are 
practically put right in the middle of the horrifying chaos. The alternate 
desperation and fear that the characters are feeling, not only due to the Son 
of Sam but also from their own troublesome relationships, is always strongly 
palpable, and the film also succeeds as seldom period pieces do. Technically, 
while most movies set somewhere in the past usually seem like a bunch of 
actors playing dress-up and the settings looking manufactured, "Summer of 
Sam" feels as if Lee has literally gone back in time and really made the 
picture in 1977. To acquire this, a great deal of work has gone into the set 
decoration, production and costume design, research on the year of 1977, and 
Lee experiments with several different film stocks to give the picture an 
"in-the-moment" feeling. The cinematography, by Ellen Kuras, is strikingly 
distinct and moody, further helping along the setting of 1977. Another 
decisive technical element that is cause for praise is the astounding, edgy 
music score by Terence Blanchard that occasionally gives off an air of 
dreaminess and fantasy amidst the nightmare going on. Complimenting the score 
are the perfectly-chosen '70s songs, and it is one of the strongest song 
compilations on a period movie in recent memory.
Lest you have misunderstood, the Son of Sam killer, David Berkowitz (Michael 
Badalucco), is intermittently shown as a severely unstable man in extreme 
stages of schizophrenia. Pounding his heavy-set body down on the bed in his 
trashed apartment, writing wicked, ominous messages on the walls, Berkowitz 
is constantly being annoyed by the black labrodor retriever whom allegedly 
told him to kill in the first place, and in a shocking moment that might have 
been transformed into an unintentional laugh if it wasn't for the painful 
realism in which it was presented, the dog speaks to him briefly (voiced by 
John Turturro). When Berkowitz sets out to shoot and kill his victims, the 
murders are graphically, but non-exploitatively shown. There are no false 
scares and rising suspense, just a blink-and-you'll-miss it look of horror on 
the peoples' faces before the gun points straight for them and, BANG, they're 
life has been taken from them. Too often serial murder is superficially 
looked upon in mainstream films, so credit Spike Lee for taking these 
sequences and turning them into stark moments of pure, unadulterated terror.
John Leguizamo has had a misfortune so far in his acting career because he 
has been given usually comic, one-note roles (1997's horrific comedy, "The 
Pest," 1995's "To Wong Foo, Thanks for Everything, Julie Newmar"). In his 
first strictly dramatic role that I can remember, we are finally given a 
glimpse of Leguizamo as a talented, serious actor. His character of Vinny has 
his virtues--he cares for those people around them, is the symbol of normalcy 
around his off-beat, foul-mouthed friends who hang out at a "Dead End" street 
corner--but more often than not is a seriously flawed, unlikable man who 
blatantly has casual affairs despite the love and care that his wife gives 
him, and when he is caught, foolishly believes that she will forgive him for 
what he's put her through.
Academy Award Winner Mira Sorvino (1995's "Mighty Aphrodite, where she gave 
the best supporting performance of the decade) plays his suffering wife, 
Dionna, as a loyal woman who is close to her father and works as a waitress 
at his Italian restaurant. Suspecting Vinny is cheating on her, and unable to 
please him sexually, Dionna becomes distressed that something must be wrong 
with her. Starting off as the token "wife," Sorvino's Dionna eventually is 
uncovered to show us an unexpectedly strong woman who is firm in her beliefs 
and knows what is right and wrong. Leading to the most heartbreaking moment 
in the film, Dionna goes along with Vinny to Plato's Retreat, a sleaze club 
that turns into a free-for-all orgy. Feeling that if she participates in it 
with Vinny, she will gain his respect, Dionna is devastated afterwards when 
Vinny blames her for the whole experience, accusing her of not caring about 
him. Sorvino does not strike one false note, as we are able to deeply 
sympathize with what she is going through, even more so when she is revealed 
to be an intelligent, free-thinking woman later on.
Adrien Brody is exceptional as the misunderstood Ritchie, the character who 
is most suspiciously looked upon due to his quick-changing punk/musician/porn 
lifestyle, even though he clearly has the most virtuous personality. Seeking 
to be an individual, Ritchie is always changing his physical appearance and 
not really sure where his life is headed, but is loyal to Vinny, listening to 
his problems when even he knows what Vinny is doing could potentially destroy 
Dionna.
All other performances in "Summer of Sam" are also top-notch, particularly 
Ben Gazarra; Jennifer Esposito, who adds a fetching naturalism to her 
relatively underwritten role; and Patti LuPone, as Ritchie's mother who loves 
him dearly but finds herself throwing him out of the house because of her 
overpowering new husband (Mike Starr). Even Spike Lee appears as an 
inadequate news reporter who pops up every now and again to make a commentary 
on the goings-on in NYC, and adds a much-needed light dose of humor to the 
overpoweringly dark material.
Controversy has been surrounding "Summer of Sam" ever since Spike Lee began 
filming the picture in the exact neighborhoods where David Berkowitz once 
prowled the streets. This simple thought gives the film an added eerieness, 
but Berkowitz and the families of the victims have cried out about how 
exploitive this film would be. The good news for them is that they are wrong; 
the movie does not center or dwell on the gruesome slayings, but wisely 
exposes an open-ended tapestry of feuding stories, characters, and 
occurrences within a 2-month time period. Jimmy Breslin opens and closes 
"Summer of Sam," saying, "There are 8-million stories in the Naked City, and 
this is one of them." It is, indeed, and a truly spellbinding and powerful 
one at that.
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for High Art (1998)
Directed by Lisa Cholodenko.
Cast: Radha Mitchell, Ally Sheedy, Patricia Clarkson, Bill Sage, Gabriel 
Mann, Anh Duong, David Thornton, Tammy Grimes, Helen Mendes, Cindra 
Feuer, Charis Michelson.
1998 - 101 minutes.
Rated R (for profanity, sexual situations, nudity, and drug use).
Reviewed December 11, 1998.
Lisa Cholodenko's "High Art," is an intelligent, quiet drama. Its 
strongest quality, aside from the top-notch central performances, is the 
perceptive way in which the film, also written by Cholodenko, observes 
its characters. They are all flawed people, some more troubled than 
others, but they are not judged. Judging the characters in this picture 
would be a creative misstep on the filmmakers' parts, because no one, no 
matter how bad off they are, deserve to be negatively judged if they are 
involved in some serious problems that they cannot break free of.
Syd (Radha Mitchell), a 24-year-old woman living with her longtime 
boyfriend James (Gabriel Mann), has recently been awarded an ideal job 
at the high-profile photography magazine, "Frame." She very much enjoys 
where her career is headed, but is often not taken very seriously by her 
managers, who are always giving her petty jobs to do, when she knows she 
could be doing more important things. One night, while taking a bath, 
Syd notices a leak coming from the apartment above hers, so when she 
goes up there to inform them of it, she meets Lucy Beliner (Ally 
Sheedy), a thin, worn-out, and unhappy woman, who lives with her 
drug-addicted German girlfriend, Greta (Patricia Clarkson), a pathetic 
former actress who is usually so out-of-it that she often is in and out 
of conciousness. Syd quickly strikes up a conversation with Lucy, and 
discovers that she used to be an acclaimed photographer ten years 
before. Lucy claims she doesn't want to get back into the profession, 
but Syd manages to convince the "Frame" editors to do a piece on her 
work. All the while, Syd begins to grow deep feelings for Lucy, even 
though she has never previously been attracted to a woman, and Lucy 
starts a battle with her personal demons.
"High Art," is such an effective motion picture because it is never 
suger-coated or idealized, but instead an honest and convincing portrait 
of a handful of unhappy people whose lives are going nowhere, while 
Syd's luck begins to rise. The film in no way is about lesbianism, but 
about love, which was a refreshing change of pace from the usual 
stereotypical portraits of homosexuality. As Lucy and Syd grow closer 
and closer together, we really do believe that they are falling in love 
with each other, even if the relationship might be doomed. 
With this picture, Ally Sheedy's star has risen once again, thanks to 
her touching, nearly flawless portrtayal of Lucy, a woman who, in the 
course of a decade, has found her life consumed almost entirely by 
drugs, which has taken away her once-blossoming career. Her characted 
really is tragic, and one particular scene involving Lucy and her 
mother, in which Lucy admits to her that she has a drug problem, and her 
mother matter-of-factly responds by saying she can't help her, is 
heartbreaking. Although not autobiographical, Sheedy has had drug 
problems in her past, and I suspect she brought that knowledge of 
already being in Lucy's footsteps to her role. Also very good is Radha 
Mitchell as Syd, who previously starred in the slight 1997 Australian 
comedy, "Love and Other Catastrophes," wh caught me by surprise with her 
performance. Easily being able to pass as Christina Ricci's older 
sister, Mitchell obtains the same natural charisma that has made Ricci 
so popular recently.
As accurate as almost every detail is in, "High Art," I wish the 
relationship had been more tightly written involving Syd and James, who, 
played by Gabriel Mann, is left with a throwaway role. By the time he 
finds out about Syd and Lucy, he disappears from the film, and I wish 
there had been another scene where they confronted each other.
This is a very minor fault, however, in a film that is full of riches. 
Although many of the characters are stuck in a hopeless pit of despair, 
Syd and Lucy are intelligent people who recognize their problems. The 
character of Dominique (Anh Duong), the "Frame" editor who decides to 
give Syd a chance with her ideas, was also written to be far more mature 
than expected. And the one sex scene in the film was beautifully and 
originally done. For once, it did not invlove steaminess, or violent 
sexual activity, or gratuitous nudity, but focused on the actual 
characters, who love each other, and their insecurities involved in 
making the decision to actually have sex. "High Art," which won the 
screenwriting award at the 1998 Sundance Film Festival, marks the 
superior feature film debut of Cholodenko, as well as Sheedy's 
strongest, and best, role to date.
           - Copyright 1998 by Dustin Putman
             Dustin
Putman's Film Reviews> 

Title
Review for Reindeer Games (2000)
Directed by John Frankenheimer.
Cast: Ben Affleck, Charlize Theron, Gary Sinise, Clarence Williams III, 
Dennis Farina, James Frain, Donal Logue.
2000 - 104 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, sex, nudity, and gore).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, February 26, 2000.
It's getting to be like clockwork. Nowadays, every single week comes a 
high-profile film with killer talent that you can't believe could ever miss 
the mark, but does--majorly. Last week's candidate was "Hanging Up," a 
disastrously sloppy pile of trash that starred Meg Ryan, Diane Keaton, Lisa 
Kudrow, and Walter Matthau.  This week's Garbage Bin award goes to "Reindeer 
Games," directed by world-class filmmaker John Frankenheimer (1962's "The 
Manchurian Candidate," 1998's "Ronin") and starring Ben Affleck, Charlize 
Theron, and Gary Sinise in a movie that should never have been greenlit, 
particularly with the inanely ludicrous screenplay by Ehren Kruger. The fact 
that Kruger went so very wrong here is a surprise, considering his exciting 
contributions to 1999's "Arlington Road" and the current "Scream 3." 
Hopefully, this was just a minor slip on his part, because, truth be told, 
his work here is pretty crummy.
Rudy Duncan (Ben Affleck), who has been in prison for a short time due to 
grand theft auto, is about to be paroled. It's Christmas time, and all he 
wants to do is go home to see his family, and settle down with a cup of hot 
chocolate and a slice of pecan pie. His cellmate, Nick (James Frain), has 
been carrying on a six-month relationship with a beautiful 25-year-old woman 
named Ashley (Charlize Theron), through letter correspondence. She is 
planning on meeting him outside the jail on the day he gets released, which 
is the same day as Rudy. The only problem is, two days before they are to 
meet, Nick is stabbed and killed in a cafeteria riot. After seeing Ashley 
poignantly waiting outside the prison for a man she has fallen in love with 
but who is nowhere to be found, Rudy decides to take over the identity of 
Nick for her. After a shy chat in a cafe, a lustful roll in the hay (or off 
the hay, as they get so carried away they fly right off the bed!), and a trip 
to a clothing store to buy him some new clothes, they run headfirst into a 
major predicament. 
Their happiness does not last long when they are stalked down by Ashley's 
slimy brother (Gary Sinise) and his three cohorts, all of which, like Ashley, 
believe that Rudy is Nick. Nick, it seems, had a previous job at an Indian 
reservation casino, and so what they want him (Rudy) to do is head up a heist 
of the joint, even though he knows nothing about the place.
"Reindeer Games" isn't as much a movie that is supposed to make sense as it 
is a blatantly gimmicky action-thriller with the sole purpose of consistently 
fooling the audience. That's it. Without the token plot twists during the 
conclusion, which, by the way, are unpredictable because we are given 
absolutely no hints beforehand, there would be a vacuous filmstrip where a 
visual picture was supposed to be. 
The first twenty minutes are the only bright spot of the picture. Beginning 
with the startling image of five slain Santas lying in the snow; then moving 
straight into the close and believable relationship that is set up between 
Rudy and Nick; and finally ending up with what looks to be turning into an 
unlikely, yet undeniably sweet romance, the picture's opening has next to no 
action in it, but does a nice job of setting up the characters of Rudy and 
Ashley. Their initial meeting at a cafe is the film's best scene, as it gets 
that feeling of nervousness and hesitancy in meeting someone you feel like 
you already know just right.
When the plot finally thickens with the entrance of Sinise and his 
shamelessly generic bad-guy comrades, so do the problems with the film 
itself. Running on autopilot for the next hour, and reminding me, in certain 
ways, of that awful 1996 Keanu Reeves vehicle, "Chain Reaction," it is 
evident that all Kruger and director John Frankenheimer are doing is wasting 
our time until the obligatory surprise, which (they think) will make the 
audience exclaim, "oooh!," when all it really will do is cause them to groan. 
There is very little to recommend here, aside from the sex scene between Ben 
Affleck and Charlize Theron, where they both are freely in the buff (and 
let's face it-- who wouldn't want to see that?). While Sinise is nothing more 
than an unredeeming, one-dimensional baddie, Affleck and Theron both have 
what it takes to topline a big movie, but this isn't the ideal one. Working 
as mere puppets in service of the overly convoluted plot, they have talent to 
burn, but nowhere to place it here. 
By the climax, "Reindeer Games" has degenerated from being a mere bore into 
something that is overwrought, mean-spirited, and graphically violent. The 
movie also isn't very fair to one of the central characters, nor do they 
treat him/her with satisfactory respect on the writing level. And then, after 
it has left us feeling unclean and rather depressed, it tacks on a feel-good 
conclusion that so obviously was filmed during reshoots that it sticks out 
like a sore thumb. You know you're in trouble when you set out to make an 
action picture, and it concludes with more sappiness than a Robin Williams 
movie.

Title
Review for Ressources humaines (1999)
Directed by Bruce Paltrow.
Cast: Paul Giamatti, Huey Lewis, Gwyneth Paltrow, Andre Braugher, Scott 
Speedman, Maria Bello, Angie Dickinson, Lochlyn Munro.
2000 - 113 minutes
Rated R (for brief violence, profanity, and sex).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, September 16, 2000.
A road picture about three different sets of people traveling to Omaha to 
perform in a $5000 karaoke tournament, Bruce Paltrow's "Duets" is an offbeat 
and occasionally quirky little movie that, like all successful ensembles, 
gradually builds upon its energy, depth, and momentum the further we get into 
it. We not only grow to care about the characters and what they mean to each 
other by the conclusion, but we also realize that director Paltrow's and 
screenwriter John Byrum's purpose was so much larger--so much more honest and 
telling--than spinning a story solely about karaoke hopefuls. All six of the 
central characters are looking for that one special thing that will make them 
happy. Ultimately, not all of them fully find what they are looking for, but 
they discover things about themselves, and the world, that make them somehow 
wiser--more assured, less confused and lonely.
Switching between three subplots that inevitably converge at the karaoke 
contest in the conclusion, "Duets," like last year's wonderful "Go," never 
loses track of any of its characters, nor does its energy falter. Todd (Paul 
Giamatti) is a disgruntled traveling salesman tired of going unappreciated 
and ignored by his family who snaps one day and, while supposedly going out 
for a pack of cigarettes, simply keeps on driving. While in a New Mexico bar, 
Todd is egged on by a beautiful local to try his own hand at karaoke singing, 
and to his disbelief, loves it. Soon, Todd has met the good-hearted Reggie 
(Andre Braugher), an ex-con just released from prison and with a curiously 
shady past, who becomes both his traveling companion and good friend.
When singing extraordinaire Ricky Dean (Huey Lewis), who hops from karaoke 
bar to karaoke bar across the nation, slyly hustling others and making good 
money off of it, learns of the death of a past close relationship, he drives 
down to Las Vegas for the funeral, and in the process, meets his daughter for 
the first time. A wide-eyed, sweet-natured showgirl, Liv (Gwyneth Paltrow) 
decides to follow Ricky to Omaha to spend time with him, hoping to build a 
relationship with her remaining parent.
Finally, cab driver Billy (Scott Speedman), an idealistic young man who, at 
one point, wanted to become a priest, has just discovered his girlfriend has 
been cheating on him. Wallowing in self-pity at a local bar, he meets Suzi 
(Maria Bello), a singing hopeful who doesn't have any money, but knows how to 
use her sexuality to get what she wants--including a ride to California from 
Billy. Along the way, they catch word of the karaoke contest, and set out for 
a detour to Omaha themselves.
Handling separate storylines all at once is a risky undertaking in film, with 
the possibility of a certain vignette overpowering the others, or worse, 
coming off as uneven without anything of interest to say or do. Director 
Bruce Paltrow (whose only other feature film has been 1982's "A Little Sex") 
smoothly handles the frequent plot transitions and portrays all of the 
characters as children--that is, lovingly and with a sharp eye for detail. 
Sort of like a slightly less ambitious Robert Altman ensemble (think 
"Nashville" set in the world of karaoke, rather than country music), this is 
not supposed to be a criticism, but simply a fair comparison between a 
smaller-minded and more intimate motion picture, rather than a sprawling epic 
with twenty-some main players.
The cast is talented and fully believable--each one making a lasting 
impression, including the brief supporting appearances by such actors as 
Lochlyn Munro (2000's "Scary Movie") and Angie Dickinson. Paul Giamatti, 
arguably the center of the film and the character which receives the most 
screen time, is touching and acceptably off-kilter as Todd, a man who says he 
is tired of the American Dream, and wishes to do nothing but live the rest of 
his life the way he wants to live it. Andre Braugher is perfectly cast as 
Reggie, who wants to get his troubled life back together, and never expects 
to meet someone like Todd at the turning point in his own life. Giamatti and 
Braugher perform a showstopping version of "Try a Little Tenderness" that is 
as exciting and full of life in its three minutes than this weekend's action 
picture, "Bait," is in its entire two hours.
Scott Speedman (TV's "Felicity") shows a genuine spark of charm that has 
previously gone unnoticed for him, and he proves that he could very well have 
a prosperous future career in films. Maria Bello (2000's "Coyote Ugly") is 
possibly the least developed of the six protagonists, but is still given 
ample material to work with, and does a mean performance of "Sweet Dreams Are 
Made of This."
Kudos to director Paltrow for realizing that, since the film revolves around 
karaoke clubs, and hinges on the success or failure of depicting such a 
world, it would only be truthful if the musical numbers were performed in 
full. Each of the numerous songs are vibrantly brought to life by the 
performers, all of which, aside from Braugher, used their real singing 
voices. A particular surprise is Gwyneth Paltrow (1998's "Shakespeare in 
Love"), the biggest name in the cast and the daughter of the director, who 
turns out to be extremely talented as a singer, as well as an actress. 
Paltrow's Liv is a different, interesting character for her--more childlike 
and innocent, less refined. Her rendition of Kim Carnes' "Bette Davis Eyes" 
is delightful, and her climactic duet with her father, played admirably and 
with an added dose of tough realism by Huey Lewis (1993's "Short Cuts"), in 
which they both somehow come to terms with their newfound relationship 
through the words of Smokey Robinson's "Cruisin'," is one of the most 
indelible film moments of the year. 
"Duets" rarely goes for cheap laughs (although it does get many genuine 
ones), obvious melodrama, or out-of-the-blue plot twists, and like real life, 
develops in an authentic fashion. An unforeseen event does occur in the 
picture's final minutes and uncovers the many hidden truths behind the film's 
true reason for being. "Duets" is not about who gets the girl, or who wins 
the big tournament, or who will go on to become professional singers. It 
would like you to believe it is, at first glance, but it isn't. It's a motion 
picture about a group of characters--everyday people like you or me--who find 
redemption and personal gratification where they least expect to. "Karaoke is 
a way of life," someone says early in the film. This film proves that the 
same goes for human yearning, dreaming, and affection.

Title
Review for Score, The (2001)
With top-flight talent onboard that includes the likes of Robert De Niro, 
Edward Norton, Marlon Brando, and Angela Bassett, one has to wonder how Frank 
Oz's "The Score" got greenlit without one person involved--be it the cast or 
the crew--calling it on its mediocre screenplay. Unevenly written by Kario 
Salem, Lem Dobbs, and Scott Marshall Smith, what we have here is a would-be 
crime thriller involving a long-time burglar who is about to perform one last 
big score before retirement, if only he can get away with it unscathed. Stop 
me if you've heard this one before. 
The man in question is Nick Wells (Robert De Niro), and now that he owns a 
successful Montreal nightclub, he wants out of his life of crime. Inspiring 
this decision is his devoted, flight attendant girlfriend, Diane (Angela 
Bassett), who has agreed to give up her job position and move to Montreal to 
be with him, if only he fulfills his end of the bargain and stops putting his 
life on the line. But first, Nick must pull off one final job, brought to his 
attention by an old friend named Max Baron (Marlon Brando). It seems the 
Custom House has a beautiful, 17th-century scepter in storage that is, more 
or less, priceless, and if Nick is able to pull it off, he will remain 
wealthy for the rest of his crime-free life. Despite vowing always to work 
alone, Nick is persuaded by Max to be accompanied by young ingenue Jackie 
Teller (Edward Norton), who works at the Custom House and is the one man that 
can get on the inside and case the location of the scepter. 
For its opening ninety minutes, "The Score" rambles along setting up the 
premise, and then repeats this set-up again and again with variations on who 
the characters happen to be in each given scene. Heist films are a subgenre 
as old as the silent picture era, and "The Score" needlessly wallows in its 
cliches for far too long, as if director Frank Oz (1999's "Bowfinger") isn't 
quite sure that the audience will understand the complex plot. Little did Oz 
realize that the plot is actually quite simple, and maybe even too simple to 
sustain a two-hour-plus running time. 
If the first three-quarters of the film are basic filler for what is to come, 
the final thirty minutes are a suspenseful, crackerjack entertainment, 
tightly paced and drenched in nailbiting tension. As the heist gets underway, 
almost everything that could go wrong does, and Oz excels in following Nick 
and Jackie on their high-risk steal. 
Perhaps the climax seems so impressive because everything that comes before 
it is such a waste of time. The characters are handled in a clunky manner 
that paints them as giant bores with little interests outside of what the 
story requires. Robert De Niro (2001's "15 Minutes") is a consistently great 
actor who, for the first time in memory, fails to deliver an interesting 
performance. De Niro is by no means bad, but his character of Nick is dull, 
and so is he. Edward Norton (2000's "Keeping the Faith") fares decidedly 
better, only because his role of Jackie requires that he actually do a little 
something that stands out. In Jackie's case, this is acting like a mentally 
handicapped man through half of the movie, as he singlehandedly fools 
everyone he works with at the Custom House. 
In phoned-in parts that are woefully underutilized, it is downright 
depressing to see a screen icon such as Marlon Brando (1996's "The Island of 
Dr. Moreau") just sit around and attempt to make the best of the 
circumstances. Granted, Brando is not in the best of health (or shape), so 
this may explain his limited involvement in the story, but he deserves 
better. Meanwhile, Angela Bassett (2000's "Supernova") turns in a small, 
effective performance as Nick's long-suffering gal, but something tells me a 
large chunk of her role found its way to the cutting-room floor. 
In what could have been a dynamite crime movie with excellent actors 
strutting their stuff in a taut script, director Frank Oz has botched the 
results, and with no help from his lazy writers. Repetitive to the point of 
viewer impatience, only to strike back with a bravura final act that exposes 
how deeply flawed the rest of it is, "The Score" must ultimately go down as a 
missed opportunity, one that will undoubtedly hang as little more than a 
footnote in these fine performers' respective careers. 
  - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman 
    http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman 

Title
Review for What Lies Beneath (2000)
Directed by Robert Zemeckis.
Cast: Michelle Pfeiffer, Harrison Ford, Diana Scarwid, Miranda Otto, James 
Remar, Joe Morton, Wendy Crewson, Amber Valletta, Katharine Towne.
2000 - 130 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity, violence, and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, July 22, 2000.
"What Lies Beneath," directed by Academy Award winning filmmaker Robert 
Zemeckis (1994's "Forrest Gump"), is so very good in so many scenes that it 
almost makes you angry the movie is hampered by an uneven, flawed screenplay. 
In teaming with A-list actors Michelle Pfeiffer and Harrison Ford, Zemeckis 
has set out to create a mature, sophisticated supernatural thriller, and his 
visual talents are consistently at the forefront of the picture. The movie is 
quietly taut, eerie, and deliberately paced, as it gradually builds momentum 
to a climactic twist that not only is difficult to swallow, but leaves a sour 
taste in your mouth once the end credits roll. Still, despite the 
disappointing finale, the film is undeniably suspenseful and beautiful to 
look at, and that is the complication with not being able to wholeheartedly 
recommend "What Lies Beneath." It does its job more than effectively, but, if 
the superbly paced first hour is any indication, it could have clearly turned 
out to be so much more than the cliched "Friday the 13th" knockoff it resorts 
to. 
Claire Spencer (Michelle Pfeiffer) and her husband, Dr. Norman Spencer 
(Harrison Ford), are a happily married couple living in an idyllic waterside 
home off the coast of Vermont. With their daughter Caitlin (Katharine Towne) 
away at college, and Norman often at work for long hours into the night, 
Claire suddenly find herself home alone for much of the time, without anyone 
to rely on her, and with little to get into. That is when she begins to 
witness doors opening and closing by themselves, and pictures abruptly 
falling. The bathtub keeps mysteriously filling up with water without anyone 
around to have done it, and the computer keeps getting turned on. Claire 
starts to suspect that their house is being haunted by a young, blonde woman 
who looks a great deal like herself, and with her next-door neighbor (Miranda 
Otto) having strangely disappeared, she thinks she knows the entity she is 
being visited by.
As is sometimes the unfortunate case in the thriller-horror genre, the setup 
of promised greater things to come is far stronger than the final outcome. 
Such is the trap that "What Lies Beneath" falls into. The opening sixty 
minutes, which is primarily a one-character show, as we follow Claire through 
her lingering days at the house by herself, and the increasingly supernatural 
and frightening things that begin to occur to her, is somewhat deceptive, for 
when twists and characters are brought up in the film, they disappear almost 
as quickly as they appear. And the plot development concerning Claire's 
suspicions about her neighbors is only present to bide its time while it 
turns up the fire and reveals its more complicated and extravagant (but not 
necessarily more successful) master plan. 
With the exception of possibly 1992's "Batman Returns," Michelle Pfeiffer has 
never been more confident and powerful in a performance as she is here. As 
the increasingly paranoid and scared Claire, Pfeiffer never overplays any of 
her scenes, appropriately donning a tricky balancing act between believing 
the things she sees, and wondering if she is possibly delusional. She is a 
sympathetic protagonist, a woman in her forties who begins to realize how she 
has traded in her chances as a great cellist for almost the last twenty 
years, to instead raise a family and support her husband's work. Seemingly 
setting itself up to be an allegory of a woman who comes to terms with the 
choices she has made in her life, but recognizes that it's never to late to 
start over, the film disappoints on this level also, once again not following 
through with a subplot it has brought up.
Although top-billed, Harrison Ford constantly plays second fiddle, but holds 
his own remarkably well in many of his scenes with the radiant Pfeiffer. Ford 
portrays Norman as a caring husband who, nonetheless, simply isn't around 
nearly enough, and has made many mistakes in his past that he regrets (one of 
which plays a key role in the film, as well as in the misleading advertising 
campaign).
The supporting cast all equip themselves amicably, but each of them are 
wasted and not given a full character to develop. Diana Scarwid (1981's 
"Mommie Dearest") is vibrantly unconventional, but sorely underused, as 
Claire's best friend, Jody. The same goes for Miranda Otto (1997's "Love 
Serenade"), as troubled neighbor Mary Feur; James Remar, as Mary's 
no-nonsense husband, Warren; and Katharine Towne,  as Claire and Norman's 
daughter, Caitlin, who exits after the first five minutes and never reappears 
or is heard from again. Strengthening the supporting characters, or deleting 
many of them altogether, would surely have done a world of good in Gregg 
Clark's misguided screenplay, which relies heavily on plot twists and jumpy 
scary scenes, where someone enters the frame suddenly and there is a 
startling musical sting.
Where director Zemeckis does excel is in building up the tension, and if the 
movie is never truly scary, it does leave you on the edge of your seat on 
more than one occasion. It's strange, really, how even during the concluding 
twenty minutes, when things grow increasingly preposterous and the concluding 
twist feels more like a betrayal than a genuine surprise, Zemeckis uses his 
camera in a sly way that heightens the suspense even when that aspect should 
be falling apart too. One silent sequence that is set in a bathtub is a 
technical masterpiece, where just the subtle use of running water makes you 
want to grasp onto the theater seat's armrest. And another moment, in which 
the camera swings down to shoot below the floorboards, is almost 
awe-inspiring. 
Everything in "What Lies Beneath" seems to be in place to create a rare 
supernatural thriller that not only works on a visceral level, but is also 
intelligent and classy, yet screenwriter Clark botches its chances. While the 
slasher movie-style finale is entertaining, simply to see such big stars 
involved in carrying it out, couldn't the movie have remained more of a 
psychological telling, rather than a violent and ghastly one? All could have 
been forgiven, however, with a satisfying epilogue, one that stays true to 
the character of Claire, a woman we as an audience have grown attached to, 
but the film unexpectedly ends with very few explanations or answers given. 
Whereas the viewer should walk away from a motion picture like "What Lies 
Beneath" with a giddy, satisfied feeling inside, all we are ultimately left 
with is the question, "What was the point?"

Title
Review for Home Fries (1998)
Directed by Dean Parisot.
Cast: Luke Wilson, Drew Barrymore, Catherine O'Hara, Jake Busey, Shelley 
Duvall, Chris Ellis.
1998 - 92 minutes.
Rated PG-13 (for violence and profanity).
Reviewed November 28, 1998.
By Dustin Putman 
Dustin Putman's Film Reviews >
"Home Fries," has been wrongfully sentenced to a misleading ad campaign 
which makes the film look like a simple, sweet love story. But, on the 
other hand, I can also understand the marketer's decision, since, "Home 
Fries," is actually a dark comedy involving deception and murder, with a 
romance stuck in between. In some ways, it felt like a PG-13 version of 
another new, and far superior, film that was released on the same exact 
day, "Very Bad Things."
The first sign that this would not be your usual romance came in the 
first five minutes, in which a middle-aged man (Chris Ellis) is 
terrorized at night by a helicopter, and is scared to death. The people 
in the plane, we find out, are the man's sons, sympathetic Dorian (Luke 
Wilson) and bad-tempered Angus (Jake Busey), who only meant to frighten 
him a little because their domineering mother (Catherine O'Hara) wanted 
to seek revenge on him due to him having an affair. While in the 
helicopter, Dorian and Angus hear voices over their head phones, and 
suspect that someone might have heard the murder. After narrowing down 
the possible people it could be, they find out the voice was coming from 
Sally (Drew Barrymore), a sweet-natured young woman pregnant with Dorian 
and Angus' father's baby, who works at the Burger Matic, a fast-food 
restaurant. Dorian is forced to get a job there to figure out who the 
witness was, but in the process, begins to fall in love with Sally, even 
though his mother and brother want her dead!
As you can see, "Home Fries," is anything but an ordinary romance, but 
instead, a wicked, offbeat comedy, with a few action scenes sprinkled in 
for good (or bad) measure. Although I appreciate the fact that director 
Dean Parisot and screenwriter Vince Gilligan were trying to make an 
original film, it simply doesn't work.
The heart of the film does, in fact, come from the blossoming romance 
between Barrymore and Wilson (also dating in real life), and I liked all 
of their scenes together a whole lot. As always, Barrymore is radiant 
throughout, managing to develop a three-dimensional, likable character 
with an underwritten role. Wilson, who is actually the main character, 
is engaging and every match for Barrymore. Also lending support is 
O'Hara, who could have easily played one-note throughout, but chose 
instead to not just make her character a cliched villainess. Meanwhile, 
Shelley Duvall, as Sally's mother, was amusing, but not given enough 
screen time.
Unfortunately, for every good performance and delightful, well-written 
scene, there would be a large amount of off-the-wall material that did 
not work at all. It was as if two very different films had been 
forcefully molded into one. A climactic helicopter chase was annoying 
and failed to salvage my last remaining hope for the movie.
Perhaps my biggest overall problem with, "Home Fries," was that it felt 
as if it had been heavily edited prior to its release. When the end 
credits began to roll, I was surprised, since I was expecting at least 
another fifiteen minutes. The film felt rushed, and all of the 
relationship remained open-ended and unsolved. The character 
development, although I liked what they had of it, was also 
unsatisfactory. In the case of, "Home Fries," more would have most 
certainly been more.

Title
Review for Dude, Where's My Car? (2000)
Directed by Danny Leiner.
Cast: Ashton Kutcher, Seann William Scott, Marla Sokoloff, Jennifer Garner, 
Kristy Swanson.
2000 - 90 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for violence, profanity, drug use, and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, December 16, 2000.
Sort of a teenage version of "Dumb and Dumber," "Dude, Where's My Car?" is 
such a bad movie that it exhibits a sort of innocent charm. From the very 
first frame, the movie doesn't have any illusions that it's anything more 
than a self-proclaimed stupid comedy. Instantly forgettable and lacking 
anything resembling honest human emotions, the first half is so bright and 
silly that it gets your expectations up far too much. Its surprising success 
right from the get-go hurts the final product more than helps it, as its 
jokes quickly grows tiresome and repetitive, until the movie becomes almost 
unbearable in its final thirty minutes.
Jesse (Ashton Kutcher) and Chester (Seann William Scott) are stoner best 
friends who wake up one morning to find that their car has disappeared. Not 
remembering anything from the drug-induced night before other than that their 
car holds their anniversary gifts for their girlfriends, Wilma (Marla 
Sokoloff) and Wanda (Jennifer Garner), Jesse and Chester set out to retrace 
their steps. With everyone they run into, another piece of the puzzle is 
filled in, from the advances of their voluptuous dream girl Christie Boner 
(Kristy Swanson), to their apparent visit to a strip club, to a case they had 
gotten hold of carrying thousands of dollars in cash, to a feuding group of 
alien hunters and actual extraterrestrial "chicks."
I've said it once already, and I'll say it again. "Dude, Where's My Car?" is 
so unabashedly dumb that you can't help but be a little impressed by its own 
throwaway trashiness. Aside from the tedious third act, the movie falls into 
the category of a guilty pleasure--the type of bad movie you can have fun 
with, rather than the type that is just plain awful ("Battlefield Earth" 
comes instantly to mind).
Ashton Kutcher (TV's "That 70's Shows") and Seann William Scott (2000's "Road 
Trip"), like Bill and Ted before them, make an instantly delightful duo of 
doofuses who have little on their minds, and are having a hell of a time in 
the process. Kutcher, especially, stands out as having quite an enjoyable 
presence, and it's not difficult to see him making more substantial motion 
pictures in the future. Since Jesse and Chester fill up every frame, they 
leave little room for anyone else. Marla Sokoloff (2000's "Whatever It 
Takes") and Jennifer Garner (TV's "Felicity") are briefly on hand as their 
respective girlfriends, while the unfortunate Kristy Swanson (1999's "Big 
Daddy") has clearly fallen on hard times by taking such a wasted role.
There are a couple comic sequences that work extremely well--far more than 
they have any right to. An encounter with a pushy, stubborn worker at a 
Chinese drive-thru, and a dog that does nothing but smoke pot and lie around, 
are admittedly a riot, as is an unpredictable kiss between the two male leads 
that rivals the on-screen smooch between Trey Parker and Matt Stone in 1998's 
infinitely superior "BASEketball." All of these setpieces, however, appear by 
the 40-minute mark, and it is followed by a comic dead zone in the 
increasingly preposterous climax.
"Dude, Where's My Car?" is terrible as a film, yet passable entertainment as 
a movie. 13-to-16-year-olds will likely have the most fun, and one's 
tolerance for strictly juvenile humor will decide what other age frame might 
enjoy such fodder. Credit director Danny Leiner and screenwriter Philip Stark 
for one thing: they realize "Dude, Where's My Car?" is akin to a piece of 
fecal matter, and have a great time living up to such a low honor.
     - Copyright 2000 by Dustin Putman
       Http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman
       Reviews by Dustin Putman 

Title
Review for Virus (1999)
"Virus" is the type of cliched, vacuous film that has been recylcled so 
many times before that you wonder why anyone would even bother putting 
work into making it. Strangely enough, on the same mid-January weekend 
last year, another film was released like this, "Deep Rising," about an 
ugly monster on a cruise liner. Prior movies with the almost exact same 
storyline include 1989's "Leviathan," 1989's "Deep Star Six," and all 
four "Alien" pictures. "Virus," in comparison, is a servicable thriller, 
well-made and produced, but since it doesn't include one moment of even 
remote originality or intelligence, it sinks under the weight of the 
water that the film was shot on.
Based on a series of comic books, "Virus" concerns the crew of an ocean 
salvage tugboat, which becomes extremely damaged during a violent 
typhoon. After discovering that the boat is slowly sinking, (un)lucky 
for them, a huge ocean vessel that appears to be dead in the water turns 
up within the confines of their radar screen. Once the team reaches the 
Russian ship, they go on board to find that the place is seemingly 
deserted. After turning the power back on, however, there gradually are 
signs that something else is on the ship, and the electrical equipment 
is oddly working by itself. One survivor finally does turn up, Nadia 
(Joanna Pacula), who informs the suicidal and stern captain (Donald 
Sutherland) and one of the crew, Kit Foster (Jamie Lee Curtis), that a 
mysterious alien life form hit the Santi Mir space station which then 
was transported down to the ship, taking over the minds of all of the 
electrical machines and thinking that humans are viruses that should be 
completely wiped out.
If "Virus" sounds like all of the previously mentioned movies, you're 
correct. Although the technical artistry is fairly impressive to bring 
the mechanical creature to life, the film itself doesn't appear to have 
a brain in its head. The film sticks so close to the worn-out 
conventions of the "creature" genre that it is amazing anyone would 
spend the money and time filming it when they could be making an 
original film.
The actors are all very good and have all proven their acting abilities 
in the past, but they are sorely wasted here and do not really even have 
characters to play. In her second return to horror in the last year, 
Jamie Lee Curtis once again proves to be a strong and resourceful 
heroine, but that is about it. Although 1998's "Halloween: H20" was also 
a disappointment, at least she was given a few scenes to develop a 
character, unlike here. Donald Sutherland has fallen on hard times 
recently by starring in thoroughly disposable films, such as 1994's "The 
Puppet Masters," although I just watched him in the superb 1978 sci-fi 
classic "Invasion of the Body Snatchers," where he was fabulous. The 
last of the three top-billers is William Baldwin, but it is fairly hard 
to say if he is good or not in the picture, since he has nothing to do.
Basically, "Virus" is another one of those films where a group of people 
walk around and investigate a space ship/ocean liner/haunted house until 
the deadly and equally grotesque and slimy creature pops up and kills 
them one-by-one. It is not the worst of its type, but it is far from one 
of the best, and when exactly are studios going to give up recycling 
such shameless and overdone plot gimmicks such as this? As long as some 
of them keep making money, I suspect the answer is never.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Hollow Man (2000)
Directed by Paul Verhoeven.
Cast: Elisabeth Shue, Kevin Bacon, Josh Brolin, Kim Dickens, Greg Grunberg, 
Joey Slotnick, Mary Randle, William Devane.
2000 - 113 minutes
Rated R (for violence, gore, profanity, nudity, and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, August 5, 2000.
In an age when computers and visual effects are cinematically at the top of 
their games, it's curious that a film hasn't been made sooner about a 
psychotic invisible man. Sure, there was 1992's big-budget fiasco, "Memoirs 
of an Invisible Man," starring Chevy Chase, but that was a black comedy, 
rather than a thriller that truly delves into the mind of a slightly unhinged 
human subject who has decided to become invisible. The possibilities for what 
could be done with this idea are seemingly endless, and "Hollow Man," 
directed by hit-or-miss director Paul Verhoeven (1992's "Basic Instinct," 
1997's "Starship Troopers"), has taken advantage of this novel approach, 
offering up the type of state-of-the-art special effects that have never been 
seen on the big screen before. While problematic in more ways than one, the 
picture also holds the distinction of actually working as a spooky horror 
picture, albeit one that is particularly more gruesome and violent than most.
Slick hotshot Sebastian Caine (Kevin Bacon) is a self-titled genius, the head 
of an exclusive research team being financed by the Pentagon who has 
discovered the DNA formula with the ability to render animals invisible. 
Following experimentations that claim bringing the animals back to visibility 
are successful and relatively harmless, it is time for a human to become the 
next test subject, and Sebastian is determined to be that man.
Without authorization from the Pentagon and aided by fellow researchers Linda 
McKay (Elisabeth Shue), Sebastian's ex-lover; Linda's current flame, Matthew 
Kensington (Josh Brolin); veterinarian and animal specialist Sarah Kennedy 
(Kim Dickens); and assistants Carter Abbey (Greg Grunberg), Frank Chase (Joey 
Slotnick), and Janice Walton (Mary Randle), Sebastian injects himself with 
the invisibility serum, and although a rocky journey, the next quantum step 
works, leaving him exactly like the animals they had previously tested. 
When bringing Sebastian back proves to be more difficult than all involved 
had expected, leaving him temporarily trapped in a world where no one can see 
him, he gradually begins to grow stir-crazy stuck in the underground lab, and 
begins to realize that he now has the ability to do anything, criminal or 
not, and could get away with it. Not helping matters is the discovery that 
Linda, whom he hasn't gotten over yet, is romantically involved with Matthew.
For the opening hour, "Hollow Man" is almost exclusively a psychological 
drama, and it isn't until Sebastian finally snaps that the proceedings turn 
ghastly. Whereas the biggest chunk of the film deals with the provocative 
question, "What would you do if no one could see you?," and gains notable 
mileage out of such a thought-provoking notion, the movie finally switches 
gears and, by the final thirty minutes, has become a gory slasher movie, 
where the central figures are knocked off one at a time until only two 
characters remain to fight for their lives against the killer.
The sudden switch in genres and tones is cause for both disappointment and 
celebration. On one hand, by the time the climax has arrived, director 
Verhoeven and screenwriter Andrew W. Marlowe have abandoned the innovative 
psychological subject matter that had been brought up, instead aiming for 
shocks, scares, and bloody death scenes. Verhoeven and Marlowe both could 
have undoubtedly thought of a more intellectually sound way to conclude the 
story, something that would have followed through more closely to what had 
come before, but scientific accuracy apparently was not on their agenda. 
Relatedly, when the murders arrive, the basic story is more or less forgotten 
about, in place of an "Alien/Friday the 13th" clone.
Despite what it may sound like, becoming a basic slasher film isn't 
necessarily a negative thing, however. The final thirty minutes are easily 
the most entertaining and tautly paced, and manage to even be a little 
frightening, a trait that is rare these days. The ingenious twist on the 
stalk-and-slash motions it goes through is that the menace can only be seen 
while wearing special goggles, or when something touches him, like water or 
steam. One particular sequence, set inside an elevator shaft, is especially 
nerve-wracking, and stands as proof that Verhoeven is a true filmmaking 
craftsman. 
The visual effects in "Hollow Man," by Sony Pictures Imageworks Inc., are the 
true stars of the show, as they are rarely ever anything less than awesomely 
convincing. The process in which someone or something becomes invisible is 
superbly realized, as the skin is first stripped away, followed by the vital 
organs, and then the skeletal system. The computer-generated effects, which 
are another step forward in motion picture technology, makes everything that 
is happening believable, and therefore, more threatening.
Elisabeth Shue, who hasn't found much success following her Oscar-winning 
role in 1995's "Leaving Las Vegas," is effective and strong-willed as the 
heroine, a sort of Sigourney Weaver for the '00s. If any human actor steals 
the film away from the effects, it is Shue. Kevin Bacon, as Sebastian, is 
also very good, and easily has the most difficult role, as he must show 
emotions from only the sound of his voice (he is invisible for 3/4 of the 
movie). It is also nice to see the talented Josh Brolin (1998's "Nightwatch") 
here, as he is an almost constantly underrated thesp who deserves more 
recognition, and will hopefully get it with such a showy studio film here. 
Outstanding in a supporting part is Kim Dickens (1998's "Zero Effect"), who, 
with every appearance, is able to form a three-dimensional character, even 
when it isn't on the written page. Dickens is one of the most promising young 
actresses working today, and like Brolin, merits further exposure.
On the whole, "Hollow Man" stands as a tricky balancing act between deeper, 
existential ideas and a cliched monster movie. While Verhoeven's last film, 
"Starship Troopers" was merely dumb and overly campy, his "Hollow Man" plays 
things fairly straight, and it is a stronger film because of this. Because 
the characters are deadly serious throughout the horrific goings-on, the 
viewer grows all the more involved. "Hollow Man" could have possibly 
graduated to being a great, subtle thriller, but that isn't the movie 
Verhoeven made. Instead, what we have is a bloody, gripping, gruesome, 
big-budget, popcorn-munching horror movie--and it works. Scientific logic, be 
damned!

Title
Review for Crazy/Beautiful (2001)
Directed by John Stockwell.
Cast: Kirsten Dunst, Jay Hernandez, Bruce Davison, Taryn Manning, Lucinda 
Jenney, Rolando Molina.
2001 - 97 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity, sexual situations, and alcohol/substance abuse).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, June 30, 2001.
A sophisticated, gritty drama that is notably more grown-up than most 
so-called "teen" flicks, "crazy/beautiful," directed by John Stockwell, has a 
lot going for it, not the least of being Kirsten Dunst (2001's "Get Over 
It"), who is one of the most gifted young actresses of her generation. With 
every role, Dunst fully embodies her characters with a zeal that is as 
charismatic as it is believable. And to prove what a chameleon she can be, 
Dunst has played everything from an ageless vampire (1994's "Interview with 
the Vampire"), to an alluring early-20th century debutante (2000's "Lover's 
Prayer"), to a suicidal teenager (2000's "The Virgin Suicides"), to an overly 
giddy cheerleader (2000's "Bring It On").
Dunst now stars as Nicole Oakley, a rebellious 17-year-old who is apt to go 
on both drinking and substance abuse binges. Nicole, whose father, Tom (Bruce 
Davison), is a California congressman, plays by her own rules, and doesn't 
care what other people think of her. It is this trait of fearlessness that 
attracts "A"-student Carlos (newcomer Jay Hernandez), who must travel two 
hours each morning to attend an exclusive, private co-ed high school, to her. 
They soon begin a whirlwind romance, despite their cultural, financial, and 
personality differences, which isolates them from close parties on both 
sides. When Tom, who has the power to get him into the naval academy he has 
always dreamed of going to, tells him to stay away from the troubled Nicole 
before she brings him down with her, Carlos must ultimately decide how 
important true love is when it means possibly sacrificing his future plans.
As written by Phil Hay and Matt Manfredi, "crazy/beautiful" is a thoughtful, 
if minor, movie that is surrounded by good actors who make the most of their 
respective parts. Aside from Dunst's intimate, accurate portrayal of the 
problematic Nicole, Jay Hernandez amicably portrays Carlos as an intelligent 
young man with a bright future and an undeniable connection with Nicole. His 
is a face to definitely watch in the future. Also breaking the cliche of 
being a one-dimensional parent figure, Bruce Davison (2000's "X-Men") turns 
Tom Oakley into a conflicted man with a daughter whom he unconditionally 
loves, but doesn't know how to help. Lucinda Jenney (2000's "Remember the 
Titans"), on the other hand, is stuck playing Nicole's bitchy, whiny 
stepmother whose welcome wears thin real fast. Jenney offers no help in 
giving her any deeper character shades.
Where "crazy/beautiful" goes wrong is in its unmistakable similarities to 
1995's superior "Mad Love," in which good kid Chris O'Donnell fell for 
mentally ill wild child Drew Barrymore. Not only are full scenes and plot 
developments lifted directly from "Mad Love," but Dunst's spacious glass-clad 
home is even a dead ringer for Barrymore's, complete with a Mexican 
housekeeper. The likeness doesn't stop there; even the very ending is the 
same, with the movie concluding with a brief narration from Dunst that is 
just like Barrymore's. There is a difference between two films sharing a 
resemblance, and downright infringement. Whatever the case may be, the film 
lacks urgency and any original insight into its characters because it felt 
like it had been made just a few years before. 
What must be applauded, however, is its treatment of Nicole, whose behavior 
bordering on alcoholism is accurate and palpable. It's a testament to 
director Stockwell's expertise that he is able to convey so much, while not 
once showing Nicole actually taking a drink. With such a hard-edged 
character, the cutting of material to get a PG-13 rating could have very well 
spelled disaster, but it ends up not affecting the outcome as much as 
expected.
I'd like to say that "crazy/beautiful" is a motion picture worth seeing, but 
it isn't. There is so much that is good it's almost a shame to have to 
chastise it for its cliched storyline. Unfortunately, it is that very problem 
that turns what could have been a sharp, intuitive look at teenage love into 
a movie that has "been there/done that" written all over it.
  - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
    http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman

Title
Review for Baby Boy (2001)
Directed by John Singleton.
Cast: Tyrese Gibson, A.J. Johnson, Taraji P. Henson, Ving Rhames, Omar 
Gooding, Snoop Dogg, Tamara LaSeon Bass.
2001 - 128 minutes
Rated R (for sex, nudity, violence, and profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, June 27, 2001.
In a film that is far closer to his roots in filmmaking than 2000's 
big-budget remake of "Shaft," John Singleton's "Baby Boy" is a low-key, often 
astute, drama. Described as a companion piece to his masterful debut film, 
1991's "Boyz N the Hood," the picture is considerably less violent and bleak, 
but is still set in a world (to be exact, a troubled, crime-ridden Southern 
California neighborhood) in which its residents can never be too sure if 
their lives are going to work out as planned, or even if they're going to 
survive to see tomorrow.
A film about growing up and taking responsibility for your actions and 
relationships, R&B singer Tyrese Gibson stars as Jody, a 20-year-old "boy" 
who has fathered two children from two separate women (one of which he is in 
love with), but remains at home living with his lonely 36-year-old mother, 
Juanita (A.J. Johnson). Juanita loves Jody, but feels that he should "leave 
the nest" and accept becoming an independent man, just as she wants to move 
on with her own life. Meanwhile, Jody's long-time, long-suffering girlfriend, 
Yvette (Taraji P. Henson), is beginning to feel like she isn't being 
appreciated in the relationship as she should be, and suspects that he has 
been sleeping around. Sure, they love one another, but is love really enough 
when your significant other almost outwardly cheats behind your back? 
John Singleton, whose career has been quite varied ("Boyz N the Hood" and 
1995's "Higher Learning" were powerful statements on society, while 1993's 
"Poetic Justice" and 1997's "Rosewood" were ambitious blunders), has made a 
serious-minded, ardent motion picture with "Baby Boy," although it fails to 
succeed in quite the same way that his greatest achievements have. For one, 
Singleton, who also penned the screenplay, too often goes for 
over-exaggeration when dealing with his characters' mannerisms, and the path 
that the movie follows is an admittedly cliched one. While it may be truthful 
up to a point, the actors are instructed to yell their lines in certain 
scenes, rather than just speak them in a normal tone, as if to be black you 
have to have a nasty temper and be sassy. While this aspect of the 
characters' interaction is unnecessary, it thankfully does not takes up the 
majority of the running time.
For much of the 128-minute running time, "Baby Boy" is an involving romantic 
drama that treats its participants with respect and understanding, never 
fully condemning them for their mistakes. Jody, played maturely by Tyrese 
Gibson in his first film role, is a likable, sympathetic young man, even when 
he makes mistakes and isn't always faithful to Yvette. In one of the movie's 
most powerful moments, following Yvette's discovery that he has been with 
many different women, Jody earnestly explains that he hasn't been honest with 
her because he actually does love her and didn't want to hurt her feelings. 
The same goes for Jody's mother, Juanita, who begins to see, and subsequently 
falls in love with, a man named Melvin (Ving Rhames), who is a reformed 
gangster. Juanita's last twenty years have all been dedicated to Jody, and 
now that he is an adult, she simply wants to move on and enjoy her own life, 
for once. A.J. Johnson (1994's "The Inkwell") gives a powerful performance as 
a woman who loves her son unconditionally, but wants, and needs, to let him 
go. As for Ving Rhames (2000's "Mission: Impossible 2"), his 
sure-to-be-remembered frog-hopping sex scene has got to be seen to be 
believed.
Newcomer Taraji P. Henson has the most interesting and finely-tuned role, as 
Yvette, and runs away with the entire film. Henson is a lovely fresh face 
whose performance is both perceptive and touching, and Yvette is written with 
an intelligent delicacy that makes you instantly care about what happens to 
her. It's the trickiest role, too, as a young mother who is trying to make a 
good life for her and her son, and would love to include Jody in it if only 
he could show her some commitment. 
The plot takes a wrong turn with the appearance of Yvette's criminal 
ex-boyfriend, Rodney (Snoop Dogg), who is released from jail and promptly 
takes over Yvette's apartment. Not sure how to get him out, and scared of his 
dangerous streak, the film culminates in a false-alarm drive-by shooting that 
later turns to real violence. While what takes place is captivating, and even 
effective in the issues it raises, the appearance of guns in the final act of 
an otherwise non-violent motion picture was a bit of a letdown. Snoop Dogg, 
who is fine with what he has been given, is equipped with a character who is 
portrayed as less of a person, and more of an obnoxious story device. 
Luckily, once he is out of the picture, the film concludes with several 
extremely well-written passages that wrap up the film in a hopeful, 
satisfying manner.
"Baby Boy" is not a great movie, and lacks the overall realism and intensity 
of "Boyz N the Hood," but it is a good one. The engaging performances, mixed 
with its keen observations on love and maturation, are worth seeing, even if, 
in order to get to them, you must walk down a road that has been covered many 
times before. It is clear that when he set out to make "Baby Boy," John 
Singleton's heart was in the right place.
   - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
     http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman
* COMING SOON - The grand opening of my new movie review site, 
themovieboy.com! *

Title
Review for Little Boy Blue (1998)
Directed by Antonio Tibaldi.
Cast: Ryan Phillippe, John Savage, Natassja Kinski, Tyrin Turner, Jenny 
Lewis, Adam Burke, Devon Michael, Shirley Knight.
1998 - 104 minutes.
Rated R (for violence, profanity, nudity, and sex).
Reviewed December 6, 1998.
"Little Boy Blue," is like one of those old southern gothic mysteries 
from the '50's, where the characters are shrouded in uncertainty, where 
the plot twists come at a rapid pace, but where the story is pretty 
juvenile and silly, except to the people unlucky enough to be in the 
film. This type of film can sometimes be done well (1997's "The 
Locusts"), but without a director and screenwriter that have a firm grip 
on the material, it can turn out disasterously, and that is what 
plagues, "Little Boy Blue."
Just the synopsis of the film threatens to sound ridiculous, but bear 
with me. A teenager just out of high school, Jimmy West (Ryan Phillippe) 
plans to leave his bleak existence in a small Texas town to go off to 
college with his girlfriend of two years, Traci (Jenny Lewis). He 
decides to stay, however, because he is worried about his younger 
brothers (Adam Burke and Devon Michael) and his mother, Kate (Natassja 
Kinski), who works at a bar and is often bullied by his insensitive, 
gruff father, Ray (John Savage). This family, we can tell right from the 
start, is dysfunctional, to say the least. In an early scene, Ray forces 
Kate and Jimmy to have rough sex in the back of his car, which, we 
sense, is a regular occurrence at the West residence. The plot thickens 
when Jimmy begins to suspect that his parents have been hiding things 
from him after he discovers that his father lost his member in Vietnam. 
But if this is so, then how could he and his brother have ever been 
born?
"Little Boy Blue," is so muddled and frustrating in its storytelling 
that I felt like giving up on the film halfway through. I stuck through 
it, however, hoping for some sort of change. Maybe there would be some 
insight on the paper-thin characters, or maybe there would actually be a 
plot thread that had a purpose other than to surrender to the 
conventions of the story. No such luck. 
Instead, what we have here, is a movie that would certainly have felt 
more at home in the 1950's, but that probably still wouldn't work, 
because any way you look at it, it is simply not good. The story jerks 
around all over the place, never stopping long enough so that we can 
grow to care about anyone. Aside from the mystery of the father, Ray, 
the film also includes a mysterious disappearance; a catfish that I 
think is symbolic, but don't ask me about what; murder; revenge; and an 
older woman (Shirley Knight) that enters into the picture late, who, 
before the end, is toting a rifle and blowing away everyone in sight.
"Little Boy Blue," is an independent film that had been floating around 
at film festivals prior to its limited theatrical release this Spring. I 
suspect it took a while to obtain a distributor, and no wonder. It is a 
goofy little thriller with no real purpose of being made, nor any 
obvious talent in the filmmaking department. The pacing is very, very 
slow, and when things picked up, I didn't believe it for a second.
The actors in the film are good, for the most part, but have very little 
to do. Ryan Phillippe, in the title role, has proven that he can be good 
("54"), but nothing happens to test his acting skills. John Savage plays 
the token "bad guy," and adds no depth to his character. The female 
performers fare a little better, but are also plagued with empty-headed 
characters. Natassja Kinski attempts to add some life to her incestuous 
mother character, and Jenny Lewis shows some promise as Phillippe's 
long-suffering girlfriend. 
"Little Boy Blue," does not work as a thriller, as a "slice-of-life" 
drama, as a mystery, or as an old-fashioned 50's movie. The workings of 
the far-fetched plot constantly creak with amateurishness. The actors 
obviously fight diligently to add some spark to the proceedings, but, 
unfortunately, the film itself collapses down around them, and the 
audience is left with 104 minutes of nothing.

Title
Review for House on Sorority Row, The (1983)
Directed by Mark Rosman.
Cast: Kathryn McNeil, Eileen Davidson, Lois Kelso Hunt, Harley Kozak, 
Christopher Lawrence, Charles Serio.
1982 - 92 minutes
Not Rated (equivalent of an R for extreme violence, gore, profanity, a sex 
scene, and nudity).
Reviewed June 18, 1999. 
+ The following is the first capsule review of my internet career. From now 
on, if I see a movie that doesn't warrant a full-length review for a myriad 
of reasons, then I will write a capsule one.
Director Mark Rosman's "The House on Sorority Row" is a stylishly-filmed, 
slightly above-average slasher film that nonetheless has the characters 
mindlessly going off alone in the dark for the simple reason of being 
slaughtered. The story focuses on a group of sorority sisters who have just 
graduated from college, but before they go are planning to throw a party. To 
get back at their sorority headmaster, an older woman (Lois Kelso Hunt) who 
gave birth to a deformed child twenty years before, they plan to play a 
little prank on her, only to see it backfire when they accidentally shoot her 
for real. After disposing of the body in the school's decrepit swimming pool, 
their party must go on. Only problem is, the body soon disappears from the 
water, and the girls start dropping off like flies. You know where the story 
is going every second of the way, and you find yourself yelling at the 
characters on-screen for doing idiotic things in the most dire of 
circumstances. Rosman, you're a polished director with a lot of promise, but 
give the viewer a little credit, why don't you!
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Thirteenth Floor, The (1999)
Even before filmmaker Josef Rusnak's new sci-fi picture, "The Thirteenth 
Floor," had been released, people were already comparing it to such 
recent films as "The Matrix," "Dark City," and "eXistenZ," but this 
comparison actually holds no water and is only related in a superficial 
way. Although "The Thirteenth Floor" has acquired a similar storyline 
concerning alternate realities and virtual technology, the style in 
which the subject matter is approached relies more on '30s film noir 
than action or fantasy (even though it has a little bit of both). If 
anything, the film reminded me of 1994's Jean-Claude Van Damme pic, 
"Timecop," if you can believe that.
Hannon Fuller (Armin Mueller-Stahl), a groundbreaking computer designer 
and leader of a corporate tower, has invented a virtual reality system 
that stands as a realistic simulation of Los Angeles, circa 1937. It 
seems Fuller has been "jacking in" quite a lot lately, and found himself 
a hunted man in both worlds, the simulation and 1999. Before he is 
killed, however, he leaves a note with a bartender in 1937 to be given 
to his close confidante and computer researcher, Douglas Hall (Craig 
Bierko). When much of the murder evidence ominously points toward 
Douglas, he decides to go back to the simulated '30s in hopes of finding 
out why Fuller was killed, and if he really did do it. Meanwhile, a 
mysterious, fetching young woman, Jane (Gretchen Mol), claims to be 
Fuller's daughter, and immediately grows an attraction with Douglas, 
both of whom are struck with an odd sense of deja vu that they've met 
before.
Sony, the studio behind "The Thirteenth Floor" (which is based upon the 
Daniel F. Galouye novel, "Simulacron 3"), probably couldn't have chosen 
a more inopportune time to be releasing this film. The summer of big 
blockbusters has just begun to gear up in recent weeks, and this film is 
a deliberately-paced, rather un-mainstream movie without a "name" actor 
in the whole cast. Not only that, but "The Matrix" is still playing in 
most theaters, and the television spots for "The Thirteenth Floor" have 
probably been too similar to picque sci-fi fans' interest. Perhaps an 
early-spring berth would have been a more intelligent release time 
because, as is, the film has next to no chance at being a box-office 
success.
So, regardless of money, how is the actual film? Well, after a rocky 
opening twenty minutes that never really grasped ahold of my interest, 
the movie gradually got more and more involving and intriguing until I 
actually began to enjoy it midway through. The idea of alternate 
realities is not a new one, but it almost always seems fresh here, most 
likely because it doesn't follow the usual genre bandwagon and go for 
non-stop action, explosions, and special effects. There is an actual 
brain working within "The Thirteen Floor," and while this is always 
apparent, the film ultimately fails to take off in time to fully save 
itself. By the end, there are still many noticable plot holes that 
certainly needed to be worked out, but maybe I should just be thankful 
that it was at least comprehensible, as opposed to the overblown, 
overplotted, overrated "The Matrix."
The cast is good for what they're worth, but no one ever really comes 
off as fully developed and three-dimensional. Craig Bierko is an 
unfamiliar face who has what it takes to act as the protagonist, but I 
never really grew to care about his fate. The same goes for Vincent 
D'Onofrio, as Douglas' buddy in the present and a bartender in the 
simulation world. Armin Mueller-Stahl is thoroughly wasted as Fuller, 
the vital chaacter who sets the plot into motion, but all but disappears 
afterwards. And finally, we come to Gretchen Mol, a luminous young 
actress whom has occasionally, and unfairly, been criticized for her 
questionable acting talents. What "those" people fail to understand, 
however, is that Mol does have range, but her full abilities have not 
been put to the cinematic test yet, since most of her roles thus far 
have been relatively small. Mol is the one strong link in "The 
Thirteenth Floor," and in several scene, particularly one set at a 
grocery store, she manages to not strike one false note.
By the time "The Thirteenth Floor" had reached its climax, I was far 
more engrossed in the goings-on than I was in the first hour, but the 
film still came off as nothing more than a valiant failure. The 
screenplay, by Josef Rusnak and Ravel Centeno-Rodriguez, brings up many 
thought-provoking questions and unpredictable twists, but the dialogue 
and characters needed another re-write. "The Thirteenth Floor" is one 
case in which individual moments and ideas come off as far more 
powerful, and memorable, than the overall whole.
   - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
     Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Bounce (2000)
Directed by Don Roos.
Cast: Ben Affleck, Gwyneth Paltrow, Johnny Galecki, Caroline Aaron, Joe 
Morton, Natasha Henstridge, Tony Goldwyn, Jennifer Grey, Alex D. Linz, David 
Paymer.
2000 - 106 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for sexual situations and profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, November 18, 2000.
Director Don Roos' 1998 debut "The Opposite of Sex" was such an acid-tongued, 
wittily-scripted black comedy that there was no doubt in my mind his 
sophomore effort, whatever it may be, would be anything less than smart and 
confidently made. "Bounce" fulfills both of these things and goes a step 
forward to, as in "The Opposite of Sex," find the poignancy and truth that is 
required in any intimate relationship. Aided by a memorable supporting cast, 
and two couldn't-be-better performances from the film's leads, Gwyneth 
Paltrow and Ben Affleck, "Bounce" is the sort of romance that doesn't come 
around too often--intelligent without being saccharine, heartfelt without 
being condescending.
With the snow heavily falling outside, almost all planes have been canceled 
at Chicago's O'Hare Airport. Passing the time in an airport bar, advertising 
executive Buddy Amaral (Ben Affleck), headed for his home in Los Angeles, has 
met up with the beautiful Mimi (Natasha Henstridge), going to Dallas, and 
kind businessman Greg (Tony Goldwyn) who desperately wants to get home to his 
wife and children. When Mimi makes it clear that she would like Buddy to 
spend the night with her, he gives his ticket to Greg (who is also headed for 
LA, but on a later flight), and slyly convinces the flight attendant at the 
door (Jennifer Grey), who has an on-again-off-again crush on buddy, to do so. 
When the plane crashes, killing everyone on board, Buddy (1) can't believe he 
was going to be on that flight, and (2) crushed that he more or less sent 
this family man off to die while he could have yet another one-night-stand.
Switch forward one year, Buddy is now a newly recovered alcoholic who has 
just checked out of the local Drug and Alcohol Recovery Center and is eager 
to get back to work. In an effort to come to terms with his insecurities and 
make amends, Buddy tracks down Greg's wife, real estate agent Abby Janello 
(Gwyneth Paltrow), and attempts to give her a big sale on a patch of property 
his ad company wants to buy. With Abby, at first, telling Buddy that she is 
merely divorced, and without Buddy having the guts to disclose his true 
identity with her, they unexpectedly click and begin to fall for one another.
In lesser hands, "Bounce" would be a romantic drama that is predictable and 
obvious every step of the way, offering nothing new in the way of plot 
developments or character motivation. But unlike so many movie romances, 
"Bounce," scripted by Roos, is based in the scary world of reality, where not 
everything always turns out as you'd expect, and where the characters seem to 
be real people, rather than pawns whose only purpose is to fall in love with 
a mawkish love ballad overscoring each scene. Its expertise in depicting 
everyday life while setting up an affecting romance is impressive and all too 
rare in movies nowadays.
Reminiscent in many ways with 1999's Harrison Ford-Kristin Scott Thomas drama 
"Random Hearts," which had virtually the same setup, "Bounce" is infinitely 
more successful because it isn't afraid to show its heart, while "Random 
Hearts," ironically, was cold and emotionally unfeeling. Buddy and Abby are 
both flawed, yet sympathetic people whom we care about and hope get together, 
despite the sticky situation they are in. 
Since his Oscar win for 1997's "Good Will Hunting," Ben Affleck has 
skyrocketed to the top of the Hollywood A-list, but in doing so, has chosen 
far too many duds and not enough financial successes. Either appearing in 
brainless thrillers like 2000's "Reindeer Games" or trashy blockbusters like 
1998's "Armageddon," Affleck has finally returned to the type of emotionally 
centered motion picture he exceeds in.  Affleck may have the build to be an 
action star, but his sweet-natured features and puppy dog eyes make him far 
more qualified for character roles that exploit his acting talent, rather 
than muscles.  Here, he has a tough assignment--someone that has made many 
mistakes in his past and a nasty bout with alcoholism, but is struggling 
every day to put his life back together and be the best that he can be. This 
is arguably Affleck's most powerful and distinguished work, to date.
His match in every way, Gwyneth Paltrow (1999's "The Talented Mr. Ripley") 
has proven herself time and time again that she is an extraordinary talent 
who has a string of successful films and a Best Actress Oscar statuette (for 
1998's "Shakespeare in Love") to show for it. Fearless in her portrayal of an 
average, working-class mother with two young children, Paltrow is fearless in 
the way she downplays her physical beauty here, and in doing so, is all the 
more radiant. Every performance choice that Affleck and Paltrow make--every 
facial expression and line-reading--rings with a resounding honesty that is 
inordinately refreshing to hear.
Roos' strongest asset, however, lies in the sharp dialogue he pens. Every 
word counts, and in making what the people say so memorable, has created 
quite a few good supporting roles, helped along by strong performances from 
the rest of its cast. With just a few scenes each, such top-flight actors as 
Natasha Henstridge (2000's "The Whole Nine Yards"), Tony Goldwyn (1990's 
"Ghost"), and Jennifer Grey (1987's "Dirty Dancing") make a lasting 
impression that stays with you throughout. Of special notice is Johnny 
Galecki (who appeared in Roos' "The Opposite of Sex"), as Buddy's confidante 
and gay assistant, who is so understated and effective that I would love to 
have seen a whole movie made about his immensely likable and naturalistic 
character.
Quietly emphatic, "Bounce" is never exactly earthshaking, but exactly the 
type of motion picture that will have its work cut out for it if it plans on 
making money. With so many expensive holiday movies being released now, a 
low-key drama about real people in real relationships is something that not 
many people will be attracted to, which is a shame. On its side are the 
wonderful turns by Ben Affleck and Gwyneth Paltrow, who have enough chemistry 
to light up the darkness in a giant movie theater. "Bounce" is a truly 
worthwhile and appealing entertainment that is certainly worth a look, and 
reestablishes what a fine filmmaker director Don Roos is becoming.
     - Copyright 2000 by Dustin Putman
       Http://www.atnzone.com
       Http://www.young-hollywood.com
       Reviews by Dustin 
Putman - Http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman

Title
Review for Drowning Mona (2000)
Directed by Nick Gomez.
Cast: Danny DeVito, Neve Campbell, Casey Affleck, Jamie Lee Curtis, William 
Fichtner, Marcus Thomas, Bette Midler, Peter Dobson, Kathleen Wilhoite, Will 
Ferrell, Tracey Walter.
2000 - 91 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for mild violence and profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, March 4, 2000.
Nick Gomez's "Drowning Mona" displays an ensemble of interesting and 
inventive characters in search of a sharper, more focused screenplay than the 
one they have been given. Hand it to the bright, exciting cast for giving it 
their all (and they are all obviously having a blast with their roles), but 
the script, by Peter Steinfeld, aimlessly wanders around between them, not 
knowing where it is going, and resting its rooting interest on the tepid 
whodunit plotline.
Mona Dearly (Bette Midler) is the most despised wench living in the small 
white trash town of Verplanck, New York, which was the testing site years ago 
for the Yugo car company. When she is unable to put on her brakes and flies 
right over the cliff and into a watery grave in the opening scene, suspicions 
are aroused by Chief Wyatt Rash (Danny DeVito) when he learns the brake lines 
had been intentionally cut. Soon, everyone even remotely related to the 
maniacal Mona is a suspect, including her husband Phil (William Fichtner) and 
her son Jeff (Marcus Thomas), both of which hated her as much as everyone 
else. Jeff is landscaping partners with Bobby Calzone (Casey Affleck), who 
was consistently verbally and even physically battered by Mona, and he is 
about to marry the pretty, tough-spoken Ellen (Neve Campbell). Having an 
affair with both Phil and Jeff is Rona (Jamie Lee Curtis), the 
straightforward waitress at the local diner, who also may or may not have 
killed Mona because she wanted Mona's family to herself.
At just 91 minutes, "Drowning Mona" feels drug out, and one of the reasons 
for this is that the film always seems like it is finally going to take off 
with its story, and in the interactions of the Verplanck inhabitants, but it 
never truly does. Occasionally, there will be a spark of wit and originality, 
as when Rona and Phil, meeting at their usual hotel room for a tryst, use the 
"Wheel of Fortune" game as foreplay. But more often than not, the humor just 
isn't edgy enough to work the way it should, and at least one of the 
detractors of this is its bothersome PG-13 rating when it very well could 
have been R, and probably a whole lot funnier. That isn't to say the film has 
no laughs; one scene, in particular, drove me to tears, and I missed the 
whole next scene because I couldn't get over the previous one. Too bad the 
laughs are relatively few and far between.
Advertised as one of the major stars of the picture, Bette Midler actually 
only pops up sporadically, and even then it is only for a minute or two each 
time, via flashbacks that are supposed to present her as this evil woman, but 
fails. Sure, she has a hot temper, but she doesn't seem all that bad, and in 
the one good flashback sequence Midler is given, Mona loses at a 
knife-throwing contest and expresses her frustration for not ever being a 
winner at anything in her life. Otherwise, Midler is sorely underused, but at 
least better than she was in the recent stinker, "Isn't She Great."
Of the rest of the cast, only Danny DeVito is disappointing, not because of 
his performance, but because his character is the one that gets very few 
funny things to say. The high points are most certainly Neve Campbell, who is 
shaping up to be a promising major talent in Hollywood, if only she starts to 
choose her projects a little more wisely (her upcoming Sundance hit, "Panic," 
co-starring William H. Macy, is a good start), and especially Jamie Lee 
Curtis, who it is nice to see again after not appearing in a feature film in 
over a year. Curtis joyously gets right into her character, and the film 
always gains the most mileage out of her appearances. And Will Ferrell, as a 
balding mortician with a taste for taking kinky pictures of scantily clad 
women in his backroom, demonstrates his sheer comic timing to his few scenes.
Undoubtedly made on a limited budget, the cinematography, by Bruce Douglas 
Johnson, is particularly flat for a wide-release motion picture, and after 
seeing his 1997 misfire, "Illtown," and now the superior, but still not very 
good "Drowning Mona," it is safe to say director Gomez is never going to be 
winning any Oscars. Relying on the performances alone, try as they might, 
they simply cannot withhold the weight of the film all by themselves. 
"Drowning Mona" has promise, and it has occasional flare, but for the most 
part, it is a string of missed opportunities.

Title
Review for Gone in Sixty Seconds (2000)
Directed by Dominic Sena.
Cast: Nicolas Cage, Giovanni Ribisi, Delroy Lindo, Angelina Jolie, Robert 
Duvall, Timothy Olyphant, Christopher Eccleston, Will Patton, Chi McBride, 
James Duval, Scott Caan, William Lee Scott, Vinnie Jones, Grace Zabriskie, 
Frances Fisher.
2000 - 119 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for violence, profanity, and sexual innuendo).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, June 10, 2000.
Have you ever been driving on an empty, open road and had the sudden urge to 
put the pedal to the metal, not just to see how fast you could go, but for 
the pure adrenaline rush? Driving far past the speed limit may be illegal, 
and potentially dangerous, but that risk just aids in the sense of freedom 
you unavoidably obtain. Dominic Sena's "Gone in 60 Seconds," based on a cult 
1974 film of the same name (famous for a showstopping 40-minute car chase 
sequence), is the latest brain(less)child of producer Jerry Bruckheimer 
(1997's "Con Air," 1998's "Armageddon")--someone who knows how to make a 
movie fast-paced, and how to orchestrate overblown action setpieces--and it 
should have been the film to reinforce the idea of letting go of your 
inhibitions and driving fast every now and again. Walking out of the theater, 
director Sena (in his feature film debut after making many flashy television 
commercials) and Bruckheimer, no doubt, want the audience to get such an 
urge, but they fail miserably, even on the elementary level of creating 
excitement.
For six years, Memphis Raines (Nicolas Cage) has been retired from his former 
car thief business, and has taken up a job as a kiddie Go-Kart operator 
somewhere in the Nevada desert. When he receives word that his younger 
brother, Kip (Giovanni Ribisi), has since picked up the trade and landed 
himself in hot water with crime boss Raymond Calitri (Christopher Eccleston), 
Memphis flees back to San Francisco to save him. Raymond gives Memphis an 
ultimatum: steal fifty assigned cars in four days, or Kip has to pay the 
consequences. Predictably, a ragtag group of reformed car thieves and Kip's 
friends are assembled to help Memphis in his quest, none of which have more 
than one or two defining characteristics. He is also reunited with his 
dreadlocked ex-lover, Sway (Angelina Jolie), who looks as if she just 
returned from her "Battlefield Earth" audition. Meanwhile, two detectives 
(Delroy Lindo, Timothy Olyphant) are hot on Memphis' trail.
Several months ago, when the trailer for "Gone in 60 Seconds" began 
advertising, one woman behind me in the theater, following the preview, 
exclaimed, "I'm exhausted just watching that!" To be sure, the film looked as 
if it was sure to be a balls-to-the-wall, no-holds-barred summer action 
picture. The aforementioned lady in the theater needn't have fretted about 
the aspects of possibly seeing "Gone in 60 Seconds," because the trailer is 
infinitely more thrilling than the actual movie, which has all of about two 
or three action scenes strung out over the course of two hours, with 
nonsensical, time-filling rubbish in between. In pure Jerry Bruckheimer 
fashion, character-building moments mean 30-second dialogue exchanges 
overpopulated with corny one-liners. In pure Jerry Bruckheimer fashion, every 
shot has been given a yellowish tint by cinematographer Paul Cameron, as if a 
filter has been strategically placed over the camera to portray the world as 
naturally looking like a golden palace.
However, what is not in pure Jerry Bruckheimer fashion is the film's slow 
pace and wearisomely dull action scenes--all two or three of them.
Nicolas Cage can be--no, strike that--is a brilliant actor, so why he 
continues to make great films (i.e. 1995's "Leaving Las Vegas," 1999's 
"Bringing Out the Dead"), followed by insipid ones (1997's "Con Air," 1998's 
"Snake Eyes"), is a question only he could be able to answer. His talent is 
genuine, and his face has a wonderful, soulful quality that allows him to 
"say" a great deal when given the chance. Life is too short to be wasting his 
time in throwaway roles that give him nothing to do, except cash a fat 
paycheck.
The top-to-bottom talent that "Gone in 60 Seconds" exudes is amazing all the 
same, none of which have any reason at all to appear here. Fresh off her 
Academy Award winning performance in "Girl, Interrupted," Angelina Jolie is 
second-billed, but appears for all of about fifteen minutes (if that) in an 
underutilized role that not only wastes her, but causes you to almost forget 
how good she can be in other movies. As the snappily-named Sway, Jolie 
sleepwalks through her fleeting scenes as if she is attempting to blend into 
the background and not be discovered as an actual performer involved in such 
a bottomless pit. 
As younger brother Kip, Giovanni Ribisi is appropriately scummy-looking and 
slimy, but one wonders why Memphis would go through so much trouble to save 
such an ungrateful prick. Until checking over the cast list following viewing 
the movie, I had almost forgotten Robert Duvall was in it, which gives you an 
idea of how much of an impression he makes. Especially distressing are the 
young rising stars that appear for very little rhyme or reason, including 
James Duval (1995's "The Doom Generation"), Scott Caan (1999's "Boiler 
Room"), and Timothy Olyphant (1999's "Go"). The only actor that escapes 
relatively unscathed is Delroy Lindo, as Detective Roland Castlebeck, who 
brings a certain charm and, dare I say, depth to his scenes that are missing 
elsewhere.
The opening 100 minutes are nothing more than setup for the climactic car 
chase, but instead of breathtakingly going down as one of the classic chase 
sequences, along with 1971's "The French Connection" and 1998's "Ronin", Sena 
botches everything by haphazard editing that robotically switches back and 
forth between the pedal, Cage's face, and an overview shot of the car. But, 
considering the disposability of what came before, it should have been 
expected. The underwhelming finale simply proved what I had increasingly been 
realizing throughout, which is that there was no reason for "Gone in 60 
Seconds" to be made at all.

Title
Review for Green Mile, The (1999)
Directed by Frank Darabont.
Cast: Tom Hanks, Michael Clarke Duncan, Doug Hutchison, David Morse, Michael 
Jeter, Bonnie Hunt, James Cromwell, Sam Rockwell, Barry Pepper, Dabbs Greer, 
Eve Brent, Graham Greene, Harry Dean Stanton, Patricia Clarkson, Jeffrey 
DeMunn.
1999 - 182 minutes
Rated R (for profanity, violence, and graphic depictions of electrocutions).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, December 11, 1999.
Expectations have been running so high for Frank Darabont's adaptation of the 
Stephen King serial novel, "The Green Mile," that many film industrialites 
prematurely labeled it "The Best Film of 1999," even before it was finished 
filming. 'Premature' is the correct adjective because, while "The Green Mile" 
is a very fine, intimately made drama on its own, it does not come close to 
standing up to its lofty presumptions. This is not a criticism of the film 
itself, but simply a negative observation about how hype is more often than 
not highly unnecessary, and ends up doing more damage than good.
Aside from the 3-hour-plus running time, "The Green Mile" occasionally bears 
a slight resemblance to 1997's "Titanic," particularly in the wraparound 
story in which we meet a very old man named Paul Edgecomb (Dabbs Greer), who 
lives at a nursing home and breaks down crying one afternoon when he happens 
to see Fred Astaire singing "Cheek to Cheek" in an old movie. When confidante 
Elaine (a fabulous Eve Brent) shows her concern and goes to see what is the 
matter, Paul decides to tell her a story that took place sixty years before, 
and that he has never discussed until now.
Switch back to the year of 1935 in Louisiana, a much-younger Paul (Tom Hanks) 
works as a prison guard at the Cold Mountain Penitentiary, where the 
convicted criminals on death row are sent. Currently suffering a painful 
bladder infection, but with a lovely, supportive wife (Bonnie Hunt), Paul's 
whole perspective on life gradually changes with the appearance of John 
Coffey (Michael Clarke Duncan), a 7-foot-tall, 350-LB. black man who has been 
convicted of raping and murdering two young girls. Like a giant kid himself, 
John instantly does not seem like the type who would hurt a fly, as he even 
requests that the lights stay on at night, "'cuz I'm scared of the dark."
Other inmates are met and also focused on, including Arlen Bitterbuck (Graham 
Greene), a highly spiritual Native American; William "Wild Bill" Wharton (Sam 
Rockwell), a psychopath as crazy as a crap-house rat; and Eduard "Del" 
Delacroix (Michael Jeter), a kindhearted man who befriends Mr. Jingles, a 
mouse that roams The Green Mile, called that because the floors are painted 
green as they lead the inmates to their executions. Complicating matters is 
the arrival of a new, young prison guard hotshot named Percy (Doug 
Hutchison), a truly despicable human being who gets his kicks out of 
humiliating and deliberately hurting others. As time passes, we watch as some 
of the inmates are taken to their deaths, people that we have grown to care 
about, and all the while Paul grows a close friendship with John Coffey, who, 
through supernatural plot developments that will not be divulged here, he 
becomes convinced is innocent of the crimes which will inevitably send him to 
his wrongful execution.
Frank Darabont, whose previous film was the similar Stephen King-adapted "The 
Shawshank Redemption," has returned back to the setting of a prison for the 
second time in a row, and it cannot be denied that he has a definite flare 
for this sort of storyline. While "The Shawshank Redemption" was that rare 
case in which it bombed in movie theaters, but gained an overwhelmingly 
positive following on video, I was not one of its strongest supporters. At 
close to 2 1/2 hours, the picture was an effective, but severely flawed drama 
that had (to me) several long, dry stretches in the middle that could have 
easily been cut out. In comparison, "The Green Mile" is over 3 hours in 
length, but never once overstays its welcome, nor does it even feel like a 
movie of such great length. This is because, while deliberately paced, it 
also has been tightly edited by Richard Francis-Bruce, with not one scene 
that should have been thrown on the cutting room floor; every second of 
screen time has a clear purpose, even when the developments themselves begin 
to grow strained by the finale.
One of the most powerful attributes of the film is its depiction of time 
passing within the penitentiary, as certain intimately drawn characters come 
and go through death row, just to end up as nothing more than memories within 
the walls of the building. This subject matter is superbly handled under the 
helming of writer-director Darabont, as are the occasional sequences of 
execution by electric chair. Credit must go to Darabont again for not turning 
his back on these harsh moments, as he graphically depicts the death scenes, 
which are tough to take not only for what they shows, but also because the 
victims are people we have grown to like and respect, whether they are guilty 
or not of their convicted crimes. One particular execution sequence is just 
about as stirring and devastatingly inhumane as anything I have ever seen on 
film before.
The ensemble cast of "The Green Mile" is first-rate across the board, 
headlined by star Tom Hanks, whose exact, naturalistic turn as Paul Edgecomb 
could very well be his most impressive since 1993's "Philadelphia" or 1994's 
"Forrest Gump." A perfect balance of personalities and casting, newcomer 
Michael Clarke Duncan is genuinely effective as the magical, honest John 
Coffey, all the more striking because it is his feature film debut. 
Supporting players all make an impression, no one more so than Michael Jeter, 
who is outstanding as inmate Del, a terminally lonely but giving person who 
finds joy in his life through the sort of loyal partnership he forms with Mr. 
Jingles. Heartbreaking and not easy to forget, Jeter gives one of the 
strongest supporting performances of the year. As cruel and heartless as a 
movie character can be without heading in cartoonish territory is Doug 
Hutchison, as Percy, a man without one redeeming quality who strives on the 
pain he causes others. While never rising above two dimensions, Hutchison 
still makes quite an impact. Sam Rockwell, a chameleon who has proven in 
recent years to be able to play a wide spectrum of characters (1997's "Box of 
Moonlight," 1998's "Lawn Dogs"), is downright creepy as William Wharton, a 
maniac that John Coffey senses is downright evil. The underrated Bonnie Hunt 
also turns in fine work as Paul's wife, despite not having much to do. 
While thoroughly effective and well-made, one major misstep the film takes is 
in its final fifteen minutes which, at first, abruptly switches gears into 
more mainstream territory, complete with a climactic scene that feels overly 
calculated and tough to swallow. This moment is so disappointing because it 
is purposefully treated to be a scene that gets audiences to cry, rather than 
one that is more truthful to the situation. Accordingly, when the wraparound 
story comes back into play in the end, the film takes another turn for the 
worst. Instead of being merely downbeat, the conclusion is inappropriately 
depressing and uncalled-for, and left me feeling more revolted than 
emotionally satisfied. [Side note: Riding home with my brother afterwards, we 
got into a brief argument spurred from me making a sarcastic comment at him, 
because the movie had put me in a very bad mood]. 
The ending may have come as a major letdown, but that, ultimately, cannot 
take away from the first 165 minutes of "The Green Mile," which are 
consistently engrossing and perceptive. Darabont is a master of writing and 
populating his films with memorable, solid supporting characters, and he has 
struck gold with his cast this time around. It's just too bad, then, that the 
finale could not have been stronger. It downgrades a potentially great film 
to being, at most, a very good one.

Title
Review for Psycho (1960)
Directed by Alfred Hitchcock.
Cast: Anthony Perkins, Janet Leigh, Vera Miles, John Gavin, Martin 
Balsam, John McIntire, Simon Oakland, Patricia Hitchcock, John Anderson, 
Frank Albertson.
1960 - 108 minutes.
Rated R (for violence).
Reviewed December 3, 1998.
>From the master of suspense, "Psycho," is Alfred Hitchcock's most 
well-known, and widely considered, best film, a great feat for a 
relatively low-budget horror picture. It terrified audiences in 1960, 
and surprisingly, still holds up very well today. When I first viewed 
the entire film about four years ago, it really did scare me, and with 
my most recent viewing, it is still a powerful, unforgettable 
experience.
"Psycho," starts off from the point-of-view of Marion Crane (Janet 
Leigh), a young banker who, on her lunch breaks, often meets her 
long-time boyfriend, Sam Loomis (John Gavin), in a hotel room. Desperate 
to break free and be with him, she steals $40,000 in cash and goes on 
the lam, only to stop at the backwoods Bates Motel for the night, where, 
as everyone knows, she meets her ill-fated demise by being stabbed to 
death in the shower by a mysterious female figure. When the motel 
manager, Norman Bates (Anthony Perkins), whose invalid mother is always 
looking out the bedroom window of the house overlooking the motel, 
discovers Marion, he desperately disposes of the body by putting her in 
the trunk of her car and driving it into a nearby swamp. After missing 
for a week, Marion's older sister, Lila (Vera Miles), grows concerned 
and enlists the aid of both Sam and the police detective, Arbogast 
(Martin Balsam), to investigate the disappearance.
At the time of its release, "Psycho," was a highly courageous and 
explicit film, dealing with brutal murder, risque (in 1960) sexual 
situations, and the ideas of the Oedipal complex and transvesticism. In 
today's times, these elements are not nearly as shocking, but 
Hitchcock's "Psycho," is still a masterful, outstanding motion picture, 
and one of the best horror films I have ever seen, next to 1978's 
"Halloween." 
The screenplay, by Joseph Stefano, which is also closely being used for 
the recent remake by Gus Van Sant, is way ahead of its time in both its 
dialogue and surprising construction. For those unfamiliar with the 
shower scene, it would come as a huge surprise that the character of 
Marion, who has been the main character from the start, dies within the 
first hour. There are two murder set-pieces in, "Psycho," and they are 
both dazzlingly executed. Without giving it away, the sequence with 
Arbogast on the staircase remains one of my favorite moments in any 
horror picture, old or new. The first time I saw it, I actually jumped 
in my seat, which is almost unthinkable for a film that was made in 
1960. All other horror movies, prior to, "Psycho," are simply not scary 
in today's time because audiences have become more adept to handle 
violence.
The character of the occasionally charming, partly threatening Norman 
Bates will always be associated with the late, great Anthony Perkins, 
who never had a role as memorable as this one, and he is perfect. Janet 
Leigh is outstanding as the film's anticlimactic heroine, and all of her 
early scenes, although not dealing with a horror aspect, manage to 
vibrantly come alive, thanks to her, and a scene involving a policeman, 
and another at a car dealership, are genuinely suspenseful.
The cinematography, which was nominated for an Oscar, consists of some 
of the most stylish black-and-white photography I have seen. It adds a 
great deal of atmosphere, foreboding, and mystery that might have very 
well been lost in color. And the flawless, eerie music score by Bernard 
Herrmann, which has been largely ripped-off since, is one of the most 
well-known scores in motion picture history. I simply could not imagine, 
"Psycho," without that music, with its striking orchestral chords that 
are able to send a shiver up your spine just listening to them. Again, 
no horror film score has been able to match it, besides John 
Carpenter's in "Halloween."
Alfred Hitchcock's, "Psycho," is a masterpiece in all senses of the 
word. As a horror film, it is a horrifying study in terror, and as film 
in general, it is a brilliant study in style and mood, as well as the 
darkest regions of a person's psyche. The fact that it holds up just as 
perfectly nearly forty years after it was made is a testament to 
Hitchcock's well-earned title, "The Master of Suspense." He was a 
"master," in more than one sense of the word, too. 
      - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
        Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Teaching Mrs. Tingle (1999)
Directed by Kevin Williamson.
Cast: Katie Holmes, Helen Mirren, Marisa Coughlan, Barry Watson, Jeffrey 
Tambor, Molly Ringwald, Michael McKean, Liz Stauber, Vivica A. Fox, Lesley 
Ann Warren.
1999 - 95 minutes.
Rated PG-13 (for violence, sexual situations, and profanity).
Reviewed August 21, 1999.
Now that I've seen "Teaching Mrs. Tingle," the directorial debut of "Scream" 
scribe Kevin Williamson, just one question lingers: exactly what type of film 
is this? If it is a black comedy, there are too many serious moments for it 
to fully take off; if it's a drama, the silliness definitely needed to be cut 
down; if it's a thriller, it's one in which suspense is promised but never 
arrives until the climactic scene; if it belongs in the horror genre, the 
film, with a PG-13 rating and very little violence or terror, is overly mild; 
and if it's a teen angst picture, the writing certainly leaves something to 
be desired.
Leigh Ann Watson (Katie Holmes) is a high school senior nearing graduation 
whose mother (Lesley Ann Warren) is stuck in a dead-end life as a waitress, 
and whose only hope to get into college is if she receives the scholarship 
given to the valedictorian of her class. Unfortunately, her two hurdles are a 
stuck-up fellow student (Liz Stauber) who currently is one point higher than 
she is, and an 'A' in her history class, which is seeming more and more 
unlikely because of her nasty, bitter teacher, Mrs. Tingle (Helen Mirren), a 
middle-aged Wicked Witch of the West who gets her kicks out of putting all of 
her pupils down and being the one to stand in the way of their dreams. When 
Leigh Ann is falsely caught by Mrs. Tingle with the answer sheet to the final 
exam in her bookbag, despite the culprit actually being the rebellious 
slacker, Luke (Barry Watson), Tingle threatens to report Leigh Ann the next 
morning and, thus, basically ruining her whole life. Convinced by Luke and 
Leigh Ann's best friend, the aspiring actress Jo Lynne (Marisa Coughlan), the 
three of them set off that night to Mrs. Tingle's home to explain and plead 
the whole misunderstanding with her. Things get out of hand and the plot 
thickens when Tingle threatens to call the police on them and ends up getting 
a crossbow accidentally shot at her, side-swiping her face and knocking her 
out. In desperation, the three drag the unconcious Mrs. Tingle upstairs to 
her room and tie her to the bedpost, ready to talk their way out of the 
situation once she comes to, but their elder has some surprises in store for 
them too, as she works to turn them against each other with some tricky mind 
games and believable lies.
"Teaching Mrs. Tingle" is the film that Williamson is known to have written 
the screenplay for before his fame with "Scream," and it was only after 
adding clout to his name was he allowed by Miramax's genre label, Dimension 
Films, to make the picture. Easy to believe, as "Teaching Mrs. Tingle" has 
all of the signs of a strictly novice effort, with the writing having almost 
none of the cleverness, style, and originality that has marked all of his 
other projects, from "Scream" to "I Know What You Did Last Summer" to TV's 
"Dawson's Creek." And as for being a director, Williamson shows some promise, 
but since the screenplay is seriously flawed and never takes off, neither 
does the film.
If there is one word to describe "Teaching Mrs. Tingle," that word is 
'bland.' If the movie is never necessarily boring, it also is rarely 
interesting, and almost everything that occurs in the film (which, let's face 
it, isn't much) is strictly dull and insipid. The premise of an unforeseen 
hostage situation with the "Teacher From Hell" could have easily been 
exciting and inventive, with the three teens having to solve one complication 
after the other, but aside from one pedestrian instance in which the gym 
teacher (Jeffrey Tambor) arrives at Mrs. Tingle's home and addresses himself 
as, "Spankey," nothing of the sort ever happens. Instead, what we have are 
three characters essentially standing around a house, with the sly Mrs. 
Tingle occasionally playing with each one of theirs' emotions, and a 
non-graphic, but exploitative sex scene popping up at the most inopportune 
time for the simple reason of adding some spice to the proceedings. All it 
ends up adding, however, is an extra level of ludicrous plotting.
Veteran British actress Helen Mirren, as the cruel Mrs. Tingle, is far more 
astonishing and scene-stealing than she has any right to be, and raises this 
otherwise tepid film up a notch so that it could be classified as an "OK" 
film, rather than a downright bad one. From her early, brutal scene in which, 
one by one, Mrs. Tingle cold-heartedly criticizes her students as they get up 
to present a project, Mirren creates a character that is just about the most 
distinct, memorable movie villain I've ever seen. Not only that, but Mirren 
also creates an added dimension to Mrs. Tingle that probably would never have 
appeared had the performance not been as powerful, as we learn she is an 
unhappy woman hellbent on destroying her students because of her 
uncontrollable jealousy that many will become big-time successes, when she is 
still stuck in the same little town with the same job she had thirty years 
ago.
As the three central teen characters, Katie Holmes strikes an honest chord 
with her desperate character, but is not given the chance to really test her 
acting skills as she was with this past spring's "Go" and on "Dawson's 
Creek," due to a flat character that is never very appealing. Faring even 
worse is Barry Watson (TV's "7th Heaven"), who is stuck for the majority of 
the film blending into the background. His character of Luke is so thin, and 
not given the chance to do anything but act as an unconvincing love interest 
to Holmes, that he makes next to no impression. Marisa Coughlan is a 
different matter altogether; a fresh, talented find that will next be seen on 
Williamson's latest televsion excursion, "WasteLand," Coughlan's Jo Lynne is 
engaging in a way that Leigh Ann never is, and is given some of the more 
notable scenes, including a dead-ringer reenactment of the possessed Linda 
Blair in "The Exorcist" and another scene where she puts on a plausible act 
in front of Mrs. Tingle, only for the acid-tongued Tingle to respond, "I hope 
you make a good waitress." In supporting roles, everyone is wasted in 
basically cameos, particularly Vivica A. Fox, who has all of one scene as 
Leigh Ann's understanding guidance counselor. Only former teen queen Molly 
Ringwald is able to stand out, as the principal's assistant who takes over as 
substitute for Tingle and ends off teaching the material to the class 
equipped with a neverending slew of curse words.
"Teaching Mrs. Tingle" wraps up its story in an unconvincing manner that 
hammers the final nail in the film's coffin. Although Leigh Ann was right to 
fight for what she believed was right, that still does not excuse her or her 
two friends' criminal behavior, something which they get out of far too 
easily. And the last scene might have been satisfying had the end credits not 
have popped up so abruptly while in the middle of the scene. Was Williamson 
in such a breakneck rush to end the film that he didn't feel there was time 
to film a complete last scene before going to black and then starting the 
credits? Who knows? "Teaching Mrs. Tingle" has only one claim to notoriety, 
and it's Mirren's sparklingly vicious performance. Without her, the film 
would ultimately be a black hole of nothingness.
      - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman. 
        Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Urban Legend (1998)
Urban Legend * * * 1/2 (out of * * * * )
Directed by Jamie Blanks.
Cast: Alicia Witt, Jared Leto, Rebecca Gayheart, Tara Reid, Michael 
Rosenbaum, Loretta Devine, Joshua Jackson, John Neville, Natasha Gregson 
Wagner, Danielle Harris, Robert Englund.
Running Time: 100 minutes.
Rated R (for horror violence, gore, profanity, and a brief sex scene).
Back in the early 1980's, there was a slasher movie craze, and it 
eventually burned out because the films simply weren't any good, 
reaching for the lowest-common-denominator in filmmaking. But then 
1996's "Scream," a genre-shattering horror flick suddenly revived the 
genre, and since then we have been bombarded with new horror movies, and 
the strange thing is, ever since then, they could be divided easily into 
two categories: the great ("Scream," "Scream 2," "I Know What You Did 
Last Summer") and the awful ("An American Werewolf in Paris," 
"Wishmaster"). Usually you can tell before you see one of these little 
fright items whether they are going to be worthwhile or not. And 
luckily, the new slasher film, "Urban Legend," directed by newcomer 
Jamie Blanks, fits in the former category: the great.
"Urban Legend" stars Alicia Witt (TV's "Cybill") as Natalie, a student 
of the fictional northeastern college Pendleton University, who becomes 
convinced after several dead bodies show up that a psychopathic killer 
is on the loose, murdering people in ways that are based on urban 
legends (i.e. an axe-wielding killer hiding in the backseat of your car, 
a babysitter receiving threatening phone calls that are coming from 
inside the house, etc.). Complicating the story even more is the myth 
that at the college 25 year ago, a muder spree took place, and the sole 
survivor was Mr. Wexler (Robert Englund), who, surprise!, is currently 
teaching the American Folklore class at Pendleton U.
As in the "Scream" movies, "Urban Legend" has a lot of fun toying with 
its audience on who the killer is: could it be Mr. Wexler; Paul (Jared 
Leto), a journalism major and potential boyfriend of Natalie; the 
school's janitor; or any number of the other students and staff. 
Regardless of this minor similarity to "Scream," "Urban Legend" is an 
original because of the extremely clever, ingenious storyline. 
Practically no popular legend is left unturned, and all of them are used 
to spooky effect.
There are many things that separate this from those 80's stalk-and-slash 
movies: the characters aren't all one-dimensional airheads, and the 
performances are from mostly talented up-and-coming actors; the writing 
is sharp and often funny, with many in-jokes and tributes to other 
movies, most noticably "Halloween"; the killer's identity is, for most 
of the running time, unpredictable; and most importantly, it is actually 
scary, with many effective, suspenseful set-pieces.
Two particular moments that are especially nerve-wracking is the opening 
scene, set at a gas station, and another set at a radio station. The 
picture runs at a brisk pace, and is consistently entertaining.
The technical credits are superb, particularly the moody cinematography 
which casts the college as an ominous character of its own, and the 
down-beat music score. Another plus is that there are very few songs in 
the movie, and like some of the great genre works, like "Halloween" and 
"The Exorcist," it relies more on instrumental scores.
If there is a negative thing about the resurgence of the horror genre, 
it is usually the climax, which reveals the killer's identity and then 
becomes an example of overacting, and loses its frightening grip. Not 
here. In "Urban Legend," the villain, whom will remain nameless, 
obviously has a lot of fun, and it becomes both menacing and strangely 
humorous. 
Oh, and one last thing that is worth mentioning: Loretta Devine, who 
plays the school's black security guard who is obsessed with Pam Grier 
and blaxploitation movies, is a standout, stealing every scene she's in.
"Urban Legend" is one of the very best of the recent slasher offerings, 
because it mixes its laughs and chills with more smoothness and grace 
than usual, and it proves that just because it's a horror movie where 
people are brutally murdered doesn't mean it still can't be intelligent 
and impressive filmmaking. 

Title
Review for Siege, The (1998)
Directed by Edward Zwick.
Cast: Denzel Washington, Annette Bening, Tony Shalhoub, Bruce Willis, 
Sami Bouajila, David Proval, Helmi Kassim.
1998 - 112 minutes.
Rated R (for violence, profanity, brief nudity, and sexual situations).
Reviewed November 7, 1998.
By Dustin Putman 
Dustin Putman's Film Reviews >
In 1989, director Edward Zwick began his career with the powerful Civil 
War drama, "Glory," but since then, he has made continuous 
disappointments, to me at least, with 1994's "Legends of the Fall," and 
1996's "Courage Under Fire." Those two films weren't bad, just not very 
good, but with Zwick's latest film, "The Siege," he has finally made 
one.
"The Siege," is a modern-day action-thriller that focuses on terrorism 
that is sweeping through New York City. Investigating the matter is FBI 
agents Anthony Hubbard (Denzel Washington) and Frank Haddad (Tony 
Shalhoub), who are first hit by the ordeal when a city bus explodes with 
several innocent people on it. Later, a bomb goes off in a Broadway 
theater, killing even more. They soon meet CIA operative Elise Kraft 
(Annette Bening), who may very well hold the key to the identity of the 
Arab terrorist. 
There are some movies that simply don't need to be made, and, "The 
Siege" may very well be one of them. Oh, sure, Zwick thinks he is making 
a "meaningful" action film, since he has added lots of exposition scenes 
in which the audience is basically lectured on the horrors of terrorism, 
but what he really has made is actually no more substantial than, say, 
"Die Hard," which also starred Bruce Willis. This time, Willis is 
horribly wasted as a General of the U.S. Army, who puts a state of 
martial law over NYC during the climax. Whatever points, "The Siege," 
earnestly tried to make, were obviously lost in the translation from 
page to screen, or maybe, Zwick never really had anything serious to say 
in the first place. The role of the Arab community is offensively 
stereotypical, just as women were in the recent, "John Caprenter's 
Vampires," by placing them all in the category of "bad guys."
"The Siege," contains three fine actors---Washington, Bening, and 
Shalhoub---but Washington is stuck with a character that contains not an 
ounce of even remote development. Bening has slightly more to do, and 
has an intriguing character to work with, while Shalhoub pretty much 
steals the show, even though, again, he has no real character.
By the climax of, "The Siege," with Washington giving a sermon to Willis 
on the so-called "message" of the story, I felt like I had wandered into 
a sequel to, "On Deadly Ground," in which Steven Seagal gave a 10-minute 
speech at the end about preserving the environment. "The Siege" is 
constantly heavy-handed, not entertaining or insightful, and just goes 
to prove that not even the best actors can save a film that lacks a 
satisfactory screenplay.

Title
Review for Simply Irresistible (1999)
Directed by Mark Tarlov.
Cast: Sarah Michelle Gellar, Sean Patrick Flanery, Patricia Clarkson, 
Christopher Durang, Larry Gilliard Jr., Dylan Baker, Betty Buckley.
1999 - 95 minutes.
Rated PG-13 (for profanity).
Reviewed February 6, 1999.
Blatantly borrowing elements from 1993's "Like Water for Chocolate" and 
1991's "The Butcher's Wife," "Simply Irresistible" attempts to be a 
whimsical romantic comedy but, more often than not, comes off as 
laughable, leaving you to wonder why rising star Sarah Michelle Gellar 
(T.V.'s "Buffy, the Vampire Slayer") would choose such an obviously 
inept film project to waste her time on.
Things get off to a bad start right from the onset as Amanda (Sarah 
Michelle Gellar), a young woman who runs her late family's struggling 
New York restaurant, runs into a mystery man who forces a bushel of 
crabs on her and then vansihes into thin air. While out shopping, she 
also meets Tom (Sean Patrick Flanery), a charming, handsome man, who 
happens to be planning a ritzy restaurant for the department store he 
works for, and later when he decides to drop by her dive, called 
Southern Cross, for lunch, she somehow makes a delicious crab dish for 
him, even though she is known to not be a very good chef. Suddenly, 
Amanda finds her restaurant, on the edge of foreclosure, rejuvenate to 
life as customer begin to swarm for her food, which strangely causes 
everyone immediate jubilation when it hits their mouths. Are Amanda and 
Tom destined to be together? And is it not just because of the magical 
food, but because they really, truly like each other? And what exactly 
is going on with the food she is making? Does it have anything to do 
with that pesky crab she got that sits on the shelf in the kitchen 
somehow assisting her in her food preparation?
"Simply Irresistible" is a ridiculous and just plain goofy romantic 
fantasy that's as flimsy as a slice of bologna. It takes one joke---that 
people who eat the food are taken aback by it in most unusual ways---and 
recycles it over and over again until the film has reached an 
appropriate running time of 95 minutes. Add in a music montage every ten 
minutes (these are actually the best scenes in the movie, which 
certainly tells you something about the film itself), and what you've 
got is an utterly empty, if not necessarily boring, excursion. 
The cast of "Simply Irresistible" is fairly good, but it is the 
supporting characters who are the most interesting. Patricia Clarkson 
(1998's "High Art," in which she played a drugged-out lesbian) is a 
standout as Tom's colleague, and is thankfully given a few funny lines 
of dialogue. Also of note is Larry Gilliard Jr., as Amanda's cooking 
assistant and buddy, who is allowed to create a seemingly full character 
out of only a handful of scenes. Of the main stars, Sarah Michelle 
Gellar is fine, but really does often look like she's struggling through 
the unmistakably clumsy material, and if Sean Patrick Flanery plans on 
keeping a film career in the future, he has certainly got to pick better 
projects than this.
The bottom line is that "Simply Irresistible" is the exact opposite of 
its deprophesized title, and when the movie got to the point where the 
characters began to float in mid-air (an unamusing plot device that was 
repeated in the stupid last scene), my mind checked out from the 
characters and the romance. When I think about it in hindsight, I should 
have checked out in the very first scene, where the point of the action 
was for Gellar to crawl under tables looking for a runaway mechanical 
crab. Now, that certainly is what I'd call magical!
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putmam
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for 10 Things I Hate About You (1999)
Directed by Gil Junger.
Cast: Julia Stiles, Heath Ledger, Larisa Oleynik, Joseph Gordon-Levitt, 
Larry Miller, Andrew Keegan, David Krumholtz, Susan May Pratt, Gabrielle 
Union, Daryl "Chill" Mitchell, Allison Janney.
1999 - 98 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and sex-related material).
Reviewed April 3, 1999.
In December of 1996, a little movie called "Scream," was released, 
became a box-office smash, and resurrected films targeted at teens. 
First, it was teen slasher movies that were the big fad (both "Scream" 
movies, "I Know What You Did Last Summer," "Urban Legend," etc.), but 
just recently, the popularity has switched over to the teen comedy genre 
(a 'la '80s John Hughes), starting with last June's "Can't Hardly Wait." 
It may be the first week of April in 1999, but so far this year we have 
been given a movie aimed at the 25-and-under market almost every single 
week: "Varsity Blues," "Jawbreaker," "Cruel Intentions," "Simply 
Irresistible," "The Rage: Carrie 2," and "The Mod Squad." Coming April 9 
are two more of this type: "Never Been Kissed" and "Go," and on April 
23, we've got the teen satire "Election" and the teen horror-comedy 
"Idle Hands." Jeesh! Out of all of these moves, however, the one that is 
most similar to the latest incarnation, "10 Things I Hate About You," is 
this past January's mediocre, ho-hum "She's All That." Although similar 
in plotting (ok, darn near identical), "10 Things I Hate About You," a 
modern-day version of Shakespeare's "The Taming of the Shrew" ("She's 
All That" got its inspiration from "Pygmalion"), is an infinitely 
superior film in every department, from the smart direction by 
first-time feature director Gil Junger to the charming and well-written 
screenplay by Karen McCullah Lutz and Kirsten Smith to the striking 
ensemble cast, who give the best group of performances in a teen comedy 
since 1985's "The Breakfast Club." And to top it all off, in the 
inevitable climax set at the prom, at least we didn't have to once again 
suffer through a goofy, inappropriate dance sequence (who could forget, 
or want to remember, for that matter, this ludicrous development in 
"She's All That?").
The day wide-eyed, shy new student Cameron James (Joseph Gordon-Levitt) 
starts school at Seattle-based Padua High, he is swept away at the sight 
of the beautiful and popular sophomore, Bianca Stratford (Larisa 
Oleynik). Although he doesn't know french, he purposefully learns some 
of it just so he can tutor her, but finds that her paranoid gynecologist 
father (Larry Miller) won't allow her to date until her bitter, 
unconventional older sister, Kat (Julia Stiles), a senior, decides to. 
Kat, of course, has sworn off the likes of boys, but Cameron sets out to 
find someone that will be the perfect match for her, which is exactly 
what he finds in the form of the rebellious Patrick Verona (Heath 
Ledger). Complicating matters, Cameron's dorky friend, Michael (David 
Krumholtz), decides to use a wealthy jock, Joey (Andrew Keegan), who 
also has his sights set on Bianca, as a pawn so that he will pay Patrick 
to get Kat to go out with him, and then Cameron hopes to steal Bianca 
away from Joey.
As you can see, "10 Things I Hate About You" includes a huge number of 
characters, some of which I haven't even mentioned, such as Kat's 
Shakespeare-obsessed friend, Mandella (Susan May Pratt) and Bianca's 
materialistic comrade, Chastity (Gabrielle Union). At a short, but 
well-used running time of 98 minutes, all of the characters are 
perfectly handled, satisfyingly developed, and, for the most part, are 
not treated as caricatures (another flaw of "She's All That," where the 
bad guys (and gals) ran around constantly saying, "you're vapor"). Since 
I could sympathize with the realistic depictions of the central 
characters, and since many of the comedic and dramatic scenes were 
surprisingly effective, I got completely caught up in all of the 
relationships and was thoroughly entertained.
Aside from a good screenplay, it's the performances that can make or 
break a movie, and director Junger has really hit the jackpot. Aside 
from Joseph Gordon-Levitt ("3rd Rock from the Sun"), who gives his 
strongest performance to date here, none of the actors are that 
well-known, but it is this aspect that brings a particular freshness to 
the proceedings. As the main character of Kat, Julia Stiles (last seen 
in the miniseries "The '60s") is marvelous and always believable, and 
certainly has a bright future ahead of her. Even though it is her role 
that is initially the most difficult and hard-edged, it was easy to 
identify with Kat's way of thinking (she is against the silly tradition 
of the prom and loves reading Sylvia Plath), and I completely admired 
her individuality. No one, I think, could have portrayed her as 
perfectly as Stiles does. Heath Ledger, as the infamous bad-boy of the 
town, injects much life into Patrick, and has a lot of chemistry with 
Stiles. One other actor of note is Larisa Oleynik who, with the help of 
screenwriters Lutz and Smith, is able to turn Bianca into a person with 
multi-dimensions, even though she is accurately self-centered at the 
on-set. In one truthful scene, Cameron angrily asks her if she has 
always been so selfish, and Bianca grudgingly realizes that yes, she 
has. 
One off-beat element of the film, and a source of some hearty laughs, is 
the way that the school's staff act, which is strikingly unformal. 
Allison Janney, as the guidance counselor Ms. Perky, who is writing a 
trashy Harlequin romance novel, is comic dynamite, as is Daryl "Chill" 
Mitchell as the english teacher, who reads Shakespeare to the class in 
rap and, at one point, sends Kat to the office because, for once, she 
actually thinks one of his assignments is really good. Although there 
are a few cheap laughs that are thrown into the film near the beginning, 
most of it actually works, especially in the humorous and witty dialogue 
exchanges and quirks between the characters. In one very funny scene, 
Chastity asks, "I know people can be overwhelmed, and they can be 
underwhelmed, but can people just be...whelmed?" At another point, 
Bianca and Kat's father (a stand-out Larry Miller), who is constantly 
terrified that his daughters are going to get pregnant, only allows 
Bianca to go to the prom on one occasion: before she leaves, she has to 
put on the heavy fat suit he has so she will get an idea of what it's 
like to be pregnant.
"10 Things I Hate About You" once and for all proves that there is still 
life in the teen comedy genre, and this movie is probably more 
reminiscent of the great John Hughes than any other film of the '90s. It 
also helps that the movie has a perfectly-assembled soundtrack, mixing 
indie-rock with new wave '80s songs (and with, thank goodness, no rap). 
By the film's end, it actually had me rooting for certain characters to 
get together, and I was also quite pleased with how everything was 
wrapped up, especially in the final scenes involving Kat and Bianca, Kat 
and her father, and a flawlessly-acted and moving sequence in which Kat 
gets up to read the poem she has written for her english class (this is 
where the title comes from). Luckily, I doubt I would be able to find 
ten things I hate about "10 Things I Hate About You," but the positive 
aspects of the film far out-number ten. 
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Teenage Bonnie and Klepto Clyde (1993)
Directed by John Shepphird.
Cast: Scott Wolf, Maureen Flannigan, Bentley Mitchum, Don Novello, Tom 
Bower.
1993 - 90 minutes.
Rated R (for violence, gore, profanity, sex, and nudity).
Reviewed November 16, 1998.
"Teenage Bonnie and Klepto Clyde," is an obvious take-off of the 
original, "Bonnie and Clyde," story, about a pair of lovers who went on 
a crime spree, but it is set in modern-day times and involves two 
teenagers.
Clyde (Scott Wolf) is a dull, bored high school student until the night 
Bonnie (Maureen Flannigan) walks into his life while he is working at a 
fast food restaurant. The strange thing is, he is not captured by her 
beauty, but by the fact that he catches her stealing his lighter that he 
allowed her to use to light a cigarette. Clyde persues her constantly 
until she finally gives in, learns that he is also a kleptomaniac, and 
in order to escape their unhappy family lives, decide to go on a crime 
spree, first by stealing various items at small stores. As their 
relationship heats up, they realize that they are running out of money, 
and so they begin to plan a bank robbery.
The arc that, "Teenage Bonnie and Klepto Clyde," takes is more or less 
predictable, and we know from the start that the story is inevitably 
heading for a tragic conclusion. But don't all stories about forbidden 
lovers end in tragedy? 
Watching the film, it strangely reminded me of something that director 
Gregg Araki (1995's "The Doom Generation," and 1997's "Nowhere") might 
have made, as it has many of the same elements: sex between teenagers, 
violence, occasionally exaggerated gore, crime, and an offbeat sense of 
humor. Ultimately, John Shepphird is not as distinctive a director as 
Araki, and the characters and the story did not enthrall me as much as I 
would have liked. While an Araki film always has an air of mystery or 
unpredictableness, "Teenage Bonnie and Klepto Clyde," feels more 
conventional.
The performances by Scott Wolf (currently on TV's "Party of Five") and 
Maureen Flannigan are perfectly realized, if anything. Wolf succesfully 
projects the feeling of vulnerability that is needed for his 
inexperienced character, and is matched wonderfully with newcomer 
Flannigan, as the wealthier, but more streetwise one. Since it is these 
two characters who are in almost every scene, the film is helped 
immeasurably by their charismatic presence, so much so that it was 
almost enough for me to be won over on my overall opinion of the film. 
The happenings around the characters, however, have been done so many 
times before that I really did not see any point for the film to even be 
made. The screenplay, although occasionally entertaining, needed more of 
a focus for it to be as effective as the climax wanted it to be. 
"Teenage Bonnie and Klepto Clyde," is not a bad film, nor is it a boring 
one. It is consistently interesting, to be sure, and is brought to life 
solely due to the two main actors, but when all is said and done, there 
is simply not enough substance left for the film to be partcularly 
worthwhile.
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Beloved (1998)
Directed by Jonathan Demme.
Cast: Oprah Winfrey, Danny Glover, Kimberly Elise, Thandie Newton, Beah 
Richards, Lisa Gay Hamilton, Albert Hall, Irma P. Hall.
1998 - 174 minutes.
Rated R (for profanity, violence, sexual situations, and nudity).
Reviewed October 20, 1998.
It is known that it took Oprah Winfrey ten years to bring Nobel Prize 
winner Toni Morrison's novel, "Beloved," to the screen, and she was 
determined to get it made. It was only until she met director Jonathan 
Demme (1991's "Silence of the Lambs") that she knew she had found the 
perfect person to make the adaptation.
"Beloved" is a mysterious, unusual, sprawling epic, running just under 3 
hours, and set in Cincinnati, circa 1873. Sethe (Oprah Winfrey), a 
former slave, lives in a quaint rural home with her quiet 18-year-old 
daughter, Denver (Kimberly Elise), and an angry ghost that haunts the 
house. Sethe also had two sons that ran away eight years earlier, and a 
baby daughter whom is no longer with her. Aside from the ghost, things 
begin to look up for Sethe when an old friend from her slave days at 
Sweet Home, Paul D (Danny Glover), turns up on her doorstep one day and 
becomes her lover. The peculiar title character, Beloved (Thandie 
Newton), enters the film thirty minutes into it, found with her back up 
against a tree stump in front of their house, beetles crawling all over 
her body. Sethe allows Beloved to stay at their home, and she becomes a 
sort of playmate with Denver, but it is obvious from the start that 
there is something awfully fishy about this young woman.
That is all of the story that I would even dare mention, because 
"Beloved" is the type of movie that, if you are unfamiliar with the plot 
going in, the less said, the better. Those going into "Beloved" 
expecting a slavery drama will, no doubt, be rather shocked by the film, 
as it is filled with many supernatural elements, and deals with such 
elements as ghosts, evil spirits, and resurrection.
"Beloved" is a deliberately-paced, but well-crafted, exceptionally 
performed motion picture. There are so many brilliantly effective 
moments throughout that it is quite disappointing when, after 3 hours of 
investing your time in it, it doesn't seem to add up to much. The story 
is intriguing and truly original, and the film felt as if it was leading 
up to an emotional powerhouse of an ending, but after the central story 
concludes, the film goes on for another twenty minutes, which is 
especially problematic since the intensity and mystery of the story has 
vanished. Although the ending starts to drag, there also seem to be 
chunks of the story that have been edited out, which was a mistake. 
Things occur quickly in the last hour, and plot elements are forgotten 
about or go unexplained. My guess is that the picture was originally a 
4-hour film, so they had to trim it, but in doing so, they edited the 
wrong section out. It was the very ending that needed a severe edit, not 
the sections that they did cut out.
Maybe it is beginning to sound like I didn't care for, "Beloved," which 
is untrue. Although nowhere nearly as brilliant as it would like to be, 
the film is nonetheless an admirable piece of work.
The performances from the central cast are, by far, the highlight of the 
piece. Winfrey, in her first feature film since 1985's superior, "The 
Color Purple," is strong and self-assured, not to mention able to get 
the viewer to forget that she is a talk show host from the first frame. 
Thandie Newton, as the difficult Beloved, has what is probably the most 
difficult role, as she is given what is perhaps an unplayable role. 
Newton somehow succeeds, however, in both capturing our sympathy in one 
scene, and frustrating us in the next. The standout in the cast is 
Kimberly Elise, who gives the film's most touching, sympathetic 
performance. She very much deserves an Academy Award nomination come 
next February. She is that dazzling.
While watching "Beloved," I could easily see one of the best films of 
the year within, but it ultimately let me down in its penultimate 
moments. Winfrey, Demme, and screenwriters Akosua Busia, Richard 
LaGravenese, and Adam Brooks, should be applauded for successfully 
adapting such a complex, unwieldly novel, but it certainly could have 
been so much more. 
      - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman 
Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Dream with the Fishes (1997)
Directed by Finn Taylor.
Cast: David Arquette, Brad Hunt, Kathryn Erbe, Cathy Moriarty, J.E. 
Freeman, Patrick McGaw, Anita Barone, Allyce Beasley, Timi Prulhiere.
1997 - 96 minutes.
Rated R (for nudity and profanity).
Reviewed October 30, 1998.
"Dream With the Fishes," the film debut of director Finn Taylor that 
premiered at Sundance, is a peculiar, unconventional little film, but 
one that is extremely well-written and carefully handled. 
At the start of the film, we meet Terry (David Arquette), a young man in 
his 20's who is a very lonely person, and spends his time acting as a 
peeping tom towards the people that live in the building beside his. One 
night during an attempted suicide, he meets Nick (Brad Hunt), one of his 
spying subjects, whom has a fatal disease and is going to die in a few 
weeks. It seems Terry is depressed because of the death of his wife in a 
car accident. Since one wants to die, and the other is definately going 
to, they form a sort of dysfunctional bond with each other, and proceed 
to live out some of their fantasies, such as nude bowling and taking 
acid. When they travel to Nick's hometown, they are greeted unfavorably 
by his father (J.E. Freeman), who wants nothing to do with him. Instead, 
they end up staying at the home of his Aunt Elise (Cathy Moriarty), an 
understanding former stripper. Soon, Nick's live-in girlfriend, Liz 
(Kathryn Erbe), who Terry secretly fantasizes about, catches up with 
them.
By the sound of, "Dream With the Fishes," it may seem like a film that 
might have very little story, and one that might meander, but that isn't 
the case at all, primarily due to Finn Taylor's smart, offbeat 
screenplay. But then again, this isn't really a "plot"-style film as 
much as it is a "character" film, and that is one of the great joys in 
watching it. The characters are all fascinating people, and it is fun to 
follow them through the film to see what happens next, which is mostly 
because of the fact that it is completely unpredictable. The most 
interesting character is Liz, who is obsessed with tatoos and on the 
surface is quite hard-edged, but slowly begins to hint that that might 
just be a facade to hide under. After all, she does very much care for 
Nick, and is sympathetic towards Terry's problems. Kathryn Erbe plays 
her wonderfully, and she is a talented actress who has been very good 
before in other films, particularly 1993's sweet slice-of-life, "Rich in 
Love." Also standing out is Cathy Moriarty, who almost always brings 
something special to every role she plays.
Aside from the performances and characters, another plus is the 
exuberant soundtrack, which includes an especially appropriate song, 
"Fisherman's Blues," by The Waterboys. 
With "Dream With the Fishes," Finn Taylor has proven himself to be an 
original director that is definately someone to look for in the future. 
He has a way with words, characters, and what is most surprising is how 
touching much of the film is without ever taking the easy route, and 
going for obviousness or predictable, maudlin melodrama. 
           - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
             Dustin
Putman's Film Haven >

Title
Review for Wood, The (1999)
Directed by Rick Famuyiwa.
Cast: Sean Nelson, Omar Epps, Richard T. Jones, Taye Diggs, Duane Finley, 
Trent Cameron, Malinda Williams, Lisaraye, Tamala Jones, Telma Hopkins.
1999 - 106 minutes.
Rated R (for profanity, a mild sex scene, and brief violence).
Reviewed July 17, 1999.
Although it probably wouldn't have made much of a difference, it is still 
unfortunate that "The Wood" had to be released only a week after the 
infinitely funnier and sweeter "American Pie." Both movies concern a group of 
high school buddies who make a bet/pact to lose their virginity. Not only 
that, but each follows the same sort of pattern and some scenes that are 
almost identical (one set in a bedroom, the other involving a parent catching 
their child doing something, er, embarrassing). Not only that, but both 
conclude similarly with one of the guys deciding not to tell everyone that he 
had sex, based on the actual love and respect he has grown for her. Now for 
the differences between the two. While "American Pie" was raunchy and often 
downright hilarious, "The Wood" only has a few select amusing moments, 
doesn't quite capture the realism of being a teenager as well, and feels 
manufactured. To top it all off, the marginally succeessful scenes depicting 
them as teens in 1986-1989, are constantly being intercut with the three 
friends in the present day, which is cause for it to feel severely uneven and 
disoriented, only an excuse to add the marquee value of Omar Epps and Taye 
Diggs to the release. Cut out the meaningless wish-wash of the framing story 
and director Rick Famuyiwa may have had a winner on his hands, but as is, 
every time I began to get into the characters as teenagers, the film would 
jerk me back to 1999. For this reason, call it an african-american, male 
version of 1995's much better, "Now and Then," which at least had the good 
sense to present the flashback in one long 80-minute stretch, with the 
present day stuff only coming into play in the first and last ten minutes. My 
mind floating around from one past movie to the other, I have just discovered 
that "The Wood" doesn't have one original, distinctive element..
"The Wood," our narrator and central character, Mike (Omar Epps), tells us in 
the first scene, "isn't what you think. No, it's short for Inglewood, 
California, where his single mother moved them when he was 14-years-old (Sean 
Nelson). Quickly becoming friends with Slim (Duane Finley) and Roland (Trent 
Cameron), they would spend their days off from school hanging out with each 
other, going to school dances, etc. From the first day he came to town, Mike 
was completely smitten with the beautiful Alicia (Malinda Williams) who, 
after a rocky first meeting when he grabbed her booty due to a bet, becomes 
his good friend through the rest of middle and high school. Back to the 
present day, Mike and Slim (Richard T. Jones) set off to find Roland (Taye 
Diggs), who is about to get married in a couple hours. They find him 
inebriated at the home of his old girlfriend, Tanya (Tamala Jones), and has 
suddenly gotten cold feet about marrying his fiancee, Lisa (Lisaraye). As the 
three further reminisce about the "olden days" together, they find that it is 
important for them to be lifelong friends, and for Roland to take that final 
step towards becoming the husband to the woman he dearly loves. 
Aside from the refreshing idea of showing how your high school romances 
rarely translate into adulthood, and from refraining to turn into a gritty, 
violent urban drama as so many "african-american"-oriented pictures do, "The 
Wood" isn't worth your time, effort, or money, alternately feeling far longer 
than its 106-minutes, but also coming off as empty. Since the present-day 
story, as it is, has been stripped down to the bare-bone essentials, and you 
know from the get-go that it will end with one of the friends finally getting 
married, there is no particular interest that I could dedicate to those 
scenes. The flashbacks, although more effective and with a truthful scene 
here and there (as when Mike loses his virginity to, yep, you guessed it), 
are also painfully thin and, again, nothing much happens.
As the young Mike, Sean Nelson (1994's "Fresh") acts as the respectable 
leader of the cast, and he is given a few nice scenes with Alicia (played 
sweetly by Malinda Williams), as well as one with his mother. Those are 
actually just about the only performances worth noting. Duane Finley and 
Trent Cameron, as the young Slim and Roland, are not on view long enough to 
create much of a personality, and end up feeling like more of an afterthought 
than real characters. The same goes for the adult actors, Omar Epps, Richard 
T. Jones, and Taye Diggs, who are only cashing a paycheck here. Blame for the 
lackluster story and poorly-written characters must go to writer-director 
Rick Famuyiwa who, judging from this film, unfortunately doesn't appear to 
have much of a talent in the filmmaking business. Consequently, the film is 
flatly shot by Steven Bernstein, and no other technical credits make any 
impact whatsoever.
"The Wood" is the type of film that isn't awful or even bad, but you also 
just can't seem to get excited about anything in it. It simply sits there, 
motionless, without any notable attributes to recommend, or that are even 
worth mentioning. It's unfortunate, but it's the truth.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Hell High (1986)
Directed by Douglas Grossman.
Cast: Maureen Mooney, Christopher Stryker, Christopher Cousins, Millie 
Prezioso, Jason Brill.
1986 - 84 minutes. 
Rated R (for violence, gore, profanity, nudity, and sexual situations).
Reviewed November 8, 1998.
"Hell High" is a completely convincing 80's slasher product. It is one 
that has everything it should have: stupid teenagers, a vengeful, 
knife-wielding killer, a dark, isolated country house, gratitous nudity, 
and cliches galore. And shockingly enough, it isn't bad, and is a 
perfectly good way to waste an hour-and-a-half for those seeking a 
"dumb" horror movie. It's no more than that, but sometimes, that's 
enough for any fan of this genre.
As usual, "Hell High" starts off with a prologue in which a little girl, 
Brooke, witnesses two teens engaging in a sexual act and hurting one of 
her dolls in a swamp area, and so when they are riding off on their 
motocylcle, she throws mud in their face, causing them to crash and 
accidentally get killed. Fast forward 18 years, as four teenagers who 
hate their repressed biology teacher, Ms. Storm (Maureen Mooney), with a 
passion, concoct a plan to terrorize her one night while she is alone at 
her secluded, wooded home. This prank, however, brings back traumatic 
memories for Ms. Storm, who is Brooke, and she goes crazy.
Yes, "Hell High" is victim to every cliche in the book, but it is not 
the worst of its type, and if you get into it, turns out to be fairly 
entertaining, if not particularly scary.
One interesting spin in the film is that the four teens are actually not 
only the victims, but the villains, since they are the ones that start 
the trouble with Brooke, and they are a slew of truly disreputable 
characters who deserved to die.
The cinematography and music in "Hell High," is one of the highlights, 
and there are a few scenes towards the beginning, before the horror 
starts, that are actually full of a lot of energy.
Although "Hell Night," is getting a two-star rating, which is negative, 
in no way did I totally dislike the film. For a low-budget, 
direct-to-video horror flick, it is pretty impressive. If you are in a 
certain frame of mind, it is a lot of fun. Just don't...ahem...expect an 
ounce of originality.
       - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
         Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Body Shots (1999)
Directed by Michael Cristofer.
Cast: Amanda Peet, Sean Patrick Flanery, Tara Reid, Jerry O'Connell, Ron 
Livingston, Brad Rowe, Emily Proctor, Sybil Temchen.
1999 - 99 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, sex-related talk, sex, nudity, and a rape).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, October 23, 1999.
"There are movies that define every decade," declares the official poster for 
Michael Cristofer's youthful look at sex and love in the '90s, "Body Shots." 
The marketing team at its studio, New Line Cinemas, sure got that right, 
because "Body Shots" is one of those "serious"-minded films about a group of 
self-absorbed twentysomethings--call it yet another entry in this decade's 
self-made genre of "Gen-X Whiners."
The movie opens with Rick (Sean Patrick Flanery) waking up in the bed of Jane 
(Amanda Peet). After a club night full of alcohol, they can't quite remember 
what went on, and then Rick asks if she has any Tylenol. They abruptly are 
disturbed by a knock on the door at 4:35 a.m., which is coming from Jane's 
friend, Sara (Tara Reid). Bleeding from the forehead and with a busted lip, 
she claims that Michael (Jerry O'Connell), a hotshot football player, raped 
her. Turning back the clock by about twenty hours, we meet all eight major 
characters, which also include stripper-by-night Whitney (Emily Proctor), 
lonely Emma (Sybil Temchen), straight-arrow Shawn (Brad Rowe), and dorky, 
kinky Trent (Ron Livingston), as they talk into the camera, 
pseudo-documentary style, about whatever is on their minds (read: sex, sex, 
and more sex). As night falls on their shallow lives in L.A., all eight 
arrive at a night club for some dancing, drinks, and fun, and each one ends 
up coming into sexual contact with another before the night is over. Midway 
through, the morning after comes around, and the picture quickly takes a 
sharp turn for the worst, as it turns into a sort of made-for-TV "message" 
movie on date rape, but with a hint of explicit sex for good measure.
For its opening half-hour, "Body Shots" was an enthralling, sexually frank 
film that got much of its interest from its inventive style, in which the 
characters talk to the camera in whatever setting they tend to be in, as if 
it is what is going on in their heads. The discussions on such topics as oral 
sex, love, and the importance of a meaningful relationship, seemed to be 
setting itself up for a meaningful motion picture that captured the realism 
of a certain spectrum of twentysomethings.
That's when things began to severely irritate me. The confessions to the 
camera suddenly became outrageously inane ("Sex without love equals 
violence," says Shawn in pure "Afterschool Special" mode), the plotting grew 
repetitive and too stylish for its own good, and the characters began to 
unveil themselves to be alarmingly shallow individuals who turn out not to 
hold any insight whatsoever into people of the so-called X and Y generations. 
That's when the matter of the rape arises, at around the 50-minute mark. Sara 
goes to the hospital to be treated, and presses charges on Michael. Through 
an annoying, pointless plot device that is akin to Kurosawa's "Rashomon," 
Michael tells his side of what happened between Sara and himself the night 
before, and flashbacks ensue. Then it's Sara's turn to tell the "truth," and 
we visually see what happened from her point-of-view. Before the trial even 
begins, Sara, Michael, and their six friends around them question if maybe 
their memories were foggy from being drunk. After all, Michael can't quite 
recall what happened, now that he thinks about it, and there was that one 
isolated incident from the past where Sara had a blackout from alcohol 
poisoning. This "He-Said/She Said" turn-of-events doesn't work for a second, 
since we as an audience know that alcohol was definitely part of the 
equation, and whatever did happen only occurred because they immaturely 
brought it upon themselves. Because of this, the resolution is an inevitable 
disappointment, and the pair of drug-out flashbacks completely 
inconsequential.
In the performance department, first-time feature film director Michael 
Cristofer (HBO's "Gia") has acquired a slew of promising and talented young 
Hollywood players who have got to be more intelligent than the vapid 
characters they inhabit. Faring most effectively are Tara Reid ("American 
Pie"), who handles a few difficult scenes with impressive aplomb; Brad Rowe 
("Billy's Hollywood Screen Kiss"), as the somewhat introverted one who 
nonetheless has a rough sexual encounter with Emma; and Sybil Temchen, as 
Emma, who plays the only one written with any sort of believability or care.
"Body Shots" would like--no, make that love--to stand as an important film 
for the '90s generation, but it makes so many fatal missteps along the way 
that, by the last twenty minutes, it was literally a struggle to watch the 
remainder of the film. Clumsy and self-important, "Body Shots" forces you to 
spend 99 minutes with a group of people you wouldn't be able to stand in 
real-life, much less on a movie screen in a theater. The pits.

Title
Review for Hell Night (1981)
Directed by Tom DeSimone.
Cast: Linda Blair, Vincent Van Patten, Kevin Brophy, Jenny Neumann, 
Peter Barton, Jimmy Sturtevant, Suki Goodwin.
1981 - 102 minutes.
Rated R (for violence, profanity, and sexual situations).
Reviewed November 1, 1998.
Now here's a surprise! "Hell Night," which was released in 1981 at the 
time of the big slasher film craze, is actually an effective, well-made 
picture.
The story, like most films in the genre, is simple. For their initiation 
into a fraternity, four college students agree to spend the night in the 
infamous Garth Manor, a mansion in which the family living there was 
murdered years before by the deformed son, Andrew, with the gate locked 
up so they can't escape. While staying at the Manor, Marti (Linda Blair) 
begins to to get to like Seth (Vincent Van Patten), a fellow pledge, and 
as three other students hide outside attempting to scare them, a killer 
lurks around the estate, set on killing them one by one. 
Admittedly, "Hell Night" has an unoriginal story that is like any number 
of other similar slasher films, but what makes this one above-average is 
that, unlike the countless, "Friday the 13th" sequels, which were only 
concerned about violence and gore, "Hell Night" actually tries to be 
scary and suspenseful, and it surprisingly succeeds. The climax, 
especially, is very frightening and well-crafted.
Another plus is that this movie actually features one very good 
performance, by Linda Blair, a previous Academy Award nominee for 1973's 
brilliant, "The Exorcist," who is not only talented, but also a great 
screamer.
What keeps "Hell Night," from being anything particularly special is 
that, when it all comes down to it, it is only a slasher movie, with one 
death after the other, and the characters are pretty much 
one-dimensional. But director Tom DeSimone obviously was trying to break 
away from the norm and make a horror film that was actually good, and 
because of this, "Hell Night" is a worthwhile entry into the 80's 
mad-slasher wave. 
      - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
        Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Practical Magic (1998)
Directed by Griffin Dunne.
Cast: Sandra Bullock, Nicole Kidman, Stockard Channing, Dianne Wiest, 
Aidan Quinn, Goran Visjnic, Chloe Webb, Lucinda Jenney.
1998 - 105 minutes.
Rated PG-13 (for mild violence, profanity, and sexual situations).
Reviewed October 17, 1998.
"Practical Magic," is a film that is so misguided in so many ways that 
it makes you wonder how such talented and high-profile actors would even 
get involved in an embarrassing clap-trap like this one.
The film stars Sandra Bullock and Nicole Kidman as Sally and Gillian 
Owens, two sisters whose family comes from a long line of witches, 
spanning back 200 years. At the start, their parents die when they are 
still children, and they go to live with their two zany aunts (Stockard 
Channing and Dianne Wiest). Switch to the present day, Gillian, who is 
the stronger, more rebellious sibling, leaves home, and meets up with a 
dark, abusive guy (Goran Visjnic), while Sally stays in their hometown, 
meets and falls in love with a sweet, caring man, has two children, and 
then is devastated when her husband is hit by a truck and killed (come 
to think of it, she's not too devastated since she gets over it in about 
two minutes). When Gillian calls Sally to come get her after having 
another abusive spat with Visjnic, they accidentally murder him, and in 
desperation, bury the body in the backyard of their aunts' house. Add to 
this wildly convoluted story subplots involving the dead rising and an 
exorcism, not to mention a spattering of "light-hearted whimsy," and you 
have a pretty good idea how messy "Practical Magic" is.
After seeing the film, I reflected that there was not even one scene, or 
element, that I liked or enjoyed. It is a comedy, to be sure, but all of 
the humor falls astoundingly flat, and the occasional dramatic moments 
are the least bit touching. It is not charming or entertaining in any 
way. And then to top it off, we've got this dark, but bird-brained story 
of an evil spirit taking over Gillian's body. Whatever.
The characters are handled terribly, and actually, most of the actors do 
not have the fortune of even getting to be what you could call a 
character. There is no reason why Channing and Wiest should have decided 
to be in this film, and in every scene involving them, they are always 
standing side-by-side. No attempt is made to flesh them out into actual 
people. The same goes for Aidan Quinn, as a handsome police 
investigator, who has the misfortune of being the romantic lead opposite 
Bullock, even though he comes into it at around the 70-minute mark, and 
once again, there is no attempt to develop their relationship, or his 
character, in any way. In fact, every line of dialogue in the film is in 
service of moving the plot along, rather than getting to know the people 
saying the lines. I should have know I was headed for trouble during the 
opening credits, when I found out the screenplay was written by the 
deeply hated Akiva Goldsman, who managed to destroy the "Batman" series 
with "Batman Forever" and "Batman and Robin."
"Practical Magic" is directed by Griffin Dunne, primarily an actor, who 
last year made the contrived, clumsy romance, "Addicted to Love," with 
Meg Ryan and Matthew Broderick. I disliked that movie quite a bit, but 
since "Practical Magic" is even worse, that can only give you a taste of 
what a talentless filmmaker he is. I'd tell him to quit while he's 
ahead, but in these last two years, he's ultimately already buried 
himself.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Valentine (2001)
Directed by Jamie Blanks.
Cast: Marley Shelton, Denise Richards, Jessica Capshaw, David Boreanaz,
Jessica Cauffiel, Katherine Heigl, Daniel Cosgrove, Hedy Burress, Johnny
Whitworth, Fulvio Cecere, Benita Ha.
2001 - 95 minutes
Rated R (for strong violence, profanity, and sexuality).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, February 3, 2001.
Imagine my surprise to find that "Valentine," directed by Jamie Blanks
(1998's "Urban Legend"), has more in common with the slasher films of the
late-'70s/early-'80s, than those of the "oh-so-clever," jokey, post-"Scream"
era of the late-'90s. With everything from "Scream" and its sequels, to "I
Know What You Did Last Summer" and its sequel, to "Urban Legend" and its
sequel, following the same pattern of a mystery killer offing teenage
characters until their identity is exposed and they explain their motive to
the remaining cast members, it was a genuine pleasure to sit back and watch a
group of non-teen actors getting dispatched of in a grisly way, with the
motive of the killer determined within the opening five minutes. Sure, there
is still a whodunit quality to the proceedings, but the payoff is quite
different and surprisingly refreshing from the recent slew of, as Roger Ebert
calls them, Mad Slasher Movies.
"Valentine" also follows in the footsteps of the nostalgic holiday-set
slashers, such as 1978's "Halloween," 1974's "Black Christmas," 1980's "New
Year's Evil," and even 1981's "My Bloody Valentine." The movie makes no bones
about its old-fashioned,
"let-me-go-bathe-in-the-hot-tub-as-a-killer-lurks-in-the-house" horror
conventions, but that is part of the fun. The impressive production values,
however, are very much of a decidedly 2001 nature, as is its healthy budget
that afforded such rising young stars as Denise Richards (1999's "The World
is Not Enough"), David Boreanaz (WB's "Angel"), Katherine Heigl (WB's
"Roswell"), and Marley Shelton (2000's "Sugar & Spice").
In a prologue set at a junior high school dance in 1988, a nerdy,
bespectacled boy is severely traumatized when he asks five classmates to
dance, all of which turn him down except one--a heavyset girl who later
accused him of attacking her in front of other classmates. Switch forward 13
years, four of the now-grown girls reunite at the funeral of the fifth,
Shelley (Katherine Heigl), who is brutally murdered while studying for her
pre-med final. Immediately afterwards, sweet-natured Kate (Marley Shelton),
sexy Paige (Denise Richards), bitchy Lily (Jessica Cauffiel), and the
now-pretty, poor-little-rich-girl Dorothy (Jessica Capshaw), begin receiving
grisly, threatening Valentine cards as the holiday approaches. Could their
former middle school classmate, whom they haven't seen in years, be out to
seek revenge on those that did him wrong? And if so, might he be someone that
is already in their lives?
Loosely based on the acclaimed novel by Tom Savage, "Valentine" stands out
from the recent spate of slasher films because of its simple throwback to the
setup and payoff of the horror movies of old. Aside from natural humor that
surfaces from some of the dialogue, the film takes itself very seriously, and
divulges several good scary moments and more than a couple thrilling,
suspenseful setpieces. While many of the older, lesser slasher flicks relied
on nothing more than gore and exploitative violence, "Valentine" manages to
keep the tension level high, and is actually pretty tame as far as
blood-and-guts goes. There's a bit of that, to be sure, but talented director
Jamie Blanks, whose first film, "Urban Legend," was the best of the
post-"Scream" knockoffs, is more interested in stylish camera movements,
tight editing, and genuinely unsettling sequences of mayhem to create a
distinct atmosphere of dread.
One of the biggest stars of "Valentine" is its gorgeously sleek, threatening
production design by Stephen Geaghan, which becomes a character all its own,
particularly in the climax set at a Valentine's Day party at Dorothy's
family's wooded mansion. The cinematography, by Rick Bota, is also top-notch,
particularly its truly eerie use of red to not only cleverly foreshadow the
holiday, but also the threat of death that grows around the characters as the
story progresses. The makers of "Valentine" have succeeded awesomely in their
challenge to make the title holiday palpably felt, and potentially dangerous.
The characters are a grab-bag of both the likable and spiteful variety, which
actually aids the film more than it hurts it, because, in some strange way,
we are supposed to feel sympathy for the killer. The jury is still out if
director Blanks is successful on this count, but he does allow you to at
least grow to care about three of the characters--Kate; her boyfriend Adam
(David Boreanaz), who is struggling with his alcoholism; and Dorothy, who has
now lost a lot of weight but feels remorse for the way she treated her junior
high classmate when she was really in the same boat as he at the time.
Marley Shelton ably provides the honest center for the film, and is better
here than she was in the recent "Sugar & Spice." Getting to play a more
adult, mature character, Shelton is a beautiful face, and just the sight of
her smile creates an overwhelming feeling of warmth and realism. More
importantly, she is very good as the put-upon Kate, and hopefully this will
be her breakthrough role.
The biggest name in the cast is Denise Richards, whose performances have
ranged from trashily great (1998's "Wild Things") to middling (1999's "Drop
Dead Gorgeous") to downright bad ("The World Is Not Enough"). As the sexually
powerful Paige, who takes almost everything in her life for granted,
including her own attractiveness, Richards respectably creates a well-rounded
character with the material provided, and even gets a few chances to test out
her comedic skills.
In his first feature film since he hit it big on TV's "Buffy, the Vampire
Slayer" and currently its spinoff, "Angel," David Boreanaz does fine work in
a mostly superfluous supporting role, while Kate Capshaw, as Dorothy, turns
in a poignant portrayal of someone who is so insecure with herself that she
doesn't yet know where she fits into the world. Finally, Katherine Heigl is
memorable with only ten minutes of screen time as the first victim of the
creepy Cherub mask-wearing killer.
The purpose of a slasher film is two-fold: it should be entertaining, yet
scary, fun, yet nail-biting. It's fairly safe to say director Blanks and
screenwriters Donna Powers, Wayne Powers, Gretchen J. Berg, and Aaron
Harberts were not attempting to recreate the wheel when they made
"Valentine," so there is no use in even expecting a masterpiece. However,
thanks to Blanks' numerous inspired Hitchcockian elements that he subtly pays
tribute to, as well as the surprising twist ending that, for once, does make
sense, "Valentine" ends up being the next best thing: a modern-day slasher
pic that is a step above most.

Title
Review for Ready to Rumble (2000)
Directed by Brian Robbins.
Cast: Scott Caan, David Arquette, Oliver Platt, Richard Lineback, Rose 
McGowan, Martin Landau, Bill Goldberg, Joe Pantoliano, Diamond Dallas Page, 
Caroline Rhea, Ellen Albertini Dow, Kathleen Freeman, Chris Owen, Steve 
'Sting' Borden.
2000 - 107 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity, violence, brief nudity, and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, April 8, 2000.
The quality (or lack thereof) of "Ready to Rumble," an atrociously 
ill-advised comedy directed by Brian Robbins (1999's "Varsity Blues"), can be 
boiled down to one statement: take "Dumb & Dumber," add a wrestling angle to 
the storyline, and strip the proceedings of all signs of wit, interest, and 
laughs. 
Gordie (David Arquette) and Sean (Scott Caan) are lifelong best friends whose 
IQs are well into the lower double-digits, and who clean out septic tanks and 
port-a-potties for a living. Their lives revolve solely around two things: 
sewage and WCW wrestling, particularly their obsessive loyalty to their 
undefeated hero, Jimmy King (Oliver Platt). When the infamous (to them) 
Monday Night Nitro arrives in their small Wyoming town, Gordie and Sean 
eagerly are able to acquire tickets, but devastated when the King, for the 
first time, is defeated by Diamond Dallas Page (playing himself), and thus, 
gets his title of WCW Wrestler of the World taken away from him. Tracking the 
King down, Gordie and Sean find him holed up in a trailer park, almost 
penniless and boozed up into a drunken stupor. Their image of him remains 
untarnished, however, as their faithfulness overcomes the discouragingly 
troubled human being in front of them, and they persuade the King to attempt 
a comeback. 
"Ready to Rumble" is the type of nonsensical movie that one watches with a 
detached air in between them and the screen, until the moment when they 
question how something of such incredible vacuity was ever greenlit by the 
studio. The moment came for me during a dream sequence involving Gordie 
beating up the insulting worker of a convenience store. That moment was also, 
calamitously, at the five-minute mark of this overlong, 107-minute waste of 
celluloid. With nary a trace of clever writing or original subject matter for 
its so-called jokes, the film relies heavily on the needless exploitation of 
profanity-spewing women (including the charming Ellen Albertini Dow, the 
rappin' granny in 1998's "The Wedding Singer") and humor involving sewage, 
flatulence, and, well, there's a lot of sewage pratfalls. The only scene 
worth a deserved laugh is one in which Gordie and Sean hitch a ride with a 
van full of "Hallelujah"-singing nuns who, before long, are being taught the 
lyrics to "Shout at the Devil."
>From David Arquette to Scott Caan to Oliver Platt to Academy Award winner 
Martin Landau (as a retired wrestler who Gordie and Sean turn to for help in 
shaping up the King), what were these usually reliable actors thinking when 
they chose to participate in the making of such a film? Arquette, who is in 
great need of a barbituates overdose, hoots and hollers a lot, but does 
little else, while Scott Caan seems to be grinning and bearing his appearance 
here. Oddly enough, Oliver Platt is just about the least likely person to 
ever become a professional wrestler, and his casting is more of a stunt than 
anything; surely, a real-life wrestler would have fit this unfunny, 
straight-man role far more snugly, rather than a comedian who is given little 
chance to do anything other than look disgruntled. 
Once in an interview, actress Rose McGowan stated that she knew what a 
talented actress she could be, given the right material. There is no doubt 
that she can be good--just check out her standout performances in 1995's "The 
Doom Generation" and 1996's "Scream"--but, if so, then why is she wasting her 
time in such a disposable role, as Sasha, a scheming Nitro girl who has a 
fling with Gordie?
Thinking back of "Ready to Rumble," I am left with few words to describe the 
viewing experience, because it disparagingly leaves you with so little to 
think about or take away. There are amusing low-brow comedies (1980's 
"Airplane!," anything from the Farrelly brothers--heck, even 1996's "Happy 
Gilmore"), and then there are movies like "Ready to Rumble," that amaze you 
with their sheer stupidity and unwillingness to create anything that is the 
least bit worthy of wasting two hours of your life with. 

Title
Review for Pauline  la plage (1983)
 Directed by Eric Rohmer.
 Cast: Amanda Langlet, Arielle Dombsale, Pascal Greggory, Fedoor Atkine, 
 Simon De La Brosse, Rosette.
 1983 - 94 minutes - French - Subtitled.
 Rated R (for nudity and sexual situations).
 Reviewed October 5, 1998.
 By Dustin Putman 
 Dustin Putman's Film Reviews ">Http://members.aol.com/filmfan16/index.html>
 Eric Rohmer's "Pauline at the Beach," is one of those small, 
 deliberately paced, but charming foreign films in which not much happens 
 plot wise, but a lot happens to the characters emotionally.
 The film takes place during a few weeks of August at the Normandy Coast, 
 and centers on six different characters, primarily Pauline (Amanda 
 Langlet), a wise beyond her years 15-year-old who has come to stay for 
 the summer with her older cousin, Marion (Arielle Dombasle). On the 
 first day at the beach, Marion runs into an old high school flame 
 (Fedoore Atkine), and although he wants to rekindle their relationship, 
 she is more interested in an older, more seductive womanizer (Pascal 
 Greggory), who is also secretly having an affair with a candy vendor 
 (Rosette). While Pauline watches as an outsider at what is happening 
 between all of the adults, she forms a relationship of her own with a 
 young teenage boy (Simon De La Brosse). 
 "Pauline at the Beach," is not a film in which big dramatic things 
 occur, and there is not a clear-cut, tidy conclusion to the story. 
 Instead, it is a picture that simply observes its characters in every 
 day life, and the surprises come from little character details. The film 
 is quite talky and slow moving, and so it is pretty safe to say it isn't 
 for those who are only a fan of action movies, but is a treat for those 
 viewers who often like to venture outside of the big-budget genre and 
 see a good art film.
 This is the first film by acclaimed director Eric Rohmer (1969's "My 
 Night at Mauds," and 1971's "Claire's Knee") that I have seen, but his 
 direction is assured and intelligent, as is the screenplay, which he 
 also wrote. "Pauline at the Beach," is a film worth seeing.

Title
Review for Vampires (1998)
Directed by John Carpenter.
Cast: James Woods, Daniel Baldwin, Sheryl Lee, Thomas Ian Griffith, 
Maximillian Schell, Tom Guinee.
1998 - 105 minutes.
Rated R (for violence, profanity, gore, nudity, and sexual situations).
Reviewed October 31, 1998.
By Dustin Putman 
Dustin Putman's Film Reviews >
There was a time when John Carpenter was a great horror director. Of 
course, his best film was 1978's masterpiece, "Halloween," but he also 
made 1980's "The Fog," and 1987's underrated, "Prince of Darkness." 
Heck, he even made a good film in 1995, with "In the Mouth of Madness." 
But something terribly wrong happened to him in 1992, with the terrible 
comedy, "Memoirs of an Invisible Man." Somehow, Carpenter has lost his 
touch, with junk like his failed 1995 remake of, "Village of the 
Damned," to his uninspired 1996 sequel, "Escape From L.A." Those movies, 
however, look like cinematic works of art compared to his latest film, 
"John Carpenter's Vampires." If I was him, I definately wouldn't want to 
put my own name in the title. It is a sad state of affairs when 
Carpenter can make something as misguided and flatly written and filmed 
as, "Vampires."
The story is simple. Jack Crow (James Woods) is a vampire hunter who, 
along with one of his partners, Montoya (Daniel Baldwin), and a 
prostitute, Katrina (Sheryl Lee), survives an attack from the Master 
vampire, Valek (Thomas Ian Griffith). Since Katrina was previously 
bitten by him, Crow takes her along because anyone who is bitten by 
Valek becomes telepathically linked to him until they themselves turn 
into vampires a couple days later, and Crow is hoping to find him with 
the help of her. It seems Valek's mission is to steal a black, wooden 
cross from a Roman Catholic church that will enable him to become so 
powerful that sunlight will not destroy him.
My question is: how many time have we seen this same story played out? 
Well, the answer is just about as many times as a better version of the 
story has been made. "John Carpenter's Vampires," sadly enough, is one 
of the most unscary horror films I've ever seen. In fact, there isn't 
even one suspenseful moment in the whole 105-minute running time. The 
non-stop vampire attack sequences are stylelessly filmed, without any 
interesting camera work, which is usually a trademark of Carpenter's. 
And then we come to the screenplay, which, as far as I can tell, is 
nearly non-existent. There is no story development, and there isn't even 
an attempt to flesh out the characters.
James Woods can be a good actor, but he has nothing to do here but to 
say a couple of "pseudo"-clever lines of dialogue. Daniel Baldwin has 
some potential, but his character comes off as being very dense. And 
Sheryl Lee (faring much better as Laura Palmer in "Twin Peaks"), like 
all of the female characters, plays an offensive stereotypical whore. 
There is not an ounce of intelligence, or excitement in, "John 
Carpenter's Vamires," which is very disheartening coming from an ex-fan 
of Carpenter's. He has said that he turned down directing, "Halloween: 
H20," because he couldn't work up any excitement for it. And yet, when 
asked about a "Vampires" sequel, he said he would be happy to do it. I 
think that's a definite sign that Carpenter has finally lost any trace 
of his lasting talent, not to mention a significant number of IQ points. 

Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)
Directed by George Lucas.
Cast: Liam Neeson, Jake Lloyd, Natalie Portman, Ewan McGregor, Pernilla 
August, Samuel L. Jackson, Ray Park. 
Voices: Ahmed Best, Frank Oz, Anthony Daniels, Kenny Baker.
1999 - 131 minutes
Rated PG (for mild violence).
Reviewed May 20, 1999. 
"Star Wars" fans across the nation have been waiting sixteen years for 
the promised prequels to the most popular series in motion picture 
history. The original trilogy somehow captured viewers' imaginations 
like no other movie possibly could, taking them on a wild ride through 
never-before-seen places and meeting unforgettable characters and 
creatures. The most die-hard fanatics have been sitting outside the 
Mann's Chinese Theater in L.A. for over a month, simply to be the first 
in line to see director-creator George Lucas' latest opus. On Wednesday, 
May 12, advance tickets went on sale at 3:00 p.m., and I was instantly 
in amazement, arriving at the theater almost two hours before the 
tickets were to be sold, to see a line going all the way around the 
building. Many people were said to have camped out overnight (and this 
is in the small town of Frederick, MD!), and the two guys next to me in 
line both said that they had called off work on that day. Ultimately, I 
waited three hours to get tickets to the 7:30 nighttime showing on "May 
19," a date that will probably be forever ingrained in some peoples' 
minds. Expectations were so high for the film, with many nearly treating 
the impending release as "The Second Coming." On the other hand, I have 
never been that big of a fan of "Star Wars." I like them, and in the 
case of 1980's "The Empire Strikes Back," I nearly loved it, but I am 
far from a crazed devotee. I couldn't, however, pass up going to see 
this "Event" on the day it opened.
The film in question is, obviously, "Star Wars: Episode 1--The Phantom 
Menace," set many years before the goings-on in the original trilogy, 
Episodes IV, V, and VI. Going in, I chose to not have any sort of 
expectations (although they admittedly were kind of low), but to simply 
hope the film would do its job in amazing and exciting me. Early 
critical reviews have not been very kind, but there have been a slew of 
overwhelmingly positive ones, including Roger Ebert and Janet Maslin (of 
"The New York Times"). And so, without any certain presumptions, the 
final word on "The Phantom Menace" is that it is perhaps the most 
visually astounding motion picture I have ever seen, far more 
stimulating than the previous "Star Wars" movies, due to such 
extravagant technological visual effects advancements since the 
late-'70s/early-'80s. Unfortunately, those movies by-and-large had one 
vital element that this movie is sorely lacking, and that is any sort of 
character involvement. While Han Solo, Lucas Skywalker, and Princess 
Leia were likable characters with distinct personalities, "The Phantom 
Menace" holds no such close scrutiny. But then again, that leads to 
another predicament, which is that this film is only the first in a 
planned prequel trilogy, meaning that many of the characters will, no 
doubt, be further explored and development in the later installments, 
currently due out in theaters in 2002 and 2005. Problems abound in "The 
Phantom Menace," many more than there needed to be, but George Lucas 
truthfully had an overwhelming amount of elements to handle here, as he 
had to do the most difficult thing so far in the series, and that is to 
start it with the first vital chapter in the "Star Wars" legacy. You 
would be out of your league to say Lucas succeeded on every level, but 
he did do a respectable job, and treated me to extraordinary images that 
are worth the price of admission alone.
"Episode 1" begins as The Trade Federation are preparing an attack on 
the planet of Naboo, headed by the 14-year-old Queen Amidala (Natalie 
Portman), whose life is in jeopardy. After a narrow escape from the 
Federation, who turn out to be more twisted and corrupt than expected, 
two Jedi Knights, the no-nonsense, scruffy Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson), 
and his apprentice, Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor), set off for Naboo to 
rescue the Queen and take her to Tatooine, a planet of safety. When 
their spacecraft breaks down, they venture out into a small desert town 
where they come into contact with two slaves, Shmi Skywalker (Pernilla 
August) and her 9-year-old son, Anakin (Jack Lloyd). Sensing the Force 
is with Anakin, and that he is destined to become a powerful Jedi, he 
hesitantly leaves behind his mother to join Qui-Gon and Obi-Wan, 
promising to return and set her free one day from a slave life.
Since "The Phantom Menace" has the tiresome task of setting up 
everything to come later on, the villains come off more as an 
afterthought. The main one, I suppose, is Darth Maul (Ray Park), a 
fiendish sith with red-and-black face makeup, but he is literally given 
about four scenes and three lines of dialogue. How are we supposed to 
feel negatively towards Maul when we don't really even know who he is, 
and we never actually see him do any bad things, save for the inevitable 
climactic lightsaber battle between Qui-Gon, Obi-Wan, and himself? 
Villains probably aren't the point in this installment, though, and 
since they are so uninvolving and slight, it doesn't come off as a major 
problem.
Sure, this movie is basically an arrangement for everything to come, but 
that still isn't an excuse for what does come off as a problem, and that 
is the performances, which are as lifeless as a piece of chopped-up 
wood. Neeson and McGregor are the centerpiece of the film, but we learn 
almost nothing about them, and they recite their lines without any 
feeling, as if their hearts weren't really into it. Maybe it is not the 
actors' faults, since they are so thinly written. At any rate, I'm sure 
McGregor felt especially out of place since he is a real actor, and 
probably not used to being what is essentially a background prop who 
stands there like a good boy and rarely says anything. Jake Lloyd, as 
young Anakin Skywalker, later to become Darth Vader, is an unctuous 
child actor if I ever saw one, with almost nary a line of dialogue that 
he is able to pull off. Surely, Lucas could have found a stronger, more 
assured actor to fit the bill of what is the most vital character in the 
film, as Lloyd is annoying and seemingly always aware that he is "in" a 
movie. Out of the four central roles, Natalie Portman easily fares best, 
but did you expect anything less of her? At 17-years-old, she is already 
a near-veteran, popping onto the scene in 1994 with her heartbreaking 
performance in "The Professional," and carrying it over to what was a 
performance snubbed of an Oscar nomination, in 1996's "Beautiful Girls." 
Portman knows how to make a scene work, even when the material isn't up 
to her level, and it will be intriguing to follow her character's 
development in Episodes II and III. Pernilla August, a Swedish actress 
in her first American film, is touching as Anakin's solemn, caring 
mother, and in each of her scenes she gives Neeson and Lloyd a run for 
their acting money. Also making brief appearances are Yoda (voiced by 
Frank Oz) and Mace Windu (Samuel L. Jackson), who sense an underlying 
uneasiness within Anakin, as well as friendly androids, R2-D2 (voiced by 
Kenny Baker) and an unfinished C-3P0 (voiced by Anthony Daniels). 
Brought to life as "Star Wars"'s first-ever major character that is 
completely computer-generated is the amphibious Jar Jar Binks (voiced by 
Ahmed Best) who, judging from his thick accent, must have been born and 
raised in the outskirts of Jamaica. Much talk has been raised about how 
Jar Jar is an annoying, kid-friendly addition to the film, and although 
he is probably more targeted for the children in the audience, I 
actually did like him, and his goofy, lovable nature. He is integrated 
seamlessly into each frame, never really looking like a special effect, 
and gives a better performance overall than any of the humans do.
If the characters are lacking depth and three dimensions, no one can 
accuse "Star Wars: Episode 1--The Phantom Menace" of not being original 
and often awe-inspiring. The landscapes and marvelous city vistas are 
never anything less than powerful, majestic, and sumptuous, 
picture-perfect images that I could stare at for hours on end. Words 
really can't describe the visual experience of "The Phantom Menace," but 
every frame in the 131-minute movie is gorgeous to look at. Some images 
I will never forget include: the atmospheric, dreamy overhead views of 
the city skyscrapers in the planet, Coruscant; the endless green fields 
in Naboo where a climactic war is held; the Queen's kingdom, which is 
surrounded by curved, bubble-like buildings, as well as a crystal-clear 
waterfall leading into a river; and an underwater city in Naboo, 
populated by fish, giant water creatures, and Jar Jar Binks' own race of 
giant, floopy-eared pseudo-hares. "The Phantom Menace" is such an 
optical triumph that, like "Terminator 2"'s liquid-metal and "Jurassic 
Park"'s dinosaurs, stands as a new turning point in visual effects 
artistry, this time proving that every frame can look completely 
believable, as if no effects were even actually used. If I didn't know 
better, I'd say that Naboo, Tatooine, and the underwater city were 
actual places that exist.
"The Phantom Menace," although more dialogue-oriented than 
action-inclined, as in 1977's "Star Wars," nonetheless includes some 
startling setpieces, including an exciting, superbly-crafted pod race 
that Anakin enters in with a pod he has made himself. Soaring through 
rock passageways and down cliffs, this sequence is the first true sign 
that we are back in "Star Wars" territory, and it is further carried out 
in the climax, which intercuts between three separate action storylines, 
including a war in the fields of Naboo between an army of robots from 
the Confederation and the amphibious Naboo residents; a fight to the 
death between Darth Maul, Qui-Gon Jinn, and Obi-Wan Kenobi; and the weak 
link, due to the corny, throwaway one-liners and weak acting by Lloyd, a 
space battle between Anakin and enemy troops.
Flawed as it is, "Star Wars: Episode 1--The Phantom Menace" captured my 
imagination and I enjoyed it. With a more tightly-written screenplay and 
characters, George Lucas would have really had something, but just as 
with "Episode IV," you have to look at the movie as a jumping-off point 
for the two later films, which most likely will be better on the story 
and, hopefully, on the performance levels. Going into "The Phantom 
Menace," I wasn't actually a "Star Wars" fan, but coming out I wanted more; 
I wanted to see what was going to happen next. "Episode II" may be three 
years away, but I'm already highly anticipating it, and the 
imperfections of "Episode I" have only sparked my interest even more 
since, like "The Empire Strikes Back," it is sure to be superior.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Gods and Monsters (1998)
Directed by Bill Condon.
Cast: Ian McKellen, Brendan Fraser, Lynn Redgrave, Lolita Davidovich.
1998 - 106 minutes.
Rated R (for profanity, brief nudity, and sexual situations).
Reviewed January 8, 1999.
Bill Condon's "Gods and Monsters" is a fascinating look into the last 
days in the life of gay director James Whale (Ian McKellan), who made 
the horror classics "Frankenstein" and "Bride of Frankenstein." Since I 
was unfamiliar of Whale prior to viewing the film, there is no way to 
know how accurate the film is, but I suspect that much of it only came 
from Whale's inner fantasies and hallucinations. 
Whale, who fought in WWI and then went on to become known for his work 
on horror pictures, decided fifteen years before his death at age 67 to 
quit filmmaking once a homosexual scandal broke out involving him. As 
the film tells it, during the end of his life, Whale, at his large home 
in L.A., became infatuated with the tall, handsome, and much younger 
man, Clayton Boone (Brendan Fraser), who was working as the gardener at 
his home. James Whale, we learn quickly was, what many people refer to 
him as in the film, "a dirty old man." In one of the opening scenes, a 
young film enthusiast visits Whale's home to interview him and Whale 
agrees, on one condition: for every question he answers, the young man 
must take off an article of clothing. Because of this episode, we know 
exactly what it is Whale wants when he asks Clayton to pose for him for 
a painting, later making the excuse that his bright, white shirt is 
disracting only so he will take it off. Clayon agrees, and doesn't 
really think much of this, much to the warnings of his friends, becoming 
more and more intrigued in the stories Whale tells him about his past. 
Certainly, the relationship between Whale and Boone is headed for a 
downfall, since Whale starts to grow a deep love for this young man, 
even though Boone is not gay, and Whale himself realizes he is nearing 
the conclusion to his life, as he begins to seldom suffer mild strokes 
and moments of true catharsis.
"Gods and Monsters" is an intimate and seemingly respectful portrait of 
a director who was forced to become somewhat of an outcast, due to his 
sexual preference, and never got the recognition he would have liked, 
since he longed to be referred to as a "motion picture director," rather 
than a "horror director." And in one heartbreaking scene, he attends a 
party with Boone being his guest, held by director George Cuckor, and 
finds that many of the other attendees do not recognize him anymore. It 
is evident that Whale's first love in his life was making movies, and 
when his career ultimately fell apart, so did his passion in life. 
As played brilliantly by Ian McKellen, James Whale comes off as a sad, 
but dignified man, and a person who was not afraid to stand out from 
others, just as long as he knew he was being true to himself. He never 
hid the fact that he was gay, however, even if it meant threatening his 
filmmaking profession, and it was this unblinking honesty that made him 
a great person. Through the complicated relationship that develops 
between Whale and Boone, Boone, of course, only things of Whale as a 
possible friend or someone he can talk to, while it means so much more 
to Whale, who sees Boone as sort of his salvation in life. Although 
Boone is only in a dead-end job as a gardener of people's homes, Whale 
views him as the ideal man, not only one that is good-looking, even 
though it is this attraction that first begins his feelings, but one 
that will actually listen to him. Since Whale lives with only his loyal, 
but disapproving maid (touchingly portrayed by Lynn Redgrave), it is 
Boone that Whale can talk to in his ultimate reclusion from the world, 
and the only reason Whale finally decides to attend the gathering of 
George Cuckor.
Although an extremely fine and mature picture, a few small elements hold 
the film back from ultimate greatness. It is appreciated that the film 
does not pull for any obvious or overly dramatic story developments, but 
it is a little thin, and the structuring of the "on-again-off-again" 
friendship at the film's center is fairly predictable. We know early on 
where these two characters are headed, and we can guess that there will 
be a final confrontation between the two as the tension slowly builds. 
In lesser hands, this set-up might have felt too calculated, but it is 
not in the surprisingly deft treatment and writing that helps the film 
to be much more than this. Also, a subplot is briefly brought up between 
Clayton and a waitress working at a bar (effectively played by Lolita 
Davidovich), but abruptly dropped and never brought up again. If the 
film was not going to follow up on this side story, then it, perhaps, 
should have been taken out altogether.
"Gods and Monsters" is a heartfelt and intelligent motion picture, 
impressively directed by Bill Condon, who, I sense, relates to or fully 
understands the meaning behind the curious relationship between Whale 
and Boone. The film also plays as a tribute to a fine man who met an 
untimely end. Walking away from "Gods and Monsters," it was Ian 
McKellen's marvelous and astounding performance that left the most 
impression on me, and I doubt there could have been anyone who could 
have stepped into the role more fully and believably. It is a sad 
testament when a person's true talent and love is unfairly taken away 
from them, based on the scrutinization and judgement of their personal 
life, which, ironically enough, is no one else's business in the first 
place. 
      - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
        Dustin
Putman's Film Haven >

Title
Review for Election (1999)
Directed by Alexander Payne.
Cast: Matthew Broderick, Reese Witherspoon, Chris Klein, Jessica 
Campbell, Molly Hagan, Mark Harelik, Jeannine Jackson, Colleen Camp, 
Phil Reeves, Matt Molloy. 
1999 - 103 minutes
Rated R (for sexual situations and profanity).
Reviewed May 8, 1999.
Well, who would have thunk it? After an endless stream of mostly 
predictable and cliched movies set in high school in the last year, one 
has finally come along that is amazingly so precise, so hilarious, so 
biting, so smart, so perfect, in every one of its minute details that it 
comes as a sort of godsend. Its name is "Election," it's directed by 
Alexander Payne (1996's "Citizen Ruth"), and it, no doubt, will go down 
as one of the very best films of 1999.
Set at Omaha's Carver High School during the election for student 
council, the film imaginatively is narrated by all four of the main 
characters so that we can learn and understand the innerworkings of 
their minds, even when they are saying the opposite of the actions they 
are making. Jim McAllister (Matthew Broderick, coming full circle from 
his role in 1986's classic "Ferris Bueller's Day Off") is the school's 
most popular teacher, a guy who has won the Best Teacher Award for three 
years running and who shows up at school nice and early each day. 
Friendly to (almost) all of his pupils, the one student who manages to 
get under his skin so much that he can't stand her is overachieving 
senior Tracey Flick (Reese Witherspoon), currently running unopposed for 
school president. If you're old enough to have experienced high school, 
you've definately run into someone like Tracey. She's the "perfect" 
student, a person who seems friendly to everyone even though you can see 
through their thin facade; a person who constantly raises their hand in 
class and knows every answer to every question; and a person who you 
know, no matter what, is going to achieve everything that he or she 
strives for in life. It's just Mr. McAllister's luck, then, that he 
happens to also run the student elections and, determined to cause 
Tracey to lose just one thing in her life, he convinces naively cheerful 
football jock, Paul Metzler (Chris Klein), who has recently broken his 
leg in a skiing accident, to run against her for president. Altough at 
first hesitant, Paul quickly grows eager to join the race, causing 
Tracey to grow outraged. For her, this means war. But that's not all; in 
a plot twist whose particulars should be discovered on your own, Paul's 
younger, rebellious sister, Tammy (Jessica Campbell), a sophomore, also 
enters into the race, causing a three-way tug-of-war between Tammy, who 
poses to the students that she doesn't even care if she wins the 
election, and as president, won't do anything; Paul, who is joyous just 
to be in the running; and dear, dear Tracey, who will go to any length 
possible to ensure her ultimate defeat.
Reading the premise, "Election" may sound like "just another teen 
flick," but it isn't by a long shot, and is in its masterful treatment 
that it succeeds so highly. I can assure you there is no climax set at 
the prom, and the story doesn't cowardly degenerate into a romance 
concerning which guy gets the girl. No, what "Election" is is a 
brilliantly articulated satire, a "high school" movie that is probably 
targeted more towards adults, but that all thoughtful teens will greatly 
appreciate as a much-needed diversion from all of those sugar-coated 
teen fantasies that have assaulted the multiplex in recent months. 
Although "about" a high school election, it gradually grows clear that 
telling such a simple, clear-cut story isn't director Payne's 
intentions. Not only is there a heavy dosage of narration by the four 
principle characters, but the film also isn't always told 
chronologically, as each plot thread is carefully and delightfully torn 
away to not only create a more meaningful motion picture, but also one 
that has something to say about loneliness. Through the big, sly laughs 
that the film creates, it is revealed that each of the characters are 
lonely, in their own certain way, and we are taken into each one of 
their lives to learn just why they are the way they are.
For example, we eventually find that Jim McAllister is obviously 
unhappily married (even though he says during narration that his wife is 
"his source of strength"). When his buddy and a fellow teacher, Dave 
Novotny (Mark Harelik), is fired for having a sexual relationship with 
one of his students, Jim grows closer to Dave's solemn wife, spending 
more and more time with her and convincing himself that he loves her, 
not realizing that it isn't love that draws them together, but 
desperation. Jim's life is a monotonous and dull routine, as he goes to 
school, teaches the same things over day after day, and then goes home 
to the same woman that he has been married to for nine years. Certainly 
a lot of people have this sort of life, but Jim needs more. Matthew 
Broderick, who has fallen on hard times in recent years (1997's 
"Addicted to Love," 1998's "Godzilla"), has revitalized his career with 
"Election," and has, indeed, given his strongest, most gratifying 
performance since "Ferris Bueller" thirteen years ago. We don't just see 
his sadness, we feel it.
Matching Broderick in every way is Reese Witherspoon, maybe the most 
talented actress under 25 working today, who has never been better. It 
would be criminal to see her flawless, nuanced, and hilarious 
performance get snubbed of an Oscar nomination come next year. 
Witherspoon transforms herself so completely into the heart, soul, and 
body of Tracey that it will be difficult from now on to distinguish the 
two personalities, although she is so wonderful in every film that she 
should have no trouble doing just that. In the character of Tracey 
Flick, we have also been given one of the most distinguished and 
memorable characters I've probably ever seen in my years of 
film-watching. She is the type of girl who you really shouldn't like at 
all. She's perky, she's unblemished, she's successful, but she is also 
so desperate and determined to be a winner that you can't help but feel 
genuinely sorry for her when things don't go her way. Like Jim 
McAllister, no matter what feats Tracey seems to triumph over she 
remains a lonely person without any actual friends. In a couple brief 
scenes involving her paralegal mother (Colleen Camp), we get a few hints 
as to what made Tracey the way she is. Although loving, her mother 
strives for the same exact great success as Tracey.
Chris Klein and Jessica Campbell, two film newcomers, also fit neatly 
into their respective roles. Klein is probably the most completely 
likable character in the film, as his Paul comes off as always innocent, 
even after we see him doing several arguably negative things, because he 
is so unintelligible and dense that he never really comprehends the 
things he's doing. There's no denying, however, that Paul has a big 
heart, and he cares about others. Jessica Campbell turns in a touching 
performance as the outsider, Tammy, who is torn apart when the girl she 
loves breaks up with her. "I'm not really a lesbian, though," Tammy 
reassures. "It just so happens that so far all of the people I have been 
attracted to have been girls."
If "She's All That" is "'Pygmalion' set in a high school" and "10 Things 
I Hate About You" is "'The Taming of the Shrew' set in a high school," 
"Election" is "'Fargo' set in a high school," and out of the three the 
latter is definately the highest honor. We don't necessarily watch 
"Election" as much as we absorb every single second of its constant 
entertainment and pleasures, excited to find out where it will lead us. 
Of technical note, the music score by Rolfe Tent is distinct and often 
even gains laughs because of its frightening perfection, sort of like 
Tracey herself. Writers Payne and Jim Taylor have fashioned one of the 
most fresh and original screenplays to come along in some time, as it 
never condescends to any of its potential audience members, whether it 
be adults or teens. "Election" is a dazzling dark comedy, clear in both 
tone and substance, and has the ability to be rib-tickling one moment 
and poignant the next, all the while never losing sight of its 
truthfulness and courage. In a week when "The Mummy" will unfairly be 
the #1 movie in America, making tens of millions of dollars, "Election" 
is the real deal, and now that it is in wide release, make it an effort 
to go out and see this sure-to-be classic as soon as humanly possible.
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Jawbreaker (1999)
Directed by Darren Stein.
Cast: Rose McGowan, Rebecca Gayheart, Judy Greer, Julie Benz, Chad 
Christ, Carol Kane, Pam Grier, Ethan Erickson, Charlotte Roldan, Tatyana 
Ali, P.J. Soles, William Katt.
1999 - 86 minutes.
Rated R (for profanity, sexual situations, and a gruesome depiction of a 
dead body).
Reviewed February 23, 1999.
"Jawbreaker," Darren Stein's auspicious sophomore directing effort (his 
debut feature, "Sparklers," is due out later this spring), is a wicked 
and darkly comic tale of accidental murder and then (partial) 
redemption. To get the comparison out of the way, yes, "Jawbreaker" owes 
quite a bit to the 1989 high school black comedy, "Heathers," and I 
can't really imagine this film being made if that one didn't already 
exist. I will also admit that "Heathers," on the whole, is a marginally 
superior film, because its themes and "message" were presented in a more 
fashionable and effective way, but "Jawbreaker" is certainly more 
visually stylish.
"Jawbreaker" starts off with a brief slow-motion shot of the "Fearsome 
Four," four beautiful and wildly popular young women, walking down a 
high school hallway as they are introduced, played appropriately to the 
rock song, "Yoo Hoo," by Imperial Teen. There's the leader and ice 
queen, Courtney (Rose McGowan), the ditzy follower, Marcie (Julie Benz), 
the slightly reluctant Julie (Rebecca Gayheart), and the sweet Liz Purr 
(Charlotte Roldan), who is kind to everyone, an "angel," if you will. 
Immediately afterwards, Courtney, Marcie, and Julie, garbed in masks, 
set out to play a birthday prank on Liz by tying her up, gagging her by 
stuffing a large jawbreaker into her mouth, and throwing her in the 
trunk of their car. While stopping for breakfast at a cafe, they are 
shocked to discover that poor Liz has accidentally swallowed and 
asphyxiated on the jawbreaker. Desperate to cover everything up, 
Courtney, the cool cat (or lion), grasps a plan: carry Liz back up to 
her bedroom and stage what will appear to look like a violent and kinky 
rape by an unknown assailant. Unfortunately, while still at Liz's house, 
the three are paid an unwelcome visit by the geeky and unattractive, but 
kind-hearted Fern Mayo (Judy Greer), who has come to drop off Liz's 
homework assignments. Thinking quick, Courtney proposes an offer Fern 
can't refuse: she will elect Fern into their elite clique, give her a 
make-over, and turn her into "Vylette." But as "Vylette" grows more and 
more corrupt and bitchy, Julie, who has had a guilty conscience the 
whole time, decides she wants out of the group, grabbing a romantic, 
suave new boyfriend (Chad Christ) who is in the drama club, and begins 
to wrestle with what she should do: tell the truth about Courtney, or 
risk getting into trouble herself since she was, after all, an 
accomplice to the crime.
Although "Jawbreaker" may bill itself as a dark comedy, and there are a 
few small laughs, I found the film to be a little bit more serious, 
particularly in dealing with the surprisingly complex (for this type of 
film, anyway) character of Julie, played by Rebecca Gayheart in the 
film's best performance, as a young woman who finds herself ultimately 
shunned by her so-called "friends" when she begins to show normal human 
emotions, such as guilt and tenderness. Equipped with the second best 
character in the picture, and the other one that goes through several 
physical and emotional changes, is that of Fern, played by Judy Greer. 
Fern is a good-natured person in her soul, but can't helped but 
practically be brainwashed by the bitchy, heartless Courtney, who often 
reminds her that she "made her." There is a warm, touching scene between 
the two early on when Julie calls up "Vylette" and brings up an old, 
fond childhood memory of how they were friends in the 4th grade and went 
to each other's slumber parties. "It's funny how time changes people," 
says Julie. "Time doesn't change people," replies Fern. "People change 
people." 
In the other central roles, Rose McGowan is perfectly cast as the 
unredeemable Courtney who (slight spoiler alert ahead) gets her just 
desserts in the satisfying climax at the prom, a la "Carrie," cleverly 
set to the tune of "Young at Heart," by Frank Sinatra. Meanwhile, Julie 
Benz really doesn't make much of an impression at all as Marcie, and 
also seemingly doesn't play a very important role in the goings-on. In 
the supporting roles, Chad Christ, as Zach, Julie's new boyfriend, is 
the splitting image of Ethan Hawke, right down to the whiskers on his 
chin; Pam Grier is admittedly wasted as the detective on the case (this 
is certainly not a step up from her meaty role in 1997's "Jackie Brown); 
and Carol Kane is fetching as always, but underused, as the school 
principal, Mrs. Sherwood. Making cameos are Marilyn Manson (::gasp!:: 
without makeup!) as a man Courtney picks up in a bar, while P.J. Soles 
and William Katt (who both starred, coincidentally enough, in "Carrie") 
make virtual walk-ons as Liz's parents who return from a trip to find 
their daughter dead.
"Jawbreaker" has one highly strong asset, and that is the underlying 
subject of redemption, both of Julie and Fern, and I appreciated that 
they were given the time to be developed so that I understood exactly 
what each one was going through. In high school, teenagers really do 
hang out with a certain type of clique or group, as cliched as it may 
sound, and I am sure some have been swayed and peer pressured into being 
someone that they truly aren't. That, in my opinion, is what 
"Jawbreaker" is all about. I hasten to add, however, that this same 
exact theme was grudgingly already explored in a similar manner in 
"Heathers," and so "Jawbreaker" doesn't necessarily have anything fresh 
to say. Both films followed the same exact pattern, and pretty much the 
same story, right down to the murder aspect and clique of four popular 
girls. Although not at all up to the former's level, "Jawbreaker" is 
still an entertaining and smart film, and in a time when something as 
banal as "She's All That" is also playing in theaters, "Jawbreaker" is 
something of a slight godsend. 

Title
Review for When the Party's Over (1992)
Directed by Matthew Irmas.
Cast: Rae Dawn Chong, Sandra Bullock, Elizabeth Berridge, Michael Landes, 
Kris Kamm, Fisher Stevens, Brian McNamara, Stephen Meadows, Raymond Cruz.
1992 - 114 minutes
Rated R (for profanity and sexual situations).
Reviewed June 20, 1999.
"When the Party's Over" really surprised me. Renting the film because of the 
impressive cast, but not actually expecting much out of it, what I found was 
an, overall, undiscovered gem that most people probably have not even heard 
of, but it really is in video stores, just waiting to be rented. Another 
movie about "twentysomethings in the '90s," but made in 1991 before the Gen-X 
feature film explosion, "When the Party's Over" includes fascinating, 
multi-layered characters and an engaging story, and is easily worthy the 
price of a rental.
Set in Los Angeles, four friends--businesswoman MJ (Rae Dawn Chong), feminist 
artist Amanda (Sandra Bullock), charity worker Frankie (Elizabeth Berridge), 
and struggling actor Banks (Kris Kamm)--share a place together. MJ is 
beginning to wonder if she will ever find someone to love, as her days are 
filled with either work or emotionless one night stands. Constantly taking 
her friends for granted, but always apologetic afterwards, she also is 
currently having an affair with Taylor (Brian McNamara), who is seriously 
involved and in love with the sweet, caring Frankie. Frankie, meanwhile, is 
in the middle of creating a giant mural in an urban neighborhood, having made 
a friend with Mario (Raymond Cruz), who lives there, but fearing for the 
residents' lives, as a drive-by shooting seems to occur almost every night. 
And last, Amanda has sworn off dating for awhile, unable to deal with the 
pain that inevitably comes with it, choosing instead to just be with her 
friends and her teenage brother, Willie (Michael Landes), who is always 
hanging around her to get away from his unsatisfying home life. One day while 
at a party, the curiously-named Alexander Midnight (Fisher Stevens) first 
comes on to her with a seemingly corny pick-up line ("I'm positive we've met 
before...in a past life"), but soon she discovers that Alexander is 
completely sincere and, for once, interested in her, not sex.
It's mindboggling why "When the Party's Over" fell through the cracks, 
obtaining nothing more than a limited, and brief, theatrical run before 
heading to video. Maybe it is because now-movie star Sandra Bullock was a 
then-nobody, or more likely, it is because distrubutor Live Entertainment was 
going through financial troubles during the 1991-1992 time period. Either 
way, it desperately deserves to be noticed, and marks not only a mature, 
affirming screenplay by Ann Wycoff, but several standout, possibly 
Oscar-caliber performances. 
Most captivating of all is MJ, played by Chong in one of her last substantial 
roles (before she, sadly, has resorted to direct-to-video action-oriented 
junk). MJ is not a bad person, regardless of if she uses her friends. She 
loves them all dearly, but is plagued by self-involvement, jumping from one 
guy to the next and only gaining interest in the men she knows she can't 
have, such as Taylor. MJ knows she has a problem, and is often keeping Amanda 
up through all hours of the night discussing her life.
In one of her very first feature film roles, Bullock gives one of her best 
performances to date, ranking right up there with her scene-stealing work in 
1993's "The Thing Called Love" and 1994's "Speed." Bullock's Amanda is given 
the chance to have two memorable relationships in the film, both very telling 
and honest--one with her teen brother who, in one of the more touching 
scenes, explains to him that she loves him more than anything, would do 
anything for him, but that he can't move in with her because he has to live 
at home with their father; and the other with Alexander Midnight, which 
slowly but surely builds up to a sweet, innocent romance. Fisher Stevens is 
another standout as Alexander, who is such a refreshingly original character 
you almost can't believe how genuine he is in his feelings.
Elizabeth Berridge, previously seen in a number of films, including one of my 
all-time favorites, 1986's "Smooth Talk," is truly poignant and effervescent 
as Frankie, who is hoping to get engaged with Taylor, unknowing that he has 
cheated on her. Frankie is a do-gooder, hoping to change the world in some 
way with her dedication to society, but is also having doubts about where 
everything is headed. She loves living in L.A., but is beginning to doubt if 
other better things might be passing her by.
All of these story threads boil down to an absolutely perfect conclusion, 
where everything comes together but, realistically, not everything is solved. 
Director Matthew Irmas is wise not to judge the characters, but to let the 
viewer decide what they think of each one of them, and due to the flawless 
last ten or so shots, ends everything on an emotional, thoughful note. "When 
the Party's Over," a serious-minded motion picture on the trials, 
tribulatons, and (good and bad) experiences of young adults, is not to be 
missed.
   - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
     Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Along Came a Spider (2001)
Directed by Lee Tamahori.
Cast: Morgan Freeman, Monica Potter, Mika Boorem, Michael Wincott, Dylan 
Baker, Jay O. Sanders, Penelope Ann Miller, Billy Burke, Anton Yelchin.
2001 - 104 minutes
Rated R (for violence and profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, April 8, 2001.
A superior, loose sequel to 1997's lurid and silly "Kiss the Girls," "Along 
Came a Spider" is a competently made thriller--well acted, tautly directed, 
but with more than a few ludicrous twists and plot holes. The story this time 
around does not revolve around a serial killer, but a vicious kidnapper, 
which is an admittedly refreshing change of pace from what was originally 
expected, and what I am used to seeing in this genre. It is ultimately the 
film's tight pacing that saves the day, turning what could have been a 
tiresome retread into an enjoyable, if unexceptional, viewing experience.
Brilliant investigator Alex Cross (Morgan Freeman), the one major returning 
character from "Kiss the Girls," has been having a rough personal time 
lately, unrequitedly guilt-ridden for not being able to save the life of his 
partner several months earlier. He is called back to work, however, when one 
Megan Rose (Mika Boorem), the 12-year-old daughter of a United States 
senator, is abducted by her teacher, Gary Soneji (Michael Wincott), while at 
school. Helping and guiding Alex in his desperate search is Jezzie Flanagan 
(Monica Potter), a secret service agent who has worked at the exclusive 
private school for the last two years. If anyone can possibly know why Megan 
was kidnapped, it is Jezzie, who has grown to know and care about all of her 
charges.
"Along Came a Spider" is riddled with far-fetched ideas and sequences, 
including a mad chase through the streets and metro stations of Washington, 
D.C. without any accuracy in where each location is placed on a real map. 
There is also a laughable scene in which the FBI is able to conveniently 
search through the kidnapper's home using only a camera and a computer that 
is able to zoom in on every minute detail of the room. The movie is a little 
silly when you stop to think about it long enough, and yet, it works in spite 
of its flaws.
The screenplay, by Marc Moss (based on the novel by James Patterson), and 
direction, by Lee Tamahori (1997's "The Edge"), are certainly instrumental in 
making the picture's spare parts gel together into a satisfyingly cohesive 
whole, but it is Morgan Freeman who makes everything convincing. Freeman 
(2000's "Nurse Betty") is a class-act veteran, taking every character he 
plays so seriously that it would almost be impossible for him to turn in a 
bad performance. His Alex Cross is not developed much further than he was in 
"Kiss the Girls," but it is a smart, cunning character that you cannot help 
but follow.
Holding her own is Monica Potter (2001's "Head Over Heels"), a younger, 
blonder version of Julia Roberts, who is quickly becoming quite a stunning 
actress. Potter more than makes up for the absence of Ashley Judd (the 
heroine in the movie's predecessor), and genuinely is able to go through a 
spectrum of differing emotions, as she isn't sure how to react to her own 
failings as a guardian at the school.
Mika Boorem (2000's "The Patriot"), as Megan Rose, is perhaps the standout in 
the film. Megan may be a young child, but she is a clever, intelligent, and 
strong individual--quite a rare feat for such a small kidnap victim in the 
world of feature films. Boorem is not only likable, but believable, and her 
role is not an easy one, either.
>From the opening credits, which ingeniously consist of the words being 
lowered by the strings of a spider web, to the stunning prologue that depicts 
a horrifying automobile accident which concludes over the side of a 
waterfall, to the unpredictable finale, "Along Came a Spider" is a good 
movie. Judging from how strongly I disliked "Kiss the Girls," it is probably 
better than it has any right to be. It isn't a great achievement, however. 
The climactic twist is undoubtedly surprising, but it also leaves several 
unanswered questions, and almost feels like a betrayal. You'll know what I 
mean when you see it. Suffice to say, amidst its downfalls, the ending is 
much like the entire movie in general: not completely agreeable, but 
nonetheless, it manages to somehow remain a strong entertainment.
 http://www.all-reviews.com/reviewers/DustinPutman.htm
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman
http://www.atnzone.com

Title
Review for Talking to Strangers (1988)
Directed by Rob Tregenza.
Cast: Ken Gruz, Dennis Jordan, Caron Tate, Marvin Hunter, Henry 
Strozier, Lois Evans, Sharrie Valero, Joanne Bauer, Linda Chambers, 
Richard Foster, Romey Curtis, Sarah Rush.
1988 - 93 minutes.
Not Rated (contains profanity).
Reviewed November 2, 1998.
By Dustin Putman 
Dustin Putman's Film Reviews >
I was not prepared for the impact that the overlooked independent film, 
"Talking to Strangers," by director Rob Tregenza, would have. In fact, I 
had never heard of it until I picked it up at the video store and saw 
that a lot of critics had praised it. So I rented it.
"Talking to Strangers" is 90 minutes long, and consists of 9 separate 
sequences, and only 9 shots. It was filmed in Baltimore on an extremely 
low budget, and each scene only had one take, so the actors obviously 
had a lot of pressure on them to not make any mistakes. Through the nine 
scenes, we follow one person, Jesse (Ken Gruz), an artist who is alone 
in the first and last segment, and in the middle seven, a sort of story 
involving usually one other character, is set up that is seemingly 
completely obscure from the others. They sort of play like short films 
strung together in no particular order, involving the same actor. But as 
a whole, the film paints a powerful tapestry of conflicting stories that 
do, strangely enough, feel like they create a whole.
"Talking to Strangers," is one of the most audacious, startlingly 
original film debuts I have ever seen, and director Tregenza is a great 
talent. Each segment is totally fascinating, even those in which very 
little happen, such as the opening ten minutes, which starts off looking 
like an establishing shot of a city, but then follows the character of 
Jesse through the streets, down several blocks, as he almost gets on 
three different buses. And, similar to this, in the last scene, we 
simply watch him paint a room with a paint sprayer.
The middle sequences are all gorgeously shot and effective in their own 
way. The best story involves Jesse at a bank, as he tries to talk to an 
upset black secretary (Caron Tate), who keeps receiving disturbing, 
mysterious phone calls from her husband. Another thought-provoking 
segment starts off with Jesse talking to a kind middle-aged woman (Romey 
Curtis) on a bus whose car has broken down, only for the bus to be taken 
over by a group of punks, which leads to a brutal rape. All of the other 
scenes take place in varying settings, such as a ferry, a soup kitchen, 
a confessional in a church, and under a bridge.
What ultimately makes, "Talking to Strangers," such a brilliant motion 
picture is the unorthodox, strikingly unpredictable style that the film 
is made in, as well as the fact that it is always spellbinding to watch. 
There is never a dull moments, and all of the stories and individual 
characters are wholly memorable and often truly sympathetic and 
poignant. Thinking back on the film, the character of the secretary at 
the bank, played flawlessly and naturally by Caron Tate, is especially 
tragic and unforgettable, as is the enigmatic central character of 
Jesse.
The so-called "point" of the film is left wide open for the viewer to 
draw their own conclusions, and although I still am not sure exactly 
what it is all about, the overall boldness and power of the film cannot, 
in no way, be denied.
Director Rob Tregenza has a true gift as an intriguing filmmaker, and 
his debut film, "Talking to Strangers," is, in many ways, a masterpiece. 
It contains far more creativity, intelligence, extraordinary images, and 
provocative ideas than twenty big-budget Hollywood films put together, 
and it deserves to be seen.

Title
Review for Ringmaster (1998)
Directed by Neil Abramson.
Cast: Jerry Springer, Jamie Pressly, Molly Hagan, Wendy Raquel Robinson, 
Michael Jai White, Michael Dudikoff, John Capodice, William McNamara, 
Krista Tesreau.
1998 - 95 minutes.
Rated R (for profanity, sex, and nudity).
Reviewed November 28, 1998.
By Dustin Putman 
Dustin Putman's Film Reviews >
"Ringmaster," the film debut of controversial talk show host Jerry 
Springer (who also produces), is an uproarious, raunchy comedy that is 
much better than I expected it would be, not to mention funnier, but a 
film that didn't seem to add up to much when it was all over.
The film wisely does not focus on Springer (who actually is the blandest 
character here), but on two groups of lower-class people that are 
thrilled to get to go on the "Jerry" show. The first group is a bunch of 
white trash living in a trailer park. Angel (Jamie Pressly), a slutty 
19-year-old, works as a maid for a motel by day (and who services the 
customers, as well), and in the evening carries on an affair with her 
stepfather (Michael Dudikoff), much to the chargin' of her equally 
promiscuous mother (Molly Hagan). The second group of people is a feisty 
black woman named Starletta (Wendy Raquel Robinson) who is angered at 
her cheating "dog" boyfriend (Michael Jai White). When both groups are 
accepted on the show, they come into contact with each other, in more 
than one sense of the word, while at their all-expenses-paid hotel.
"Ringmaster," is far superior than I had expected because the film 
wisely centered on the characters, rather than Jerry, and it did a 
pretty good job of telling both of their stories. All actors, who are 
mostly unknowns, did a servicable job in their rather thankless roles, 
and Wendy Raquel Robinson, as Starletta, was, by far, the standout. In 
every single scene she was in, I couldn't help but laugh at her endless 
energy and hilarious dialogue. Also added to the comic relief of her 
character was her beloved hair piece, which goes through quite a lot 
during the duration of the film! I also liked Molly Hagan, as the mother 
of Angel, who is not a very happy woman, due to the fact that she is 
getting older, and nothing seems to be going right for her.
The interactions between all of the characters was entertaining and 
consistently comical, with a rather heavy dose of tastlessness. Where, 
"Ringmaster," ran into problems, I think, was simply in the slight 
story, which is pretty forgettable, and in the climax, in which drama 
and moralizing takes over. Although there is a surprisingly truthful 
conversation between Pressly and Hagan late in the picture, a final 
speech given by Springer rang totally false. It was as if Springer 
wanted to tell the world a meaningful reason why he has stuck with his 
show for so long, when everyone knows it is only because it is 
outrageous and he has fun with it. His reasoning goes no further than 
that, and so his speech really put a damper on the fast and humorous 
pace that came before.
What it all comes down to is that, "Ringmaster," is an overall fun way 
to spend an hour and a half, but it is nothing special. Nothing occurs 
in the film to really buoy it over into what I would actually consider a 
very good comedy, but it is a pleasant one. It would help considerably 
if you didn't have to pay the admissions price to go see it.

Title
Review for Legally Blonde (2001)
Directed by Robert Luketic. 
Cast: Reese Witherspoon, Luke Wilson, Matthew Davis, Selma Blair, Jennifer 
Coolidge, Victor Garber, Ali Larter, Holland Taylor, Jessica Cauffiel, Alanna 
Ubach, Oz Perkins, Linda Cardellini, Meredith Scott Lynn, Bruce Thomas, 
Raquel Welch. 
2001 - 96 minutes 
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and brief sex-related humor). 
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, July 14, 2001. 
Reese Witherspoon, one of the brightest, most intelligent young actresses in 
Hollywood, has been around ever since her feature debut at 14 in 1991's 
nostalgic "Man in the Moon." Solid star turns followed in 1996's "Fear," 
1996's "Freeway," 1998's "Pleasantville," 1999's "Cruel Intentions," and 
1999's "Election," but never before has she had an entire movie rest solely 
upon her shoulders--until now. 
"Legally Blonde," the directing bow of Robert Luketic, is an intentionally 
frothy, good-natured comedy about female empowerment and getting to show your 
true colors in a cynical society. At the forefront is Witherspoon, in a role 
that is perfectly tailor-made for her sturdy comedic talents, and she shines 
in every second of its entertaining, fast-paced 96 minutes. 
Elle Woods (Reese Witherspoon), no doubt named after the magazine, is about 
to graduate from college with a 4.0 GPA and a degree in fashion 
merchandising. She also expects to get a marriage proposal from her longtime 
boyfriend, Warner Huntington III (Matthew Davis), when, instead, he dumps her 
due to not believing that she would make an acceptable senator's wife. 
Distraught over this unexpected turn of events, Elle decides to follow Warner 
to Harvard with her beloved Chihuahua in tow, where she will major in law and 
prove him wrong about just being a "dumb blonde." 
This is the clever setup of "Legally Blonde," a sunny, hip confection that 
uses 1995's delightful "Clueless" as an indirect blueprint. The screenplay, 
scribed by Karen McCullah Lutz and Kirsten Smith (1999's "10 Things I Hate 
About You"), is spunky and very sweet, but the film really would sink or swim 
based on its leading lady. 
Luckily, just the right one was chosen and Witherspoon is up for the 
challenge, turning Elle into a positive, well-meaning heroine for the 
21st-century who proves looks are, indeed, only skin-deep. Elle may be a 
beautiful girl with a keen fashion sense, but the key to her appeal is that 
she is a genuinely good person, plain and simple. Witherspoon wins you over 
from the very beginning, much like Alicia Silverstone did in "Clueless," 
because she's cute, funny, and isn't self-involved like you may expect from 
the way she looks. No, Elle does things her way, and she'll be damned if 
she's going to change just because people think she should. 
The aforementioned script is a particularly smart one, alternately satirical 
and down-to-earth when it needs to be. Elle's application tape into Harvard, 
which she got "one of the Copolla's to direct," for example, is both winning 
and silly, with her proving that she can successfully use proper legal jargon 
("I object!," she exclaims as a passerby touches her backside), as well as 
hold inordinately huge amounts of information in her head by rattling off the 
various current storylines on the soap opera, "One Life to Live." Late in the 
picture, as the action turns toward a murder trial, writers Lutz and Smith 
hilariously incorporate the usual court matters with significant plot points 
concerning designer shoes and the proper way to manage a new perm. 
The actors around Witherspoon fall into two categories--those that are nice 
to Elle, and those that aren't. Jennifer Coolidge (Stifler's mom in 1999's 
"American Pie") is notably charming in the type of part she's never played 
before--a shy manicurist who befriends Elle when nobody else initially does. 
Selma Blair (2000's "Down to You") does well as Warner's new brunette 
girlfriend at Harvard, at first coming off as stuck-up before feeling remorse 
about the way she has wronged Elle. Finally, Luke Wilson (1999's "Blue 
Streak") does what he can with the underwritten role of Elle's new potential 
love interest. Not enough time is spent developing their relationship, and it 
is one of the few missteps that is made throughout. 
The journey that Elle takes as she sets out to reclaim her beau, only to 
discover that she is more than capable of standing on her own two feet, is a 
predictable one, as is the outcome of the climactic murder trial. Then again, 
"Legally Blonde" makes no false accusations about being a deep or intricately 
plotted motion picture. It's a lighthearted, breezy comedy that is sure to 
gain Reese Witherspoon the full recognition she has deserved for years. And 
more so than anything else, it sure is a whole lot of fun. 
  - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman 
    http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman 

Title
Review for America's Sweethearts (2001)
Directed by Joe Roth. 
Cast: Julia Roberts, John Cusack, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Billy Crystal, Hank 
Azaria, Stanley Tucci, Seth Green, Christopher Walken, Keri Lynn Pratt. 
2001 - 102 minutes 
Rated PG-13 (for sexual situations involving a dog and an adult male, and 
profanity). 
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, July 20, 2001. 
With a high-powered, A-list cast that features no less than Julia Roberts, 
John Cusack, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Billy Crystal, and Christopher Walken, the 
chance that "America's Sweethearts," a satirical view of Hollywood with a 
little romance thrown in for good measure, would be a failure seemed slim to 
none. Thanks to director Joe Roth's aimless direction, and Billy Crystal and 
Peter Tolan's unimpressive, personality-deprived screenplay, the unthinkable 
has happened. "America's Sweethearts" is a dull-witted, utterly slight comedy 
that, dare I say, is boring from one end to the other. 
Set over one weekend at a Las Vegas desert-set press junket, big-screen 
actors and married couple Eddie Thomas (John Cusack) and Gwen Harrison 
(Catherine Zeta-Jones) have come to promote their eighth picture together, 
entitled "Time Over Time." With Gwen's last two Eddie-less films bombing in 
the states, a lot is riding on the success of "Time Over Time" to boost both 
of their careers. Only one problem stands in the way of a peaceful weekend of 
joint promotion; Eddie and Gwen have split up and are currently not even 
speaking to each other. 
Enter Lee (Billy Crystal), a studio publicist who has been hired to reconcile 
Eddie and Gwen's relationship, or, at the very least, make it seem to the 
press that they are still getting along. This task won't be an easy one; 
Eddie is in a state of depression, and still believes he is in love, while 
Gwen has taken up with a Spanish lothario named Hector (Hank Azaria). Further 
complicating matters, Gwen's sister and personal assistant, Kiki (Julia 
Roberts), has secret longings of her own for Eddie. 
If "America's Sweethearts" wants to take a ruthless, sharp jab at the 
Hollywood industry, it is far too soft around the edges and lacks the wit 
needed to accomplish such a task. If it wants to make a statement about 
famous marriages and the press surrounding celebrities, the same idea was put 
to far better use, and was infinitely more telling, in 1999's "Notting Hill," 
also starring Roberts. If it wants to be a screwball comedy in the tradition 
of Preston Sturges, it hasn't the energy to even get off the ground running. 
And, finally, if it wants to be a romance between Eddie and Kiki, I've seen 
more sparks fly between ostriches. 
Watching "America's Sweethearts" is a disheartening experience. It starts off 
slowly, has a middle that creeps along at the speed of an asthmatic 
octogenarian, and finishes up with a conclusion that is neither gratifying 
nor inspiring. While a few winning moments sneak in throughout (Roberts' 
distressed Kiki, formerly sixty pounds heavier, falls off the wagon and digs 
into a breakfast big enough for the entire salvation army), they are only 
fleeting glimpses of what might have been had the screenplay gone through 
some major rewrites. Not helping matters are a collection of characters 
(excluding the mousy Kiki) who are self-involved, uninteresting, and not 
nice. Who wants to watch a film--one that attempts to be a romantic comedy, 
no less--when you can't even stand to be around the participants? 
Julia Roberts (2000's Oscar winner for "Erin Brockovich") isn't the world's 
most popular actress for nothing. She injects life into the slimmest of 
parts, and "America's Sweethearts" offers her her most thankless role since 
1991's "Hook." While Roberts' Kiki is the sole likable presence, as she 
gradually learns to stand up for herself, she is underwritten and not 
terribly engaging. Almost every scene that does work includes Roberts, 
however, whether she be stuffing her face with breakfast, blowing up at the 
vacant idiocy of Gwen and Eddie, or sharing a tender moment with Eddie in a 
flashback that finds her equipped with a pudgy face and a fat suit (read: a 
normal, American body). 
John Cusack (2000's "High Fidelity") and Catherine Zeta-Jones (2000's 
"Traffic"),as title couple Eddie Thomas and Gwen Harrison, are far above 
their roles. Cusack, good in just about everything, must resort to jokes 
about falling on the spines of a cactus to get laughs. Zeta-Jones plays the 
pampered actress to a hilt, but the sheer phoniness of her character does 
nothing in the way of making her an attractive presence. Billy Crystal 
(1999's "Analyze This"), as the determined, smarmy Lee, has one good gag 
involving a Doberman attracted to his crotch, but might as well not have even 
been present for the rest of the picture. In minor roles, Christopher Walken 
(2001's "Joe Dirt"), as the maniacal director of "Time Over Time;" Hank 
Azaria (1999's "Cradle Will Rock"), as Gwen's flamboyant new flame; Stanley 
Tucci (2000's "Joe Gould's Secret"), as the head of the production studio; 
and Seth Green (2001's "Josie and the Pussycats"), as Lee's eager, but 
clueless, assistant, have little to do. 
"America's Sweethearts" squanders so badly because it fails to uphold the 
courage of its convictions. Something is definitely off about the whole 
enterprise. Where it should be a lethally funny attack at the cliches of the 
Hollywood system, it holds no true insight or daring. And where it should be 
a cute romance, it is--for lack of a better word--sterile. Director Joe Roth 
may be the head of the promising new studio, Revolution Films, but as the one 
in charge of "America's Sweethearts," he has wasted the talents of a large 
bevy of people who probably should have known better in the first place. 

Title
Review for Pretty Woman (1990)
Directed by Garry Marshall.
Cast: Julia Roberts, Richard Gere, Laura San Giacomo, Ralph Bellamy, Jason 
Alexander, Alex Hyde-White, Amy Yasbeck, Hank Azaria, Elinor Donahue.
1990 - 119 minutes.
Rated R (for sexual situations, brief nudity, mild violence, and profanity).
Reviewed July 30, 1999.
Known as the most successful, highest-grossing romantic comedy in history, 
director Garry Marshall apparently struck gold with "Pretty Woman," which 
opened quietly during the summer of 1990 but, thanks to positive 
word-of-mouth, was able to reach upwards of $175-million in theaters alone. 
The question of why it worked so well lies directly with the film's two 
charismatic stars, Richard Gere and Julia Roberts, since the story itself is 
none too original or even believable. The other winning element that makes 
"Pretty Woman" so entertaining is its genuine sweetness and innocence, which 
is rarely as palpable in today's films as it is here. 
Edward Lewis (Richard Gere) is a suave, extremely wealthy business mogul who, 
at the start of the picture, breaks up with his girlfriend over the phone 
after a nasty argument, and abruptly takes his friend's car and gets lost on 
Hollywood Boulevard while trying to find his hotel. Stopping the car along 
the street, he asks a woman, obviously a prostitute, for directions. Agreeing 
to get in his car and show him for ten bucks, Edward ultimately accepts, they 
strike up a conversation, and before long she has been asked up to his 
penthouse room on the top floor. This meeting does not lead to sex, however, 
as Edward confides that he'd rather just have someone to talk to, and offers 
her $300 to spend the night. Just as well, since the hooker, named Vivian, is 
a beautiful, generally upbeat young woman who is the type of person that can 
lend an understanding ear. The meeting between these two completely opposite 
people does not end the next morning as planned, when Edward finally offers 
to pay Vivian three-thousand dollars if she will stay with him for six days 
and nights while he is in the area, keeping him company and acting as his 
companion to business dinners and get-togethers. Since Vivian firmly tells 
Edward at the beginning that she will do anything with him except kiss him on 
the lips, which always leads to unwanted intimacy when dealing with her 
customers, the obligatory rule of the genre says that by the third act, 
Edward and Vivian will finally, truly, kiss.
Allegedly planned as a grim, downbeat drama until Garry Marshall came on 
board as director, "Pretty Woman" has been transformed in all senses of the 
word into a classic fairy tale, a la "Cinderella." The premise is hardly 
believable and its portrait of prostitutes hanging out on the streets of 
Hollywood Boulevard is just about the most idealized portrayal that there 
could have possibly been. You honestly don't need a high-IQ (or any IQ, for 
that matter) to guess how the film will end, and the story is as old as my 
Great Great Grandma Bertha. The supporting characters are almost all 
sketchily written and less-than-gratifying, and the screenplay is no award 
winner. And yet, amidst all of these qualms and flaws, "Pretty Woman" is an 
astoundingly charming motion picture, and it is definately easy to see why it 
became such an overnight sensation with moviegoers. You'd actually be amazed 
how far bemusement can go, and there are a few select moments (not even whole 
scenes, mind you) that are as romantic as anything I've seen on film in the 
1990's.
Additionally, the film belongs, and its success can be attributed, to two 
people and two people only, and they are Richard Gere and Julia Roberts. 
Playing sex symbols throughout the '80s with such pictures as "American 
Gigolo" and "An Officer and a Gentleman," Gere branches out here to play a 
more quiet, almost shy, but still alluring, character that believably could 
sweep Julia Roberts off her feet, and vice versa. Julia Roberts, in her 
breakthrough role after 1988's well-received "Mistic Pizza" and 1989's "Steel 
Magnolia," for which she was nominated for an Academy Award, is radiant and 
funny as the wordly Vivian, who surprisingly could be a role model for 
impressionistic viewers, not for her line of work, but more for her sheer 
intelligence. It would have probably been easy to have written Vivian as 
merely a flake, but screenwriter J.F. Lawton clearly cared too much about his 
central characters to do such a thing. After "Pretty Woman," Roberts, along 
with Meg Ryan, became the reigning queen of romantic comedies (with her 
latest being the just-released "Runaway Bride," which repairs Gere and 
Roberts together once again), and no wonder. Roberts has continually proven 
to not only be a strong actress with a flare for comedy, but also one who can 
efficiently do drama, and in almost every film she appears in, it is 
difficult not to fall in love with her along with her male co-star. 
An especially strong scene that Gere and Roberts do together takes place 
after Edward foolishly tells one of his co-workers that Vivian is actually a 
prostitute, and he then approaches her, making sexual advances. No only does 
this make Vivian feel cheap, especially since she had previously been posing 
as a more professional, eloquent young lady, but it also maddens her that 
Edward would demean and betray her in such a way, and ultimately causes her 
to question where exactly her life is leading, and if she likes this 
particular path. On the more dreamy side, the film is filled with romantic 
scenes that are simply effervescent to behold, especially one in which Edward 
enters into the hotel's lounge to see Vivian turn around and not only reveal 
her marvelous cocktail dress, but also her inner (and outer) glowing beauty. 
Another subtle moment has Vivian lovingly blowing a kiss to Edward, who is 
asleep, and placing it on his lips, since she still is unsure if she should 
be getting attached to this man who may very well be out of her life forever 
in a short couple of days.
"Pretty Woman" does not blatantly step wrong until the very last scene, which 
is a happy ending (as you'd expect, and wouldn't have it any other way) that 
somehow does not work, perhaps because of its undeniable contrivances. This 
one misstep does not put a damper on the rest of the film, though, because 
there is just far too much magic at work here to disaffirm such a petty 
problem. Helped along by a warm, memorable supporting performance from Laura 
San Giacomo, as Vivian's best friend and roommate, and a fabulously catchy 
soundtrack, in which all of the songs prominently aid in the movie's overall 
fulfillment, "Pretty Woman" is a sparkler of a motion picture, and has what 
it takes to act as a blueprint on how to make the quintessential romantic 
comedy.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman 
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for What Women Want (2000)
Directed by Nancy Meyers.
Cast: Mel Gibson, Helen Hunt, Ashley Johnson, Mark Feuerstein, Marisa Tomei, 
Alan Alda, Judy Greer, Lauren Holly, Lisa Edelstein, Delta Burke, Valerie 
Perrine, Loretta Devine, Ana Gasteyer, Eric Balfour, Bette Midler.
2000 - 126 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity, sexual innuendo, and brief drug use).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, December 16, 2000.
In, amazingly, the first romantic comedy of his career, Mel Gibson (2000's 
"The Patriot") fits perfectly within the framework of director Nancy Meyers' 
"What Women Want," a film with a truly fascinating and clever premise that 
nevertheless collapses under the weight of everything that surrounds the 
central storyline. Intermittently entertaining with excessive dry spots 
amidst the fun, the movie not only overstays its welcome by at least 30 
minutes, but never takes off the way it should.
Successful ad slogan man Nick Marshall (Mel Gibson) has a beautiful skyrise 
apartment, makes loads of money, and is expected to become the new Creative 
Director of the Sloan Curtis Agency in Chicago. He's also a male chauvinist 
pig who constantly is taking advantage of the women in his life, whether it 
be for a one-night-stand or to use for his own professional wants. When word 
comes that Nick's boss (Alan Alda) has bypassed him for a fresh female 
viewpoint in the form of Darcy Maguire (Helen Hunt), Nick is none too 
pleased, hell-bent on upstaging her by thinking of the better slogan for a 
women's Nike commercial.
With his ex-wife Gigi (Lauren Holly) on her honeymoon, Nick is left to look 
after his estranged 15-year-old daughter, Alex (Ashley Johnson), but has 
never been a real father to her and isn't sure how to go about it now. While 
drunk one night trying on the latest female sales items that his agency is 
getting ready to promote, a freak accident leaves him nearly electrocuted to 
death. Awaking the next morning, Nick is, at first, shocked and then 
intrigued by being able to hear every woman's thoughts within distance of 
him. Using this as an advantage over the mystery of the opposite sex, as 
suggested by his psychiatrist (Bette Midler), Nick finds himself gradually 
getting in touch with his more emotional, feminine side, and begins to 
understand and sympathize with the women around him, including an unexpected 
budding attraction to Darcy.
Had this been the whole premise of "What Women Want," director Meyers and his 
actors would have been home-free, making an appropriately breezy 90-minute, 
bubblegum concoction. Instead, the subplots with extraneous supporting 
characters stack up so thickly that it's almost a chore wading through them 
all, and then watching each of their never-ending outcomes. There's Lola 
(Marisa Tomei), a struggling actress working at a coffee shop who has a mad 
crush on Nick. There's a meek office assistant (Judy Greer) ignored by 
everyone, and whom Nick learns is potentially suicidal. There's the male 
coworker (Mark Feuerstein) who fears everyone thinks he's gay when Nick 
overhears a woman's passing thoughts about him. There's the debate over the 
Nike slogan ad, and the sly plan of Nick's to steal all of Darcy's bright 
ideas from her head before she gets to verbalize them, only to pass them as 
his own. There's the upcoming prom night that Alex, Nick learns, is planning 
to lose her virginity to her grungy 18-year-old boyfriend (Eric Balfour) at. 
And there's more where that came from.
Nearly each and every one of the aforementioned subplots are well-written, 
and would work splendidly in a different movie. But not this one. "What Women 
Want" tries valiantly to cover so many different bases in its 2-hour-plus 
length that it ends up losing sight of its main purpose, coming off as merely 
overstuffed. Screenwriters Josh Goldsmith and Cathy Yuspa have a definite way 
with words, but aim far too high for such an obviously featherweight movie. 
Instead of enriching the film for the good, they only make themselves appear 
to be overly self-important by a half.
Where the film does excel is in its sparkling cast; it's just too bad not 
more of them are put to good use. From the beginning to the end, "What Women 
Want" is Gibson's movie all the way, and he manages to charm and seduce even 
when he's being his naturally smarmy self. Gibson has rarely been so loose 
and free-spirited on film before. Sharing the most screen time with Gibson is 
the hardworking Helen Hunt (2000's "Pay It Forward") in her third of four 
movies this year. Hunt is truly making a name for herself in the feature film 
world, and it only helps that she is an astoundingly talented, clearly 
dedicated performer who takes each of her roles seriously, but also knows how 
to have fun with them. Hunt's Darcy Maguire is a smart, strong-willed woman 
who isn't afraid to speak her mind, and it's generally easy to see why Nick 
becomes so smitten with her.
In the supporting cast arena, Ashley Johnson (1999's "Anywhere But Here") has 
the most significant role, and is highly effective as Nick's bitter daughter 
Alex. Johnson paints Alex as a realistic, likable, if occasionally stubborn 
teenager, and has what are questionably the best scenes in the movie, 
including a delightful montage of Nick helping her to pick a prom dress, and 
a late, heartfelt scene where, for the first time in her life, Alex finds 
herself being able to open up to her father.
Also a standout is Marisa Tomei (2000's "The Watcher"), as the neurotically 
sweet Lola. Tomei finds herself able to generate the same level of 
firecracker comedic presence that she demonstrated in her Oscar-winning role 
in 1992's "My Cousin Vinny." A sex scene between Nick and Lola is a comic 
highlight, and Tomei is so cute that it's a shame she is basically thrown 
away without any satisfying closure. Having the opposite problem is Judy 
Greer (1999's "Jawbreaker"), poignant as the depressed office secretary, who 
has a truthfully performed climactic scene, but hasn't had her subplot 
developed enough in the early stages to make the sort of powerful impact it 
aims for. Everyone else is window-dressing, developed only in the most 
scattershot, broad strokes imaginable, though Bette Midler (2000's "Drowning 
Mona") does delight in an unbilled cameo. Had she been in the movie more, it 
could have easily been her best film role in the last four or five years.
"What Women Want" is funny a lot of the time, and occasionally even a little 
touching. Director Nancy Meyers gratefully does not load on the corn factor, 
as she aims for more human portrayals. Everything is in place for a charmer 
of a romantic comedy, the type that mainstream audiences eat up (and they 
still might), but it isn't successful in the long run. The film is a long, 
overblown extravaganza complete with a nonstop music soundtrack, and even two 
dance sequences. The solo number with Nick dancing to Frank Sinatra, complete 
with a top hat and a coat rack, is impressive on a technical level, but comes 
out of nowhere, only helping to stack on an extra three or four minutes of 
superfluity. The concluding scene between Gibson and Hunt is also severely 
misguided and does not go out on a graceful note. Ultimately, "What Women 
Want" has the ability to be a winning diversion, but much like the character 
of Nick, it simply doesn't know when to stop.
    - Copyright 2000 by Dustin Putman
      Http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman
      Reviews by Dustin Putman 

Title
Review for Dungeons & Dragons (2000)
Directed by Courtney Solomon.
Cast: Justin Whalin, Marlon Wayans, Zoe McLellan, Jeremy Irons, Thora Birch, 
Bruce Payne, Kristen Wilson, Lee Arenberg, Tom Baker.
2000 - 108 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for violence and mild profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, December 10, 2000.
The role-playing game, "Dungeons & Dragons," has had a heavy cult following 
since the mid-1970s. Although popularity has seemed to have faltered in 
recent years, it has taken two-and-a-half decades for the game to be adapted 
into a live-action feature. Not being a close follower of the game, "Dungeons 
& Dragons," the film, had to stand on its own for me, and it does. Knowing 
very few particulars of the plot before stepping into the theater auditorium, 
it was relatively easy to follow and kept me fairly interested for the 
entirety of its running time (a great feat, indeed, for someone who isn't a 
fan of sword-and-sorcery stories). 
The problem with the movie does not have as much to do with its entertainment 
value as it does about its clearly restricted budget (reportedly 
$36-million), which is simply not enough money to do such an epic story 
justice, as well as its decidedly threadbare screenplay, by writer-director 
Courtney Solomon. The appearance of dungeons are few and far between, while 
the only sign of dragons come during the first and last ten minutes of the 
108-minute running time. The war of dragons that make up the grand finale are 
impressive visual effects, indeed, but not overwhelming. They always look 
like well-done computer-generated graphics, rather than actual 
living-and-breathing creatures, as do most of the backgrounds. If anything, 
the effects in "Dungeons & Dragons" are picture-perfect examples of realism 
and artistry compared to the recent haphazard bomb, "Battlefield Earth."
Set in the mythical empire of Izmer, 17-year-old Empress Savina (Thora Birch) 
is in the midst of a controversial fight with the dastardly Profion (Jeremy 
Irons), a powerful magic-user. The Empress wholeheartedly believes that the 
upper-class Mages and lower-class commoners should finally be treated as 
equals, while Profion disagrees. In an attempt to capture a powerful rod that 
controls the kingdom, Profion sends his henchman Damidar (Bruce Payne) out to 
find it, while bright-eyed commoners Ridley (Justin Whalin) and Snails 
(Marlon Wayans), along with Mage Marina (Zoe McLellan), find themselves on 
the opposing side, appointed to once again bring justice to the land.
"Dungeons & Dragons" is a respectable take on the classic good-versus-evil 
theme, despite its constant resemblance to a low-rent version of "Star Wars." 
While a sometimes pleasurable diversion, the writing and aformentioned budget 
restraints bring the end result down several notches. Since director Solomon 
(a long-time "D&D" fan) knew that money would be tight, he should have 
concentrated on making the story and writing original and smart. Alas, his 
script is ridden with cliches and the dialogue comes off unintentionally 
silly. 
Not helping matters are the mediocre performances given by all. Best of the 
lot is most likely Justin Whalin (1991's "Child's Play 3"), as Ridley, as he 
is the center of the movie and equips himself well. He is bland, however, 
particularly in comparison to Marlon Wayans (2000's "Scary Movie"), as his 
sidekick Snails, whose wisecracks aren't nearly as annoying as expected. 
Rounding out the main three players is Zoe McLellan (1997's "Inventing the 
Abbotts"), who may or may not be a good actress; from the evidence presented 
here, I would guess the latter. As the head villain, Jeremy Irons (1998's 
"The Man in the Iron Mask") is outrageously cheesy, overacting and chewing up 
the scenery to such a degree that everyone acting next to him might as well 
not even open their mouths--his yelling and evil laughter often drown out the 
other dialogue. Finally, Thora Birch (1999's "American Beauty") is severely 
wasted as Empress Savina. To go from such a masterful motion picture as 
"American Beauty" down to something as inconsequential as "Dungeons & 
Dragons" (and to not even be particularly that good) is mindboggling. 
Hopefully, Birch got a servicable paycheck for playing what is basically the 
poor-man's Queen Amidala character, played by Natalie Portman, from "Star 
Wars--Episode 1."
With a bigger budget, a stronger screenplay, and generally more accomplished 
actors, "Dungeons & Dragons" might have been a film worth remembering--the 
first notable release of its type since the "Conan" movies. Instead, it 
stands as a near-success with too many holes and problematic sections to be 
able to recommend. Perhaps the best thing that can honestly be said about 
"Dungeons & Dragons" is that it could have been much worse. Now how's that 
for being positive?
   - Copyright 2000 by Dustin Putman
     http://www.young-hollywood.com
     http://www.atnzone.com
     http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman ( Reviews by Dustin Putman )

Title
Review for Cast Away (2000)
Directed by Robert Zemeckis.
Cast: Tom Hanks, Helen Hunt, Nick Searcy, Lari White, Michael Forest, Viveka 
Davis, Jenifer Lewis.
2000 - 143 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for an ultra-realistic plane crash and mild profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, December 23, 2000.
At first glance, "Cast Away," directed by Robert Zemeckis (2000's "What Lies 
Beneath"), may appear to be a feature film version of TV's "Survivor," where 
a man stranded on an island must learn to fend for himself in order to stay 
alive. Zemeckis and screenwriter William Broyles, Jr. could very well have 
made such a movie and come up with a first-rate adventure-thriller, along the 
lines of 1988's "A Cry in the Wild." Instead, their purpose is exposed to be 
something else entirely, and the title hints at this ambitious aim. Instead 
of being about a castaway, the picture is about a man very much dependent on 
today's technology to help him live his life, who, through circumstances out 
of his hands, is cast away from society, and must start his life anew. 
In, perhaps, a career-best performance in a very long line of successes, Tom 
Hanks stars as Chuck Noland, a loyal Federal Express executive who devotes 
much of his time trying to make the company as good as it can be. Following a 
short Christmas reunion with his sweetheart, Kelly Frears (Helen Hunt), he is 
paged to return to work, although not before handing her a small, wrapped 
present that both parties know is an engagement ring. While traveling across 
the Pacific, Chuck's plane runs into severe turbulence due to a nasty storm 
and it ultimately crashes. Narrowly escaping with an inflatable raft in hand 
and a treasured locket with a picture of Kelly inside that she gave to him 
before he shoved off, Chuck eventually finds himself washed ashore on a 
desolate island devoid of any other human life.
For its middle 75 minutes, "Cast Away" is a hugely involving and fascinating 
look at the way Chuck deals with being cut off from all people and everyday 
conveniences, as he is forced to learn how to survive with very few 
resources. With a wealth of coconuts surrounding him, Chuck's diet becomes 
solely dependent on the fruit until he learns to start a fire from the 
friction of sticks and eventually work his way up to crabs and fish. And 
thanks to a bunch of Fed Ex packages that drifted to shore, Chuck gains 
access to a few limited articles of clothing, ice skates whose sharp blades 
come in handy, and a volleyball that becomes his only friend and a personal 
salvation on the island, going as far as painting a face on one side using 
his own blood from a wound.
It's no secret from the television ads and theatrical trailer that Chuck 
does, indeed, make it back to civilization. While more suspense might have 
surrounded such a question had it not been so blatantly given away, such a 
decision holds absolutely no bearing on the success or overall impact of the 
film. In a way, it is a positive thing, as it directs the viewer's attention 
away from a possibly unknown outcome, and toward the deeper meanings behind 
the picture's existence. The final 30 minutes, with Chuck now back home 
following a four-year disappearance that led everyone to believe he was dead 
(and going as far as holding a funeral for him), is just about as powerful 
and truthful of a denouement as could possibly be expected.
"Cast Away" is a cinematic triumph, a motion picture so rich with honest 
emotions and ideas that it comes as a relative surprise that this is a 
big-budget, star vehicle. Rarely does Hollywood prove that it is still 
capable of making intelligent, adult fare, so when such a stirring feat 
occurs, it is all the more reason to rejoice. The movie is thoroughly 
entertaining for the entirety of its nearly 2 1/2-hour running time, and it 
is effective on every level--both as a character study, and an accurately 
drawn adventure yarn.
Appearing in every scene (save for a 3-minute prologue that delves into the 
lives of Fed Ex workers across the globe), Tom Hanks (1999's "The Green 
Mile") is astounding. Highly publicized for the unorthodox way in which 
Zemeckis made the film, taking nearly a year off in between in order for 
Hanks to drop 60 lbs., it is a testament to Hanks' loyalty to his craft to go 
through such a rigorous process. Impressing even more greatly than his 
physical appearance is his performance, deeply charged with serious emotions 
and subtly dodging any signs of saccharine drama. With the majority of the 
picture literally a one-man show (and with this sizable middle chunk also 
devoid of music and very little dialogue), Hanks is able to single-handedly 
take hold of the screen and keep the viewer with him at all times. Very few 
actors could ever spend 75 minutes alone onscreen and remain captivating, but 
Hanks does just that.
In her fourth film appearance in the last three months (with the other three 
being in "Dr. T and the Women," "Pay It Forward," and "What Women Want"), 
Helen Hunt is perfectly cast as the love of Chuck's life, Kelly. While, no 
doubt, the smallest role Hunt has had this year, it is also her strongest 
performance. Not only is it easy to see why Chuck loves Kelly so very much, 
and why she is one of the reasons he hangs onto the hope of seeing her again 
one day, but Hunt injects the part with a level of compassion and 
heartbreaking pathos that is truly unforgettable.
An allegory on the importance most people place on material items, and the 
extreme impact being cut off from such things can have on someone, "Cast 
Away" is the exquisite, thought-provoking journey of a man who ultimately 
must find a way to put his life back together when everything he had 
previously known changes in the four years he is gone. And even more, it is 
an unforgettable love story between two smart, likable people who know they 
were meant for each other--and keep that fact between them, even when they 
realistically know nothing can ever be the same again. With 2000 quickly 
reaching a close, "Cast Away" is easily one of the very best films of the 
year.
   - Copyright 2000 by Dustin Putman
     http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman ( Reviews by Dustin Putman )
     http://www.atnzone.com ( NZone Magazine )

Title
Review for Deep End of the Ocean, The (1999)
Directed by Ulu Grosbard.
Cast: Michelle Pfeiffer, Treat Williams, Ryan Merriman, Jonathan 
Jackson, Whoopi Goldberg, John Kapelos, Cory Buck, Michael McElroy, 
Alexa Vega, Lucinda Jenney.
1999 - 108 minutes.
Rated PG-13 (for profanity).
Reviewed March 13, 1999.
Based on the Jacqelyn Mitchard novel, "The Deep End of the Ocean" has 
allegedly experienced a rocky road to the big screen, and it shows. 
Reshoots ensued several months after already wrapping, and although the 
press kit read that the film was 148 minutes, it actually was forty 
minutes shorter. Was that a mistake on the kit, when it should have said 
1:48, or was it really cut by nearly 3/4 of an hour? My guess would be 
the latter, since large chunks of the film seemed to be missing, and 
despite the exemplary performances from the whole cast, the editing is 
admittedly pretty shoddy.
The film begins in 1988 in Madison, Wisconsin, as joyful photographer 
and mother, Beth Cappadora (Michelle Pfeiffer), leaves her husband, Pat 
(Treat Williams), to go to her high school reunion, bringing along her 
three children, 7-year-old Vincent (Cory Buck), 3-year-old Ben (Michael 
McElroy), and infant daughter, Kerry. While in the hotel lobby where the 
reunion is being held, Beth walks away from a brief moments to check in, 
telling Vincent to hold Ben's hand, but when she returns, Ben is nowhere 
to be found. Immediately thereafter, a highly-publicized search starts 
for Ben, headed by investigator Candy Bliss (Whoopi Goldberg), but to no 
avail, and Beth, cloaked in a smothering vail of grief and remorse, 
starts to nearly ignore her other kids, notably Vincent, leaving it up 
to Pat to take on the central parent role. Switching forward nine years, 
the Cappadora family has relocated in the suburbs of Chicago and Beth 
has finally been able to get her life back together. And then the 
unthinkable happens: one summer day, Beth is greeted at the door by 
12-year-old Sam (Ryan Merriman), who lives two blocks away and asks to 
mow her lawn for her. Put into a near frenzy of sudden joy and hope, 
Beth becomes convinced that "Sam" is actually Ben, and her belief is 
reassured when Det. Bliss informs her that the fingerprints match. The 
less said about the further developments in the storyline, the better, 
since there are a few surprises. 
"The Deep End of the Ocean" is a rather frustrating drama because, on 
the one hand, it is a realistic and beautifully acted drama with several 
touching moments that come out of the screenplay, instead of taking the 
easy route and plucking at the heartstrings with maudlin melodrama. But 
then, coming away from the film, the flaws gradually began to shine 
through more clearly, not the least of being that nothing is really 
dealt with in a satisfactory manner as it seems to be constantly rushing 
to its conclusion which, by the way, feels tacked-on and unbelievable. 
While some characters are given satisfactory screen time and are handled 
well (Pfeiffer, Jackson, Merriman), others remain underdeveloped and 
pushed to the side-lines (John Kapelos, as the man whom Ben thought was 
his father, Williams, and Alexa Vega, as Beth and Pat's youngest child, 
Kerry). Also, several occurrences in the story are treated by only a 
shot of something (for the last half of the film, Pat sleeps on the 
couch, signifying marriage problems), or are brought up and then 
immediately forgotten (the question of who Ben will celebrate 
Thanksgiving with).
As already noted, nothing negative could possibly be said about the fine 
performances. Michelle Pfieffer is always authentic in her wide range of 
emotions, as a mother who is devastated and blames herself for her son's 
disappearance. Treat Williams, a generally underused actor (although put 
to good, chilling use in the 1986 masterpiece, "Smooth Talk"), is 
satisfying as Pat, Beth's husband, even if he could have had more to do. 
And as for the children, the standout performance of the whole cast is 
Ryan Merriman, making his feature film debut, who is truly touching as 
the boy who finds himself torn between the man he has always thought was 
his father, and his biological parents. Merriman is never anything short 
of astounding, and is a new, refreshingly talented find. Jonathan 
Jackson, as the misunderstood and oft-times ignored 16-year-old Vincent, 
shows that he has a lot more going for him, after all, than the soap 
opera he is on, "General Hospital," and if this film is any indication, 
Jackson should get off that show while he still has a chance at a 
prosperous film career. Meanwhile, in a minor role, Whoopi Goldberg is 
effective as the caring Candy Bliss, and has one zinger of a line after 
announcing her name ("I know, it sounds like a Las Vegas stripper"). In 
one peculiar scene, however, Det. Bliss tells Beth, for no apparent 
reason, that she is a lesbian, but what exactly was the point, since 
nothing is made of this revelation after Candy brings it up?
"The Deep End of the Ocean" is a respectable family drama, but is all 
the more disappointing since it is obvious that it could have been so 
much more. There is no doubt in my mind that much of the film's problems 
is due to what ended up lying on the cutting room floor, and I wonder 
exactly why Columbia decided to cut it like they did. I was never bored 
by the film, and if about fifteen to thirty minutes had been added, many 
of my criticisms would probably have vanished, or at least lessened. The 
performances in "The Deep End of the Ocean" are so strong and assured 
that it's too bad the obviously truncated screenplay didn't hold up its 
half of the bargain. 

Title
Review for Blast from the Past (1999)
"Blast From the Past" is a sunny, good-natured romantic comedy that is 
as light as the air, but almost always charming, and is helped 
immeasurably by the occasionally sharp screenplay, written by Bill Kelly 
and Hugh Wilson (also posing as the director), and the uniformly strong 
cast of relatively fresh, young talents and veteran actors.
The film starts out in Los Angeles in 1962 at a party being held by the 
Webbers, scientist Calvin (Christopher Walken) and the 9 months pregnant 
Helen (Sissy Spacek), when they hear word about the oncoming Cuban 
missile crisis. Quickly getting rid of their guests, Calvin and Helen 
desperately make their way down into their own personal fallout shelter 
just as a plane crashes in to their house. Thinking the Big One hit, 
Calvin sets the locks for 35 years because, as he says, by that time the 
radiation will have faded. Equipped with every possible thing they could 
need, Calvin loves the life down in the shelter and as the years fly by, 
teaches his son, Adam, as if he were in a real school. Helen, however, 
eventually begins to go stir-crazy, turning to any alcohol she can find, 
even her cooking sherry. Ultimately, 35 years finally pass and the 
Webbers decide to send Adam, now a grown man (Brendan Fraser), up into 
the world for the first time. Losing his way back to the fallout 
shelter, which a slummy restuarant run by a hippie has been built on top 
of, all Adam really wants is a girl, which he finds in the form of Eve 
(Alicia Silverstone), a cute, but cynical, young woman who is at first 
distant with him, but agrees to help him in his quest of buying and 
storing as much food as possible, thanks to selling his nearly priceless 
35-year-old baseball cards. Eve is not really sure why he is doing such 
a thing, but doesn't bother to ask since, after all, he is so unlike all 
of the men she has known before, and is more like an innocent boy, 
albeit one that is not used to the '90s world. 
Although "Blast From the Past" often feels somewhat like "Pleasantville" 
in reverse, "Blast" mostly avoids the latter's serious commentary on the 
world and so it is inevitably not nearly as deep, but because of this, 
also does not fall into the trap of laying the emotions on too thick. 
Undoubtedly a romance at heart, the film was therefore surprising how, 
in the first half-hour, the characters of Calvin and Helen were the main 
focus, and it had a wonderful start, thanks to Walken's and, especially, 
Spacek's bright performances. Spacek is usually seen in more dramatic 
pictures (as in the remarkable recent "Affliction"), but shows that she 
is also a wonderful comedian, and a standout in every one of her scenes 
as the loving wife and mother who happens to also be going into a 
hilarious descent into booze.
Once the now-grown Adam takes over the film, "Blast Fom the Past" is 
transformed into an entertaining "fish-out-of-water" story, as he starts 
to discover the world, including the sky and ocean, which he has never 
even seen before. One small, but sweet sequence shows Adam sitting at a 
window and intently watching the sunrise for the first time in his life. 
As a budding romantic comedy, the film is also a success, due to the 
charming rapport between Fraser, who seems to recently be switching from 
indies ("Gods and Monsters") to the mainstream ("George of the Jungle"), 
and Silverstone, who has made her first good film since she appeared in 
1995 in one of the best comedies of the decade, "Clueless." Although 
certainly nowhere near that level, it is a clear improvement from her 
last two failed excursions, the embarrassing "Batman & Robin" and the 
misguided "Excess Baggage."
For all of its many engaging elements, "Blast From the Past" is in no 
way anything more than merely good. The film is slight, but in a fun 
way, and makes no excuses for being anything more than what it sets out 
to be, a winsome, frothy comedy. Throughout the film, I laughed out 
loudly quite a few times, and was won over by the pleasant two lead 
characters whom I wanted to both be happy. The movie delves no further 
down than this, but that was quite enough for it to be an entertaining 
diversion for 106 minutes.
      - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
        Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Species II (1998)
MGM; rated R (gore, graphic violence, language, nudity, rape, sexual
situations); 92 minutes
Cast: Michael Madsen, Mykelti Williamson, Justin Lazard, Marg Helgenberger,
Natasha Henstridge, George Dzunda, James Cromwell, Myriam Cyr, Peter Boyle.
Species II is quite simply one of the worst motion pictures I have ever had
the displeasure of seeing in a theater.  It is numbingly bad.  It is so bad I
had to look away from the screen for several points during the film simply to
prevent myself from going insane.
The original Species (1995) was a surprise summer sleeper and was part of
MGM's return to a major studio.  Species II could very well kill the studio
all over again (if they weren't still thriving from the latest Bond picture,
Tomorrow Never Dies (1997), it probably would for sure).
I don't think anyone would accuse the first film of being a classic but it was
a fun, sexy, sci-fi thriller with a solid cast and some creepy ideas.  It also
introduced the wildly sexy Natasha Henstridge and, unfortunately for her, she
returns here.  Since her character Sil was killed in the first film she
returns as a clone of her former self in this one.  She's now known as Eve and
is kept behind glass, and off screen, for much of the film.
The main focus of the film is on national hero Patrick Ross (Justin Lazard).
He's the first man to walk on Mars and the son of a prominent Senator (James
Cromwell).  He also begins to slowly wipe out the population because, due to a
nasty alien virus he contracted on the trip, whenever he has sex with women
they immediately become pregnant, carry the baby to term so that it can
explode from their stomach leaving the mother dead and grow at rapid speed
into evil alien spawn.  His ultimate goal?  To mate with Eve so that they can
create the ultimate, unstoppable, alien race.
Well since this guy is wiping out the population it's lucky for the government
that Eve is psychically linked to him and they have her under surveillance so
she can help them out.  Watching over her is Dr. Laura Baker (Marg
Helgenberger) who returns from the original film.  Also returning is Press
Lenox (Michael Madsen), and the two have a bizarrely less stimulating
relationship this time around.
Anyway they team up with another astronaut, Dennis Gamble (Mykelti
Williamson), who was exposed to the virus but didn't get infected.  A third,
female, astronaut (Myriam Cyr) also acquired the virus but since she's a woman
she dies immediately upon having sex.
Eventually they track down Patrick and kill him but not before Eve has broken
out and the two nearly mate (allowing for token exposure of Natasha's bare
breasts and butt).
To state all the reasons this movie is pure evil would take entirely too long.
There is really nothing redeeming.  The film is not even cheesy enough to be
fun.  It's just boring, overdone, ugly, offensive, disgusting, and awful.
None of the actors do anything to enliven the procedures.  Justin Lazard
basically ensures his stint as a movie star is over before it begins and
Madsen, Helgenberger, and Williamson look like they're just collecting
paychecks.  I don't even want to know what possessed the brilliant James
Cromwell to become involved in this, I'd rather just forget about it and watch
Babe, L.A. Confidential, or Star Trek: First Contact again.
Then there's poor Natasha Henstridge.  She's a beautiful woman and the scenes
of Eve in heat come closest to redeeming the film.  They flirt with being
honestly sexy which provides the film with it's only almost real moments.
Maybe she's a really great actress but even if she isn't she deserves better
than this.
If you must see the film just wait for video (or even cable, which is where
this movie should have premiered).  But don't say you haven't been warned...

Title
Review for Very Bad Things (1998)
Directed by Peter Berg.
Cast: Jon Favreau, Cameron Diaz, Christian Slater, Jeremy Piven, Leland 
Orser, Daniel Stern, Jeanne Tripplehorn, Joey Zimmerman, Tyler Malinger, 
Carla Scott, Russell B. McKenzie.
1998 - 101 minutes.
Rated R (for extreme violence, gore, profanity, sex, and nudity).
Reviewed November 27, 1998.
By Dustin Putman 
Dustin Putman's Film Reviews >
"Very Bad Things," is the most delightfully morbid film of the year, a 
movie that goes so far over the deep end with its outrageousness and 
violence that I couldn't help but be won over by the material.
The film starts off with five friends leaving their homes in Los Angeles 
for a bachelor party in Las Vegas. The groom-to-be is Kyle Fisher (Jon 
Favreau), who is about to be married to the controlling, 
wedding-obsessed Laura (Cameron Diaz). The other friends are real estate 
agent Robert Boyd (Christian Slater), quiet Charles (Leland Orser), and 
brothers, Michael (Jeremy Piven) and family man Adam (Daniel Stern). 
After a wild night of gambling, boozing, and drugs, a stripper (Carla 
Scott) who was paid for by Robert comes into their hotel room, but after 
a freak accident, to everyone's terror, she is killed. As Robert puts 
it: "There are two options: go to the police and go to prison, or bury 
her out in the desert where no one will ever find her." After a security 
guard enters into the hotel room unexpectantly and sees the body, Robert 
is forced to kill him as well. "Okay, there is only one option now. You 
can forget about calling the police," he says. By the time the five 
friends return home and as the wedding draws nearer, most of them are 
overcome with guilt, which sets off an even more elaborate series of 
event, that includes much, much more murder, double-crosses, and the 
inevitable wedding from hell.
"Very Bad Things," which is actor Peter Berg's feature film directing 
debut, is the shockingly perverse and wicked comedy that, "There's 
Something About Mary," wanted to be. It pulls out all the stops to 
create something fresh, original, and hilarious, even if that requires 
surprisingly graphic violence, gore, and a slew of truly hateful 
characters that all get what they deserve by the end. 
The screenplay, also written by Berg, is, to put it mildly, very funny 
and courageous. During the second act of the film, some of the fun was 
beginning to slightly dwindle due to so much death, which was beginning 
to undermine the humor, but it eventually recouped itself with a climax 
that has to be seen to be believed. The dialogue is edgy and inventive, 
and this film proves that a movie doesn't necessarily require likable 
character to be extremely enjoyable. There's more fun, I think, in 
showing ignorable people getting their just desserts.
Cameron Diaz gives her best performance to date here, and has a lot of 
fun in playing the hateful Laura, who eventually turns out to be more 
crazy than any of the five male friends. Diaz puts so much overblown 
energy to her character that I really do think she deserves a supporting 
actress Oscar nomination come next January. By the time she is beating 
someone to death with a coat hanger, and reciting lines like, "stuff him 
in the crapper and get your ass upstairs," I couldn't help but crack up 
at how "balls-to-the-wall" this film had become. Jeanne Tripplehorn 
creates another character original, as Daniel Stern's wife, who late in 
the picture, we discover, is a tough kick-boxer that should not be 
messed around with. 
It is at this level that, "Very Bad Things," was so entertaining and 
surprising. Just when you thought you could predict what was going to 
happen, there would be a little twist involving the characters that 
would be absolutely wacky. The last sequence was perfect and managed to 
go even further over-the-top. Although I enjoyed the film immensely, let 
me make this clear: "Very Bad Things," is not a movie for everyone. It 
is more tasteless than anything I have ever seen, it is more violent and 
bloody than a R-rated film usually is, and it is offensive. Luckily, 
these are elements that I would prefer in a comedy, since it clearly 
shows the filmmakers were set on making a no-holds-barred, politically 
incorrect comedy. The fact that this film slipped through the cracks of 
the usually mainstream and "safe" wide-releases coming out lately, still 
gives me hope for the Hollywood film industry.

Title
Review for Notting Hill (1999)
Directed by Roger Michell.
Cast: Hugh Grant, Julia Roberts, Rhys Ifans, Emma Chambers, Tim 
McInnerny, Gina McKee, Hugh Bonneville.
1999 - 124 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and sexual situations).
Reviewed May 30, 1999.
The final installment of what I'd like to call the "unrelated bookstore 
romance trilogy," director Roger Michell's "Notting Hill" is, for my 
money, easily the best (the other two being "You've Got Mail" and "The 
Love Letter"). It is a sparkling romantic comedy, full of so much 
energy, laughs, and intelligence that it also must go down as one of the 
better films of its genre this decade. Taking the overly familiar 
formula of "boy-gets-girl/boy-loses-girl/boy-gets-girl-back," Michell 
and screenwriters Richard Curtis and Duncan Kenworthy have put an extra 
spin on the potentially mundane by having a great deal to say about 
fame, and the price celebrities must pay, when most would probably 
rather lead a "normal" life. 
Set exclusively in the homely England town of Notting Hill, William 
Thacker (Hugh Grant) is a lonely 35-year-old divorcee who runs a travel 
bookshop and shares a townhouse with the goofy, unsightly Spike (Rhys 
Ifans), a scruffy-looking man who is oddly lovable even when he is 
revolting. One day while at work, William finds his life suddenly change 
before his eyes when Anna Scott (Julia Roberts), the world's most famous 
movie star, walks in to do some book-shopping. After a brief encounter, 
William then experiences a "Meet-Cute" with Anna when he accidentally 
spills orange juice on her while walking along the street. After 
stopping by at his home to clean up, it becomes clear that Anna really 
likes William, and might even want to further the relationship, but 
there are, predicatably, many obstacles in the way. For one, the life of 
a movie star is not easy, as they rarely are able to snatch a moment's 
time for themselves. And two, Anna knows that their budding romance 
might very well lead to life-changing consequences for William and 
herself, particularly when the media inevitably catches on to the story.
Watching "Notting Hill," it is clear to see how easily the film could 
have been of lesser quality. After all, we've seen this story outline 
numerous, practically endless, times before and to mostly ho-hum 
results. It is only after the fame aspect is added in that the film 
proves it is trying something a little different, as the dialogue always 
comes off as nothing less than witty and entertaining. This slyness also 
leads to the heavy dose of humor the film has going for it, and I can't 
even remember when I've laughed so hard at a romantic comedy before. 
Aside from the scripting, the supporting characters are all comic 
originals, from Ifans, as William's roomate, Spike, who brightens up 
each scene he is in (even if the scenes are already bright), to Emma 
Chambers, as William's talkative, lovable sister, Honey, who is 
fortunate enough to be given the film's most laugh-inducing line of 
dialogue, when she first meets Anna, the movie star. Also effective in 
minor roles are Tim McInnerny, as William's brother, and Gina McKee, as 
his crippled wife, who share a few nice scenes together, and whose 
relationship is believable and touching as a married couple who love 
each other with all their hearts, no matter what.
And of course at the center of the film are the star attractions, Hugh 
Grant and Julia Roberts. Grant is the character whom we follow 
throughout the film, and he gives a memorable performance that more than 
adequately displays the full round of emotions William feels when it 
looks like his relationship with Anna isn't going to work out after all, 
and then when he finds himself given another chance. The question of 
should he take the chance or not is cause for some debate, and your 
opinion will greatly hinge on if you, like William, have fallen for 
Anna. Since she is played by Julia Roberts, of all people, my prediction 
is that most people will grow to care and understand her character's 
plight, as she has all of the money and success that she could ask for, 
but still is burdened with her extreme popularity, the media, and no 
privacy. It would be the easy way out to say that Roberts is, in 
general, playing herself, but I don't think so. Anna is strictly a 
character, but the reason Roberts is so wonderful and right at home here 
is because she, no doubt, has taken her own experiences with fame and 
put them into the context of this film. Together, Grant and Roberts are 
dynamite, and perhaps they could go on to become the next Tom Hanks/Meg 
Ryan romantic duo.
One of the pleasures to be had in "Notting Hills" is in its dealing with 
Hollywood. One of the best, and most hilarious, on-target, sequences 
comes when William drops by the Ritz hotel to see Anna, and finds 
himself in the midst of press interviews. Saying that he is from "Horses 
& Hounds" magazine, William is forced into a seemingly endless stream of 
interviews with Anna Scott's co-stars in her latest film, the sci-fi 
epic, "Helix." The sheer accuracy of the interview procedure is one of 
the reasons the scene is so successful, and is only aided by William's 
utterly benign questions, such as when he asks Anna, "do you wish that 
you had added more horses into your film?" "Not really," replies Anna, 
"seeing that this particular picture takes place in space." Because of 
her fame, Anna knows that she can never have what most people have, 
which is a regular life, but still feels frustrated by the fact that she 
can't do anything without the media turning it into a major headline 
blitz. The treatment of this character element only enhances the film, 
and Anna, so that when she grows upset at one point late in the picture, 
it is an understandable reaction.
Although not vital to the film's story, one added bonus that should be 
pin-pointed is a magical, liberating sequence in which William walks 
down a Notting Hill street and right in front of your eyes, we see the 
seasons change from summer to rain to snow, and finally, to spring. 
Bravo to director Michell for attempting something so fresh and stylish, 
and performing it to perfection.
How everything ends up at the conclusion of "Notting Hill" can be more 
or less telegraphed before the movie even starts, but getting to that 
predictable moment was an unexpected delight, and for the film to have 
ended any other way would have seemed like a cheat. "Notting Hill" is 
the rare, quintessential Hollywood romance--smart, affectionate, 
realistic, and thoroughly likable.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Remembering the Cosmos Flower (1998)
Directed by Junichi Suzuki.
Cast: Akane Oda, Megumi Matsushita, Mari Natsuki.
1999 - 103 minutes (in Japanese w/English Subtitles).
Not Rated (equivalent of a PG rating for mature themes).
Reviewed July 19, 1999.
Japanese filmmaker Junichi Suzuki's "Remembering the Cosmos Flower" is such a 
well-meaning drama that you almost feel guilty criticizing it, but, 
ultimately, the movie paints a decidedly syrupy, manipulative picture on the 
subject of the AIDS virus. Foreign films, more often than not, are far more 
intelligent than American films, because it is often said that foreigners 
write about adults while Americans write about children. With "Remembering 
the Cosmos Flower," this theory unfortunately doesn't hold up, as you can 
always see Suzuki straining to get the viewer to shed some tears. I almost 
did once; I admittedly felt myself welling up all so slightly, but only 
because my tear ducts felt as if they were being violently yanked about.
After being away for seven years in South America, 15-year-old Akiko (Akane 
Oda) returns to her hometown in Japan with her mother. While overseas, she 
and her father were in an automobile accident; he died, while she was given a 
blood transfusion, as well as AIDS. Word spreads quickly through the Japanese 
town as many parents start threatening to keep their children out of school 
if Akiko attends, oblivious to the reality of AIDS, which is that it can't be 
passed through the air or simple touch. Akiko and her caring mother (Mari 
Natsuki) are strong-willed people, and things brighten up when Akiko is 
reunited with her childhood friend, Natsumi (Megumi Matsushita), who is also 
cautious at first until she is educated more on the disease and realizes how 
much pain Akiko is going through, both physically and emotionally. Akiko 
knows she isn't going to be living for much longer and is terrified of death, 
but keeps her chin held high and desperately tries to not let anything 
negative affect her. As the town's festival approaches, Akiko and Natsumi 
plan out a comedy skit to perform in the school talent show, but when Akiko 
falls ill in the hospital, Natsumi is urged to carry on their original plans 
alone.
"Remembering the Cosmos Flower" is mature and realistic when it deals with 
Akiko and Natsumi's close friendship, as well as the portrayal of how 
everyone deals with her inevitable death, but along the way Suzuki has felt 
the need to include several melodramtic scenes that ring with a resounding 
falseness. One such scene comes toward the end, when Natsumi goes on-stage to 
perform their comedy act alone and is greeted by the audience with several 
prejudiced remarks about Akiko. Standing up there in front of everyone, 
Natsumi makes a heartfelt speech defending her friend and educating everyone 
on the seriousness of AIDS, which concludes with half the audience crying and 
everyone clapping. Film scenes like this always rub me the wrong way because 
they are so far-strung from reality, and it doesn't help that the movie seems 
outdated. Ten or fifteen years ago I may have believed this story because 
AIDS was a relatively new disease that not many people knew much about. 
Coming in the late-'90s, however, the characters that inhabit the town in 
this film apparently know nothing about AIDS and react in a ludicrous manner 
that I couldn't believe for a second.
On the positive side, the performances by the two leads are winning and 
poignant. Akane Oda effectively presents Akika as a girl coping day by day 
with her disease, even amidst all of the negativity that is thrown at her and 
her mother. Megumi Matsushita is equally superb as Natsumi, Akika's best 
friend who gradually studies up on AIDS and learns that Akika is just like 
everyone else, except that she has a far more difficult battle ahead of her 
for the rest of her life. Natsumi's conflicted relationship with her stubborn 
father is well-done also, as he constantly is trying to stop his daughter and 
Akika from spending time together, and in one of the film's more truthful 
moments, Natsumi blows up at her dad for being so narrow-minded under the 
circumstances.
"Remembering the Cosmos Flower" cannot be faulted for its superior actors or 
some of the memorable relationships that are developed here, but it is an 
otherwise mechanical motion picture, one that is both predictable, in a sappy 
sort of way, and out-of-date. Its heart is obviously in the right place, but 
as a portrait of a closed-up, uneducated society on the reality of the very 
serious AIDS virus, it comes at least a decade too late.
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Just Visiting (2001)
Directed by Jean-Marie Poire.
Cast: Jean Reno, Christian Clavier, Christina Applegate, Tara Reid, Bridgette 
Wilson-Sampras, Malcolm McDowell, Matt Ross.
2001 - 88 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for mild profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, April 7, 2001.
In its native France, 1993's time travel comedy, "Les Visiteurs," became a 
breakout hit that ended up outgrossing "Jurassic Park" in that respective 
year. When it was finally released in the United States, it flopped, but 
Hollywood's viewpoint was that all it needed was an American remake for it to 
become a financial success. In a rare move, the original's director, 
Jean-Marie Poire, and main stars, Jean Reno and Christian Clavier, have 
reunited for "Just Visiting," which is cursorily enjoyable, but  almost 
instantly forgettable.
In a prologue set in 12th-century England, the honorable Count Thibault (Jean 
Reno) is preparing to marry his beloved Rosalind (Christina Applegate). When 
he becomes victim to witchcraft and ends up accidentally killing his fair 
love, he seeks out the help of a wizard (Malcolm McDowell) to cast a spell on 
him and his goofily faithful servant, Andre (Christian Clavier), to send them 
back in time to the moment preceding Rosalind's untimely death. 
The spell goes awry, however, and Count Thibault and Andre end up awaking in 
Chicago, circa 2000. In an entirely different place and time than they have 
ever known, they are both mystified and frightened of the inventions and way 
of life in the modern world, standing as two fish helplessly out of water. 
Almost immediately after landing in the present day, they have a chance meet 
with Julia Malfete (Applegate, in a dual role), a 
great-great-great-great-great descendant of Rosalind, who takes them in and 
helps them in finding a way back home. 
With a screenplay by Jean-Marie Poire, Christian Clavier, and John Hughes, 
"Just Visiting" takes its time in setting up the premise, but finds much 
physical comedy once things get going. The movie is very funny some of the 
time, and occasionally clever, but is so slight that it offers nothing 
worthwhile outside of a few laughs. The featherweight plot lacks an urgency 
that fails to ever involve the viewer in the goings-on, and with the end 
credits comes a feeling of time that could have certainly been more 
well-spent.
Jean Reno and Christian Clavier, as Count Thibault and Andre, expertly play 
two 12th-century men humorously floundering in the 21st-century, and no 
wonder--they played the same exact roles in "Les Visiteurs," unseen by 
myself. Their characters never feel like anything other than pawns, though, 
so it is difficult to invest any interest on their returning to England and 
setting things right. 
The American actors who surround them are all rising young actors whose 
involvement in such a minor, wasteful effort boggles the mind. Christina 
Applegate (1998's "The Big Hit"), as both Rosalind and Julia, is a bright 
actress whom I've admired ever since her days on TV's "Married...with 
Children," and she is very good here, trying to keep a straight face amidst 
the insanity that is brought with two men from medieval times transplanted in 
the year 2000. Matt Ross (2000's "American Psycho"), as Julia's slimy 
fiancee; Bridgette Wilson-Sampras (2001's "The Wedding Planner"), as his 
mistress; and Tara Reid (2000's "Dr. T and the Women"), as a free spirit who 
catches the eye of Andre, have one-dimensional supporting roles.
As a movie that just happens to be playing on cable late one night, "Just 
Visiting" might be a harmless way to spend an hour-and-a-half before heading 
to sleep. As a  theatrical release, its aspirations are hopeless, and its 
chance of financial success is about as promising as "Battlefield Earth 2." 
Hollywood Pictures would have been best off had they just left well-enough 
alone.
 http://www.all-reviews.com/reviewers/DustinPutman.htm
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman
http://www.atnzone.com

Title
Review for Return to Horror High (1987)
Directed by Bill Froehlich.
Cast: Scott Jacoby, Lori Lethin, Vince Edwards, Alex Rocco, Brendan 
Hughes, Philip McKeon, Richard Brestoff, Al Fann, Panchito Gomez, 
Michael Eric Kramer, Pepper Martin, Maureen McCormick, Marvin McIntyre, 
Remy O'Neill, Andy Romano, George Clooney.
1987 - 95 minutes.
Rated R (for violence, gore, profanity, sex, nudity).
Reviewed November 10, 1998.
"Return to Horror High," wants to be a couple different types of movies 
at once. The film tells the story of a low-budget horror movie being 
filmed at the closed-down Crippen High, a school where a group of serial 
murders took place five years before. But what the cast and crew don't 
know is that a real killer, maybe the same one that was never 
apprehended, is going into action again.
On one level, "Return to Horror High" is a slasher movie, and it is at 
this level that it works the best on. Watching the film, which was made 
in 1987, I couldn't help but take notice that the killer's costume was 
almost identital to that of the Ghostface in, "Scream," and "Scream 2." 
On another level, the film wants to be a slapstick comedy, and there are 
many hints of this throughout. Unfortunately, most of these jokes fall 
flat. And the last thing the film wants to be is a "behind-the-scenes" 
look at an exploitation film being made. The only problem is that, while 
much of it is supposed to be from the movie itself being made, no 
cameras are shown filming it, thus making it far more confusing than it 
had to be. And to top it all off, the "twist" ending makes very little 
to no sense whatsoever, and so we are basically left with feeling as if 
we wasted our time. There are story developments that are beyond 
ludicrous, and plot holes you could drive a winnebago through. If you 
see the film, or have seen it, you'll know what I mean.
The premise of "Return to Horror High," is admittedly pretty crafty, and 
I liked the atmosphere of the school, which is where the whole thing 
takes place. But Director Froehlich, judging from this movie, is an 
incompetent director, except for being able to film the seldom 
suspeneful scene. Well, come to think of it, there is only one scene 
that is actually scary, and it has to do with two actors being locked in 
a room as the killer tries to break in. But other than that two-minute 
distraction, "Return to Horror High," is certainly no great shake.
Note: Look for George Clooney in a supporting role as one of the actors 
on the film. And strangely enough, he is the first character to get the 
ax...literally.
       - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
         Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Entrapment (1999)
 For anyone who has caught on to my overall taste in movies, you know 
 that, while I give everything a chance, espionage/spy/thief action 
 pictures are definately not my cup of tea. They all seem very much the 
 same, and I find the large majority of them either dull or crushing 
 bores. But with that said, I liked "Entrapment," in a kinda-sorta way, 
 thanks to the wonderful repartee of Sean Connery (in his first good film 
 in a long time) and Catherine Zeta-Jones, who is a sparkling new talent 
 that I have instantly fallen in love with. Sure, she's absolutely 
 beautiful, but she also has a sneaky way with words and is able to 
 modify her mildly underwritten character into a wholeheartedly 
 believable, not to mention likable, creation.
 Virginia "Gin" Baker (Catherine Zeta-Jones) is a New York insurance 
 investigator who has tracked down and been following the expert art 
 thief, Robert "Mac" MacDougal (Sean Connery). After spying on him on one 
 occasion, she is awaken in the middle of the night by Mac, who reveals 
 that he is one step ahead of her. Posing as a thief herself, Gin makes a 
 proposal to him: help her steal an ancient Chinese mask worth millions. 
 As the last days of 1999 close in, which will inevitably cause a 
 "millenium bug" in all of the computers, Gin also forms another plan, 
 this one with the stakes heightened: steal $8-billion from the largest 
 and tallest bank in the world (located in Malaysia) and they will split 
 the money, but the theft has to be done during the last ten minutes 
 before the new year.
 "Entrapment," like the similar, but in my opinion inferior, James Bond 
 films, spans across the globe from the already-mentioned Nfrom the 
 already-mentioned New York to Malaysia to Scotland, where Mac's castle 
 is located. As Mac and Gin get deeper and deeper in over their heads, 
 Mac grows suspicious of Gin's possible false identity and her motives, 
 while Gin fears that she, through all of their bickering, might actually 
 be falling for him. In case this subplot is unbelievable, don't worry. 
 Although Zeta-Jones is 28-years-old and Connery is 68, this is the least 
 to worry about when you're dealing with such a preposterous, but 
 admittedly entertaining, story. Besides, Connery has aged very well 
 (like Warren Beatty and Robert Redford), and so their budding romance 
 isn't quite as much of a stretch as the downright ragged Clint Eastwood 
 and his near-laughable womanizing character
 Although never a particular fan of Connery's (who played James Bond 
 himself, primarily, in the '60s and '70s), he is very charismatic and 
 enjoyable here, even when we aren't sure if his character of Mac should 
 be trusted. Matching, and actually surpassing, his performance is 
 Zeta-Jones, who was last seen in "The Mask of Zorro" (which I opted to 
 skip when it was in theaters) and will be appearing in "The Haunting" 
 this July. She has a lovely, innocent, but at the same time experienced, 
 face that you could stare at for hours on end, and a fetching 
 personality to play. I loved, for example, the scene in which Mac asks 
 her if there has ever been someone she hasn't been able to seduce, and 
 without a moment's thought and with a sly grin, replies, "no." Without 
 Connery and Zeta-Jones, and without the fun that is had concerning the 
 tension between them, "Entrapment" wouldn't have been nearly as 
 successful, and it is their casting that, to me, was the most vital 
 element in making the whole picture.
 The two action set-pieces, one in which they attempt to steal the 
 Chinese mask, and the climactic sequence in which they set out to steal 
 billions from the bank, are stylishly and expertly crafted. Back at 
 Mac's Scottish castle, he trains Gin to be able to slink through the 
 invisible criss-crossing laser beams in order to get to the mask, and a 
 great deal of suspense is stirred up in this scene. The climax, also, is 
 breathtaking, with Mac and Gin being spotted stealing the billions and 
 in their desperation to escape, must crawl out onto an unsteady wire 
 seventy stories in the air, above a prestigious New Year's celebration.
 When all is said and done, "Entrapment" is a fun and completely amiable 
 precursor to the upcoming onslaught of Summer movies. There's nothing 
 extraordinary about it, it isn't likely to stick in your mind as some of 
 the best films do, and the plotting leaves several holes. The supporting 
 characters are all wasted, including Ving Rhames as a friend and 
 gadgetry-supplier of Mac's, but that was fine with me since the heart of 
 the film belongs to the delicate and nicely-acquired relationship 
 between Connery and Zeta-Jones. "Entrapment" isn't a particularly 
 fulfilling experience, but it easily gets the job done.
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Anniversary Party, The (2001)
Directed by Alan Cumming, Jennifer Jason Leigh.
Cast: Jennifer Jason Leigh, Alan Cumming, Phoebe Cates, Kevin Kline, Jennifer 
Beals, Gwyneth Paltrow, Jane Adams, John C. Reilly, Mina Badie, Denis O'Hare, 
Parker Posey, John Benjamin Hickey, Michael Panes, Owen Kline, Greta Kline.
2001 - 115 minutes
Rated R (for profanity, nudity, and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, June 24, 2001.
When you think about it, who better to write and direct their own film than 
actual veteran actors, who have spent countless amounts of time on movie sets 
taking in the jobs of everyone around them? While the occasional actor who 
takes a stab at directing has a tendency to become pretentious, there seems 
to be a relatively high actor-to-successful-director ratio. 
"The Anniversary Party," written and directed by actors Alan Cumming and 
Jennifer Jason Leigh, is a striking triumph--an incisive, thought-provoking 
look at the questionable longevity of a marriage, set at their sixth-year 
wedding anniversary, following a year-long separation. The couple is fading 
thirtysomething movie actress Sally Therrian (Leigh) and her novelist husband 
Joe (Cumming), who is about to start filming an adaptation of one of his own 
books. The upcoming film project, widely known to be about Sally, is one that 
he is planning to cast 22-year-old ingenue Skye Davidson (Gwyneth Paltrow) 
in, much to the chagrin of Sally, who is hurt he didn't choose her, instead. 
Set over the course of a 24-hour period, the first hour depicts the guests 
(all real-life friends of Cumming and Leigh) arriving. The varied group, all 
involved in the Hollywood industry, include recent Oscar winner Cal Gold 
(Kevin Kline) and his wife Sophia (Kline's real-life spouse Phoebe Cates); 
the Therrian's business manager Jerry Adams (John Benjamin Hickey) and his 
daffy wife, Judy (Parker Posey); Mac Forsyth (John C. Reilly), the current 
director of the romantic comedy Sally is making, and his neurotic, 
ultra-skinny wife, Clair (Jane Adams); and Gina Taylor (Jennifer Beals), 
Joe's long-time photographer confidante. The two outsider guests are the 
Therrian's next-door neighbors, Ryan (Denis O'Hare) and Monica Rose (Mina 
Badie), whom they have been instructed to grudgingly invite to avoid a 
possible lawsuit over their long-standing feud about Sally and Joe's barking 
dog. Also making an appearance, and causing Sally's true feelings to begin to 
rise to the surface, is Skye Davidson.
After the corny party games are played (the charades scene is pricelessly 
funny and genuine) and Sally and Joe open their anniversary gifts, the 
designer drug, Ecstasy, is introduced to the group as Skye's present. Their 
subsequent ingestion by everyone who decides to stay paves the way for the 
film's second hour. At first enjoying themselves and having a blast, Sally 
and Joe have various encounters with the other guests that makes them 
question their own relationship, with a secret that Sally has been harboring 
that may threaten to tear them apart forever.
Highly publicized to have been filmed in 19 days on the controversial digital 
video format, "The Anniversary Party" has a naturalistic flow to it that 
makes it feel less like a fictional motion picture, and more like a two-hour 
eavesdrop on the type of party that the rich and famous might really throw. 
Adding to the realism is a flawless cast who, in many cases, play characters 
decidedly similar to themselves, and who all believably seem like a large 
gathering of good friends. Kevin Kline (1999's "Wild Wild West") and Phoebe 
Cates (who has not been onscreen since 1994's "Princess Caraboo"), for 
example, play a movie star couple who, in Cates' case, has given up her 
prospering film career to raise her children. Likewise, Jennifer Jason Leigh 
plays someone not too far away from where she herself is at--a woman in her 
late-thirties whose career has recently been on a down slope, questionably 
because she is now a little too old to be playing the "young" roles, and not 
old enough to be getting the Susan Sarandon or Meryl Streep parts. The 
screenplay, by Leigh and Cumming, is so very impressive that it actually 
seems more like a delightfully well-acted, two-hour improv, rather than a 
"written" piece.
As previously mentioned, the cast is a top-notch smorgasbord of reasonably 
well-known talent. In a film that houses many standout performances, Phoebe 
Cates is superb and (in one truthful sequence) heartbreakingly funny; Gwyneth 
Paltrow (2000's "Bounce") gives her role of Skye, who most think of as dense 
and childish, several different character shades that expose her to be a 
little smarter than she looks; Jane Adams (1998's "Happiness") reaps comic 
gold as a new mother who is, to put it mildly, an obsessive parent, as well 
as an obsessive dieter; Jennifer Beals (1998's "The Last Days of Disco") is 
astoundingly assured in the best role she's had in ages; and Leigh's 
half-sister, Mina Badie (1994's "Mrs. Parker and the Vicious Circle"), is 
quietly poignant as a neighbor who doesn't seem to have the same stuck-up 
attitude as her husband, and begins to realize their extreme differences as 
the night presses on.
The movie wouldn't be complete without the audacious, passionate effort that 
Jennifer Jason Leigh (1999's "eXistenZ") and Alan Cumming (2001's "Josie and 
the Pussycats") have put into their directing debut, as well as their two 
central acting turns. Leigh and Cumming have rarely been better onscreen than 
they are right here, as a couple who do, indeed, love one another, but might 
not be secure enough in their own bodies to be able to survive each other's 
company. Best of all is a confrontation near the end, as they search for 
their missing dog, that is full of such pain, anger, and betrayal that it's 
almost difficult to endure.
It's clear that Leigh and Cumming put their entire heart and soul into the 
project, as they've not only crafted a comedic drama of surprising depth, but 
one of true emotional maturity. Very Altmanesque in its free-flowing 
treatment of the characters and story, "The Anniversary Party" is alternately 
so adept, so funny, and so powerful that it manages to stand on its own as a 
true original. It's easily one of the best American films of the year.
   - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
     http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman
http://www.all-reviews.com/reviewers/dustinputman.htm
http://www.atnzone.com

Title
Review for Cookie's Fortune (1999)
Directed by Robert Altman.
Cast: Glenn Close, Charles S. Dutton, Liv Tyler, Julianne Moore, Chris 
O'Donnell, Patricia Neal, Ned Beatty, Courtney B. Vance, Lyle Lovett, 
Matt Malloy, Donald Moffat.
1999 - 118 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and a suicide).
Reviewed May 11, 1999.
Since 1975's "Nashville," an American masterpiece and one of the 
greatest films ever made, Robert Altman has proven that he is a 
world-class filmmaker. Although his career since then has been noticably 
uneven, he always manages to come out on top, and in the last decade has 
made several successful motion pictures, including "The Player," "Short 
Cuts," and even "The Gingerbread Man." His latest film, the 
southern-based dark comedy "Cookie's Fortune," which gained a lot of 
buzz at this year's Sundance Film Festival, unfortunately falls into 
Altman's pile of disappointments (joining the likes of the inane "Ready 
to Wear"), and probably is his biggest misfire I've seen.
Set in the humble, little town of Holly Springs, Mississippi, Cookie 
(Patricia Neal) is an elderly and grieving widower who has several 
relatives nearby, none of which much seem to bother visiting her, and 
whose only actual friend is Willis (Charles S. Dutton), a kindly black 
man who lives with her to keep her company. Easter is quickly 
approaching, and when her two nieces, the kooky, determined Camille 
(Glenn Close), who is the director of the church's violent holiday play 
of "Salome," by Orson Welles, and the dim-witted, flaky Cora (Julianne 
Moore), drop by, they are horrified to discover Cookie dead in her 
upstairs bedroom, the victim of a suicide. Stating that suicide will not 
be permitted in their family, the quick-thinking Camille immediately 
brainwashes Cora into telling the police Cookie was murdered, and then 
goes about destroying evidence (she literally eats the suicide note) and 
setting up a "murder scene." Soon, however, the planted gun happens to 
contain the fingerprints of Willis, who is taken to the town's jail by 
the reluctant cops, who keep the cell door wide open and set up a game 
of Scrabble for him to play. Hearing word that her best buddy is in the 
slammer, Cora's tough 19-year-old daughter, Emma (Liv Tyler), becomes 
Willis' jail partner, taking time out only to make out with her "iffy" 
cop boyfriend (Chris O'Donnell). 
There are two many obvious problems in "Cookie's Fortune" to count, but 
many that can't be ignored. The ensemble cast that Altman has gotten for 
this film is truly exceptional, but (aside from Dutton and Tyler) every 
single one of them is burdened with an annoyingly one-note character 
that isn't given any chance to grow within the nearly eventless 2-hour 
running time. Amid all of the "charming" eccentricities, all signs of 
realistic or even human characteristics have been abandoned for blatant 
caricatures that quickly test the viewer's nerves. In a film in which 
the majority of characters are related in some way, there is no excuse 
for the amount of relationships that aren't the least bit explored, or 
even given one scene, particularly between mother and daughter Cora and 
Emma, who have all of one scene together and one line exchange. Similar 
and far superior films in the "Southern eccentricity" genre are 1989's 
"Miss Firecracker" and 1997's "Midnight in the Garden of Good and Evil." 
It's been at least a year since I've viewed both of these movies, but 
they are more fresh in my mind, and certainly more memorable, than 
"Cookie's Fortune" which, as I write this, I saw about an hour ago.
It's a shame, too, because the performances are the central saving grace 
(which isn't nearly enough to save any graces at all concerning this 
movie). Since Dutton and Tyler are given the two fully-realized roles in 
the piece, their performances easily stand out, making the most out of 
what is certainly a lackluster screenplay, by Anne Rapp. Julianne Moore 
is the most lovable character in the bunch, mostly because of her 
genuine naivety. Ultimately, she is turned into the main comic relief 
and is forced to stand at a distance from the material. Glenn Close also 
is fine here, but too off-beat by a half for us to get involved or care 
at all about her, even though, I suspect, she wasn't meant to be 
particularly likable. Chris O'Donnell sleepwalks through his first film 
in two years (since the disasterous "Batman and Robin"), but it isn't 
his fault that he pretty much is put in a corner with nothing to do but 
occasionally kiss Tyler. Courtney B. Vance shows up three-fourths of the 
way into the film as a crime investigator and comes off as nothing more 
than an afterthought, as does Lyle Lovett, as Tyler's boss and friend at 
her fish hatchery job.
By the time "Cookie's Fortune" reached its climax which, to say the 
least, leaves something to be desired, I was left with one nagging 
question: what was the point? The movie is rarely funny, straining for 
laughs that no doubt sounded better on paper than in actual film form; 
there is no human interest, or any sort of interest at all, in the 
story; and very little at all comes to satisfying closure. Unlike 
Altman's "Nashville" or "The Player," "Cookie's Fortune" has nothing at 
all to say about anything, hoping that utter wackiness will be enough to 
salvage the proceedings. It isn't. Not by a long shot.
   - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
     Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Whatever It Takes (2000)
Directed by David Raynr.
Cast: Shane West, Marla Sokoloff, Jodi Lyn O'Keefe, James Franco, Aaron Paul, 
Colin Hanks, Manu Intiraymi, Julia Sweeney, Richard Schiff, Kip Pardue, Scott 
Vickaryous, Christine Lakin.
2000 - 92 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, March 25, 2000.
"Whatever It Takes" is the exact antithesis of "Here on Earth," this week's 
other teen-oriented movie. Whereas "Here on Earth" must be praised for its 
non-stereotypical view of teenage characters, "Whatever It Takes," directed 
by David Raynr, is a cliche-ridden high school comedy with few inventive 
ideas, but a fair amount of wit. Sort of a hybrid of "She's All That" and 
"Drive Me Crazy," and superior to the former, the film predictably follows 
two good-natured protagonists and their self-involved romantic counterparts, 
until the moment when...well...I think we both know how this one will end, 
folks. Because the ground rules for this genre have been so stringently laid 
out, its the "getting-there" that is more important than the actual payoff, 
and "Whatever It Takes," while certainly not one of the better teen comedies, 
is at least one of the more entertaining recent ones.
Ryan Woodman (Shane West) is an unpopular senior at Gilmore High School, with 
a long-time best friend and next-door neighbor in Maggie Carter (Marla 
Sokoloff), whose bedroom balconies conveniently face each other, so they can 
spend their free time talking between them. Maggie is seemingly nothing more 
than a sister to him, as he has eyes for the most popular (and superficial) 
girl in school, Ashley Grant (Jodi Lyn O'Keefe), even though she doesn't know 
he even exists. When jock Chris (James Franco) decides that he would like to 
have a chance with Maggie, he devises a plan with Ryan. Since Ashley is 
Chris' cousin, he will easily be able to get her to go out with Ryan, if Ryan 
helps him to win over Maggie. Pretty soon, it becomes apparent to Ryan that 
Ashley is nothing more than a shallow individual worried only about herself, 
and he slowly comes to the realization that his true feelings lie with 
Maggie. It sounds complicated, but it's really not; just another spin on the 
same old formula.
"Whatever It Takes," loosely based on "Cyrano de Bergerac," is a flawed movie 
in more ways than one, and it makes you long for the '80s John Hughes era, 
when teen movies like "Sixteen Candles," "Pretty in Pink," and "Some Kind of 
Wonderful" laid the groundwork for such '90s fare as this, but were done with 
a great deal more intelligence and overall heart. So why does "Whatever It 
Takes" fundamentally work? Easy. Going into a movie theater playing this 
film, you have it set in your mind exactly what is going to happen and how 
everything will be played out, and because it satisfies those expectations 
and doesn't resort to complete brainlessness, you come out happy. If you 
don't, then you really had no excuse for walking into the theater in the 
first place.
Shane West (TV's "Once and Again") and Marla Sokoloff (TV's "The Practice") 
are charming and likable as Ryan and Maggie. Their roles, like everyone 
else's, is a cliche, but they do their jobs professionally, and seem to be 
having fun in the process. 
The standout in the cast, however, turns out to be Jodi Lyn O'Keefe (1998's 
"Halloween: H20"), who is basically playing the same stuck-up character that 
she did in 1999's "She's All That," but with a fresh spin. About as 
self-absorbed as a person can possibly be, O'Keefe's Ashley is won over by 
Ryan not by flattery, but by criticisms, as any negativity directed towards 
her attracts her attention, since she is such an obviously insecure and 
pathetic creature. It might have been nice had screenwriter Mark Schwahn 
attempted to tear down Ashley's thin facade and explore her as a real human 
being (as John Hughes did spectacularly with Lea Thompson's popular sexpot 
character in 1987's "Some Kind of Wonderful"), but at least she isn't 
purposefully cruel--only highly materialistic.
"Whatever It Takes" is light, fluffy, fast-paced, and through the sludge of 
overdone ideas are a couple original moments, particularly in the Prom 
finale, whose theme for the year is "Titanic Dreams." With the gymnasium set 
up to look like the Titanic, complete with fake icebergs and lifesavers, a 
plot development occurs that immediately turns the dance into a basic 
reenactment of the tragic sinking of the title ship. But who are we kidding? 
The movie is little more than a remake of countless other films, done 
occasionally better but often worse. The play's the thing, however, and 
"Whatever It Takes" is entertaining throughout the duration of its brisk 92 
minutes.

Title
Review for Lost in America (1985)
By Dustin Putman 
Dustin Putman's Film Reviews ">Http://members.aol.com/filmfan16/index.html>
"Lost in America" is a very funny comedy from Albert Brooks (who also 
made 1996's "Mother"), about an unhappy married couple (Brooks and Julie 
Hagerty) in their 30's who are stuck in high-paying jobs that are going 
nowhere, and feel like their lives are just passing them by. When Brooks 
finds out that the execute vice manager position has been passed over 
him to another worker, they decide to quit their jobs, sell everything 
they own, purchase a motor home, and set out on the open road together. 
It's what they've always wanted to do, and besides, they are hoping it 
will save their marriage. Predictably, things immediately don't go as 
planned when they stop in Las Vegas to renew their wedding vows and 
Hagerty loses all of their money gambling.
"Lost in America" isn't necessarily an original film, and it knows it 
isn't (there are various references to it being exactly like "Easy 
Rider", and it is very similar to the delightful 1950's comedy, "The 
Long Long Trailer," starring Lucille Ball and Desi Arnaz), but what 
saves it from being completely cliched is the highly enjoyable and witty 
screenplay by Albert Brooks and Monica Johnson. The dialogue, as in all 
of Brooks' films, is sharp and funny, and he and Hagerty make a great 
team. In fact, they are so charismatic together, I'm surprised they've 
never reteamed for a film. Now, that's an idea!
"Lost in America" was so good throughout that the film easily had the 
potential to be a great comedy, like the similar "National Lampoon's 
Vacation," but it feels much too short, and just when you think it 
should be hitting the 3/4 mark, it ends, as if they forget to film a 
conclusion. When the end credits started to roll, I was disappointed 
because I felt like there was so much more that could have been done, 
but wasn't.
Nonetheless, Albert Brooks' "Lost in America" is so entertaining the 
whole way through that it certainly should not be missed. It's a 
perfectly good way to spend an hour-and-a-half.

Title
Review for Dancer, Texas Pop. 81 (1998)
Directed by Tim McCanlies.
Cast: Breckin Meyer, Peter Facinelli, Ethan Embry, Eddie Mills, Ashley 
Johnson, Patricia Wettig, Michael O'Neill, Alexandra Holden, Eddie 
Jones, Wayne Tippet.
1998 - 97 minutes.
Rated PG (for mild profanity).
Reviewed October 25, 1998. 
"Dancer, Texas Pop. 81," is one of those minor small-town films in which 
not much happens, but it is enjoyable nonetheless just to watch the 
characters.
The title gives way to the setting of the movie, which is a tiny desert 
town that, yes, has a population of only 81. At the start of the film, 
four teenage friends are about to graduate from high school (their class 
only consists of one other person), and promised each other when they 
were 12 that once they graduated, they would set off together for L.A. 
At the head of the group is Keller (Breckin Meyer), the person who is 
the most positive he wants to get out. Terrel Lee (Peter Facinelli) is 
being forced to help out with his father's oil business, and doesn't 
know how to break the news to his friends that he can't go. Squirrel 
(Ethen Embry) is the most eccentric of the group, and has a very bad 
family life, living in a motor home with a father who doesn't really 
care about him, or know what's going on half the time. And John (Eddie 
Mills) is also unsure about going, after his father tells him he has a 
great talent for ranching, which is something he loves.
There are no big, dramatic scenes in "Dancer, Texas Pop. 81," nor are 
there any big plot developments. Instead, it is simply a series of 
scenes and vignettes involving all of the characters, and director 
McCanlies, making his film debut, proves that he is a very assured 
writer. The cinematography, with the open skies and empty landscapes, 
are gorgeous to look at.
There actually are no real problems with the film; it is just that it is 
so laid-back and slight that the picture couldn't possibly be any better 
than merely "good." 
The four main actors are all fine, but it actually is a few supporting 
performances that stand out, particularly Ashley Johnson, as John's 
12-year-old sister, Josie, and Alexandra Holden, as Keller's female 
friend whom he always confides in with his problems.
"Dancer, Texas Pop. 81," is by no means an earth-shattering, important 
film. It is neither complex nor any sort of award-winner. But it is 
quiet and entertaining, and I'm glad I saw it.
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
       Dustin Putman's
Film Haven >

Title
Review for Halloween (1978)
Directed by John Carpenter.
Cast: Jamie Lee Curtis, Donald Pleasence, Nancy Loomis, P.J. Soles, 
Charles Cyphers, Brian Andrews, Kyle Richards, Nancy Stephens.
1978 - 93 minutes.
Rated R (for violence, sexual situations, brief nudity, and profanity).
Reviewed October 26, 1998.
By Dustin Putman 
Dustin Putman's Film Reviews ">Http://members.aol.com/filmfan16/index.html>
I have probably seen John Carpenter's horror masterpiece, "Halloween," 
more times than any other film (the first time being when I was all of 
4-years-old), and it will always be the best horror film ever made, in 
my eyes. None of its six sequels (and counting) have been able to even 
remotely capture the style and brilliance of the original. I simply 
cannot imagine a genre picture being better than this one. 
"Halloween," starts off with a prologue set in 1963, all done in an 
elaborate, one-take POV shot, in which 6-year-old Michael Myers grabs a 
butcher knife, makes his way upstairs, slips on a clown mask, and goes 
into his teenage sister's room and stabs her to death.
Switch to October 30th, 1978, Myers, now an adult, escapes from a mental 
hospital, returns to his hometown of Haddonfield, and on Halloween 
night, goes on a murder spree, singling out three friends, Laurie (Jamie 
Lee Curtis), Annie (Nancy Loomis), and Linda (P.J Soles), two of which 
are babysitting. Meanwhile, Michael Myers' psychiatrist, Dr. Sam Loomis 
(Donald Pleasence), knows he will strike again, and goes searching for 
him.
John Carpenter's "Halloween," is the quintessential horror film, 
perfectly executed, atmospheric, suspenseful, and terrifying. Yes, it is 
a "slasher" movie, but I'd like to think that it is so good that it 
surpasses that dubious label. 
There are many reasons why "Halloween," was and still is an effective 
film. One of the big reasons is Carpenter's clever use of the 
foregrounds and backgrounds of all of his shots. If you look really good 
at the backgrounds of all of the scenes, you will often see something 
lurking around, including Michael Myers himself. Many pictures have 
copied this approach, but none have been able to do it so successfully.
Another reason it is so enthralling is that the story is very, very 
simple, and is actually a sort of "slice-of-life" movie, when dealing 
with the teenage girls. There are no "big" scenes between them. Instead, 
it just sort of observes them in their normal life. It just happens to 
be while they are being stalked by a serial killer. In recent horror 
movies, there is always a mystery to who the killer is, and this 
90's-style approach is getting old fast, even though I am a big fan of 
"Scream," "I Know What You Did Last Summer," and "Urban Legend."
"Halloween" also has the most memorable music score I've ever listened 
to. Like 1960's "Psycho," the score, when heard, is always paired with 
this movie, and even those people who have never seen it probably can 
hum it. It's sort of like in, "Psycho." Many people remember the shower 
scene, even if they've never actually seen the movie.
Despite being a slasher film, "Halloween" surprisingly has next to no 
gore or on-screen violence. Because of this, it proves that horror 
pictures do not need to have graphic violence to be a scary experience 
(something 1981's highly inferior, "Halloween II," should have 
realized). 
As most people know, this is the film that made Jamie Lee Curtis a star, 
not to mention being labeled a "Scream Queen," and this is actually one 
of her best performances, even though it was her feature debut. Donald 
Pleasence, who died in 1995 after making, "Halloween: The Curse of 
Michael Myers," also was linked to his role as Dr. Loomis more than any 
other in his life. P.J. Soles, as the promiscuous, big-mouthed Linda, is 
often very funny, and a standout. And Michael Myers...well...no slasher 
villain will ever be able to compare to him. 
John Carpenter's "Halloween," is a nearly flawless thriller, but it is 
also simply a great motion picture. Period. It is everything a film in 
this genre should be: intelligent, stylish, and horrifying. "Halloween," 
is a one-of-a-kind, unforgettable experience. Watch it in a pitch black 
room while you're home alone one night, preferably on the namesake 
holiday. I dare you.

Title
Review for Day of the Woman (1978)
Directed by Meir Zarchi.
Cast: Camille Keaton, Eron Tambor, Richard Pace, Anthony Nichols, Gunter 
Kleemann.
1978 - 100 minutes.
Not Rated (equivalent of an NC-17 rating for explicit sex, nudity, 
violence, gore, and profanity).
Suggested Retail Price: $29.99
Widescreen format; Aspect Ratio 1.85:1
Languages: English
Digitally transferred and personally supervised by Meir Zarchi
Meir Zarchi's infamous 1978 film, "I Spit on Your Grave," is inarguably 
one of the most controversial films ever filmed. At the time of its 
release, the film was critically bombasted, audiences were largely 
outraged, and it was banned entirely from the UK and Germany. What 
mostly got under people's skin about the picture, I think, was in its 
extremely graphic and brutal depiction of a woman being raped. Although 
I would also feel uncomfortable watching the movie in a theatre with 
others, that is simply human nature, since what occurs here is very 
difficult to watch due to its subject matter. 
With that out of the way, I first rented "I Spit on Your Grave" about 
three years ago to see what all the commotion was about, expecting the 
worst. Surprisingly enough, however, I actually did like the film. Sure, 
it's not for everybody and certainly deserved its original X rating. 
It's not a "fun" or "entertaining" film in any regard. But what "I Spit 
on Your Grave" is is a fairly thoughtful and realistic examination of a 
person being tortured by another, and then what happens to the victim 
afterwards, if they survive. To single one certain critic out, Roger 
Ebert rated the film "Zero Stars" at the time of its release, and like 
everyone, was in a frenzy over what takes place during the 100-minute 
running-time. What I don't understand is how, with such harsh feelings, 
he could give 1972's "The Last House on the Left," which has more or 
less the same plot, a * * * 1/2 rating! Well, I have seen that film as 
well, and "I Spit on Your Grave" is infinitely better. In contrast, 
"LHOTL" which, aside from being loosely based on Ingmar Bergman's "The 
Virgin Spring," is far more exploitative and includes a fairly 
ridiculous plot gimmick: that the rape offenders unknowingly spend the 
night at the victim's parents' house. I simply do not "get" Ebert's 
thinking when dealing with these two pictures, and how he could love the 
more cheap and manipulative one, and then criticize the other even 
though they are so startlingly similar in story.
"I Spit on Your Grave" has a fairly straightforward story. A young, 
attractive writer (Camille Keaton, Buster Keaton's niece!) leaves her 
home in Manhattan and travels upstate to stay in the country at an 
idyllic, remote cabin she has rented for the summer, in order to write 
her first novel. Everything is going perfectly for her until one day, 
while out on the lake in her boat, four men, all of which she had 
previously met while getting gas on her way there and incuding one who 
is retarded, force her into the woods and each of them, aside from the 
mentally handicapped one, rape her and beat her repeatedly, leaving her 
for dead in her cabin.What they don't expect is that she does not die, 
but in fact, slowly begins to recuperate from the ordeal. She certainly 
doesn't want the men to get away with what they did, and finally decides 
to take matters into her own hands.
"I Spit on Your Grave" could have easily fallen into the manipulation of 
"The Last House on the Left," but is more serious in its treatment. The 
main female character is an intelligent women who could easily go to the 
police about what happened, but what good would that do? The reasoning 
she comes up with is that even if they went to prison, they would 
eventually be released, free to do such a thing again to someone else. 
One of the major discrepancy that people have about "I Spit on Your 
Grave" is that it is a horror film, but it isn't; at least, not in the 
sense of a slasher film. Instead, it is a horror story about the human 
condition, and how far some people can actually go if they do not have 
any respect for other human life. There are no murders in the film 
either, until the climax, but it isn't in the same sense that Michael 
Myers or Freddy Krueger is a killer. On the contrary, the killer in "I 
Spit on Your Grave" ultimately turns out to also be the heroine, and she 
has a real reason for doing what she does. In a particularly shocking 
sequence, right before she goes through with her revenge, she pays a 
visit to the local church where she prays for forgiveness of what she is 
about to do. Now when exactly was the last time you saw that in a 
low-rent exploitation piece? I don't know about anyone else, but my 
answer is "never."
One of the aspects of the film that struck me the first time I viewed "I 
Spit on Your Grave" was how much it reminded me of an independent film. 
Sure, it is low-budget, but in its style, I found it to border on the 
artsy. One scene, for example, which lasts a couple minutes, is filmed 
entirely in a long shot, as the camera is trying to distance itself away 
from the hurtful thing that is happening on the screen. 
Another smart move on writer and director Meir Zarchi's part is that he 
does not paint the four men as outright monsters, and spends a lot of 
time with them. The mentally retarded character is actually touching in 
the way that, through a chain of events, he becomes the outcast of the 
group, and it also came as an unexpected twist to find later on that the 
leader of the group (Eron Tambor) is married and has two children, whom 
he loves. What these men do is vile, cruel, and unforgivable, but thanks 
to Zarchi, they were not in any way one-dimensional.
Since my first viewing, I have seen "I Spit on Your Grave" three more 
times and although I still find it to be a striking and courageous 
motion picture, it does have a few noticable problems. For one, we do 
not really get to know the heroine very much. After being raped and 
bruised and cut up, she gets well very fast...too fast, perhaps...and 
although she murders the men for revenge, she never was really able to 
come across as someone who has gone through the terrible ordeal, and has 
no real emotional attachment to what she does, aside from physically 
doing it. Maybe what Zarchi was attempting to do by choosing to go this 
route in the finale was to show that she had become numb inside from 
what had happened to her, and that she could very well be on the edge of 
a nervous breakdown. Still, I would have probably chosen to do that a 
little differently. Another problem is that the revenge conclusion 
requires the Tambor character to make some very stupid actions, only so 
he will, in return, fall victim to his victim This particular scene I am 
discussing, however, is one of the best in the film, although I do not 
want to give away what happens except to say that it is incredibly gory 
and won't easily be forgotten.
The DVD edition of "I Spit on Your Grave" is probably more suitable for 
fans of the picture only, since it doesn't offer any special features 
other than the cheesy theatrical trailer (is it just me or are all the 
trailers from '70s films unintentionally hilarious?). For those people 
who do like the picture, the DVD is very good on many accounts, and 
disappointing on others.
Starting with the good, the "new digital letterboxed transfer personally 
supervised by director Meir Zarchi" (as written on the back of the case) 
is beautiful and nearly flawless, increasing the impact of the images on 
the screen. The picture includes very little grain and highly emphasizes 
the impressive cinematography and camera work, particularly of the quiet 
country landscape. 
With such wonderful picture quality, it ulimately came as a letdown to 
discover that the sound on the DVD is fairly bad. In order to clearly 
hear the people talking, the volume had to be raised up to nearly its 
highest level because of the low sound transfer. This caused a 
considerable problem, then, during the rape and murder scenes when 
characters were screaming, since that sound erectified as if the overall 
sound quality had been normal, and so I had to quickly push down the 
volume. There is no excuse for the sound to come across so inadequately 
since on the video version I have watched, which has terrible picture 
quality, the sound is perfectly fine.
On the whole, I was fairly disappointed by the DVD of "I Spit on Your 
Grave." Although the picture quality was fabulous, and I'm glad I could 
see it in the way it was originally meant to be shown, the sound is 
underwhelming, to say the least. Since the film is so controversial, an 
audio commentary would have been an extra treat, as I would have loved 
to have heard Zarchi's opinion on everything that has occurred with his 
much-talked-about directing debut. In conclusion, the DVD of "I Spit on 
Your Grave" could have been improved, but the film itself, I think, is 
one of the most underrated motion pictures ever made. It most definately 
did not deserve the severe criticisms it got.

Title
Review for Great Expectations (1998)
20th Century Fox; rated R (brief nudity, language, sensuality); 111 minutes
Screenplay: Mitch Glazer (adapted from the novel by Charles Dickens)
Cast: Ethan Hawke, Gwenyth Paltrow, Anne Bancroft, Chris Cooper, Hank Azaria,
Robert DeNiro, Josh Mostel, Nell Campbell, Kim Dickens.
Like William Shakespeare's Romeo + Juliet, from 1996, Great Expectations takes
a classic story and envisions it in modern terms.  Unlike Baz Lurhmann's wild
and 
romantic film though Great Expectations is not a success. 
Faithful readers of the Dickens novel will no doubt be horrified with the
multitude of changes made.  The film plays so fast and loose with its source
material it is likely to inspire comparisons with the failed 1995 film version
of The Scarlet Letter.  I, however, am not a Dickens fan and I would warmly
welcome an attempt to turn any of his works into a modern, fun, movie.
Unfortunately, this film turns out to be as much fun as reading the novel.
For awhile the film hooks you.  The production design, costume design,
cinematography, and musical score and soundtrack are undeniably gorgeous.  If
not an exciting film, Great Expectations is certainly a beautiful film to look
at.
The film opens with young Finn (changed from Pip in the book) informing us he
will not "tell the story the way it happened" and will instead "tell the story
the way I remember it."  While on an outdoor excursion in his Florida fishing
village Finn happens across a wanted criminal who is hiding out under water
(mostly so Robert DeNiro, who portrays the criminal, can have a flashy
entrance).  After a brief experience in helping the criminal he is caught
again and Finn returns to his normal life.
He is then taken, by his Uncle Joe (Chris Cooper), to the dilapidated mansion
of the richest woman in town Ms. Dinsmoore (Anne Bancroft, inviting
comparisons to a drag queen).  After locking eyes with a beautiful but icy
young girl on the grounds Finn is swept away as quickly as he arrived.  Upon
their return home though they find his older sister (Kim Dickens) on the phone
with Dinsmoore.  Apparently the woman will pay a handsome fee if young Finn
will spend his Saturday afternoons entertaining that mysterious young girl at
the mansion.
Eager to see the young beauty again Finn quickly agrees and is soon swept into
a world of Dinsmoore's madness and the hot and cold nature of young Stella.
Time passes, Finn and Stella grow up into Ethan Hawke and Gwenyth Paltrow, and
Stella soon disappears to Europe.  Finn is heartbroken and gives up his
passion for artwork to work the ocean with Uncle Joe.
After more time passes Finn receives a gift from a mysterious benefactor which
allows him to travel to New York and start up his painting again.  In New York
he runs into Stella and old passions are brought to the surface.  However,
Stella is now engaged to wimpy Walter Reed (Hank Azaria wasting time in a
meaningless role) and is still cold enough to deny true feelings for Finn but
hot enough to pose nude for him (following in the oddly fast growing tradition
of Kate Winslet in Titanic (1997) and Helen Hunt in As Good As It Gets
(1997)).
The focus of this version of Great Expectations remains almost exclusively on
the anti-romance between Finn and Stella.  There is time taken out for Finn's
overnight success in the New York art world and for bookend appearances by the
DeNiro character.  However what we have mostly is a film about an emotionally
disturbed woman and the lap dog in love with her.
Hawke and especially Paltrow do a fine enough job with their performances but
it's hard to establish a relationship with their empty characters.  Of all the
characters only Chris Cooper's Uncle Joe seems to have an emotional depth to
him.
To be fair there are some stunningly romantic sequences.  A first kiss over a
water fountain that is later repeated is strongly erotic both times and a
scene where Finn ditches his first gallery show to sweep Stella off her feet
provides a real romantic rush.  After this though we're left with characters
who are completely at odds with each other and the romantic scenes are given a
sort of uncomfortable aftertaste.
In the end what we have is a pretty but vapid film that reaches for a timeless
passion that simply isn't present in its story.

Title
Review for Anywhere But Here (1999)
Directed by Wayne Wang.
Cast: Natalie Portman, Susan Sarandon, Shawn Hatosy, Corbin Allred, Hart 
Bochner, Thora Birch, Heather McComb, Ashley Johnson, Heather DeLoach, 
Elisabeth Moss, Bonnie Bedelia, John Diehl, Caroline Aaron, Eileen Ryan, Paul 
Guilfoyle, Ray Baker, Megan Mullally, Bob Sattler.
1999 - 114 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for mild profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, November 13, 1999.
Wayne Wang is a masterful filmmaker who first proved in 1993's "The Joy Luck 
Club" that he has a talent and affinity for telling wonderfully accurate 
stories about female characters, and carries that right into "Anywhere But 
Here," which is one of the most truthful and affectionate films about a 
mother-daughter relationship in many years, and ranks well within the same 
league as 1983's "Terms of Endearment" and 1989's "Steel Magnolias." The 
fundamental ingredients for a manipulative sap-fest are all in place, and yet 
the film never once seems to be pulling at your heartstrings for the main 
reason being to get you to cry. The richly textured, multi-layered 
screenplay, by Academy Award winner Alvin Sargent (1980's "Ordinary People"), 
is too assured to aim for simple melodrama, and the performances by Natalie 
Portman and Susan Sarandon are just about as remarkable as two performances 
could possibly be. They raise the already-winning material to an even higher 
plateau of success.
Based on a 1986 novel by Mona Simpson, "Anywhere But Here" begins as the 
eccentric, middle-aged Adele (Susan Sarandon) is driving through the desert 
with her 14-year-old daughter Ann (Natalie Portman), headed for Beverly 
Hills. Adele, at times a childish and frustrating woman who doesn't listen to 
what others tell her, is set on putting her MA degree in early education to 
positive use and getting Ann into showbiz. Ann, however, wants nothing to do 
with acting, and is distressed to have just been yanked from her hometown of 
Bay City, Wisconsin, leaving her relatives and particularly, her soulmate, 
and cousin, Benny (Shawn Hatosy). Getting a small apartment "outside of the 
posh section of Beverly Hills, but still in the school district," Adele 
easily gets a job teaching, while Ann starts school at Beverly Hills High, 
where she comments, "everyone looks like they're going to the beach." Longing 
to be back east but willing to stick things out for love of her mother, Ann 
quickly makes some new friends at school and catches the eye of a charming, 
poetry-loving classmate Peter (Corbin Allred). 
Refreshingly without a flashy story device, "Anywhere But Here" is that rare, 
perceptive Hollywood film that is about the characters and their emotional 
growth and conflicts. Admittedly, not a great deal happens plot-wise, but 
more occurs underneath the surface than most films would even dream about. 
The fate of the film hinges almost completely on its realism and details, and 
it gets everything exactly right. The relationship between Adele and Ann is a 
complex one, and although the dependent Adele drives her crazy, Ann 
unconditionally loves and respects her, even when she wishes things could be 
more normal for them. Adele has a big personality, and always is using her 
charm to solve problems, sometimes with unfortunate results. Ann often feels 
like the mother between the two, as she always seems to be comforting Adele 
when things don't go her way. As the years pass by and high school graduation 
approaches for Ann, she desperately wants to go to an eastern college, and 
knows that it's about time she branches off on her own, but also fears that 
her mother may not be able to make it on her own. Adele loves her daughter so 
much, and even though she realizes she isn't the perfect, ideal mother, she 
confesses at one point that Ann "was the reason I was born."  
In "Anywhere But Here," every element converges together to create a film 
that is nearly flawless in its authenticity, right down to the smallest 
detail. The delineation of teenagers and friendship, despite being a minor 
element in the story, is perhaps more genuine than in any other film this 
year. When Ann makes several girlfriends, we wisely are not shown when or how 
they meet, because it is a trivial detail. Instead, our first scene with Ann 
and her new friends, set in gym class as they are running around a track, 
captures the exact nuances and conversations that occur between teenagers in 
such a situation. Breaking through the wall of cliches, Ann's friends 
actually act and speak like kids who are 15 or 16 years old, as they do not 
acquire a vocabulary as large as the Webster Dictionary, and are performed 
with an air of naturalism that is wholeheartedly believable, by Heather 
McComb (1998's "Apt Pupil"), Ashley Johnson (TV's "Growing Pains," 1998's 
"Dancer, Texas Pop. 81), and Heather DeLoach (1995's "The Little Princess"). 
They are small roles, but vitally important and commendable.
Another area in which the film excels in is its depiction of how time changes 
things. Spanning a period of four years, one of the most fully touching 
interludes occurs midway through when tragedy strikes back in Wisconsin, and 
Adele and Ann travel to attend the funeral of a relative. At this point, they 
have been gone for two years, and as Ann observes, "the houses seemed 
smaller, the streets more narrow." There is a quiet, powerful scene between 
Ann and her best friend whom she hasn't seen since they left, Mary (Thora 
Birch, 1999's "American Beauty"), and it perfectly shows how people evolve, 
for better or worse, over the years. Thora Birch, appearing unbilled, makes 
quite a striking impression in only two scenes.
The innocence of young romance is also warmly done, and one scene with Ann 
and Peter in which she instructs him to strip, only for them to end up 
embracing in a hug, is purely gratifying without being needlessly 
exploitative. Corbin Allred is charismatic, funny, and virtuous as Peter, and 
works well with Portman. The same goes for the lovely, almost nostalgic, 
friendship between Ann and Benny, likably played by Shawn Hatosy (1999's 
"Outside Providence"), who may be cousins but truly love each other. One 
sequence, in which Benny comes to visit them in California, and he and Ann 
stay up late at night chatting away, is filled with such a sense of childhood 
purity, as they are on the verge of becoming adults, that it easily 
transcends even its aspirations.
Amidst all of the wonderful supporting players, others of which seem to have 
been edited down, such as Bonnie Bedelia and Eileen Ryan, as Ann's aunt and 
grandmother, respectively, the film always keeps its focus on Ann and Adele. 
In a role that could very well be a landmark in her career, Susan Sarandon is 
dynamite as the outwardly headstrong, but insecure, Adele. Early on, one 
wonders what exactly is wrong with Adele, with a possible personality 
disorder looking more and more likely, but we progressively learn that she is 
not mentally ill, but simply enraptured in her undying love for her one and 
only daughter. Sarandon handles each second she is on screen with the exact 
amount of sympathy and idiosyncrasies, and not once allows Adele to appear 
"wacky" or exaggerated.
If Sarandon is a marvel to behold, 18-year-old Natalie Portman is nothing 
less than extraordinary, and with this film joining her other Oscar-caliber 
work in 1994's "The Professional" and 1996's "Beautiful Girls," Portman has 
the chance of becoming Gen-Y's answer to Jodie Foster; she's that good. As 
with most teenagers, Ann is someone who occasionally can be spiteful and even 
a little mean, but whom we grow to care deeply about because she is also an 
intelligent, caring young woman whose mother is the most important person in 
her life, which makes things even more difficult for her when she wants to 
leave for college. In one heartbreaking sequence, she is forced to audition 
for a film, and when Adele sneaks in to watch Ann's monologue, she discovers 
her daughter making an obvious mockery of the way she acts. 
At first glimpse, "Anywhere But Here" may appear to trudge through well-worn 
dramatic territory, and it might have had it been put into lesser hands. The 
meticulous writing, verifiable direction by Wayne Wang, effective music score 
by Danny Elfman, picaresque cinematography by Roger Deakins, and astonishing 
performances from every member of the entire cast (even Megan Mullally, of 
TV's "Will and Grace," leaves a major impression in one late scene), all add 
up to make "Anywhere But Here" an exceptional motion picture that shouldn't 
be degraded by being unfairly labeled a "chick flick." It is a true-to-life 
examination of the bond between a mother and a daughter, and has universal 
appeal for anyone who has ever had a parent. My guess is that that's a fairly 
large percentage of the viewing population.

Title
Review for Kiss of the Dragon (2001)
Directed by Chris Nahon.
Cast: Jet Li, Bridget Fonda, Tcheky Karyo, Ric Young, Burt Kwouk, Laurence 
Ashley.
2001 - 95 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, sexual situations, and gore).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, July 6, 2001.
Chris Nahon's Jet Li vehicle, "Kiss of the Dragon," makes the cardinal sin of 
trying to persuade the viewer that it is more that it actually is. Setting 
aside time to attempt character development and a deep emotional core, the 
film, instead, flounders in desperately overwrought dialogue and one of the 
most incomprehensible plots since 2000's "Battlefield Earth."
Jet Li stars as Liu Jiuan, a Beijing cop who has traveled to Paris to aid in 
a police raid against a heroin smuggler. When the head of Paris' police 
department, Richard (Tcheky Karyo), ends up murdering the suspect, as well as 
a prostitute, in a hotel room and setting Liu up as the murderer, it is up to 
Liu to escape suspicions and seek revenge on the crooked cops behind the 
operation. Giving Liu an added reason to go after them, Liu meets Jessica 
(Bridget Fonda), a mother-turned-drug-addict/hooker whose daughter is being 
held hostage by Richard.
The motives behind what Richard, the archenemy, does throughout is both 
muddled and never explained. For instance, why is he trying to frame Liu for 
murder when he has just met him? And why does Richard insist that Jessica 
must remain a prostitute or have her young daughter be killed? Furthermore, 
why was Liu sought out in Paris from Beijing for a simple drug bust? Action 
movies, especially those that work as an exciting thrill-ride, do not always 
require stringent logic, but "Kiss of the Dragon" is so flawed on the story 
level that it can't be taken seriously for even one moment. 
As for the vital action and martial arts sequences, the best that can be said 
about them is that they are well-choreographed, and often very violent and 
bloody. Their innovation level is close to nil, however, and seldom exciting. 
The thought of the very small Liu taking on a whole room full of martial arts 
students, leaving all of them pounded to the floor but without a scratch on 
himself, is ridiculous even for this genre of film.
Jet Li (2000's "Romeo Must Die") is adequate as the wronged Liu, but his 
English isn't very good, and this bars him from being able to express his 
character's feelings clearly. As a woman who simply wants her daughter back, 
but has found herself stuck in a grimy life of prostitution and needles 
shoved through her veins, Bridget Fonda (1999's "Lake Placid") is so much 
better than this movie. It's actually a bit disheartening seeing the usually 
very bright Fonda stuck in an unattractive role that has her saying the most 
godawful dialogue this side of a cheesy '80s slasher flick. Rounding out the 
three main players, Tcheky Karyo (2000's "The Patriot") grunts and narrows 
his eyes on cue as the incumbently vicious Richard.
Ineptly directed by newcomer Chris Nahon and written by the usually reliable 
Luc Besson (1994's "The Professional") and Robert Mark Kamen, "Kiss of the 
Dragon" may pass as a minor divergence for hard-core action fans, but 
everyone else should stay away. With a script that is a mess of cliches and 
bad drama, and not one scene that has the ability to get your heart racing, 
you have been officially warned.
   - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
     http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman

Title
Review for Prince of Egypt, The (1998)
  Directed by Brenda Chapman, Steve Hickner, Simon Wells.
  Voices: Val Kilmer, Ralph Fiennes, Michelle Pfeiffer, Sandra Bullock, 
  Jeff Goldblum, Patrick Stewart, Martin Short, Steve Martin, Helen 
  Mirren, Ofra Haza.
  1998 - 98 minutes.
  Rated PG (for mature themes and violence; appropriate for children 7 and
up).
  Reviewed December 19, 1998.
  By Dustin Putman
  Dustin Putman's Film
 Reviews >
  1998 was such a dismal year for animated features (I gave negative 
  reviews to "Antz," "The Rugrats Movie," and "A Bug's Life") that I was 
  beginning to think I had somehow outgrown them, even though I knew that 
  wasn't true since I still loved the majority of animated pictures in the 
  past. So, it's funny how the last film in that genre for the year turned 
  out to be Dreamworks' first foray into basic animation, "The Prince of 
  Egypt," which is an awe-inspiring, amazing achievement that not only is 
  refreshingly more serious and realistic than the usual dull recent 
  Disney movies, but enraptured me in its spell from the first powerful 
  sequence to the last.
  Based on the biblical story of Moses, Dreamworks, no doubt, had a 
  difficult film on their hands to make, particularly since it was to be 
  an animated film and the subject matter is uplifting, yet very dark. 
  Thankfully, Dreamworks seems to be far more mature than Disney, for if 
  they had made it, they would have added a bunch of cute animals that 
  would substitute for comic relief. In its visually beautiful opening 
  scene, baby Moses is set in a basket and pushed out to sea by his 
  mother, in order to save him from murderous Egyptian soldiers who have 
  taken over their village. Soon, Moses washes up from the sea and is 
  given a home at the palace of the Pharaoh Seti (Patrick Stewart), where 
  he grows up thinking that the Pharaoh is his real father and Pharaoh's 
  son, Rameses (Ralph Fiennes), is his brother. When Moses (voiced well by 
  Val Kilmer) accidentally runs into two slaves, who happen to be his 
  brother, Aaron (Jeff Goldblum), and sister, Miriam, (Sandra Bullock), 
  they try to convince him of his true family. He, at first, doesn't 
  believe them, and then when the truth is reinforced by Pharaoh, Moses 
  becomes outraged that he has been lied to all his life, and realizes 
  that the slaves working at the palace are being severely mistreated. 
  Seekng solace across the desert in a Midianite village, Moses falls in 
  love with the shepardess, Tzipporah (Michelle Pfeiffer), and when he 
  finally comes into contact with the burning bush, which gives him the 
  power to set the slaves free in Egypt, he returns to his home of royalty 
  and sets forth a series of dangerous plagues, which include a 
  destructive swarm of locusts and turning the sea into blood.
  As you have probably guessed, "The Prince of Egypt," is most likely too 
  intense and "adult" for younger children, but it is a magnificent marvel 
  for older children and grown-ups, and it also serves as being 
  educational without becoming relentlessly preachy and religious. Not 
  only that, but the film was so stunning to look at and so sound in its 
  story department that it was actually highly entertaining and exciting, 
  as well.
  With "The Prince of Egypt," animation has certainly gone to a new 
  ultimate level. In recent years, the Disney films had grown to feel 
  unspectacular because the animation simply didn't seem to be showing me 
  things I hadn't already seen. "The Prince of Egypt" contains, by far, 
  the best animation I have ever seen, with a resplendent or astonishing 
  image coming ever minute. The sequences that stand out most in my mind 
  include when hieroglyphics come to life; the plague arrives that kills 
  all of the first-born children; the amazing swarm of locusts; the 
  edge-of-your-seat chariot race; the solemn march of the slaves after 
  they have been freed; and, ultimately, the parting of the red sea. 
  For once, the musical numbers in "The Prince of Egypt" are actually 
  memorable and often quite beautiful, particularly the opening musical 
  number, and "When You Believe," which is a lovely and touching ballad. 
  Although the music is not necessary, the songs were, overall, satisfying 
  enough that I have no objections to the decision of making the film a 
  musical.
  "The Prince of Egypt," finally broke the recent string of disappointing 
  animated features, so much so that this is actually one of the very best 
  films of the year. It showed me images that I had never seen before in 
  the world of animation, and I was constantly in a state of shock and 
  wonder over the astounding technological advancements. Gratefully, the 
  film proves that an animated film can be made that deals with a serious 
  subject without condescending to the so-called "cute and cuddly" laws of 
  children's fare. "The Prince of Egypt" is a towering achievement that 
  puts to shame the majority of recent Disney films, and is an ideal film 
  to see during the holiday season. 

Title
Review for Erin Brockovich (2000)
Directed by Steven Soderbergh.
Cast: Julia Roberts, Albert Finney, Aaron Eckhart, Marg Helgenberger, Cherry 
Jones, Peter Coyote, Veanne Cox, Conchata Ferrell.
2000 - 131 minutes
Rated R (for profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, March 18, 2000.
"Erin Brockovich," whose nonfictional roots are made markedly clear even 
before the first frame of film, is the sort of vibrantly acted, feel-good 
legal drama that will inevitably leave many viewers enthusiastically raving 
about its qualities while exiting the movie theater. After all, the film 
didn't score a 98 out of 100 on Cinemascore, an almost unheard-of average 
grade from the general public whose seen it, for nothing. Superior to the 
usual movie whose newspaper and television blurbs read such things as, "It 
will make you stand up and cheer!," and absent of the majority of possible 
corniness, and tiresome courtroom scenes, that may very well have seeped into 
the proceedings with a lesser director at the helm, "Erin Brockovich," 
nonetheless, has its own problems.
Directed by Steven Soderbergh, a largely independent filmmaker (1989's 
stirring "sex, lies, and videotape") whose last studio picture was the 
undernourished, overrated 1998 George Clooney-Jennifer Lopez starrer, "Out of 
Sight," his latest excursion into the world of feature films has acquired the 
same sparkling performances that "Out of Sight" possessed, but remains just 
as unsatisfying in the long run. With a plot hook that was almost identically 
seen in 1998's "A Civil Action," yet focuses more on the central character 
than the former did on John Travolta, "Erin Brockovich," for all of its 
attributes, lacks urgency. As the developments in the case (a toxic level of 
chromium is found within the water supply in the small desert town of 
Hinkley, Calif., causing the residents to grow seriously ill) play out in the 
nearly two-and-a-quarter-hour running time, there is a complete insufficiency 
of suspense or rooting interest because it is clear, every step of the way, 
how the plot is going to evolve. 
Julia Roberts, Hollywood's most popular leading lady, is unlike many of 
today's top stars because she actually has proven time and time again that 
she is a remarkably good actress. Unfairly labeled a performer who only makes 
romantic comedies, Roberts has made so many pictures in that genre because 
she is simply a charmer, and has the ability to win any viewer over, no 
matter what. That is not all she is about, however, as proven with "Erin 
Brockovich," which hands her one of the most memorable roles of her career, 
and she runs with it. As the self-titled character, a dirt-poor, 
twice-divorced mother of three who cares deeply for her children and 
desperately needs a job to get some cash, Roberts invigorates added life into 
a character that has been so freshly written to begin with. 
After an automobile accident that leaves her with a case of whiplash and a 
court loss when her attorney, Ed Masry (Albert Finney), fails to convince the 
jury that it was the fault of the other driver, a doctor, Erin, who brashly, 
yet honestly, has a way of telling people like it is, walks right into the 
law firm of Masry and Vitito one day and demands that Ed give her a job. "I'm 
smart, I'm hard-working, I will work without benefits. Please don't make me 
beg," Erin heartfeltly tells him. While filing the real estate paperwork for 
the purchase of homes in Hinkley by PG&E (Pacific Gas and Electric), Erin 
stumbles upon the distressingly bleak medical files of the Hinkley residents 
peculiarly placed with the real estate information. After Ed allows her to 
research the files more, and following her initial meetings with several of 
the townspeople, Erin grows deeply involved in their story, firmly believing 
that they have a case after discovering the chromium within the water. 
"Erin Brockovich" may be "based on a true story," but it is the sort of film 
that, if fictional, would be no less predictable. Following an intriguing 
opening half-hour as we meet and get to sympathize with Erin, who may dress 
in revealing clothing and not have a college degree, but who undeniably has 
an intelligent brain in her head and a caring heart in her chest, the film is 
bogged down in a narrative that is about as fresh as a loaf of one-month-old 
bread. Without a quick pace, something that almost any cliched movie needs in 
order to be successful, the film too often just lies there, immobile. Even 
the music score, by Thomas Newman, is basically a carbon copy of the one he 
composed for the infinitely better "American Beauty."
Thank goodness, then, for Roberts and the other top-flight actors, as well as 
some of the snappy dialogue within Susannah Grant's otherwise unworthy 
screenplay. Roberts, a naturally likable screen presence, single-handedly 
steals the film, but is ably supported by Albert Finney, who, with his own 
aptitude for humor and realism, makes a surprisingly great partner for 
Robert. Aaron Eckhart, playing a kind Harley Davidson-loving biker who falls 
for Erin and agrees to watch her kids while at work, tries his mightiest, but 
is so underwritten, and the subplot so shoddily penned, that the film might 
have benefitted from it being either edited out or rewritten. Finally, Marg 
Helgenberger, as the understanding housewife in Hinkley whom Erin first 
meets, is first-rate, and her character warmly and powerfully handled in only 
a few key scenes.
While it may be a wise career move for director Soderbergh to alternate 
between more risky, independent-minded projects and big-budget pictures, with 
"Erin Brockovich," he has made something so conventional and cinematically 
bland that it seems like the perfect example of the type of film Soderbergh 
has so valiantly fought against in the last decade of being a filmmaker.

Title
Review for Out-of-Towners, The (1999)
Directed by Sam Weisman.
Cast: Steve Martin, Goldie Hawn, John Cleese, Mark McKinney, Christopher 
Durang, Mo Gaffney.
1999 - 90 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and sex-related humor).
Reviewed April 4, 1999
Based on the 1970 comedy written by Neil Simon and starring Jack Lemmon 
and Sandy Dennis, the '90s update of "The Out-of-Towners" contains the 
same basic plot, but comparisons pretty much end right there. Although 
the film doesn't have what it takes to pull over to the side of comic 
brilliance, the movie is fast-paced and enjoyable enough, aided by the 
dynamite duo of Steve Martin and Goldie Hawn.
Unhappy Ohio suburbanites Henry (Martin) and Nancy Clark (Hawn) are 
suffering through separate mid-life crisises. While Henry is harboring 
the secret that he has been laid off from his job and is about to travel 
to New York City to be interviewed for a high-profile advertising 
position, Nancy is depressed because all of their adult children have 
finally left the nest and her relationship with Henry has seriously 
dwindled. On the spur of the moment, Nancy decides to accompany Henry on 
his trip, and that is the start of a wild, dangerous, and crazy 24-hour 
period of hijinx in the city that never sleeps. It's pretty safe to say 
that almost every outrageous thing that could happen does happen. 
"The Out-of-Towners" has two things going for it and, walking into the 
theater, you knew that at least one of them couldn't fail (the 
partnering of Martin and Hawn). Martin is one of the great modern-day 
comedians (as far as I'm concerned, he is funnier than all of the recent 
ones, like Jim Carrey and Adam Sandler), while Hawn is always a bright 
and winning presence. Since they both have perfect comic timing, many of 
the jokes were bound not to fail, and there are many that are downright 
hilarious (on the other hand, a few fall flat). One of the scenes that 
gave me the loudest laugh was when Nancy is reading the map to Henry as 
they are driving to the city. "You know this upcoming exit?" Nancy asks. 
Henry immediately turns off onto the exit. "Well, keep going past that," 
Nancy continues. Very funny. And how about the sequence where they 
accidentally walk in on a sexaholics anonymous meeting within a church 
and get caught up within the group discussion. These delightful moments 
are also thanks to the second reason the film is an overall successful 
venture, and that is Marc Lawrence's slight, but constantly snappy 
screenplay.
In a memorable supporting role, John Cleese plays the manager of a ritzy 
New York hotel who gets involved in the couple's plight and is 
discovered later on by Nancy dancing around a hotel room in women's 
clothes and stiletto high heels. Cleese has some subtly amusing moments, 
particularly one in which, while in the hotel's lobby, he stops for a 
second to admire a customer's outfit. Meanwhile, mayor Rudy Giuliani 
appears in a cameo and could have been used to fabulously zany effect in 
one of the film's key scenes, but is wasted and thrown to the wayside.
Inevitably, through all of the various mishaps that occur, Henry and 
Nancy start to come to terms with their marriage and begin to fall in 
love with each other all over again. It may very well be predictable 
(and it is), but it is the high energy of Martin and Hawn that keeps 
this light-as-a-feather comedy afloat. I hope they work together again 
real soon.

Title
Review for Civil Action, A (1998)
Directed by Steven Zaillian.
Cast: John Travolta, Robert Duvall, Stephen Fry, William H. Macy, James 
Gandolfini, Kathleen Quinlan, Tony Shalhoub, Dan Hedaya, John Lithgow, 
Mary Mara, Kathy Bates.
1998 - 115 minutes.
Rated PG-13 (for profanity).
Reviewed January 10, 1999.
Since director Steven Zaillian previously wrote the powerful screenplay 
for 1993's Steven Spielberg drama "Schindler's List" and directed 1993's 
intelligent "Searching for Bobby Fischer," his new film, "A Civil 
Action," should most likely be looked upon as an unfortunate misstep in 
an otherwise prosperous career. What doesn't make sense is how such 
high-profile and superb actors as John Travolta, Robert Duvall, William 
H. Macy, and Kathleen Quinlan got involved in this project, which is 
both dull and completely ineffective. The film, which involves a small 
community of children who mysteriously died of leukemia, certainly 
contains the type of story to be emotionally-charged, but somehow all 
signs of feeling have been completely removed from the proceedings, 
leaving us with nothing more than a poorly-done courtroom drama.
Based on a book by Jonathan Hart, which was consequently based on a true 
account, "A Civil Action" is set in 1982 in the town of Woburn, Mass., 
where personal injury lawyer Jan Schlictmann (John Travolta) decides to 
take on the case of eight families who simply want an apology for their 
children's death from leukemia due to unknown causes. Jan originally 
decides to drop the case, but when he stumbles across to corporate 
giants, Grace and Beatrice Foods, who have plants located near the 
families' homes, he sees all of the pieces suddenly fall into place: the 
two companies have been leaking harmful chemicals into the nearby lake 
which, thus, goes into the city's drinking water. Suddenly, after 
hearing about the families' heartbreak and personal stories, he begins 
to care for them and becomes determined to get to the bottom of the 
mystery, even though he is warned by his staff accountant (William H. 
Macy) that no money is coming in to them, only going out. Also figuring 
into the story is Jerome Facher (Robert Duvall), Beatrice Foods' 
corporate counsel, who finds himself in heated waters when Jan will not 
accept his $20-million offer to settle the case.
Coming from such a talented writer, director, and cast, not to mention 
one of the most interesting film composers, Danny Elfman, "A Civil 
Action" is an astoundingly empty-headed drama, one that includes an 
intriguing story and somehow transforms it into an admittedly tiresome 
and occasionally even boring experience. Perhaps one of its major 
problems was that in its attempts to be a relatively uncommercial motion 
picture, Zaillian has misplaced its refreshing unconventional attitude 
with an absence of magnetism and even meaning.
Watching the film, I couldn't help but notice its similarities with 
1997's far, far superior film "The Sweet Hereafter," which dealt with a 
lawyer, played brilliantly by Ian Holm, investigating a school bus 
accident that killed a number of children. In his attempts to find 
someone who may have been responsible for the accident, Holm interviews 
the grieving parents, as well as the sole surviving passenger, a teenage 
girl, which starts to remind him of his own teenage daughter, a young 
drug-addict who has run away from home. Not only was the plotting 
similar to "A Civil Action," but it also had the same exact running time 
of 115 minutes. Considering this, it is amazing how fulfilling and 
truthful "A Sweet Hereafter" was, not only concentrating on the school 
bus accident, but delving deeply into Ian Holm's character and his own 
personal demons, as well as the teenage girl. In "A Civil Action," 
however, I have no idea where the running time went, since the film is 
virtually two hours of nothingness. We do not get to know the parents 
very well, nor any of the main characters. Through its whole duration, I 
did not learn one thing__not one thing__about Travolta's lawyer 
character, Jan Schlictmann, who doesn't appear to have any sort of life 
or purpose outside of his job. Every scene is tediously related directly 
to the premise, and therefore, there was no one for me to care about or 
root for. You've got to work pretty hard, actually, to not get an 
audience to become involved in the parents' plight, since their children 
are dead, but that is exactly what "A Civil Action" does.
To be honest, I would be fairly hard-pressed to state an aspect of the 
film that I actually liked. Aside from one flashback to when a man's 
young son died on the way to the doctor, I remained unmoved and passive 
about what was going on in the scenes, and more than once found my mind 
wandering. I could say the performances were good, but who's fooling 
who? Since every character is one-dimensionally written, no one's acting 
abilities are challenged in any way. Travolta plays a lawyer well 
enough, but that's about all he does. Duvall virtually sleepwalks 
through his role, apparently only appearing to give one-liners at every 
chance he gets. And what in the world is Kathy Bates doing in the 
picture's final scene, as a judge? She appears unbilled, since it is 
just a cameo, but why did she even agree to do it in the first place? 
Finally, when the conclusion arrived and the end credits began to role, 
the film left me with another question: what was the point? Abruptly 
ending without any susceptible momentum, where none came before that to 
begin with, "A Civil Action" seemed to me, at least, to be an example of 
how not to make a courtroom drama, and it certainly did not do justice 
to the very serious subject matter the film deals with. 
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Dustin Putman's
Film Haven >

Title
Review for Zebrahead (1992)
Directed by Anthony Drazan.
Cast: Michael Rapaport, N'Bushe Wright, DeShonn Castle, Ron Johnson, Ray 
Sharkey, Paul Butler, Candy Ann Brown, Helen Shaver, Luke Reilly, Martin 
Priest, Kevin Corrigan.
1992 - 102 minutes
Rated R (for violence, blood, and sexual situations).
Capusule Review written June 21, 1999.
The directing debut of Anthony Drazan, "Zebrahead" captured a sizable amount 
of critical reaction upon its release in 1992, but the film is often 
overwrought, even if it is well-meaning. Set, and filmed, in Detroit, 
Michigan, white high school student Zack (Michael Rapaport) immediately falls 
for black transfer student Nikki (N'Bushe Wright), and their budding 
relationship that is not based at all on race, sets off a rally of 
controversy that soon becomes apparent is headed for violence. Rapaport and 
Wright are both outstanding in their respective, three-dimensional roles, but 
every other character is more or less a distsant caricature or symbol, aside 
from Nikki's caring, lonely mother (Candy Ann Brown). The ending is 
especially unconvincing, as it seems to switch to the end credits while still 
in midstream. 
   - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
     Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Black and White (1999)
Directed by James Toback.
Cast: Ben Stiller, Brooke Shields, Robert Downey Jr., Allan Houston, Power, 
Bijou Phillips, Claudia Schiffer, Eddie K. Thomas, William Lee Scott, Elijah 
Wood, Gaby Hoffmann, Raekwon, Mike Tyson, Scott Caan, Jared Leto, Joe 
Pantoliano, Marla Maples, Stacy Edwards, Method Man.
2000 - 100 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, nudity, and sexual situations)
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, April 7, 2000.
Writer-director James Toback's ambitions are clear. In making a film about 
the wall that stands between people of different races, no matter how much 
everyone strives to be the same, and treating his characters not dissimilarly 
from those presented in Robert Altman's 1975 masterwork, "Nashville," all 
Toback has really done is accidentally uncovered the source of his filmmaking 
weaknesses. Mixing his screenplay with improvisatory material between his 
eclectic group of actors, in an expose of over twenty different characters in 
New York City, Toback's latest picture, the aptly-titled "Black and White," 
is consistently fascinating, but doesn't add up to all that much. While one 
can walk away from a theater appreciating that the film actually has more 
than a few fleeting thoughts in its mind, there is rarely, if ever, a clear 
attempt to develop the wide array of characters from being anything more than 
symbolic figures or broad-based stereotypes.
Free-floating in style and without a clear-cut destination, "Black and White" 
doesn't follow, as much as it wanders around the inhabitants on screen, 
before jumping to the next scene. If there is any character that the film 
revolves around, it is NYU film grad Sam (Brooke Shields) who has come to 
make a documentary on the fad of white teenagers who favor acting "black" and 
listening to hip-hop music, with her flamboyantly gay husband, Terry (Robert 
Downey Jr.), in tow. Sam's central subjects are a small group of high 
schoolers, including Charlie (Bijou Phillips), Wren (Elijah Wood), and Raven 
(Gaby Hoffmann), all brought up in wealthy households, who nonetheless rebel 
at both their parents and the present-day society that says kids should all 
conform to act and dress and behave a certain way.
Meanwhile, college basketball player Dean (Allan Houston) is approached by 
Mark (Ben Stiller), a mystery man who offers him $50,000 dollars to botch his 
next big game. Dean is unsure of what he should do, and his scholarly 
girlfriend Greta (Claudia Schiffer), currently writing a thesis on the 
subject of race, isn't much help, only advising him to go with his heart. 
Intersecting with everything is Rich Bower (Power), who is finally starting 
to edge away from his criminal lifestyle and into the world of being a 
recording artist. 
Acquiring a remarkably diverse cast that includes real-life stars playing 
themselves (Mike Tyson, Method Man), actual thespians (Ben Stiller, Robert 
Downey Jr., Elijah Wood), recording artists (Power, Bijou Phillips), 
supermodels (Claudia Schiffer), and NBA players (Allan Houston), the major 
surprise "Black and White" has to offer is that its performances are 
uniformly good. Making a picture that was largely stressed by Toback to be 
improvisational must have been a daunting task for most involved, and 
everyone comes off naturally and in unaffected turns, despite having roles 
that could have used a few deeper shades of characterization. For all of its 
"true-to-life" chit-chat, these people have very few ideas or distinct 
personality traits, and more often than not, do things because the film calls 
for it, rather than because that is what the characters themselves would do.
While everyone works as a unit, and thus, few of the actors get much of a 
chance to stand out amidst the dizzying movement from one character or story 
to the next, a select few should be noted. Claudia Schiffer, of all people, 
is excellent as the supposedly kind-hearted girlfriend of Dean, whose true 
colors abruptly show, unveiling her to be a conniving backstabber. Brooke 
Shields, in her strongest film role in years, is appropriately eager and 
wide-eyed as the documentary filmmaker who is shown to have an extreme 
insecurity of being alone when Terry, played to the comic hilt by Robert 
Downey Jr., finally makes her face the fact that he is gay and has absolutely 
no interest in a relationship anymore. Eddie K. Thomas (of 1999's "American 
Pie") is surprisingly versatile and adept as one of the high schoolers being 
documented, whose father is withdrawn and unconcerned about him, favoring his 
newest girlfriend (Stacy Edwards) over him or his older son, Will (William 
Lee Scott), whom he hasn't seen in two years. And as the platinum blond high 
school history teacher who catches the eye of Terry, Jared Leto sparkles in 
only a handful of scenes.
Whereas the actors are entertaining throughout, and bring what little depth 
there possibly can be brought to such a decidedly one-dimensional display of 
stick figures, "Black and White" stumbles because its messages are never 
reasonably dealt with in any sort of satisfying manner. For example, several 
scenes hint at making a statement about the distressing distance between 
removed parents and their children, but it never reaches any sort of 
conclusion. Nor does anything else in "Black in White;" things just happen, 
simply because they happen, and before you have had time to take it all in, 
you are already onto the next scene. 
The finale is particularly anticlimactic, as we are treated to a bogus "Six 
Months Later" title card, which then reveals what happened to all of the 
characters. This gimmicky epilogue would be tolerable if not for its 
ludicrous payoff. Credit "Black and White" for its occasional flashes of 
storytelling originality, but Robert Altman has done the same thing 
one-hundred times better, and with a remarkable and startling depth that 
Toback cries for, and so unfortunately lacks.

Title
Review for Lost & Found (1999/I)
Directed by Jeff Pollack.
Cast: David Spade, Sophie Marceau, Artie Lange, Patrick Bruel, Mitchell 
Whitfield, Estelle Harris, Marla Gibbs, Ever Carradine, Martin Sheen, 
Jon Lovitz.
1999 - 97 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity, potty humor, and the comedic torture of a 
dog).
Reviewed April 24, 1999.
Comedian David Spade, he of the nerdy, skinny, and practically cheekless 
type, has made a film career (if you can call it that) out of playing 
supporting "friend" roles in low-brow comedies, particularly with the 
late Chris Farley (1995's "Tommy Boy," 1996's "Black Sheep"). In "Lost & 
Found," directed by Jeff Pollack, Spade is the main star, which comes as 
somewhat of a problem since he isn't very funny (admittedly, neither was 
Farley). To make matters worse, the film is such a rip-off of 1998's 
box-office hit, "There's Something About Mary," via the screenplay by 
J.B. Cook, Mark Meeks, and David Spade, that the Farrelly Brothers 
should consider sueing on the basis of plagarism.
Spade stars as Italian restauranteur Dylan(!?), a man whom has gone 
through one unfortunate relationship after another with women. In the 
prologue, we see him have an argument with his latest girlfriend (Ever 
Carradine), only to discover that they are in the dressing room of a 
strip joint and she is about to go out and perform. Living in an idyllic 
Los Angeles apartment building, Dylan immediately grows infatuated with 
his new sexy French neighbor, Lila (Sophie Marceau). Knowing that she's 
way out of his league but still desperate to get to know her, he fakes 
the kidnapping of her terrier dog, Jack, so that they can spend time 
together looking for him. Things get even stickier when Jack swallows an 
expensive diamond ring and the doctor informs Dylan that the only way to 
retrieve it is to wait for Jack to, well, you know...
Credit "Lost & Found" for one thing: it does have a few big laughs and a 
couple small ones (which is more than I can say for some of the recent 
so-called "comedies"). But detract point since, aside from this, there 
are long stretches that were so dull and unfunny that I was almost bored 
to tears. Luckily, everytime I got a little bit too discouraged there 
would be a funny moment that would make me laugh, therefore forcing me 
to give the film a still very bad * 1/2 rating. One of the brightest 
comedic moments involves a little boy at a pet store who proves that he 
has his speech all made out for the police involving a false case of 
child molestation. We also must endure Spade impersonating Neil Diamond 
as he lip-syncs to "Brother Love's Travelling Salvation Show," an 
excellent song, but not brought to humorous life. It should be noted, 
though, that this scene does end with perhaps the film's largest guffaw 
(which will remain unmentioned in case you see this movie, even though 
you really shouldn't).
Most of the other funny moments come from the dog, Jack, who really gets 
a licking but keeps on ticking (in the course of the 97-minute running 
time, he is thrown out a window; dropped to the floor on his back; 
literally thrown into rooms; put in the dryer; etc.). Too bad this whole 
dog subplot is lifted directly from the aforementioned "There's 
Something About Mary," and even the dogs look alike. Not only that, but 
the end credits come complete with the whole cast singing to a popular 
song (ring any bells?). And if you've seen the television ads for the 
film, you'll know that it is in the exact same format as "...Mary." 
Obviously, the T.V. spots are due to the studio, Warer Bros.', 
desperation, since they know the movie is most likely to not make a blip 
at the box-office. And director Pollack should have realized that if you 
are going to blatantly copy another movie, at least don't make the 
similarities so downright obvious and shameful! 
"Lost & Found" runs at a deadeningly slow pace, and pretty much is a 
black hole in the art of filmmaking. The plotting is so manufactured and 
predictable that you know what's going to happen before you walk into 
the theater, and then you have to suffer through the ridiculous romance 
between the odd couple of Spade and the beautiful, charismatic Marceau. 
They look and act as different as night and day, and Marceau has to be 
nearly a foot taller than Spade, which does add a bit of unintentional 
humor to the penultimate scene. Although she could have done much, much 
better following her first American film appearance in 1995's Academy 
Award-winning "Braveheart," at least she shows that she does have a 
sense of humor, can be occassionally pretty funny, and yet still takes 
her performance seriously. Spade might be the "star" of "Lost & Found," 
but Marceau is the real star, if you know what I mean. 
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Vita  bella, La (1997)
Directed by Roberto Benigni.
Cast: Roberto Benigni, Nicoletta Braschi, Giorgio Cantarini.
1998 - 116 minutes.
Rated PG-13 (for adult themes).
Reviewed January 20, 1999, courtesy Miramax Films.
In many ways Roberto Benigni's "Life is Beautiful" is a courageous 
motion picture. After all, I don't believe anyone in the past has had 
the audacity to set a comedy against the backdrop of the very serious 
Holocaust, nor would anyone want to. By creating such a light-hearted 
tone for a film about one of the most cruel and heartbreaking periods in 
recent history, it would be easy to offend viewers, especially those 
whom have a personal connection with the Holocaust. Benigni, however, 
who directed the film and stars in the lead role, somehow succeeds at 
such a genre-bending convention (or unconvention, if you think about 
it), finding just the right balance between humor and drama so that the 
film in no way is condescending to the subject matter.
The film begins as the Jewish-Italian Guido, a happy-go-lucky fellow 
(Benigni), arrives in a postcard-perfect Tuscan village where he stays 
at his uncle's home and obtains a job as a waiter at a nearby ritzy 
restaurant. Almost immediately, Guido runs into, or shall we say is hit 
by, the beautiful, kind schoolteacher Dora (Nicoletta Braschi) when she 
accidentally falls from a barn. After a pleasant and rather mystifying 
meeting, fate seems destined to bring the pair together when he runs 
into her a few more times (literally, when he crashes his bike, and 
figuratively, at the school where she works). The first hour of "Life is 
Beautiful" is a winning, sweet, and often funny romantic comedy, and 
Benigni constantly reminded me of the old comic greats Buster Keaton and 
Charlie Chaplin.
Seven years pass and we discover that Guido and Dora are now married and 
have a young son (Giorgio Cantarini). All is well in their lives, and at 
the bookstore Guido owns, until anti-semitism slowly begins to make 
appearances in the village, first by having store signs put up saying, 
"No Jews or Dogs," and then by having their own home torn apart. 
Ultimately, Guido and his son are taken away to a concentration camp and 
are split apart from Dora, who is forced to go with the female 
prisoners. Through the horrors of the Holocaust which are only briefly 
shown in a shocking and haunting image of a mountain of dead bodies, 
Guido keeps his spirits up and tells his son that everything is only a 
game, and if they are the first people to reach one one-hundred points, 
they will win the grand prize: a real, life-size tank to ride home on.
For its first hour, "Life is Beautiful" is a film full of magic, 
recalling the days of those '40s and '50s musicals. In its romantic 
story involving Guido and Dora, the film contains an undeniable 
innocence that is rarely seen in today's films, and as our protagonist, 
Guido (effervescently played by Benigni) is a pure charmer.
In its second half, the film becomes more tricky, since it was up to 
Benigni to keep the picture's light tone while still being realistic 
about the life of a Jew in a concentration camp. When taking into 
consideration Steven Spielberg's brilliant 1993 Holocaust drama, 
"Schindler's List," the Holocaust in "Life is Beautiful" is like a walk 
in the park. No on-screen violence is depicted, although there are hints 
of the gas chambers that look like showers, but on the other hand, the 
film not once actually treats the Holocaust as a joke. Instead, the 
picture attempts to portray a hopeful and spirited man that 
unfortunately happens to be a Jew in the 1940's and therefore is sent 
away to what is basically a horror show. If the film had actually become 
heavy on violence and brutality in this section, then the tone would 
have been ruined. It is clearly due to Benigni's artistry in filmmaking 
that he is easily able to mix these two differing elements so that it is 
neither too goofy or too sad.
"Life is Beautiful" honestly only missteps once, but it is in this flaw 
that detains the film from being a possible contender as one of the ten 
best of 1998. The penultimate sequence took a sudden u-turn into the 
realms of a sort of fantasy and, without giving it away, I found its 
last plot development to be entirely unbelievable and abrupt, as if 
Benigni was trying to rush to a quick conclusion so that the film would 
be over. Perhaps if the running time had contained an extra ten minutes, 
these occurrences would not have been so difficult to swallow. As it 
remains, the unfortunate ending takes away the possible greatness "Life 
is Beautiful" so clearly held, but the film is still an achievement, 
particularly because of Benigni, who took an almost impossible concept 
and brought it vibrantly to life.
      - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
        Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Deep Blue Sea (1999)
Directed by Renny Harlin.
Cast: Saffron Burrows, Thomas Jane, LL Cool J, Samuel L. Jackson, Michael 
Rapaport, Jacqueline McKenzie, Stellan Skarsgard, Aida Turturro.
1999 - 105 minutes.
Rated R (for violence, profanity, and gore).
Reviewed July 29, 1999. 
Despite its "sharky" villains, "Deep Blue Sea" is more akin to the "Alien" 
series than to "Jaws," which signals that the film honestly is cliche-ridden 
and unoriginal, but it nonetheless is one of the more exciting additions to 
the genre, thanks to director Renny Harlin's talent for creating slam-bang 
action sequences. Flawed as much of the film may be, it is one of the few 
big-budget summer extravaganzas this year (unlike "The Haunting" and "Lake 
Placid") that actually delivers on its promise to put you on the edge of your 
seat, and is also rather unpredictable concerning who the survivors, and the 
lunch, will turn out to be by story's end.
Following the inevitable prologue in which two young couples on a small boat 
are attacked, the film wastes no time in introducing Dr. Susan McAlester 
(Saffron Burrows), a marine biologist, who convinces her corporate funder, 
Russell Franklin (Samuel L. Jackson), to come back with her to her research 
lab on a former U.S. Navy sub base, to prove that she has found a potential 
cure for Alzheimer's disease, involving three 45-foot test sharks that move 
at an alarmingly swift pace and who are unusually smart. With most of the 
staff leaving for the weekend, Susan, Russell, and six additional workers, 
including co-creator Carter Blake (Thomas Jane); engineer Tom Scoggins 
(Michael Rapaport); chef Preacher (LL Cool J); and assistants Janice Higgins 
(Jacqueline McKenzie) and Jim Whitlock (Stellan Skarsgard), are left alone. 
When a violent storm arises and, through a series of circumstances, the base 
is severely damaged and partially flooded, the three sharks swim on-board to 
terrorize the inhabitants, all of which are underground with very little 
means of being able to reach the surface.
The plot of "Deep Blue Sea" certainly isn't going to win any award for 
inventiveness, as the same basic premise and set-up has been remade too many 
times to count, but luckily, Harlin revs the film up surprisingly quickly 
after all of the characters are introduced, and afterwards, is so relentless 
on its action scenes that you rarely get time to take a breather. And just 
when you think you can, there will be a startling jolt to put you right back 
on the edge. 
Since there really isn't anything new to be done with this type of movie, and 
thus, they almost always end up being a bore (see 1998's "Deep Rising" and 
1999's "Virus"), "Deep Blue Sea" demonstrates that any film's success depends 
solely on its treatment and expertise, which Harlin has always been known 
for. In an attempt to compel and arouse the viewer, Harlin does not skimp in 
any way on energy, nor could he ever be accused of making a "boring" film 
(unless, of course, it's name happens to be "Cutthroat Island"). Once the 
storm hits, the first victim is dispatched in an elongated, grisly manner, 
and the ball gets rolling approximately thirty minutes in, the movie doesn't 
let up, with a big action setpiece arriving every few minutes. Most directors 
would simply present a "death" scene, juice it up with middling suspense, and 
then move on to the next scene, but with Harlin, he always seems to take the 
action, and intensity, one step further (as in 1993's "Cliffhanger" and 
1996's "The Long Kiss Goodnight") so as to amaze and entertain with his 
particular creativity. 
One other compliment that must be made is that, more than any horror-style 
picture of its type in awhile, the proceedings are often unpredictable when 
dealing with who the victims will be. Usually you can tell, with the 
top-billed actors living, and the lesser-known supporting players being 
offed, but this tried-and-true formula is promptly crumpled up and thrown 
away as one of the "main" characters is unexpectedly torn to shreds midway 
through. Once this vital moment occurs, you realize no character is safe, 
similar to the now-infamous Drew Barrymore opener in 1996's "Scream."
Dodging the utter corniness of the derivative "The Haunting," "Deep Blue 
Sea," like all of its similar predecessors, still remains weak on the 
screenplay level. Written by Akiva Goldsman (who destroyed the "Batman" 
series with 1997's horrendous "Batman and Robin"), the film leaves something 
to be desired when reminiscing back on the dialogue and one-note characters. 
Despite being played straight most of the time, Goldsman foolishly feels the 
need to sprinkle one-liners here and there, every single one of which falls 
as flat as a pancake. The characters aren't much better (actually they're 
worse). In the course of the film, you are lucky to learn much of anything 
about the humans, as they are mostly there as pawns in a far bigger chess 
game and are given very little time to develop substantially satisfying 
individual personalities. The actors do what they can, however, and are 
mostly so believable that it would be rather easy to overlook the needlessly 
underwritten characters. Of them all, LL Cool J is given the most time to 
really shine (and is also the most likable), while Saffron Burrows and 
relative newcomer Thomas Jane act as the heroine and hero, respectively. Also 
of notice is Jacquelyn McKenzine, an obvious character actress (just watch 
her heartwrenching turn in 1997's Australian drama, "Angel Baby"), who is 
highly empathetic and given the most effective scene, not to mention a 
supreme example of raw terror (only surpassed this year by "The Blair Witch 
Project"). Unfortunately, it is the most seasoned pro, Samuel L. Jackson, 
that doesn't seem to be in his usual top form, but that probably has 
something to do with his poorly-written role. As for the sharks, the 
mechanical ones are more plausible than the CGI ones, but aren't as 
awe-inspiring on a visual level. Both types, however, achieve satisfactory 
villain status.
All in all, "Deep Blue Sea" is neither deep nor meaningful. It knows it is a 
popcorn movie, pure and simple, but unlike most of them that leave you 
feeling even more hungry than when you first sat down to watch the film, this 
movie, indeed, gives you the much-needed bang for your buck. Go in expecting 
a masterpiece of modern cinema, and you are surely setting yourself up for a 
disappointment. But go in expecting to be genuinely entertained, and you'll 
have yourself a rollicking time. Besides, what was the last high-profile 
summer action movie that even succeeded on this most elementary level? 
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Mystery Men (1999)
Directed by Kinka Usher. 
Cast: Ben Stiller, William H. Macy, Hank Azaria, Janeane Garofalo, Kel 
Mitchell, Paul Reubens, Greg Kinnear, Geoffrey Rush, Wes Studi, Tom Waits, 
Claire Forlani, Eddie Izzard, Jenifer Lewis, Lena Olin.
1999 - 121 minutes.
Rated PG-13 (for comic violence and profanity).
Reviewed August 7, 1999.
I'm not sure who director Kinka Usher is, but thanks to him and screenwriter 
Neil Cuthbert, the superhero comedy, "Mystery Men," is the most depressing 
cinematic experience of the year. Not the worst ("Inspector Gadget" and "Wing 
Commander" narrowly edge it out on that disreputable title), but easily the 
most dreary and saddening, as we are forced to watch a cast of fabulous 
actors, usually appearing in smart independent films, flounder within a movie 
that gives none of them an actual distinctive character to work with or, for 
that matter, anything at all to do, aside from be continuously humiliated by 
the absolute inanity of the screenplay.
An obvious take-off of "Batman" and "Superman," "Mystery Men" sets us smack 
dab in the middle of Champion City, as if it was a rejected set from Joel 
Schumacher's version of Gotham City. When the city's reigning superhero, 
Captain Amazing (Greg Kinnear), is kidnapped by arch-nemesis Casanova 
Frankenstein (Geoffrey Rush), it is up to a squadron of loser superheroes to 
save him, all of which have their own separate power or talent (if you can 
even call it that). There's Mr. Furious (Ben Stiller), the Shoveler (William 
H. Macy), and the Blue Raja (Hank Azaria, wielding lethal forks and spoons 
upon the enemy). Saving the likes of Captain Amazing, however, is going to 
take more than three rejects, so coming to their aide are three more wannabe 
superheroes--Invisible Boy (Kel Mitchell),a teen who claims he can become 
invisible "only when nobody is looking"; the Spleen (Paul Reubens), who 
knocks people out with his rancid flatulence; and the Bowler (Janeane 
Garofalo), equipped with a see-through bowling ball that holds her beloved 
father's skull inside. Are these six characters enough to overcome Casanova 
Frankenstein? Do dogs bark? Do cats meow? Do pigs snort? I rest my case.
The almost laughably unfunny jokes in "Mystery Men" is cause enough to 
question the intelligence of its thought-to-be superb cast. Let's take a look 
at the actors, while we're at it: Ben Stiller ("There's Something About 
Mary," "Your Friends and Neighbors"), Janeane Garofalo ("Romy and Michele's 
High School Reunion," "The Truth About Cats and Dogs"), William H. Macy 
("Fargo," "Boogie Nights"), Greg Kinnear ("As Good As It Gets"), Geoffrey 
Rush ("Shine"), and Paul Reubens ("Pee Wee's Big Adventure"). If that weren't 
enough, Claire Forlani, a standout in "Meet Joe Black," is painfully wasted 
(as is everyone else, of course) as the only 'normal' character in the whole 
film, a diner waitress and potential love interest to Stiller. Heavy usage of 
highly euphoric, mind-alterting substances had to have been used in order for 
these actors to sign on to this $85-million movie that looks like a 
$5-million direct-to-video effort. Either that, or they turn out to not have 
any taste in films after all...nah! Drugs definately played a large part in 
the casting process.
So-called comedy flies at a rapid rate throughout the film, but the problem 
is none of it is the least bit funny, only groan-inducing and lame. 
Supposedly, 60-70% of the dialogue was improvised on the spot by the actors, 
which leads me to believe that not only was the script bad, but the cast 
realized this and tried to fix it with their stand-up comedy abilities. 
Improvisation on the spot must be one of their weak spots, unfortunately, 
since very rarely does anyone say anything clever, and even then it is a 
throwaway line that is all but forgotten about a second afterwards. "Mystery 
Men" proves that no matter how good the actors may be, they cannot salvage a 
film if they aren't even given the chance to develop their own individual 
personalities.
'Excruciating' would be the perfect word to describe physically watching this 
movie. Every element on every level is inept in every respect, and the 
non-stop, stylized comic-book action sequences and idiotic dialogue is akin 
to watching an Akiva Goldsman-written fourth "Batman" sequel. If anything, an 
empty water bottle came in quite handy while I was watching the film, for if 
I couldn't have handled it in my hand, played with it, tore off the paper 
wrapping, etc., I would have been in dire danger of dozing off.
If there is a bright spot to be found at all in "Mystery Men," beyond the 
unbearable filmmaking stench of desperation, it is Janeane Garofalo, who is 
fun to watch in every movie she's in. She ultimately is not very fun to watch 
here, simply because the rest of the movie is so nauseatingly awful, but she 
does have a few good lines and shines just by appearing on the screen. Like 
everyone else, though, there was no character to work with, and Garofalo's 
only distinctive quality was that she was actually hip and snappy. In other 
words, far to kewl to be hanging out with the rest of those nitwits.
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman.
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Isn't She Great (2000)
Directed by Andrew Bergman.
Cast: Bette Midler, Nathan Lane, Stockard Channing, David Hyde Pierce, Amanda 
Peet, John Cleese.
2000 - 93 minutes
Rated R (for profanity and sexual innuendo).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, January 30, 2000.
Andrew Bergman, director of two of the brightest comedies of the '90s, 1992's 
"Honeymoon in Vegas" and 1994's "It Could Happen to You," has fallen on 
desperate times lately, first with the 1996 Demi Moore debacle, "Striptease," 
and now with "Isn't She Great," a rather cartoonish biopic of 
struggling-actress-turned-trashy-writer Jacqueline Susann. Susann, who looked 
nothing at all like Bette Midler, died at the age of 53 in the mid-1970s of 
breast cancer, but before her death became an icon for the general public, 
not because her writing was particularly good, but because it told the 
absolute truth. All she wanted was to be happy and successful, something she 
never found in her acting career, and according to the movie, it was her 
devoted husband, Irving Mansfield (Nathan Lane), who originally suggested she 
write a book. Susann is a bit hesitant at first, but after writing a brazen 
little number that tells it solely like it is, "Valley of the Dolls," and 
managing to sell it to a publishing company, it quickly tops the charts and 
stays there for 28 weeks, becoming the best-selling novel of all time.
What the public didn't know about, however, was that Jacquelyn's son was sent 
to an institution after being labeled Autistic, and that she struggled with 
cancer for many years. No one would buy a trash-talking book by a cancer 
patient, Susann though, so she hid it from everyone except her husband and 
the doctors, going in on a regular basis for chemotherapy. She ultimately 
lost her battle with the illness, but as she set out to do, was a star by the 
time she passed away.
Uplifting? Maybe a little. An appropriate story to build a wacky, fluffy 
comedy around? No way. Although any genre can surely be placed around any 
storyline and still be successful, it takes a firm, sure touch to sometimes 
pull it off. That is just one of the things that screenwriter Paul Rudnick 
(1997's "In & Out") is consistently missing in his disrespectful treatment of 
Susann, as he paints her as a crazy woman who talked to trees and thought it 
was God peering through the branches when the sun was shining. The only way 
to keep such a breezy tone and work, I think, would probably to have 
transformed the piece into a musical, a 'la "Evita." There are two scenes 
that are perfect setups for music numbers (and one of them actually does have 
Midler singing), and it is a missed opportunity that Rudnick did not realize 
this. Apparently, his brain was on autopilot while he penned the sloppy 
screenplay, anyway.
Worse yet is filmmaker Bergman. Plainly put, "Isn't She Great" is an 
astoundingly inept piece of direction, a surprise coming from someone who has 
proven his talent in year's past. From the schmaltzy narration by Susann's 
husband, Irving, to the episodic, bare-bones editing that seems to dwell on 
minor happenings in her life and then bypasses the most important elements, 
the film is never involving or emotionally satisfying because Bergman often 
seems to be too busy saying, "Look at Jackie Susann! Isn't she great?! Isn't 
she wacky?! Isn't she wild?!" Susann is only sporadically pulled out of her 
caricaturized character, and it is when she is (usually while she is telling 
things, no-holds-barred, exactly how they are) that the movie gets the little 
bit of charm that it acquires.
We rarely are able to believe anything in the film because of the 
unbelievable way in which it is presented. When Irving Mansfield, a publicity 
agent, spots Jacquelyn Susann on the stage, and then meets her in a 
restaurant, they end up spending the day together, with him confessing his 
undying love for her by the time night falls. It should be noted that they 
are standing waist-deep in a lake when this "touching" scene is played out, 
because Susann had just halfheartedly attempted suicide. Soon, they are 
married, but their relationship seems to be nothing more than close 
confidantes, as we never see them in bed together, or even kiss. And how are 
viewers to take it when Susann is earnestly talking to a tree in Central Park 
in one scene, and receiving radiation in the next? It simply does not work, 
and any cast or crew member should have discovered this when they read the 
script, unless they were all in it for the money and did not care about 
faithfully preserving the life of Susann.
Bette Midler overacts her way through the picture, but remains spunky and 
full of energy, thus making the proceedings a little more entertaining than 
they might have been had someone else been cast in the role. She can do far 
better, however, so let's hope that her next film, "Drowning Mona," being 
released next month, is a step up for her. Nathan Lane is a good sport as 
Irving, but usually is playing the straight man to Susann's bigger-than-life 
personality. Stockard Channing, as Susann's best friend, Flo, is a standout, 
spitting out her flashy lines with delightful panache. David Hyde Pierce, as 
Susann's editor; John Cleese, as her publisher; and Amanda Peet, as her 
promotional assistant, are mostly wasted, although Pierce gains a little 
extra mileage in the scenes where he sits down to edit the novel, only to get 
every one of his requested changes rebuked by Susann.
It is truly unfortunate that Rudnick sat down to construct a biopic of 
Jacquelyn Susann and could find nothing worthwhile to write aside from a 
string of one-liners, some of which are sharp zingers, to be sure, but do not 
aid in saying anything insightful about its subject. With only a brief glance 
at "Isn't She Great," which always feels like the outline to a movie, rather 
than a fully written motion picture, one thing is obvious: making the story 
of Jacquelyn Susann into a wistful comedy, albeit a badly made one, was an 
arbitrary, offensive decision, as many of the developments in her life were 
anything but a barrel of laughs.

Title
Review for Rush Hour 2 (2001)
Chris Tucker and Jackie Chan are, no doubt about it, one of the great 
present-day motion picture teams. Tucker, mugging charmingly for the camera, 
is a comedian who definitely grows on you, and his outright energy that is 
put into his scenes allow it to brighten up considerably. Chan is just as 
vital a part of their union, the straight man to Tucker's funny man who 
actually has a sly sense of humor himself. The characters in which Tucker and 
Chan portray might as well be named "Chris" and "Jackie," though, as they 
appear to be playing slightly more off-the-wall versions of themselves. The 
smaller roles are all unextraordinary and underdeveloped, with the only one 
worthy of note being Zhang Ziyi (who won acclaim in 2000's "Crouching Tiger, 
Hidden Dragon"), as the ferociously beautiful, tough, and psychotic 
villainess, Hu Li. Ziyi has next to no dialogue, but she inhabits her role 
with an undeniably mesmerizing presence that breaks through, full throttle, 
in her nicely choreographed fight sequences. 
While there are a few instances that show off Chan's incredible martial arts 
bravado (he has been widely publicized to perform all of his own stunts in 
every one of his films), there are not nearly enough of them, choosing to 
almost always go for the comedy in any situation. And because Lee and Carter 
are playing the wholly defined protagonists, there is little sense of 
suspense or possible endangerment to either party. As a full-out comedy, the 
film works only some of the time (it commits the cardinal sin for simply 
trying too hard, and has end title bloopers that are far more amusing than 
anything in the narrative), and as an action film, it is passable, but less 
than awe-inspiring. "Rush Hour 2" leaves the door wide open for a third 
installment; let's hope the makers try harder next time before spending an 
insanely high $90-million on a story that has been told, quite frankly, to 
death. 

Title
Review for Zombie! vs. Mardi Gras (1999) (V)
Directed by Mike Lyddon, Karl DeMolay, Will Frank.
Cast: Dale Ashmun, Dudley Batchelor, Garth Currie, Jason Deas, Karl DeMolay, 
Loreli Fuller, Roy "Rusty" Jackson, Veronica Russell, John Sinclair.
1999 - 73 minutes.
Not Rated (equivalent of an R for violence, blood, profanity, and nudity).
Reviewed July 9, 1999.
The film studio's synopsis of the horror (in more ways than one) film, 
"Zombie! vs. Mardi Gras," goes like this: "A child grows up studying the 
occult and plotting vengeance after being brutalized and crippled by drunken 
Mardi Gras revelers. One stormy Lundi Gras night he performs a Sumerian 
ritual which unearths ZOMBIE! from his ancient sleep. ZOMBIE! prowls the 
streets of New Orleans on Mardi Gras Day, leaving a trail of terror and 
carnage in his wake!"
Thank goodness for small favors, for without this brief synopsis, I would 
have practically been at a loss for words on what exactly the movie is about! 
At least it got the 'terror' part right, as that was exactly the way I was 
feeling while sitting through this amateurish 73-minute piece of rubbish. 
Filmed in black-and-white on what looks like a budget of approximately ten 
dollars, the washed-out picture quality often makes you feel like you are 
watching a crummy student film from the 1930s or '40s.
"Zombie! vs. Mardi Gras" is inept on every possible filmmaking level, which 
is unfortunate since the setting of Mardi Gras would, no doubt, make for a 
reasonably creepy setting for a horror movie that had at least some type of 
merit. Not this time. Instead, what we get is a parade of scenes tacked on to 
one another, most of them portraying zombies walking around attacking people, 
that make very little sense, and every now and again we will be blessed with 
a scene or two of gratuitous nudity that has nothing to do with the 
characters or story (what there is of it, at least).
Without any rhyme-or-reason, all of the actors' voices have been horrifically 
dubbed, and although most of the ridiculous dialogue is supposed to be campy, 
I suppose, every line, and every scene for that matter, falls astoundingly 
flat. Mute three-year-olds could tell better jokes than the ones in this 
piece of wasted celluloid.
Although I can't be positive, I firmly believe that by the time "Zombie! vs. 
Mardi Gras" reached its forgettable non-conclusion, my IQ had dropped at 
least 50 points. And to top everything off, the end credits show a woman and 
zombie running through a field towards each other, until they finally meet in 
a warm embrace. But the zombies were evil...and I don't believe I had ever 
met that woman in the course of the film itself. I fear if I keep going, most 
of my brain cells are going to shrivel up and die, but I'll leave you with 
one final observation: the word, "idiotic," was created for "Zombie! vs. 
Mardi Gras."
* For more information on "Zombie! vs. Mardi Gras," contact Salt City Home 
Video, P.O. Box 5515, Syracuse, NY 13220; tel. 315-454-5608, web site: 
http://www.b-movie.com or webmaster@b-movie.com.
   - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
     Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Jurassic Park III (2001)
Directed by Joe Johnston. 
Cast: Sam Neill, William H. Macy, Tea Leoni, Trevor Morgan, Alessandro 
Nivola, Laura Dern, Michael Jeter, John Diehl, Bruce A. Nash. 
2001 - 92 minutes 
Rated PG-13 (for violence and mild profanity). 
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, July 19, 2001. 
With Steven Spielberg stepping down to getting merely an "executive producer" 
credit, director Joe Johnston's "Jurassic Park III" could unquestionably have 
been an irrelevant, needless second sequel to one of the biggest money-making 
franchises of all time. With all of its possible story options told out in 
the first two pictures, could there really be more to do with the premise 
aside from hack together pieces from the predecessors and construct them into 
a new, cohesive whole? Quite the contrary, as "Jurassic Park III" turns out 
to be a new kind of breed of dinosaur--a little long in the tooth, but with 
just enough life to resurrect not only the series, but the genre of big, 
summer action-adventure movies. 
If 1993's "Jurassic Park" was a groundbreaking achievement, both in modern 
special effects and marvelous, cliffhanging storytelling, and 1997's "The 
Lost World: Jurassic Park" was a joyless, boring misfire with none of the 
magic that made the original so memorable, then "Jurassic Park III" stands as 
infinitely better than the second film, but not quite up to par with the 
first. Still, it's an entertaining and tightly-wound suspense yarn that, 
clocking in at 92 minutes, is over a half-hour shorter than the previous 
"Jurassic" excursions. This running time difference works as a definite 
asset, as the story and break-neck action sequences get going almost right 
away, bypassing the dreary, seemingly endless exposition that made "The Lost 
World" almost a chore to endure. 
Triumphantly reprising his role from the first movie, Sam Neill stars as Dr. 
Alan Grant, a paleontologist who, seven years after his unforgettable 
experiences at Jurassic Park, still must field questions about what he went 
through and saw. A proposition comes his way in the form of Paul (William H. 
Macy) and Amanda Kirby (Tea Leoni), a wealthy, married couple who wish to fly 
over Isla Sorna and take in the glorious sights of the dinosaur-infested Site 
B. Following a generous paycheck that leads Dr. Grant; his young, wide-eyed 
assistant, Billy Brennan (Alessandro Nivola); and three other crew members, 
to accompany the Kirby's on their "harmless" trip, their real motives emerge. 
The Kirby's, it seems, are a middle-class, divorced couple who have every 
intention of landing the plane on Isla Sorna to begin searching for their 
14-year-old son, Eric (Trevor Morgan), whose paraglide crashed there eight 
weeks earlier. When their airplane crashes on the island, however, they find 
themselves stranded without any way of calling for help, in a land of 
dinosaurs that would happily eat them for lunch. 
With little more than a brief fifteen-minute introduction to the characters 
and plot, "Jurassic Park III" jumps to the chase, literally and figuratively. 
The next hour is an almost non-stop parade of snazzy, state-of-the-art visual 
effects that make the creatures look more realistic and elaborate than ever, 
and fast-moving, breathtaking action set pieces that don't hardly let up to 
allow you to breathe. One such sequence, set on a creaky jawbridge that the 
potential victims have no idea is located inside a giant birdcage with 
flying, carnivorous Pteranodons, jauntily milks the tension for all its 
worth. 
Also working to the film's advantage is the intoxicating sense of wonder that 
the dinosaurs are depicted with--a trait that made the original so special, 
and one that was utterly absent from the followup. This assured, smart 
decision allows to give the film an unexpected depth that it otherwise might 
not have had in such a quick-paced narrative. The music, by Don Davis, 
powerfully recaptures the lush score that John Williams perfected in the 
original. And the screenplay, by Peter Buchman, Alexander Payne (1999's 
"Election"), and Jim Taylor, is crisply well-written. 
With so many dinosaur chases, the character interaction is effective, 
workmanlike, and kept to a minimum. Sam Neill proves again what a 
mesmerizing, underrated actor he is, and why he is better suited for the 
"hero" role than the slightly nerdy Jeff Goldblum was in "The Lost World." 
Making the debut appearances in the series, William H. Macy (2000's "State 
and Main") and Tea Leoni (2000's "The Family Man") are just the type of 
strong character actors that give their roles the added nuances needed to 
avoid cliches. In only a few scenes, we are able to believe that Paul and 
Amanda Kirby are divorcees who still, in one way or the other, love each 
other very much. Laura Dern (2000's "Dr. T and the Women") also makes a 
refreshing appearance, albeit a fairly small one, as Ellie Sadler, her 
character from the original. Dern is such a likable presence, and does such a 
good job here with not much screen time, that it's a shame she couldn't have 
been right alongside Neill throughout. One thing is for sure: their chemistry 
together is undeniable. 
"Jurassic Park III" is so thrilling a motion picture that its ending, 
unfortunately, comes out feeling anticlimactic. A final run-in with their 
meat-eating adversaries seems missing, as if the makers couldn't wait for the 
film to come to a close. The disappointing conclusion aside, "Jurassic Park 
III" is a welcome return to the style and startling execution that made the 
1993 picture such a success. With a final image that hints at a possible 
fourth "Jurassic" adventure, the thought of such, it turns out, doesn't seem 
like such a bad idea after all. 
  - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman 
    http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman 
* GET READY FOR FRIDAY! THE GRAND OPENING OF MY BRAND-NEW MOVIE REVIEW 
WEBSITE...THEMOVIEBOY.COM !!! * 

Title
Review for Supernova (2000)
Directed by Thomas Lee.
Cast: Angela Bassett, James Spader, Wilson Cruz, Peter Facinelli, Robin 
Tunney, Lou Diamond Phillips, Robert Forster.
2000 - 85 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for violence, sex, and brief nudity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, January 15, 2000.
There once was a sci-fi film that MGM budgeted at $60-million plus that went 
through directors as it was filming just about as quickly as a child goes 
through candy. The first smart soul left citing creative differences. Then 
Walter Hill came onboard the project, but after seeing his vision sliced down 
to a nearly unrecognizable 85 minutes, he requested his name be taken off and 
replaced with the pseudonym of Thomas Lee. Rumor has it that even Francis 
Ford Coppola was hired to film the reshoots. Every filmmaker, it seems, had 
the right idea when deciding they didn't want to take credit for the film. By 
the way, the film I speak of is "Supernova," it has allegedly sat on the 
shelf for almost two years, and it is a haphazard excuse for a movie, the 
type that you watch and then immediately wonder if the studio expected one 
person in the whole audience to walk out of the theater liking it. Handling 
your very negative feelings about "Supernova," you can either get angry at 
having part of your night wasted, or you can heartily laugh and make fun of 
it on the drive home from the theater. My filmgoing companions and I chose 
the latter---with a vengeance! 
Even in the opening minutes, "Supernova" screams of severe post-production 
editing, and you'd suspect it was to salvage any sort of remains of a 
worthwhile motion picture. But remember MGM's 1998 thriller, "Disturbing 
Behavior." After whittling down the poor director's vision from 110 to a 
ridiculously short 83 minutes, out went any signs of character development 
and in came one plot hole after the next. The deleted scenes were then 
resurrected on DVD, and after watching the 110-minute version, I grew a deep 
sympathy for all involved, except the culprits at MGM. Even the 83-minute cut 
of "Disturbing Behavior," however, is reminiscent of "Gone With the Wind" 
compared to the bone-headed plotting and amateurish cutting of "Supernova."
The cast is filled with such talent, both from veterans and rising stars, 
that it is an unfortunate state of affairs when every single one of them can 
fall for appearing in a movie that has been so distinctly recycled from 
countless other films. "Supernova" may have been chopped up and stir-fried to 
its current paltry length, but no cutting in the world can hide the fact that 
this story did not need to be told again, and the millions of dollars 
certainly did not need to be so egregiously wasted. Making things more 
depressing is that the visual effects look like they have come right out of a 
direct-to-video movie. Where did all that money go to? Did the cast and crew 
literally throw the hundred dollar bills up in the air and, to entertain 
themselves, shoot at it with guns during the breaks in filming?
Supposedly set in the 23rd-century, since I read this in a magazine article 
(the year is never mentioned in the film itself), on the medical rescue 
vessel Nightingale, which must answer a distress signal, the inhabitants 
include...oh, why bother with names or characters? The screenwriter and 
editor sure didn't. At the mine where the signal is coming from, they meet 
Troy (Peter Facinelli), who is welcomed aboard and turns out to be an alien 
and kills everyone aside from the first two actors billed in the credits. The 
vessel continues off into space, and the title "Supernova" appears on the 
screen, which then fades to black. The end. Sound like something you want to 
pay your money towards? I didn't think so.

Title
Review for King and I, The (1999)
Directed by Richard Rich.
Voices: Miranda Richardson, Christiane Noll, Martin Vidnovic, Ian 
Richardson, Darrell Hammond, Allen D. Hong, David Burnham, Adam Wylie, 
Sean Smith.
1999 - 90 minutes
Rated G (no objectionable material).
Reviewed March 21, 1999.
In the last two weeks of filmgoing, not one, but two films have 
contained characteristics that only the worst director of all-time, Ed 
Wood, could be proud of. The recent "Wing Commander" turned out to be 
one of the very worst movies of the whole decade, while in the new 
animated film, "The King and I," a quality-butchering remake of the 
famous Rodgers and Hammerstein musical, one sequence changes from day to 
night between shots. This foolish mistake might be at least a little 
understandable in a live-action picture, but keep in mind that this 
particular movie wasn't even filmed, but drawn!
In a children's adaptation that sticks to the bare minimum in the story 
department, there truthfully isn't much do discuss in the way of a 
premise, except that a 19th-century schoolteacher named Anna (voiced by 
Miranda Richardson) arrives at the kingdom of the stern King of Siam 
(Martin Vidnovic) to teach his eight children, while the King's evil 
brother, Kralahome (Ian Richardson), plots to destroy him, as well as 
his oldest son, so he can become the King and take over the palace.
To get a taste of how desperate for ideas "The King and I" actually is, 
take, for example, the ludicrous opening scene in which Kralahome 
creates a giant water serpent to cause Anna to shipwreck. Does Anna 
naturally shudder in fear? No, not at all. Why, she decides it would be 
a perfect time to sing the upbeat and delightful song, "I Whistle a 
Happy Tune!" Unfortunately, the film goes even further downhill from 
there, and the only element that kept it from becoming a thoroughly 
unbearable experience was the memorable, if one-dimensional, character 
of Anna, a head-strong woman who speaks up when she disagrees with 
things, and deeply believes in what is right and wrong. Amazingly, 
however, Anna disappears for long stretches of time to concentrate on 
the dull, predictable subplot involving the King's son and his 
blossoming romance with a kind-hearted servant whom he is forbidden to 
be with. Multiple awards for anyone who can guess what happens with this 
couple by the movie's end...
If animated films are expected to be money-makers, they've got to have 
at least something going for them, and obviously Warner Brothers doesn't 
have anything going for them. The animation itself is strictly 
amateurish and Saturday morning cartoonish; at several moments the songs 
are nearly drowned out by the loud, forgettable music score; and the 
overall story follows the basic slapdash formula of all animated films: 
a female protagonist; a male love interest who needs reforming; some 
cuddly animal sidekicks; and a dark, canniving villain that has magical 
powers, not to mention a clumsy, bumbling sidekick. Sigh. As the 
characters repeatedly say to the point of near-monotony throughout, 
etc., etc., etc.

Title
Review for Native Son (1950)
Based on the 1940 book by Richard Wright, the 1951 version of "Native Son" 
(it was remade in 1986 with a Hollywood cast) had difficulty gaining a 
distributor because of its "controversial" subject matter, and eventually 
fell through the cracks. Currently available on video, the film proves that 
times sure have changed, as its supposed-to-be cutting edge look at the 
disheartening state of race relations in the 1930s is almost completely 
undealt with or presented in an effective manner. 25-year-old Bigger Thomas 
(novelist Wright, taking over the film's lead) is a poor, lower-class black 
man who gets a job as a chauffeur for a rich white family. When he 
accidentally kills the intoxicated daughter on his first night of the job, he 
soon becomes a wanted man. Since the underlying themes about race are so very 
mild, basically the film becomes a mediocre "man-on-the-run" crime drama 
without any twists or likably three-dimensional characters to keep your 
interest. Wright, however, gives a fine debut performance.
* "Native Son" is available on home video from Hollywood's Attic, which can 
be reached online at www.hollywoodsattic.com or by calling 818-843-3366.
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Scream 3 (2000)
Directed by Wes Craven.
Cast: Neve Campbell, Courteney Cox Arquette, David Arquette, Parker Posey, 
Patrick Dempsey, Scott Foley, Emily Mortimer, Deon Richmond, Jenny McCarthy, 
Lance Henriksen, Matt Keeslar, Patrick Warburton, Liev Schreiber, Kelly 
Rutherford, Heather Matarazzo, Jamie Kennedy, Carrie Fisher.
2000 - 116 minutes
Rated R (for violence, blood, and profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, February 5, 2000.
In 1996, screenwriter Kevin Williamson and director Wes Craven created 
"Scream," a low-budget slasher film that revitalized the horror genre, due to 
its innovative approach of having the characters be "in-the-know" about the 
conventions of movies concerning killers hacking away at nubile victims, so 
when a psycho really does begin to dispatch of the teenage residents in the 
town, they know how they should handle it. But even more than that, "Scream" 
was the very first horror movie in a long time that was actually smart, 
scary, and genuinely suspenseful, a twist on the "stalk-and-slash" films from 
the late-'70s/early-'80s. The $14-million picture ultimately went on to gross 
$103-million, a whopping number that is virtually unheard of for this type of 
movie. 
But lightning struck twice, as "Scream 2," with most of the same cast and 
crew, was released exactly one year later, in 1997, and set new box-office 
records on opening weekend. The $25-million sequel ended its cume at 
$101-million, but while making virtually the same amount as its predecessor, 
the film left audiences divided, with some saying it was actually superior, 
while leaving others a little disappointed. My opinion fits somewhere in the 
middle--while "Scream 2" didn't even come close to the level of ingenuity 
that the first one had set, and was more than a little sloppy, looking as if 
it had hurriedly been thrown together (with 11 months, 3 weeks separating 
their releases, it was), it still had enough of its token wit and intensity 
to be a satisfying venture. 
Over two more years have passed, but the (supposed) final film in the 
financially and creatively successful trilogy, "Scream 3," has arrived, and 
to say it was well worth the wait would be an understatement. Despite the 
disappearance of Williamson in the screenplay credit (Ehren Kruger was handed 
the writing reins), Craven has remained faithful as the top-notch filmmaker 
of the series, as have ongoing stars Neve Campbell, Courteney Cox Arquette, 
David Arquette, and Liev Schreiber. And, in its own way, "Scream 3" is a 
groundbreaking motion picture itself--a second sequel that has somehow 
accomplished the daunting task of being every bit as fresh and thoroughly 
gratifying as the now-classic film that started it all. The hanging story 
threads from the previous ones are brought to the forefront, as the natural 
evolution of the characters, as well as the series itself, skillfully comes 
around full circle.
It has been several years since the bloodbath that occurred at Windsor 
College, and Sidney Prescott (Neve Campbell) now lives in a secluded, rural, 
Californian home, working from her house as a crisis hotline counselor under 
a false name. Unable to lead a regular life anymore, and plagued with 
nightmares of her deceased mother, Maureen, Sidney is distraught to find that 
one of the people from her past has been murdered (seen in the token opening 
death scene) in Hollywood, where "Stab 3: Return to Woodsboro" is well 
underway in its production on a studio backlot. Determined cutthroat news 
reporter Gale Weathers, who now hosts a television show called "Total 
Entertainment" after her brief gig on "60 Minutes II" fell through, is 
contacted by Detective Kincaid (Patrick Dempsey) to join him in his 
investigation of the multiple murders. Illegally getting onto the set of the 
film, Gale has a surprise run-in with Dewey Riley (David Arquette), recently 
retired from the police force due to his handicap, and currently an advisor 
for the movie. Although they briefly had a relationship with each other after 
the goings-on in Part 2, their varied personalities have since broken them 
up, but it is obvious the spark between them is still very much alive.
One of the elements that is so ingenious in "Scream 3," however, is in its 
movie-within-a-movie approach (there is a stunning, showstopping sequence in 
which Sidney finds her way to the sets from the production, which are the 
spitting image of real places in her hometown of Woodsboro), and in the way 
the mystery killer--once again dressed in that spooky Ghostface 
costume--kills off the characters, which is by the order in which they are 
whacked in "Stab 3." Adding confusion to the mix, (1) three different 
versions of the screenplay were created, in order to throw off Internet fans, 
but it is unclear which one the killer has gotten ahold of; and (2) with the 
real Gale, Sidney, and Dewey, as well as their three actor counterparts, in 
Hollywood together, will the killer want to get rid of the real people, the 
performers portraying them, or both?
Whereas any old second sequel to a slasher franchise would be more than 
showing its age by now, "Scream 3" is that rare case in which it is not 
merely here to cash in on the big bucks, but was all along planned as a 
trilogy. One could possibly question if this is actually true, or just an 
excuse by the filmmakers once the original struck paydirt, but "Scream 3" 
does a fabulous job of wrapping things up and filling in the missing pieces, 
all the while delivering what fans have grown accustomed to--scares, snappy 
dialogue, believable characters, and some sort of unique spin on the 
otherwise cliched formula. While "Scream 2" was the most straightforward of 
the series, in terms of its violence and occasionally messy plot 
developments, "Scream 3," like its 1996 precursor, is a multi-layered 
funhouse of chills that does a more-than-sufficient job of keeping the 
surprising twists coming, and the final unveiling of the killer is not only 
unanticipated, but the details for his/her motive come off as more plausible 
than they have any right to be.
Aside from the aforementioned scene where Sidney stumbles upon the movie sets 
and, subsequently, is chased by the killer as she relives her past, there is 
a clearly innovative and exciting sequence coming every ten to fifteen 
minutes. The 35-minute climax, set in an eerie mansion, complete with secret 
passageways and dark corridors, is literally non-stop in its intensity, and 
in the perverse fun Craven, Kruger, and the gang are obviously having. 
Moreover, the in-jokes about moviemaking and Hollywood are occasionally 
satirical and often biting, with a few people turning up in enjoyable cameos. 
Neve Campbell, fresh-faced and well-cast in "Scream," has done nothing but 
develop into an even more talented actress with clear star qualities within 
the last three-and-a-half years. Wisely choosing to downplay the sullen 
Sidney from the middle chapter, her character is now a young woman stuck in a 
rut in her life, filled with understandable paranoia that she can never be 
safe until she has completely disappeared from the rest of the world. The 
progression Sidney goes through is both touching and truthful, and Campbell 
is able to surpass her performances in both of the other pictures.
Courteney Cox Arquette, now married to co-star David Arquette, are both up to 
par with their consistently entertaining turns as Gale and Dewey. Of the 
three central characters in the series, it is Gale who has gone through the 
most changes. Starting off as a fairly heartless wench in "Scream," Gale was 
still very much ruthless in "Scream 2," but her sweet relationship with Dewey 
humanized her character into a slightly warmer individual. In the latest 
addition, Gale has finally learned there is more to life than just getting a 
juicy story, and helping out the police in the investigation of the 
increasing death toll, and rekindling her romance with Dewey, are now the two 
things most important to her.
A wide array of new faces are introduced, as usual, and the actors all have 
great fun. The highlight is easily Parker Posey, as Jennifer Jolie, a vapid, 
relatively ditzy actress who has been cast in the Gale Weathers role, and 
takes pride in portraying the character even better than Gale herself. Posey 
is a comic delight, as usual, and she single-handedly steals almost all of 
the scenes she is in. Relatedly, there is a very funny rapport that develops 
between Jennifer and Gale, who are stuck together like glue through the 
second half. When it is Gale who is to die next in the script, Jennifer 
figures that if they are always side-by-side, the killer will just attack 
Gale and leave her alone.
Also in a memorable appearance is Jenny McCarthy, as Sarah Darling, an aging 
35-year-old starlet tired of always being cast as teenagers and especially 
angered that her character in "Stab 3" only appears in two scenes and then is 
killed off (Guess which real actress appears in only two scenes in "Scream 3" 
and is killed off?). Rounding out the cast is Patrick Dempsey, nice to see 
after a sizable absence from the spotlight, as Detective Kincaid; Scott 
Foley, big-headed and appropriately pretentious, as "Stab 3" director Roman 
Bridger; Emily Mortimer as Angelina Tyler (Sidney in "Stab 3"); the 
always-beguiling Matt Keeslar as Tom Prinze (Dewey in "Stab 3"); and Lance 
Henriksen as Sunrise Studios producer John Milton (who may or may not have 
known Maureen Prescott years before). Also showing up is Liev Schreiber, the 
fourth returnee from the other "Scream" movies, as Cotton Weary.
In the director's chair, Wes Craven has somehow been able to keep the energy 
level as high as possible in "Scream 3," as if it was the first movie he has 
directed in the series. This being his third go-round, in retrospect, may 
actually be nothing but a positive thing, as Craven has treaded similar 
horror territory so many times in the past that he could do it in his sleep. 
What cannot be denied is that Craven is a master at setting up absorbing 
horror set-pieces, and no matter what, is constantly adding a stylish flare 
to the proceedings. 
With the wholeheartedly satisfying conclusion of "Scream 3," perhaps the most 
widely popular horror movie series of all time has come to a close. The way 
each of the surviving characters' lives receive closure is an excellent 
touch, and the final few shots are filled with subtle, yet remarkable power. 
Who would have guessed that the ending of a film called "Scream 3" could be 
so poignant? Certainly not I, but it is. Now how's that for an unexpected 
twist?

Title
Review for Titan A.E. (2000)
Directed by Don Bluth and Gary Goldman.
Voices: Matt Damon, Drew Barrymore, Bill Pullman, John Leguizamo, Nathan Lane,
Janeane Garofalo.
2000 - 95 minutes
Rated PG (for violence).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, June 17, 2000.
Don Bluth's and Gary Goldman's "Titan A.E." is an unusual and decidedly 
uneasy hybrid of animation and live-action intentions. A sci-fi picture that 
heavily borrows from "Star Wars," and its countless other clones, the film 
offers intermittent excitement during some of its action sequences, but the 
weak characters and tiresome screenplay ruin whatever chance it has to be a 
worthwhile endeavor. 
Littered with violence and even a little bloodshed, as well as a quirky (for 
animated
standards) rock soundtrack, an attempt has clearly been made to attract 
preteen and
younger teenage boys between the ages of 9-15. While it may very well do just 
that, and is certainly a nice change of pace to have an animated movie 
targeting others outside of the Disney crowd, "Titan A.E." is basically a 
stillborn production, and amidst all of its splashy special effects is a 
story that is painfully behind the times. 
Set in the year 3033, fifteen years after the Earth has been destroyed by a 
powerful alien race known as the Drej, the remaining humans have been 
drifting about space, setting up home at various nearby space stations. 
19-year-old Cale (voiced by Matt Damon) is a lonely young man who was torn 
apart from his father as a child when Earth was being evacuated, but has kept 
up hope of seeing him again based on his father's promise. Working at a 
salvage space station, Cale meets Korso (Bill Pullman), who tells him that 
the Titan Project, his father's invention that has the power to create an 
entirely new planet, can be found far way on Planet Ice, with the ring Cale's 
father gave him long ago having the power to act as a map to the humans' 
savior. Joined by the parentless Akima (Drew Barrymore), Cale sets off in a 
race to find the infamous Titan before the Drej do.
The one thing "Titan A.E." has going for it is its live-action feel. At 
certain key moments, I found myself imagining how effortless much of it could 
be with real actors, and how well-directed it was, in that respect. With no 
singing characters and an action-oriented storyline, the film is reminiscent 
in many ways of anime movies. Many of the action scenes are, indeed, rousing, 
particularly a spaceship chase through a mass of broken ice that turns the 
surroundings into a sort of Maze of Mirrors carnival attraction. 
The animation, like the film itself, is wildly uneven, with the settings and 
backdrops at times awe-inspiringly real. The characters, however, are a 
different matter entirely, looking like pure television kiddie fare. Poorly 
structured and drawn, their lack of any real life, along with the utterly 
forgettable voice-over work from all involved, renders the picture, as a 
whole, cold and distant.
Try as Don Bluth and Gary Goldberg might, "Titan A.E." is an ambitious 
animated film that at least attempts to aim for something different, but is 
impaired by its hackneyed plot, much the same way the inferior "Dinosaur" 
was. Without any well-developed characters or a satisfying arc, but with 
several qualities of its own, "Titan A.E." falls into the trap of many movies 
of its ilk--it knows the dance, but has forgotten the tune.

Title
Review for Mascara (1999)
Directed by Linda Kandel.
Cast: Ione Skye, Lumi Cavazos, Amanda de Cadenet, Steve Jones, Steve Schub, 
Tara Subkoff, Corey Page, Karen Black.
1999 - 96 minutes.
Rated R (for sex, nudity, and profanity).
Reviewed July 20, 1999.
Three 30-year-old friends' search for their rightful place in life is the 
subject of director Linda Kandel's independent drama, "Mascara," an 
intelligently-written, if somewhat familiar, right-of-passage film. Movies 
about a group of young women and their exploits concerning love, career, and 
identity are a dime a dozen, and even if "Mascara" isn't one of the very best 
of the genre, it is also far from one of the worst, due to the apt way in 
which the characters are dealt with and developed.
Moving back and forth between the three women's plights, the film begins with 
a stylishly-edited sequence in which one of them, Laura (Lumi Cavazos), is 
about to get married to her beau, Donnie (Steve Schub). Laura is apprehensive 
and nervous, as many brides-to-be understandably are, but seven months later, 
we discover that Donnie has begun to cheat on her, and being the resolute 
woman that she is, Laura packs up and leaves him, moving back in with her 
possessive parents. Meanwhile, Jennifer (Amanda de Cadenet) is having 
troubles of her own. It seems that when her own husband was caught having a 
one-time affair, she let it slide but found herself emotionally dead inside. 
Together, they have a sweet, young daughter, but Jennifer begins to stray 
down a promiscuous path of her own, desperately attempting to find happiness 
with a collection of one-night-stands and alcohol. And Rebecca (Ione Skye), 
who moves from one job to the next, preferring to not stay at one place too 
long, has picked up with Nick (Steve Jones), an older man with two children: 
Daphne (Tara Subkoff), a slutty teenager whom Nick seems just a tad too 
infatuated with, and Andrew (Corey Page), a college student who is rarely at 
home and, thus, when Rebecca begins a relationship with him as well, she 
doesn't know he is Nick's son.
The title, "Mascara," I think, has less to do with the make-up than as a 
metaphor for the three women's struggles for independence and satisfaction. 
All three of the central characters are vividly drawn and interesting people. 
Laura may seem the most grounded at first, but then we discover that her job 
as a psychotherapist is overshadowed by a scene when we find she has a 
therapist of her own. As far as her husband Donnie goes, she still loves him, 
but it is clear that he is not a responsible man, as he casually has affairs 
and doesn't show any sympathy for Laura. Rebecca, on the other hand, finds 
her rapid change of jobs a nice change of pace, even though she later 
discovers after an acting audition that she unknowingly has a great deal of 
talent. Slowly, she starts to suspect that something other than fatherly love 
is going on between Nick and his daughter, and quickly drops him when things 
get a little too uncomfortable. Poor Jennifer has the most problems, as she 
finds it difficult to show any feeling for anyone. Even though Ken had one 
affair, he is honestly regretful of his misstep and is otherwise faithful, 
unlike Donnie. Jennifer loves her daughter, no doubt about that, but her own 
interior problems need to be worked out, and so she leaves them. It doesn't 
take long to see that she is headed for further conflicts.
Ione Skye was such a startlingly bright presence in 1989's "Say Anything," 
but since then hasn't had much success, aside from her turn in 1992's indie, 
"Gas, Food Lodging." Skye returns with a reckoning here, as her character of 
Rebecca also has to deal with the discovery from her aunt (Karen Black) that 
her father is not dead, like she had been told, but merely wanted nothing to 
do with her when he found out her mother was pregnant. In one of the best 
scenes in the film, Rebecca pays a visit to her dad, who works as an auto 
mechanic. He takes her for a test drive in a used car, but she decides not to 
reveal her identity. Skye is so notably assured and winning here that it is 
unfortunate this film was released earlier this summer from Phaedra Cinema, 
but through ill-fated circumstances, was not reviewed in any of the NY 
newspapers and therefore opened and closed with the blink of an eye. Be sure 
to catch the film when it comes to video probably later this year.
Lumi Cavazos, as Laura, appeared in 1993's acclaimed foreign film, "Like 
Water for Chocolate," which remains unseen by me, but after seeing her here, 
I might just have a reason to take a look at that earlier picture. Cavazos is 
luminous and is even a little funny when dealing with her character's 
eccentricities (when she goes out on a date and lights a cigarette but simply 
holds it in her hand, she tells him, "I don't smoke").
Amanda de Cadenet decidedly has the most difficult role, and goes through the 
most changes, but is up to the challenge, believably displaying a wide range 
of emotions as a woman who doesn't feel wanted by anyway, most of all her 
husband, despite his constant apologizing for what he once did. One late 
sequence, however, in which Jennifer goes home with the wrong man, who then 
violently rapes her, felt out-of-place and nothing comes of the scene 
afterwards. Its purpose, of course, was to be an incident that finally knocks 
some sense into her concerning her impending path of destruction, but the 
scene still could have been more well-handled.
There actually aren't that many actual criticisms I can give the film, other 
than to say that this sort of story has been overdone and the film world 
wasn't exactly crying out for another one. I also could have done without the 
ending, which is just a little too neat and tidy for my taste, but that at 
least put me in a better mood than if it had ended on a downbeat note. Still, 
these minor downfalls don't detract away from my overall feelings on 
"Mascara," which is that it is a rare mature film about free-thinking adults, 
and one that treats its characters with an open mind and a big heart.
      - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
        Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Trick (1999)
Directed by Jim Fall.
Cast: Christian Campbell, J.P. Pitoc, Tori Spelling, Lorri Bagley, Steve 
Hayes, Brad Beyer, Clinton Leupp.
1999 - 90 minutes.
Rated R (for profanity, sexual situations, and nudity).
Reviewed August 12, 1999.
One of the most talked-about independent films at this year's Sundance Film 
Festival, director Jim Fall's "Trick" is one of those "up-all-night" comedies 
in the vein of Martin Scorcese's 1985 "After Hours," which take place within 
a 24-hour period, and follow a certain character through his/her 
(mis)adventures during that one memorable night. Not only does "Trick" 
thoroughly entertain in the context of this genre, but it also stands as 
being the most uplifting and romantic love story of the year, thanks to the 
extremely likable and innocent lug of a main character and the crisp, funny 
screenplay by Jason Schafer. The fact that the two people involved in the 
said romance are both male is more or less insignificant, as the film's core 
relationship is something all audiences can relate to, and therefore, it 
deserves to have a universal appeal (narrow-minded homophobes 
notwithstanding). It really is difficult to knock a movie, anyway, that is as 
genuinely sweet as this one is.
Gabriel (Christian Campbell, Neve's older brother) is a twentysomething New 
Yorker who, despite being a struggling musical writer, feels that he does not 
fit into the stereotypical mold of a gay person, and has a best friend in the 
bubbly Katherine (Tori Spelling), an aspiring actress who is always going to 
auditions with him and performing his musical numbers. The night following a 
discouraging presentation of one of his latest songs, "Enter, You," Gabriel 
goes off to a gay club (something he normally doesn't do), where he first 
sets his eyes on muscular go-go dancer, Mark (J.P. Pitoc). Taking the subway 
on his way home, Mark shows up in the same car as Gabriel, and immediately 
suggests that they find a place to be alone. The rest of the film follows 
Gabriel and Mark on their journey through the nightlife of NYC, as they 
attempt to turn a "trick." It doesn't work out that way, however, as Gabriel 
finds that Katherine is at his apartment printing out 150 copies of her 
resume, followed by his roommate (Brad Beyer), who shows up with his ditzy 
girlfriend (Lorri Bagley). No matter where Gabriel and Mark go, there is a 
distraction of some sort, until it eventually doesn't seem to matter much 
anymore, as a potential one-night-stand starts to transform into what may 
very well be a budding romantic relationship.
There's no better word to describe "Trick" than 'magical.' Abandoning the 
usual topics and hang-ups of most gay-oriented movies, including "coming out" 
and AIDS, what talented director Fall has done here is given us two gay 
people who have long-since accepted their sexual orientation, as have all of 
the other characters around them, and so the movie does not become a 
serious-minded, so-called "meaningful" movie, but one that immediately 
centers in and concentrates on the characters themselves and their kinships 
with each other, most importantly in that of Gabriel and Mark, and Gabriel 
and Katherine.
The performances from all three leads, as well as many of the supporting 
actors, are well worth noting. Christian Campbell, in his first major film 
role, is perfect as the somewhat shy Gabriel, who doesn't have much 
experience with love, romance, and sex yet, but knows it when he sees it. 
Campbell fills the requirements of the role probably better than anyone else 
could, because he has this sort of dimpled baby-face that you instantly 
accept and believe as the character he is playing. J.P. Pitoc, as Mark, at 
first appears to only be the "boy of attraction," but is gradually revealed 
throughout to have many complex, human layers under his exterior appearance. 
As Gabriel's roommate's girlfriend, Lorri Bagley is hilarious. With her high, 
flaky voice, Bagley has one scene in which she unsuccessfully plays 
psychologist to the feuding Gabriel and Mark, based on a misunderstanding, 
and it turns into a centerpiece of comic brilliance. And Clinton Leupp steals 
the few scenes he has as the draq queen, Miss Coco Peru, striking a major 
resemblance to Katherine, who has words of wisdom to share with Gabriel while 
in a club bathroom, if only he can finish what he has to say before the next 
person in line outside bangs the restroom door down! 
Finally, who would have ever thought that Tori Spelling (of "90210" fame) was 
such a talented actress? Spelling is outstanding as the talkative Katherine, 
showing off her surprising gift for comedy (as in the scene where she 
inauspiciously performs the song-and-dance number, "Enter, You," in front of 
a stone-faced audience), as well as fully developing her character beyond 
two-dimensional status. Katherine could have easily been a throwaway role, 
but screenwriter Jason Schafer does something that was definitely the right 
choice; Spelling's last scene is one of unexpected poignancy and truth, in 
which we really get to know and sympathize with Katherine, a young woman who 
briefly dated Gabriel in high school before he knew he was gay, and still has 
deep feeling for him even though she knows they can never be anything more 
than best friends. We've seen this sort of character and conflict before, 
sure, but it rarely has ever been this effectively and gently done. I can now 
say, without any sort of regret or embarrassment, that I like Tori Spelling 
as an actress, and anticipate the days when she can once and for all break 
free of "Beverly Hills, 90210" and concentrate on her promising film career.
Helped along by dreamy, flattering cinematography of NYC, by Terry Stacey, 
and a sunny, '40s-style music score by David Friedman, "Trick" is the type of 
absolutely winning romantic comedy that the recent disappointing Julia 
Roberts-Richard Gere box-office hit, "Runaway Bride," only dreams of being. 
You want an unabashed, believable, stirring romantic scene with nothing more 
than a simple kiss that says it all, then look no further than the excellent 
last scene of this film, and leave "Runaway Bride" at the altar where it 
belongs. Plain and simple, the film is an idealistic fairy tale about 
something that most people constantly pine for from afar, in which you find 
love where you least expect it. A "Trick," indeed, but also a veritable 
treat. 
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman.
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for My American Cousin (1985)
The winner of six 1985 Genie Awards (the Canadian equivalent of the Oscars), 
director Sandy Wilson's "My American Cousin" is a nostalgic, delicately-paced 
drama that plays exactly as if it were a memoir of the central character, 
many years down the road. Light on a so-called plot, but heavy on character 
observation, the film works a gentle spell around its viewer, and ends up 
leaving an unexpected lasting impression.
Set in a peaceful Canadian ranch town in the summer of 1959, a time when rock 
'n' roll music was still looked upon as a nasty racket by many, we first meet 
Sandy Wilcox (Margaret Langrick) writing in her journal before bed, in big 
letters, "NOTHING HAPPENS HERE!" Right on the verge of becoming a teenager, 
Sandy yearns to not be treated like a child, and is starting to grow 
interested in the opposite sex. This interest is only further carried along 
by the appearance of her 17-year-old American cousin, Butch (John Wildman), a 
suave, captivating young man who, with his hair slicked perfectly the way he 
likes it, has obviously seen James Dean in "Rebel Without a Cause" one too 
many times. Driving up to the Wilcox's home late at night in his extravagant 
cherry red convertible, Butch tells Sandy's parents (Richard Donat, Jane 
Mortifee) that he is up on vacation for a while, and is welcomed to stay with 
them. Sandy is immediately taken aback by Butch, and gains her first crush, 
but when Butch finds out that she's only 12-years-old ("I can't believe I'm 
talking to a little kid"), he doesn't seem to return the feeling.
This is the basic setup for "My American Cousin," and there isn't too much 
more to say about the story. Although there are a few discoveries about Butch 
towards the conclusion, the film isn't concerned about such petty things, 
instead choosing to wisely follow Sandy through the summer, as she grows up a 
little along the way. To be sure, not exactly groundbreaking material, but 
not too many films have been able to capture the innocence and sweetness of 
being 12, when you're too old for childish play, and too young to do much 
else. The film captures this age so marvelously and accurately, from the 
arguments that Sandy often gets into with her mother, whom she feels doesn't 
understand her, to her precociousness and naivety. In one scene, she 
complains that her life and the scenery is absolutely boring (although with 
the mountains, lakes, and endless countryside, it is obviously very much 
gorgeous), and it is only until the ending that she realizes she should have 
enjoyed the final bit of her childhood while it lasted.
In her motion picture debut, Margaret Langrick is a radiant presence to 
behold (and deservedly won the Genie Award for Best Leading Actress). Both 
unaffected and polished, Langrick gives won of the best performances (of that 
age range) I've seen, and she also has a natural comic ability, gaining 
several laughs just from her on-the-mark mannerisms and facial expressions. 
In the other role at the forefront is John Wildman, who is very appropriate 
for the role. Certainly the more underwritten of the two, Butch is 
nonetheless portrayed as a realistic 17-year-old, concerned with very little 
but girls and embarrassed when he is coaxed into giving Sandy and her three 
giggly friends a ride in his car. In their sequences together, Langrick and 
Wildman form a charismatic rapport that develops with ease and delight.
The inevitable parting of Sandy and Butch is also portrayed truthfully, 
without a sign of manipulation in sight. To be vague and not give anything 
away, Sandy and Butch do not say goodbye as we always see in movies, but go 
their separate ways as it happens in real life. Fans of syrupy, heavy drama 
may be displeased by the film's ending, but those that prefer realism will be 
utterly satisfied.
With entertaining '50s songs filling the soundtrack, writer-director Sandy 
Wilson, previously a documentary filmmaker, has created a definite time and 
place, and knows how to write genuine, unforced dialogue. "My American 
Cousin," I wouldn't doubt, is a personal film for Wilson, perhaps even 
autobiographical, as it never strays from its deft, subtle path in order to 
create big, flashy plot occurrences. It's as it should be, and nothing more.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Three to Tango (1999)
Directed by Damon Santostefano.
Cast: Matthew Perry, Neve Campbell, Oliver Platt, Dylan McDermott, Cylk 
Cozart, Kelly Rowan.
1999 - 92 minutes
Rated PG-13 (from profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, October 23, 1999.
"Three to Tango" stars Matthew Perry (TV's "Friends"), Neve Campbell (TV's 
"Party of Five"), and Dylan McDermott (TV's "The Practice"). I do not mention 
the fact that they are all currently starring on television series' to demean 
or criticize their acting abilities, but I mention it because their casting 
seems rather appropriate. There's no way "big" movie stars would have agreed 
to make "Three to Tango" because it is inauspiciously written by Rodney 
Vaccaro and Aline Brosh McKenna on a strictly television sitcom level, and 
rarely ever feels like a feature film. 
Tellingly, the movie is stretched so thinly and told in such a 
paint-by-numbers way that there is very little interest that evolves within 
the story, and the only relationship that is able to develop satisfactorily 
is that between Oscar Novack (Matthew Perry), a Chicago architect, and Amy 
Post (Neve Campbell), a prospering artist. They come together and become 
close friends after Oscar, believed to be gay after a misunderstanding 
involving his gay partner, Peter Steinberg (Oliver Platt), is hired by 
multimillionaire business magnate Charles Newman (Dylan McDermott) to keep an 
eye on his beautiful mistress, who happens to be Amy. Hitting it off at one 
of her gallery openings, followed by an adventurous evening in which their 
cab literally blows up and they get sick and throw up from eating tuna melts 
at a low-rent dive, Oscar instantly has fallen in love, and Amy likewise has 
feelings for him. Unfortunately, once the false news spreads around the area 
that Oscar is gay after his picture is plastered on the front page of the 
newspaper, he finds himself having to play up the rumor so he doesn't 
jeopardize his job or Amy's friendship.
Amidst a handful of charming little scenes and an absolutely winning 
performance from Neve Campbell that proves she's more than just a television 
actress, "Three to Tango" is a terminally empty-headed romantic comedy, and 
most of the blame should not be put on the actors (aside from Dylan 
McDermott, who is thoroughly unappealing), but on the dumb screenplay and 
flat direction, by Damon Santostefano (whose only previous film credit is 
1992's "Severed Ties"). Clocking in at just over 90 minutes, the film's 
aspirations are disjointed and very little of the mistaken identity plotline 
is successful. Moreover, its treatment of gays is, at times, surprisingly 
thoughtful, as with the subplot involving Amy's ex-boyfriend (Cylk Cozart) 
who has just recently come out, and other times it is simply offensive. The 
reaction of Oscar's father when he finds out he's "gay" is certainly the 
film's major low point.
Matthew Perry is perfectly fine in his good-guy role as Oscar, but he is 
pretty much playing his character of Chandler on "Friends." However, Neve 
Campbell abandons her sullen, problems-ridden Julia Salinger character from 
"Party of Five," and makes Amy a fun-loving, intelligent gal--the exact type 
you'd like to root for in a film of this genre. Campbell lights up the 
screen, and almost single-handedly steals the picture from everything and 
everyone else involved.
By the time the heartfelt climax and hugely predictable conclusion occur, 
you're left with a malnourished appetite, as you've been 
waiting--praying--for something of note to happen when nothing ever does. 
Oscar, being presented the award as Gay Man of the Year (is there seriously 
such a thing?), "comes out" to everyone, in reverse, letting the guests know 
that he isn't actually gay. Standing up for what he believes in and 
professing his deep love and admiration for Amy, his speech (the type that 
only occur in movies) sends off a warm applause from the audience before him. 
Why is this annoying cliche used in so many films, since it so obviously 
doesn't resemble reality or human nature at all? Accordingly, there are no 
twists, no unforeseen developments, and the ending does not make the most of 
its romantic intentions, even if we like Amy and Oscar, which I did.   
For no known reason, more of the running time is padded out by the opening 
and ending credits, which feature people dancing to swing music. How exactly 
does swing music factor in to anything else in the film, anyway? I'd almost 
bet money that no one involved could give me a plausible answer. When all is 
said and done, "Three to Tango" is like a loaf of stale bread. From afar, it 
may look fresh and mildly engaging, but get closer, and its appeal sours.

Title
Review for Stir of Echoes (1999)
Directed by David Koepp.
Cast: Kevin Bacon, Kathryn Erbe, Zachary David Cope, Illeana Douglas, Jenny 
Morrison, Kevin Dunn, Liza Weil.
1999 - 99 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, sex, and an attempted rape).
Reviewed September 11, 1999.
It's terribly unfortunate that "Stir of Echoes," tautly written and directed 
by David Koepp (who made one of 1996's unsung treasures, "The Trigger 
Effect"), should be released little more than a month after "The Sixth 
Sense," which is still going strong at the box office. These two films are 
undoubtedly going to be compared (judging from practically all of my fellow 
audience members last night), and although they have eerily similar 
storylines, "Stir of Echoes" is more of a straightforward psychological 
horror film, while "The Sixth Sense" is closer to a psychological drama. 
Additionally, while "The Sixth Sense" had a shocker of an ending that 
undoubtedly has been one of the major factors in its recent repeat business, 
"Stir of Echoes" is more conventional and predictable in its final twist. And 
where "The Sixth Sense" was disturbing, "Stir of Echoes" is just plain scary. 
I have a feeling most viewers are going to come away unimpressed because of 
the unavoidable similarities, and will foolishly forget to judge this film on 
its own respectable merits.
Adapted from a novel by Richard Matheson that was written some forty years 
ago, "Stir of Echoes" opens with a cute six-year-old boy named Jake (Zachary 
David Cope) who is taking a bath. He is speaking directly at the screen, but 
we immediately have a feeling someone else is there. Finally, he asks, "Does 
it hurt to be dead?" Apparently Jake sees the ghosts of dead people, but 
unlike "The Sixth Sense," this young child isn't the focus of the picture. 
Instead, Tom Witzy (Kevin Bacon), a Chicago lineman, is our protagonist. Jake 
is his son, and Maggie (Kathryn Erbe), whom has just discovered she is six 
weeks pregnant, is his hard-working wife. One night while at a party with 
their closest friends, Tom convinces Maggie's New-Age sister, Lisa (Illena 
Douglas), to try and hypnotize him. It unexpectedly works, and before long, 
Tom is seeing things he wouldn't normally see, including a deceased teenage 
girl (Jenny Morrison) in his house who happens to have been missing for the 
last six months. Seeking help from Lisa, she tells him that, while he was 
under hypnosis, she told him that after he awoke, his mind will remain clear 
and free, like an opened door. She didn't expect it to work, but it did, and 
the only way to stop it is for Tom to somehow find a way to help this girl he 
sees.
"Stir of Echoes" isn't a perfect film by any stretch of the imagination, but 
in the thick, atmospheric mood it conjures up, it is a terrifically eerie 
domestic horror-drama, and is not only effective on a technical level, but is 
impressive in its portrayal of a struggling working-class family. Kevin Bacon 
and, especially, Kathryn Erbe (1997's "Dream With the Fishes"), are top-notch 
and exceedingly believable as a loving married couple who nonetheless have 
their fair share of problems. After Tom is hypnotized and starts seeing 
ghastly visions, he is completely taken over by his desire to solve this 
mystery of the disappearing girl whom he has seen lurking in his house, and 
instead of Maggie not being understanding, she instead believes what Tom 
says, and aside from being a little worried by what he is going through, does 
not try to stop his pursuit. Bacon and Erbe are not traditional Hollywood 
stars like Tom Cruise and Julia Roberts, and therefore, are easier to relate 
to and always plausible as a struggling couple who have to work overtime at 
their jobs just to make ends meet.
In a masterfully-done, entrancing sequence, Tom is hypnotized by Lisa, but 
instead of watching him, we instead see what he sees, starting from his view 
as he closes his eyes into darkness. Lisa tells him to visualize being in an 
empty movie theater, and so, we, as audience members, are watching a movie 
screen from inside a theater, which is also showing a movie screen in a 
theater. Telling him to move closer and closer to the screen as a fuzzy word 
in black letters pops up on the screen, we begin to float closer and closer 
to the front of the theater until we see that the word is "sleep." Never 
before have I seen a hypnotism scene as mesmerizing and brilliantly-construed 
as this one. Truthfully, this set-piece, and another in which Tom wakes up 
from a nightmarish dream only to quickly discover he is reliving what he has 
just dreamt, are worth the full price of admission alone, just to see them on 
the big screen.
Having loads of fun with her small role as Maggie's sister, Lisa, Illeana 
Douglas (1995's "To Die For," her last great character) is a delight, but 
rarely used to her full advantage in feature films. Funny and enjoyably 
offbeat, Douglas gets to utter the best line in the film: While talking to 
Maggie about Tom's visions of the girl, she remarks, "I wouldn't be worried 
about him seeing another girl, although the fact that she's dead gives one 
pause." Also of note are Jenny Morrison (1994's "Intersection"), who is truly 
poignant in the last half of the film when we flash back to see what really 
happened to her missing character, and Liza Weil, remarkable in 1998's 
"Whatever," as Morrison's grieving teenage sister, Debbie.
If the resolution of "Stir of Echoes" does not live up to its obviously 
frightful full potential (and it doesn't), what comes before is both 
involving and appropriately gritty. The music score, by James Newton Howard, 
and unsettling use of whispers and ghostly sound effects, successfully 
compliment and foreshadow the off-kilter frame-of-mind that Tom is put into, 
and director David Koepp proves once again that he is a director with a knack 
for creating almost unbearably tense situations that revolve around 
realistically-written characters. "Stir of Echoes" isn't as good as "The 
Sixth Sense," but why should it need to be? Both films are fully capable of 
standing on their own two feet, and "Stir of Echoes" really is a 
spinetinglingly good horror film.
 - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
    NZone Magazine 

Title
Review for Evolution (2001)
Directed by Ivan Reitman.
Cast: David Duchovny, Orlando Jones, Seann William Scott, Julianne Moore, Ted 
Levine, Dan Aykroyd, Ethan Suplee, Michael Ray Bower, Katharine Towne, Sarah 
Silverman.
2001 - 97 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and violence).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, June 8, 2001.
In an attempt to rehash the formula he hit gold with in 1984, director Ivan 
Reitman's "Evolution" plays out like a present-day version of "Ghostbusters," 
replacing ghosts with fast-evolving aliens. While all of the stock characters 
are present, as well as similar plot developments, the film is absent of 
anything remotely witty or original. Tellingly, the jokes fly fast and 
furious throughout, but the number of comedic moments that actually work can 
be counted on one hand. 
The movie opens with slacker Wayne Green (Seann William Scott) out in the 
middle of the Arizona desert practicing for his impending test to become a 
firefighter, when a giant meteor crashes to earth. Hot on the case is college 
professors Ira Kane (David Duchovny) and Harry Block (Orlando Jones), who 
discover that the meteorite has unleashed a number of single-celled alien 
organisms that are growing, and multiplying, at a rapid rate. Before long, 
these gradually growing creatures have begun to take over the sleepy town, 
and if Ira, Harry, and Wayne, with the added help of clumsy Dr. Allison Reed 
(Julianne Moore), don't find a way to stop them, it will mean the extinction 
of mankind within two months.
The idea behind "Evolution"--that of quick-producing aliens irresolutely 
taking over earth--is not a particularly new one ("Gremlins," anyone?), but 
it has enough promise that it's too bad screenwriters David Diamond, David 
Weissman, and Don Jakoby botch the results. Originally conceived as a serious 
sci-fi picture, my guess is once director Reitman came aboard, he had a 
little something to do with its switch in genres.  On the basis of what has 
shown up onscreen, it was the wrong choice. While "Ghostbusters" was able to 
mix scares with laughs, "Evolution" falls flat on both counts, and ends up 
being uninspired.
Reitman has appointed an impressive cast, but all of the actors have done far 
stronger work. In fact, most of the performances leave something to be 
desired. David Duchovny (2000's "Return to Me") toplines the film as Ira 
Kane, a science professor who once worked with the government, and he's a 
genuine bore. In too many of Duchovny's big-screen roles, he is a 
good-looking face vacant of a personality. Seann William Scott (2000's "Dude, 
Where's My Car?") repeats the same type of character he has played in every 
movie on his resume (including 1999's "American Pie"), and does little else. 
And Julianne Moore (2001's "Hannibal") is woefully misused as Dr. Allison 
Reed, a cute klutz whose main character trait is that she falls down and runs 
into doors a lot. Moore is so much better than what this weak material 
provides. Only Orlando Jones (2001's "Say It Isn't So") stands out as Harry 
Block, who knows very well when things get dangerous that black men are the 
first to go in these situations. Jones is a comic delight, and his appearance 
is superior to anything else here.
"Evolution" isn't a total washout, but it is an overall waste of time. There 
is nothing offered that hasn't been done better in other movies, and at 97 
minutes (including credits), it's over just as its momentum has begun to 
build. Not helping matters is that the entire first half is slow and 
generally monotonous, as tension escalates--to nothing. Reitman may have 
wanted to make a "Ghostbusters" for the new millennium, but what he has done 
with "Evolution," instead, is made a low-rent version of "Men in Black."
   - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
     http://us.imdb.com/reviewsby?Dustin+Putman
http://www.all-reviews.com/reviewers/dustinputman.htm
http://www.atnzone.com
--part1_8c.7d4ae73.2852fb68_boundary

Evolution * * (out of * * * * )

Directed by Ivan Reitman.
Cast: David Duchovny, Orlando Jones, Seann William Scott, Julianne Moore, Ted 
Levine, Dan Aykroyd, Ethan Suplee, Michael Ray Bower, Katharine Towne, Sarah 
Silverman.
2001 - 97 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and violence).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, June 8, 2001.

In an attempt to rehash the formula he hit gold with in 1984, director Ivan 
Reitman's "Evolution" plays out like a present-day version of "Ghostbusters," 
replacing ghosts with fast-evolving aliens. While all of the stock characters 
are present, as well as similar plot developments, the film is absent of 
anything remotely witty or original. Tellingly, the jokes fly fast and 
furious throughout, but the number of comedic moments that actually work can 
be counted on one hand. 

The movie opens with slacker Wayne Green (Seann William Scott) out in the 
middle of the Arizona desert practicing for his impending test to become a 
firefighter, when a giant meteor crashes to earth. Hot on the case is college 
professors Ira Kane (David Duchovny) and Harry Block (Orlando Jones), who 
discover that the meteorite has unleashed a number of single-celled alien 
organisms that are growing, and multiplying, at a rapid rate. Before long, 
these gradually growing creatures have begun to take over the sleepy town, 
and if Ira, Harry, and Wayne, with the added help of clumsy Dr. Allison Reed 
(Julianne Moore), don't find a way to stop them, it will mean the extinction 
of mankind within two months.

The idea behind "Evolution"--that of quick-producing aliens irresolutely 
taking over earth--is not a particularly new one ("Gremlins," anyone?), but 
it has enough promise that it's too bad screenwriters David Diamond, David 
Weissman, and Don Jakoby botch the results. Originally conceived as a serious 
sci-fi picture, my guess is once director Reitman came aboard, he had a 
little something to do with its switch in genres. On the basis of what has 
shown up onscreen, it was the wrong choice. While "Ghostbusters" was able to 
mix scares with laughs, "Evolution" falls flat on both counts, and ends up 
being uninspired.

Reitman has appointed an impressive cast, but all of the actors have done far 
stronger work. In fact, most of the performances leave something to be 
desired. David Duchovny (2000's "Return to Me") toplines the film as Ira 
Kane, a science professor who once worked with the government, and he's a 
genuine bore. In too many of Duchovny's big-screen roles, he is a 
good-looking face vacant of a personality. Seann William Scott (2000's "Dude, 
Where's My Car?") repeats the same type of character he has played in every 
movie on his resume (including 1999's "American Pie"), and does little else. 
And Julianne Moore (2001's "Hannibal") is woefully misused as Dr. Allison 
Reed, a cute klutz whose main character trait is that she falls down and runs 
into doors a lot. Moore is so much better than what this weak material 
provides. Only Orlando Jones (2001's "Say It Isn't So") stands out as Harry 
Block, who knows very well when things get dangerous that black men are the 
first to go in these situations. Jones is a comic delight, and his appearance 
is superior to anything else here.

"Evolution" isn't a total washout, but it is an overall waste of time. There 
is nothing offered that hasn't been done better in other movies, and at 97 
minutes (including credits), it's over just as its momentum has begun to 
build. Not helping matters is that the entire first half is slow and 
generally monotonous, as tension escalates--to nothing. Reitman may have 
wanted to make a "Ghostbusters" for the new millennium, but what he has done 
with "Evolution," instead, is made a low-rent version of "Men in Black."

 - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
 http://us.imdb.com/reviewsby?Dustin+Putman
 http://www.all-reviews.com/reviewers/dustinputman.htm
 http://www.atnzone.com



--part1_8c.7d4ae73.2852fb68_boundary--

Title
Review for Stuart Little (1999)
Directed by Rob Minkoff.
Cast: Geena Davis, Hugh Laurie, Jonathan Lipnicki, Jeffrey Jones, Connie Ray, 
Allyce Beasley, Brian Doyle-Murray, Estelle Getty, Julia Sweeney, Dabney 
Coleman, Harry Gould, Patrick O'Brien.
Voices: Michael J. Fox, Nathan Lane, Chazz Palminteri, Jennifer Tilly, Stan 
Freberg, Steve Zahn, Jim Doughan, David Alan Grier, Bruno Kirby.
1999 - 85 minutes
Rated PG (for the life of me, I have no idea why).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, December 17, 1999.
Based on the charming children's book by E.B. White, "Stuart Little" is one 
of the most joyless family films in a long time. Not the most annoying, or 
the most sloppy, or even the most problematic, but simply joyless in every 
aspect, from its acting to its storytelling to its screenplay. You sit there, 
watching aimlessly at the screen, and can't help but recall far superior 
films that were very similar in their approach (1993's "Homeward Bound: The 
Incredible Journey" comes to mind), but at least had a little substance to 
their characters and situations. The movie clocks in at a swift 85 
minutes--thank goodness for small favors, but I wish the favor had been 
bigger (not that I'm greedy or anything).
For reasons unknown, unless they are suffering from some sort of mental or 
psychological disorder, Mr. and Mrs. Little (Hugh Laurie, Geena Davis) visit 
an orphanage one day and decide out of the blue that they'd rather adopt 
Stuart, the sweet orphan mouse (voiced by Michael J. Fox), in place of a 
human child. The Little's young son George (Jonathan Lipnicki) is, at first, 
disappointed in his new brother, but finally becomes close friends with him 
until he learns it doesn't matter what species something is, as long as you 
love them and they love you. Before I go any further, let me take this time 
to make an aside:
[Since Mr. and Mrs. Little, no doubt, grew up in the '60s and early '70s, it 
makes perfect sense that they, perhaps, experimented with a few too many 
mind-altering substances in the past.]
The plot thickens when the house cat Snowbell (voiced by Nathan Lane) becomes 
jealous of Stuart, a lower life form, being treated as a family member, while 
he is looked upon as nothing more than a pet. With the help of a group of 
stray cats in the Manhattan area, Snowbell devises a plan to hire two other 
mice to pose as Stuart's long-lost parents so Stuart will have to part with 
the Little's, and he can once again garner all the attention.
If my criticism about Mr. and Mrs. Little seems overly harsh, particularly 
for a family film, let me also say that there is no excuse for "Stuart 
Little" to be as hopelessly banal and empty-headed as it is. My nitpicking 
about the parent characters is (1) due to the obvious idiocy of the 
screenplay, by M. Night Shyamalan (of "The Sixth Sense" fame!) and Greg 
Booker; and (2) results from the boredom that the picture provides. The 
writing, surprisingly, does not offer one witty line in its whole running 
time, and I believe I lightly, and briefly, laughed once. Don't ask me what 
it was I laughed at; I only recollect doing it.
Some might argue that certain movies are for children and no one else, but I, 
nonetheless, firmly stick behind my theory that the only really worthwhile 
"family films" are those that the entire family will enjoy and be satisfied 
with. Why else do you think "The Wizard of Oz" and "Willy Wonka and the 
Chocolate Factory" are classics, and why else will "Stuart Little" be 
destined to join the endless line of ho-hum garbage that litters the video 
store shelves? The aforementioned "Homeward Bound," and even 1995's "Babe," 
which also took the idea of presenting animal characters that could talk, 
were successful because they had a heart and a mind to go along with the 
children-targeted stuff. In other words, the makers of those films did not 
hold their audiences in contempt, spitting out half-baked ideas that couldn't 
have even looked good on paper. With "Stuart Little," that is what you get. 
There's no need to mention any of the actors that were unfortunate enough to 
find themselves trapped in this dead zone of entertainment, but I will 
pinpoint the top-billed thesp, and take this time to speak to her directly: 
Geena, honey, in 1989, when you won that Academy Award for "The Accidental 
Tourist," could you have possibly predicted that ten years later you would be 
the host of a disastrous Oscar Pre-Show, and the star of a movie called 
"Stuart Little?" And in 1991, when you came out with the superb road movie, 
"Thelma and Louise," did you really have 1995's godawful "Cutthroat Island" 
on your career plan? For someone who only works once or twice every two 
years, you sure don't know how to choose projects, do you? Maybe it is not 
Mrs. Little, but you yourself that took the drugs in the '60s or '70s. LSD 
has been known to have side effects many years down the road, so it is quite 
feasible.
Smaller kids may enjoy "Stuart Little," but I can't imagine anyone else 
coming away from this film happy. While only loosely based on E.B. White's 
book, perhaps director Rob Minkoff should have chosen to adapt White's more 
personal and sweet "Charlotte's Web" into a live-action movie. On second 
thought, maybe not. With the subpar level of filmmaking displayed here, they 
would have easily found some way to turn "Charlotte's Web" into a figurative 
train wreck, too.

Title
Review for Blue Velvet (1986)
Directed by David Lynch.
Cast: Kyle MacLachlan, Laura Dern, Isabella Rossellini, Dennis Hopper, 
Hope Lange, Dean Stockwell, Jack Nance, Brad Dourif, Frances Bay.
1986 - 120 minutes.
Rated R (for violence, profanity, nudity, and sex).
Reviewed September 1998.
David Lynch's "Blue Velvet" was one of the most influential films of the 
1980's, and arguably jump-started the idea of independent filmmaking. 
But aside from that, it is also one of the most original, invigorating 
films I've ever seen.
In a tour de force opening sequence, which has been widely praised, 
brightly-lit, picture-perfect clips are shown of a small town: a man 
watering his green lawn, a milkman waving as his truck drives by, 
flowers blooming beside a picket fence...and then the happiness of the 
scene vanishes as the man watering his lawn collapses on the ground, and 
the camera slowly burrows down through the glass until it comes upon a 
mound of bugs, symbolizing the dark secrets buried in the seemingly 
perfect town.
The film then switches to a college student (Kyle MacLachlan) returning 
to his hometown of Lumberton to stay for awhile and visit his father in 
the hospital. While walking through a field, he spots a human ear lying 
on the ground, which leads to him meeting up with the town's sheriff's 
teenage daughter (Laura Dern), and convincing her to help him out to 
solve the mystery of the ear, which involves a nightclub singer 
(Isabella Rossellini), murder, and a sadistic kidnapper/drug dealer 
(Dennis Hopper).
One of the many pleasures of "Blue Velvet" is watching this 
multi-layered, intricate mystery unravel and develop, and it would be 
criminal to give anything else away. It is completely unpredictable, and 
the characters, just like the plot, are true originals. MacLachlan is a 
perfect center for the movie, Rossellini is superb as the tortured 
singer, Hopper is very, very creepy as the kidnapper, and Dern is 
outstanding, giving one of her best performances to date, and bringing 
much depth to her role, as well as her sweet, tender relationship with 
MacLachlan.
"Blue Velvet" also involves a masterstroke of style and atmosphere. 
Lynch wonderfully gives the movie a film noir feel, but it also has a 
small-town, postcard essence, which mixes together brilliantly to create 
a look and feel never before seen on film. 
The opening scene, as already noted, is flawlessly realized, and is a 
perfect contrast to the darker elements of the story, and town. It is 
also a picture that could not be placed in a specific era. Some elements 
are right out of the 1950's, but it could also very well be set in the 80's.
The same thing goes for its location. The town is called Lumberton, but it
pretty much is set in 
Anywhere, U.S.A.
There is no doubt that "Blue Velvet" contains many disturbing moments, 
and much of it involves sadomasochistic behavior, sex, degradation, and 
elements of an even darker nature. But it is at this level that "Blue 
Velvet" succeeds in becoming a true masterpiece in all senses of the 
word, because these terrible things occur in this quiet, peaceful little 
town, which harkens back to the opening of the film. It makes the point 
that no town, no matter what, is perfect, because there will always be 
something dark hiding right behind the surface, and it is called human 
nature. 
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Rage: Carrie 2, The (1999)
Directed by Katt Shea.
Cast: Emily Bergl, Jason London, Amy Irving, Zachery Ty Bryan, Dylan 
Bruno, J. Smith-Cameron, Rachel Blanchard, Mena Suvari, Elijah Craig.
1999 - 104 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, gore, brief nudity, and sexual 
situations).
Reviewed March 14, 1999.
In 1976, director Brian De Palma released "Carrie," based on the novel 
by Stephen King, which went on to be nominated for two Academy Awards 
(Sissy Spacek for Best Actress and Piper Laurie for Supporting Actress, 
respectively) and is now considered a horror classic, with almost 
everyone familiar with the shocking and surprisingly touching climax set 
at the senior prom. Twenty-three years later, a sequel seems pretty much 
like a desperate attempt for MGM to make some money, and after seeing 
"The Rage: Carrie 2," that is apparently exactly what the studio's goal 
was, since this low-rent, convoluted follow-up gives the great original 
a bad name.
In a brief prologue, a young girl who has the ability to move objects 
with her mind sees her schizophrenic mother taken away in an ambulance. 
Switch forward to the present-day, that young girl is now 16-year-old 
Rachel (Emily Bergl), a teenage girl who is living with an insensitive 
foster family. Rachel is a tough, strong-willed young woman who stands 
apart from the popular crowd at school, but is not actually made fun of 
or tormented the way that Carrie was in the original, and so we don't 
get to sympathize with the Rachel character in the same way. When 
Rachel's best friends, Lisa (Mena Suvari), excitedly tells her that she 
lost her virginity the night before, Rachel is devastated to discover 
later on that day that Lisa has committed suicide from jumping off the 
school's roof. Developing her late friend's pictures at the photomat she 
works at, Rachel discovers that Lisa had a picture taken with the guy 
whom she had sex with, Eric (Zachery Ty Bryan), one of the school jocks 
who is in a group where those initiated have sex with people and then 
rate them on a points scale in a little notebook. The one guy in the 
group who actually is growing tired of this cruel and juvenile game, 
Jesse (Jason London), starts to have eyes for Rachel, even though she 
initially finds it hard to believe that such a popular guy would be 
interested in her. Meanwhile, the school's guidance counselor, Sue Snell 
(Amy Irving, reprising her character from the original), the sole 
survivor of the town massacre two decades before, begins to recognize 
similarities in Rachel to Carrie, including her obvious power of 
telekinesis, so Sue sets out to find if Rachel is of any relation to 
Carrie. All of this finally leads up to the inevitable horrific climax, 
just like its predecessor, when the mean kids at school plot to play a 
prank on Rachel at a party, which subsequently pushes her over the edge.
The more you think about it, the more "The Rage: Carrie 2" really does 
come off as a shameful ploy to rip off the infinitely superior original, 
as it steals all of the major elements of that film and then attempts to 
put a spin on them, even though all they really are doing is tarneshing 
the memory of the first movie. For the first 85 minutes, the film moves 
at a very, very slow pace that is only a set-up for the climactic 
showdown. Although "Carrie" did the same thing, I was able to sympathize 
a great deal with Carrie, in her fight to be happy amidst constant 
torment from her fellow students (all much more memorably written and 
played by Nancy Allen, John Travolta, P.J. Soles, etc.), as well as her 
religious fanatic mother (Laurie). When the fateful moment finally did 
occur, we watched with horror and sadness as Carrie was humiliated and 
took revenge on everyone there, and the sequence was all the more 
touching, as well as frightening, because we cared about some of the 
innocent people (and, of course, Carrie) in which terrible things were 
happening to.
In "The Rage: Carrie 2," Emily Bergl, making her feature film debut, 
gives just about as strong of a performance as could possibly be 
expected, taking the thankless and underwritten role (even though she's 
the main character) of Rachel and making it her own. Perhaps this fact 
is where the first major problem of the film arises, however, since at 
least a little weakness and vulnerability needed to be shown so that we 
could care more about her. In retrospect, I can't even recall anything 
that terrible that anyone did to her in the movie (aside from at the 
party), and she was certainly not the ultimate class outcast. Because of 
this, when the ending arrived and Rachel takes out revenge on everyone, 
this plot development comes off as more of a gimmick rather than a 
natural occurrence. When Spacek did the same thing in 1976, we could see 
the pain in her eyes and were able to understand why she was doing what 
she doing. It is not Bergl's fault that she does not accomplish this 
same thing, but rather Rafael Moreu's clumsy and uneven screenplay. If 
this aspect of the conclusion doesn't necessarily work, it could have 
come off as exciting nonetheless, but director Katt Shea (1992's "Poison 
Ivy") even botches the technical aspect, and certainly lacks the style 
and overall height of raw terror that director De Palma was able to 
reach. To top it all off, when Rachel finally takes her vengeance, the 
tatoo on her arm wraps all over her body like a vine which, I seriously 
doubt, is a characteristic of a telekinetic person and makes no sense 
whatsoever. If anything, a few of the death set-pieces were admittedly 
original and shocking in its sudden surge of gore, but they also did not 
service the plot in any way.
One of the most irritating things in "The Rage: Carrie 2" is the 
pointless way that the film mixes color and black-and-white. One 
particular scene mid-way through that might have been effective only 
came off as cheesy due to the mindless decision to film certain sections 
in b&w, and because of this, the movie often felt like a direct-to-video 
movie.
Unlike "Carrie," "The Rage: Carrie 2" does an inadequate and 
disappointing job of writing its large cast of characters (many of which 
come off as simply an afterthought) and the story also does not hold 
such close scrutiny. The movie is never the least bit scary or even 
suspenseful, only occasionally bloody. Sure, there were a few 
unintentionally funny elements thrown in for good measure, such as when 
Rachel and Sue visit the school from the original that was burnt down 23 
years before, and the firey remains still have not been cleaned up, but 
this ineptness was only a brief distraction from the lame proceedings. 
In the latest issue of Fangoria magazine, Amy Irving admits that the 
reason she agreed to make this sequel was because they offered her a 
sizable paycheck. At least she's honest.

Title
Review for High Fidelity (2000)
Directed by Stephen Frears.
Cast: John Cusack, Iben Hjejle, Jack Black, Todd Louiso, Joan Cusack, Tim=20
Robbins, Lisa Bonet, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Lili Taylor, Natasha Gregson=20
Wagner, Sara Gilbert, Joelle Carter, Chris Rehmann, Ben Carr.
2000 - 113 minutes
Rated R (for profanity and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, April 1, 2000.
Boyish, commitment-shy thirtysomething Rob Gordon (John Cusack) stares at the
screen and ponders, "Did I listen to pop music because I was miserable, or
was I miserable because I listened to pop music?" And so begins "High
Fidelity," directed by Stephen Frears (1988's "Dangerous Liasons") and based
on the 1995 novel by Nick Hornby (which was set in London; the film in
Chicago). Such a statement might come off as a throwaway one-liner, but
through the course of the picture, it gradually grows to hold far more
substance and truth than expected. An alternately insightful and uneasily
thin-skinned look at relationships and true love, "High Fidelity" appears as
if half the film was written by a screenwriter full of talent and
intelligence, while the other scenes sprinkled throughout were penned by a
hack who has never been in a relationship, or doesn't care to bring such
veracity to the screen, just as long as he or she is receiving a sizable
paycheck.
Rob, who has owned a vintage record store called Championship Vinyl for
several years, has been through more romances with women than he cares to
count, but no matter what, something always seems to get in the way of things
working out. Rob is clueless as to what the problem might be, but he grows
increasingly curious when his most recent long-time girlfriend, Laura (Iben
Hjejle), leaves him and moves in with a womanizing hippie named Ian (Tim
Robbins). Rob speaks directly to the screen for a large portion of its
running time, and he triumphantly concludes when Laura leaves that she didn't
even make his Top 5 Break-Ups List. Everything is a Top 5 List for Rob and
his two coworkers, the surly, robustly sarcastic Barry (Jack Black), and the
introverted, lonely Dick (Todd Louiso), and Rob sulks in his latest loss
while he has flashbacks of his ex-flames from the past (including Catherine
Zeta-Jones, Lili Taylor, and Joelle Carter). Through it all, Rob is
determined to find out why fate has lent him such a discouraging romantic
hand in life, until the moment when he inevitably discovers it has nothing to
do with fate, and everything to do with himself. Oh, and he grudgingly must
finally admit that Laura does, in fact, make his Top 5 List on the most
painful break-ups.
Written by John Cusack, D.V. DeVincentis, and Steve Pink (the same team who
brought us 1997's "Grosse Pointe Blank"), "High Fidelity" holds the same
basic unevenness and dissatisfaction as their previous endeavor, despite
clearly knowing how to write fresh dialogue. The problem with their
screenplay is not in its details, but in its outline, which may hold a few
perceptive ideas, but is brought down by its overall feelings of deja vu in
the plot department, as well as in its severe mishandling of the wide array
of characters.
Arriving on the film's second, and most notable, quandary, "High Fidelity"
has been cast, for no apparent reason, almost top to bottom with familiar
faces and stars, and then chooses to do nothing with them. Had the
inconsequential supporting roles been filled by relative unknowns, this whole
predicament might have been solved, but when a film completely wastes the
talent of such exuberant actors, one must put blame on (1) the director, in
this case Stephen Frears; (2) the sloppy, often aimless screenplay; and (3)
the film as a whole, because you simply can't believe a movie would include
Catherine Zeta-Jones, Lili Taylor, Tim Robbins, Joan Cusack, Lisa Bonet, Sara
Gilbert, and Natasha Gregson Wagner, among others, only to throw them into
the bedroom corner, left to hang out with the dust bunnies. The major cutting
of particular characters, with the considerable rewriting of the rest of
them, would have benefitted this film significantly, making the whole
undertaking seem far more satisfying and not such a missed opportunity.
In a role he was born to play, John Cusack fully embodies the heart, soul,
and skin of Rob Gordon. Cusack, of the puppy-dog-eyes ilk, believably
exhibits Rob's oscillating desperation, his passion of music, his childish
bravado. What the film fails to do, however, no fault of Cusack's
performance, is get us to care about Rob as a person, or become involved in
his lovelorn plight. Without his complete likability, which the picture
relies vitally on to be successful, the much-needed rooting interest factor
of the story is nonexistent.
Iben Hjejle, a Danish actress making her U.S. film debut here, equips herself
with a dead-ringer American accent, and is, overall, very good, easily more
effective than most foreign actors who give America a try, and fail (Virginie
Ledoyen, of "The Beach," anyone?). Hjejle handles several subtle sequences in
the latter half with impressionable aplomb and realism, especially one near
the end in which Rob does something she never thought he would do. It must be
noted, however, how odd it is that the one major female role has gone to a
basic unknown, while the bigger stars are left hanging from the rafters--or,
for film review purists, still playing with the dust bunnies in the corner.
Finally, the only other major roles have been handed to the marvelously funny
Jack Black, and Todd Louiso, who, coincidentally, is more likable than Rob,
and whose potentially warm-hearted subplot in which he unexpectedly romances
a pretty, young customer named Anaugh (Sara Gilbert) is almost completely
disregarded. As for the rest of the ill-fated cast, Catherine Zeta-Jones is
entertaining, yet painfully shallow as Break-Up #3, the gorgeous Charlie
Nicholson, who, Rob says, "was way out of my league." Lili Taylor, as
Break-Up #4, the unlucky-in-love, desperate Sarah, might have been able to
add some poignancy to the proceedings, had her one big scene been written
with more care, rather than have been the rush job that it disappointingly
is. Lisa Bonet is surprisingly good as alluring club singer Marie DeSalle,
whom Rob has a one-time affair with after Laura moves out, but she exits the
picture too soon. Joan Cusack, as Rob and Laura's friend, Liz, offers the
same lightness of being that she always is able to bring to a film, but has
nothing to do, while the less said about Tim Robbins' embarrassing cameo, the
better. Finally, Natasha Gregson Wagner is truly fetching as Caroline, who
shows up late in the picture as a music columnist for a Chicago-based
magazine who briefly catches Rob's fancy. Wagner shows such promising signs,
in fact, that it was a shame to see her be slighted, like everyone else, with
a criminally underwritten character.
Since "High Fidelity" has just as much to do with music as it does with love,
it has been inhabited from the first scene to the last with familiar, and
not-so-familiar, tunes that span at least three or four decades.
Unfortunately, so much care has been contributed to the soundtrack that
director Frears has forgotten about the importance of the film itself. By the
conclusion, Rob has learned a great deal about himself, and about his
character flaws, to the point where he finally is able to assuredly enter
into a relationship with maturity and recently obtained wisdom. It's too bad
Frears didn't understand the title better; this film desperately needed
higher fidelity to be a movie worth seeing.

Title
Review for Heartbreakers (2001)
Author: FilmFan16@aol.com (Dustin Putman)
Approved: graham@ee.washington.edu
Newsgroups: rec.arts.movies.reviews
Organization: None
X-Questions-to: graham@jetcity.com
X-Submissions-to: graham@ee.washington.edu
Followup-To: rec.arts.movies.current-films
Summary: r.a.m.r. #28086
Keywords: author=putman
Subject: Review: Heartbreakers (2001)
Directed by David Mirkin.
Cast: Sigourney Weaver, Jennifer Love Hewitt, Gene Hackman, Jason Lee, Ray 
Liotta, Anne Bancroft, Nora Dunn, Jeffrey Jones, Sarah Silverman.
2001 - 123 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and sexual innuendo).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, March 28, 2001.
In a time when the only comedies that seem to be made are of the raunchy, 
Farrelly-esque variety, a funny, sophisticated one is quite rare these days. 
But "Heartbreakers," smartly directed by David Mirkin (1997's "Romy and 
Michele's High School Reunion"), is just that. A movie that does not wallow 
in bathroom or scatological humor, it is involving, biting, heartwarming in a 
refreshingly non-cloying way, and occasionally riotous.
Max (Sigourney Weaver) and Paige (Jennifer Love Hewitt) are a mother and 
daughter con-artist team who scam for Max to marry wealthy, unsuspecting men, 
only for Paige to seduce them in front of her, leading to a swift divorce and 
much cash flow. When their latest conquest seemingly goes off without a 
hitch, they head to Palm Beach, Florida for one last big score before Paige 
goes off on her own. They quickly set their sights on the richest man they 
can find, in the form of multimillionaire tobacco tycoon William Tensy (Gene 
Hackman). Tensy is repulsive, with cancer spots on his forehead, yellowed, 
rotting teeth, and a constant cigarette in his mouth. Max, posing as a 
beautiful Russian immigrant named Olga, bewitches him, all the while Paige 
gets a job as his new housekeeper, setting into play the type of scam that 
they are pros at. Things, however, do not go as planned for the relational, 
naturally bickering duo, threatening to expose their criminal acts.
Reminiscent of a female version of 1988's "Dirty Rotten Scoundrels," mixed 
with a comedic redux of 1990's dramatic "The Grifters," "Heartbreakers" is a 
hugely successful entertainment that plays out its story in a surprisingly 
unrushed manner that leaves the film running just over two hours (especially 
long for a comedy), but does not grow tedious once. Instead, its length aids 
in adding depth to both the characters and the different relationships, 
particularly that of the central figures, Max and Paige. A mother-daughter 
who do not always get along, but respect and stand up for one another when it 
counts, their interactions and dynamic are dead-on realistic. Best of all, 
despite some not-so-admirable things that they do throughout, Max and Paige 
remain likable and accessible to the audience. This is key in getting the 
movie to work; two nasty, annoying women would get old very fast.
As the alluring, sexy Max and the equally sultry Paige, Sigourney Weaver 
(1999's "A Map of the World") and Jennifer Love Hewitt (1998's "I Still Know 
What You Did Last Summer") have never, or rarely, been better. At 53, Weaver 
is not only physically stunning and gorgeous, but really proves to have a 
knack for the comedy genre. Her Max is an outwardly self-assured, inwardly 
insecure siren who fears the day when the only consistent person in her life, 
Paige, is gone. Their bond is obviously close, even when they argue, and in a 
life when they intentionally train themselves to stay at arm's length from 
caring about others, Paige is the only one whom Max is allowed to love. 
Holding up her half of the story just as well, Jennifer Love Hewitt has 
finally thrown her squeaky-clean, "teen" movie image out the window, acting 
as a young adult for the first time in a movie that has not a doe-eyed high 
school senior pining for her, or a hook-wielding fisherman out to kill her, 
in sight. Hewitt has surrounded herself with top-flight talent here, in a 
film that gives her ample opportunity to test out her acting chops, and she 
succeeds every step of the way.
While Max sets into motion the scam involving Tensy, Paige, out to prove to 
herself that she isn't still an amateur, targets handsome, single bartender 
Jack (Jason Lee), whose bar he owns himself is worth upwards of $3-million. 
With Jack irresistibly drawn to the sometimes difficult Paige, she grows 
scared when she finds herself guilty of doing the one thing con artists are 
never supposed to do: start to truly care about the person they are playing. 
The offbeat romance that blossoms between Paige and Jack is unforced and 
subtle, and its payoff is one of surprising emotional depth. A climactic 
sequence between the two is especially touching and well-played by both 
Hewitt and the appealing Jason Lee (1998's "Chasing Amy").
On the other hand, Max is faced with a moral dilemma that she isn't sure how 
to deal with. Realizing that Paige may very well be falling for Jack, Max 
questions whether or not she should continue to lead her daughter into a life 
of crime, or get out while there is still time to make something better for 
each of their lives. These thoughts are put into play even more when her 
previous husband, Dean (Ray Liotta), whom she conned and actually felt guilty 
about because of her own attraction to him, comes looking for her. Dean knows 
that Max swindled him out of money, but he still can't help but half-like 
her, and he's not giving up without a fight. Ray Liotta (2001's "Hannibal") 
gets another meaty role here in a picture that is graced with a superb 
ensemble cast.
It is Gene Hackman (1998's "Enemy of the State"), however, who steals the 
show. As the repugnant, if not bad guy, Tensy, Hackman hacks and coughs his 
way through a scene-stealing part that deserves Oscar consideration come next 
year. Never has Hackman been so outrageously funny, as Tensy's outlook is 
that smoking is something to be proud of, something that children should be 
started on at a very young age, and something that turns him on like nothing 
else. One of the great moments comes when Tensy proclaims, "There is nothing 
more attractive than a heavy stream of smoke billowing proudly out of a 
woman's fiery, enflared nostrils." "That image," replies Max, "will haunt me 
forever."
Max and Paige may be in an illegal profession that asks them to be cold and 
generally emotionless, but "Heartbreakers" manages to be neither of these 
things. There are enough nuances and energy in each of the actors' 
performances, and enough humanity in the screenplay, by Robert Dunn, Paul 
Guay, and Stephen Mazur, to ensure that the movie will leave you liking the 
people you've me, and feeling good. And despite one misstep in the final 
scene that almost contradicts what I thought the meaning of the film was, 
"Heartbreakers" is a sparkling comedy. It is one of the best films, thus far, 
in a year that seems to be short on quality filmmaking.
    - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
      http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman
http://www.atnzone.com

Title
Review for In Dreams (1999)
Directed by Neil Jordan.
Cast: Annette Bening, Aidan Quinn, Robert Downey Jr., Stephen Rea, Paul 
Guilfoyle, Katie Sagona, Margo Martindale.
1999 - 103 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, and sexual situations).
Reviewed January 20, 1999.
Every great once in a while, a mainstream, big-budget studio picture 
will come along and miraculously restore your faith in Hollywood, due to 
its ingeniously fresh ideas and the courage to not stick with the 
practicalities of any certain genre. After viewing the mind-numbing 
"Virus," I immediately saw "In Dreams," directed by Neil Jordan (1992's 
"The Crying Game" and 1994's "Interview With the Vampire"), which is one 
of the most consistently disturbing, surprising, and visually beautiful 
motion pictures I have seen this decade.
In the eerily gorgeous opening sequence, we are informed that in the 
'60s the town of Northfield was completely flooded out to make way for a 
reservoir as we are shown the now 30-year-old ghost town that a group of 
forensic investigators are exploring underwater. Soon afterwards, we 
discover that they are searching for a little girl who was recently 
abducted by a serial killer. We then meet Claire Cooper (Annette 
Bening), a generally satisfied woman living in New England with her 
husband (Aidan Quinn), who flies 747s for a living, and young daughter, 
Rebecca (Katie Sagona), who is anxiously preparing for her school play 
of "Snow White and the Seven Dwarfs." For a long time, Claire has been 
having a recurring dream about the missing girl, whom she sees in an 
apple orchard being led away by a person with red hair. She has reason 
to believe that she may, actually, hold the key to the child's 
disappearance until the murdered body of the girl is found nowhere near 
an apple orchard. Since "In Dreams" is so completely unpredictable and 
pleasing from beginning to end, I will have to tread carefully 
concerning what happens next so as not to give away any important plot 
points. Ultimately, a tragedy occurs involving Claire, and as she 
gradually becomes more and more haunted by the killer whom she thinks 
has found a way into her brain, and her dreams, which do hold the 
answers to what will happen in the future, the people around her, 
including her psychiatrist (Stephen Rea), start to believe that she is 
going out of her mind.
Like slasher films, the tried-and-true "serial killer" movie has been 
done to death in the last two decades, but it took a marvelous film like 
"In Dreams" to wondrously rejuvenate new life into the well-worn genre. 
So entirely imaginative and original this film is, I almost wasn't sure 
how to react while watching it. For a person who sees most every film 
that is released, whether it be in the theater or on video, it is easy 
for their senses to be deadened with all of the recycled junk that is 
made these days, but "In Dreams" is the complete polar opposite, with 
enough ingenuity and inventiveness for five movies. Not only that, but 
the film is one of the few I have seen in many years that I could 
actually say is frightening.
The cast in "In Dreams" is uniformly great, particularly Annette Bening, 
who is able to gain our outright sympathy despite her inevitable demise 
into madness. Bening has sparkled before, most notably in 1995's "The 
American President," but this is a new kind of role for her and she may 
very well give her best performance to date here. When Robert Downey Jr. 
finally shows up late in the picture, he comes off as one of the most 
believably menacing villains in memory with his almost "dead," monotone 
speech pattern and ill temper, to say the least.
It may only be the third week in January but I can already firmly state 
that there will not be a superior example of cinematography all year. 
Seldom before has a director of photography shown me such unforgettable 
and devastatingly ominous images as Darius Khonji ("Seven," "The City of 
Lost Children") does in this film. Every single representation is 
brought to glorious light, and some of the best examples would be the 
apple orchard; the underwater ghost town; the school play; and the 
Carlton Hotel. I could easily go on and on, going into great depth about 
these marvelous sights, and others, but I do not want to spoil the 
experience by giving away the smallest detail. For the whole 103-minute 
running time of "In Dreams," I was in a state of awe at everything I was 
seeing onscreen, and then utterly shocked by how little I could predict 
of what was going to happen. One particularly brilliant and intricately 
constructed sequence involves the same thing occurring to two different 
people in two different time periods, with the stories being seamlessly 
intercut with each other.
It is not too often that a film is released that actually has so many 
wonderful ideas, and it is an even rarer occurrence that these ideas are 
actually carried through all the way to the end. There are simply too 
many films to count that have gotten my hopes up, only to crush them 
during the conclusion, but "In Dreams" only got better, with a climax 
that I could never have foretold but that left me with a satisfied and 
unsettled feeling. For once, here is a film that does not condescend to 
its audience in any way, nor does it try to sugarcoat the dark subject 
matter, and as far as director Neil Jordan goes, this is his most 
accomplished piece of work yet. Almost always a film, at the least, does 
not live up to its trailer, which usually makes a picture look better 
than it actually is, but "In Dreams" also lived up to this great 
challenge. On its opening weekend, I was saddened to see that "In 
Dreams" only made about $4.6 million, and was well behind such Hollywood 
"flukes" as "Varsity Blues," "Patch Adams," and "Virus," since this film 
is infinitely more intelligent and creative than all of those films 
combined. "In Dreams" is a nightmarish, extraordinarily harrowing 
experience, and although only January, it is sure to remain one of the 
year's best films.
      - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
        Dustin
Putman's Film Haven >

Title
Review for Ravenous (1999)
Directed by Antonia Bird.
Cast: Guy Pearce, Robert Carlyle, Jeffrey Jones, David Arquette, John 
Spencer, Stephen Spinella, Jeremy Davies, Neal McDonough.
1999 - 103 minutes
Rated R (for violence and extreme gore).
Reviewed March 20, 1999.
"Ravenous," the new horror film directed by Antonia Bird (1995's 
"Priest," "Mad Love"), is one of the most unsettling motion pictures I 
have seen. Although far from perfect, when the end credits began to 
roll, I physically felt sick in my stomach, not to mention surprisingly 
disturbed, at what I had just watched. Rarely does this ever happen, at 
least to me, anyway.
Set during the Mexican-American War and obviously obtaining much of its 
story ideas from the true account of the infamous Donner party, the film 
begins as Captain John Boyd (Guy Pearce) has sat down to eat with his 
comrades and, thinking back to his horrific experiences previously in 
the war (mistaken as a dead body, he was buried under the blood-drenched 
remains of his fellow soldiers), he runs out to throw up after 
witnessing everyone around him eating rare, very rare, meat. Immediately 
afterwards, Boyd is sent to stay at an outpost in the snowy Sierra 
Nevada mountains, where he meets a wide array of eccentrics: the 
commanding officer, Hart (Jeffrey Jones); Cleaves (David Arquette), the 
goofy, drug-addled cook; and Toffler (Jeremy Davies), a religious, young 
recruit, among others. Just as Boyd is starting to become acquainted 
with his new surroundings, everything ultimately changes when they come 
across a mysterious and bearded, nearly frozen man named Colqhoun 
(Robert Carlyle), who tells them of the pioneers he had been with who 
became stranded in a cave when winter arrived and, when worse finally 
came to worse, they ended up murdering and eating each other for food. 
Colqhoun claims he is the only one to have escaped the clutches of the 
maddest man there, Ives, so all of the men trek back to the cave to 
investigate the goings-on there. 
Although this is only the basic set-up, it's decidedly best not to give 
away any more of the plot developments since "Ravenous" is a film that 
wins many of its brownie points for the high quotient of surprises that 
proceed this opening. Not only that, but "Ravenous" is a true example of 
a film that stands as a perfect moniker for the saying, "style over 
substance." There wasn't a second to be had that I wasn't completely 
impressed by the film's technical areas, many of which added to the fact 
that this is certainly one of the more frightening films to come along 
in some time (certainly more effective, overall, than the recent teen 
slasher movies we have recently been bombarded with). Scene after scene 
arrived from the half-hour point on that was almost nerve-rattlingly 
suspenseful, thanks, in part, to the bravura, remarkably eerie and 
complex music score composed by Michael Nyman and Damon Albarn. Even 
though it is only March, there is no doubt in my mind that this score 
will go down as one of the five best of the year, and it would be 
criminal for the Academy to overlook it. Also adding to the picture's 
potency is the chilly, atmospheric cinematography by Anthony B. 
Richmond, and the tight, captivating editing by Neil Farrell.
So far, however, the main elements that the film brings up have not been 
discussed, and that includes the overwhelming themes of cannibalism, 
which then can easily be linked to vampirism. If "Ravenous" had not 
dealt with this idea is a straight-forward manner, it, no doubt, would 
have ended up seeming like a cop-out. Instead, the film is filled with 
extreme violence and unimaginable gore, even for an R-rating, and it 
should be stressed that those people who are easily grossed-out should 
not, under any circumstances, torture themselves with this film. Even I, 
who almost always remains unaffected by the visceral experiece of a 
film, found myself often shrinking down in my seat, afraid to see what 
was going to happen next, but not daring to take my eyes off the screen, 
either. 
The cast in "Ravenous" is filled with an equal measure of those actors 
who are recognizable and those that are less so. The supporting 
characters, headed by Arquette and Davies, are highly underused and have 
very little to work with, but they do their jobs professionally and 
disappear rather (and unpredictably) quickly. The main characters fare 
better and are more memorable, as Pearce, following his role in 1997's 
"L.A. Confidential," stands as a sympathetic, if not purely "good," 
protagonist, while Carlyle (1997's "The Full Monty") comes off as one of 
the more believably nasty and dispicable villains to grace the silver 
screen in a while. Meanwhile, Jones, an underused actor who has one 
classic performance to his name, in 1986's "Ferris Bueller's Day Off," 
is thankfully handed a rare meaty role to sink his teeth into (pardon 
the pun).
All of the technical expertise and professional performers, not to 
mention director Bird, who obviously understands how to make a powerful 
genre piece, work together to make "Ravenous" a stirring experience that 
will not easilty be forgotten. Sure, the film feels like more of an 
exercise in terror (with noticably dark, pitch-black humor) than a 
three-dimensional movie, but why should that be a problem? With all 
things considered, "Ravenous" is definately worthy of being looked upon 
as the "Texas Chainsaw Massacre" of the '90s.

Title
Review for Pledge, The (2001)
Directed by Sean Penn.
Cast: Jack Nicholson, Robin Wright Penn, Pauline Roberts, Aaron Eckhart, 
Helen Mirren, Vanessa Redgrave, Patricia Clarkson, Benicio Del Toro, Tom 
Noonan, Sam Shepard, Harry Dean Stanton, Lois Smith, Mickey Rourke.
2001 - 124 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, and gore).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, January 27, 2001.
They say the first two months of every year is littered with the movie 
studios' unwanted children--those films that they have little to no faith in, 
and release at a time when they can exit quietly from theaters without being 
noticed. Each year, however, one movie does seem to come out that is a step 
above everything else. In 1999, it was Neil Jordan's vastly underrated "In 
Dreams," and in 2000, it was Curtis Hanson's underseen "Wonder Boys." Sean 
Penn's "The Pledge" is a film like those two, and in a few superficial ways, 
bears a slight resemblance to "In Dreams," a frightening, astonishingly 
original serial killer thriller (seek it out if you haven't seen it, by the 
way). 
"The Pledge" opens like most police murder mysteries do, with the discovery 
of a mutilated body, and the immediate question of who committed such an 
atrocity. But there is a subtle difference here, because the film already had 
managed, by the opening ten minutes, to involve me so deeply that I didn't 
dare take my eyes off the screen and my mind off the story and characters 
until the end credits rolled. With the aid of Jerzy Kromolowski and Mary 
Olson-Kromolowski's tightly wound, multilayered screenplay, and Chris Menges' 
chilly, unforgettably beautiful cinematography, the movie miraculously seemed 
fresh, even while wading through early familiar territory. Beginning as the 
story of a murder investigation, it isn't long before the film's true, 
insulated aspirations emerge.
It is the final working day before dedicated homicide detective Jerry Black's 
(Jack Nicholson) retirement when a young boy discovers the bloody corpse of a 
seven-year-old girl lying in a snow-covered wooded area. Jack decides to 
accompany his eager, young replacement (Aaron Eckhart) to the crime scene, 
and later takes the duty of informing the child's parents. Promising the 
devastated mother (Patricia Clarkson) that he will find the person that did 
this to their little girl, Jerry becomes deeply embroiled in seeking out the 
truth, even after their biggest suspect, a mentally challenged Indian 
(Benicio Del Toro) who was seen at the scene of the crime, commits suicide 
while at the police station.
It seems that the deceased girl had made a buddy right before she died that 
she told her friends was called "The Wizard," a giant-like figure in a black 
car that gave her small porcelain porcupines as gifts. With two young girls 
murdered eight and three years ago within the same Nevada vicinity, both 
wearing red dresses and killed in a similar fashion, Jerry is convinced the 
killer will strike again soon. Buying a home/gas station off one of the main 
roads, Jerry prepares to, once and for all, find the culprit. His chances 
start to look up after meeting a distressed coffee shop waitress (Robin 
Wright Penn) whose eight-year-old daughter, Chrissy (Pauline Roberts), is 
given a porcupine while at a flea market.
"The Pledge" runs through the paces of a generic serial killer thriller in 
the first half, but it is far from ordinary. The movie doesn't even seem 
terribly interested in the identity of the killer, since Jerry more or less 
figures out who it is before the end. Instead, the nervy edginess that 
director Sean Penn provides stems from whether little Chrissy, a lovable 
child whom Jerry grows close to, will be the next victim. And more than even 
that, the film gradually transforms into a thoughtful, morose character 
study--one that concludes on such a tragic, unforeseen note, it has the power 
to leave you not only shaken, but deeply provoked into thinking about the 
movie as a complete whole. Every part, every scene, every red herring holds a 
clever purpose in distracting you for as long as possible while it sets up 
Jerry's desolate downfall.
In Jerry Black, Jack Nicholson has found a role that is every bit as 
memorable and stirring as that of Jack Torrance in 1980's "The Shining," even 
without nary a scene in which he turns evil and begins chasing people with an 
ax. Widely known for his offbeat charm and sinister eyebrows, Nicholson feels 
more human here--more flawed, yet caring--than he rarely has been captured on 
film. His Jerry is a warm, compassionate man that you can't help but 
sympathize with as his goal becomes a deep-seeded obsession that is putting 
his life and newfound relationships in danger.
Surrounding Nicholson are an array of exciting performers, many of which are 
little more than cameos, but all of which leave some sort of precise 
impression. Robin Wright Penn (1999's "Message in a Bottle"), equipped with 
an unattractive, dark haircut and a chipped front tooth, gives a courageous 
performance, both physically and internally, and newcomer Pauline Roberts, as 
her little daughter, Chrissy, is a natural young actress with a lot of 
charisma. Aaron Eckhart (2000's "Nurse Betty") is appropriately smarmy as the 
cop that replaces Jerry, and therefore sees himself as superior, while 
Patricia Clarkson (1998's "High Art") and Vanessa Redgrave (1999's "Girl, 
Interrupted"), as the deceased girl's mother and grandmother, respectively, 
offer up indelible, poignant turns. Finally, Benicio Del Toro (2000's 
"Traffic") literally disappears into his mentally challenged Native American 
character who is believed to be the murderer early on.
"The Pledge" is, on the one hand, about the oath a man takes so seriously it 
washes over his entire existence, but it is also about a person's 
terrifyingly subtle descent into madness when all that he ever lived for is 
taken away from him. A provocative morality tale, "The Pledge" is not only 
the first great motion picture of 2001 (and one that might even appear on my 
annual ten-best list), but also a film that exposes Sean Penn as being every 
bit as talented a director as he is an actor.
    - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
      http://www.us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman
http://www.atnzone.com

Title
Review for Johns (1996)
Directed by Scott Silver.
Cast: David Arquette, Lukas Haas, Keith David, Arliss Howard, Elliott 
Gould, Christopher Gartin, Terrence Dashon Howard, Nicky Katt, Wilson 
Cruz, Alanna Ubach, Richard Kind, John C. McGinley.
1997 - 96 minutes.
Rated R (for violence, blood, profanity, and sexual situations).
Reviewed November 21, 1998. 
"johns," an independent film from Scott Silver, making his directing 
debut, is a gritty, bleak drama that seems accurate about its decidedly 
downbeat subject matter. It is written with intelligence and realism, 
and yet, when it ended, I felt that the film didn't particularly add up 
to much, even though there is no doubt that it is brimming with talent.
The film, which also could have been called, "One Day in the Life of a 
Male Hustler," is about two very good friends living on the streets of 
Hollywood's Santa Monica Boulevard. John (David Arquette), an 
experienced male prostitute, starts his day, which happens to be 
Christmas Eve, as well as the eve of his 21st birthday, off badly. He 
wakes up to find his "lucky sneakers," missing from his feet, which also 
happened to hold all of his money that he was planning to spend on a 
ritzy hotel for the night. His friend, who is more of an amateur, is 
Donner (Lukas Haas), whom David often teaches about the right way to 
hustle, which is to first ask if the client is a police officer. "If 
they aren't, then it's legal," John matter-of-factly states. Throughout 
the day, we follow these two characters from client-to-client, some of 
which are very shady characters, and from meal-to-meal, and they 
struggle to make a life out of their rather desolate existence. 
"johns," is a film that relies heavily on symbolism to bring some of its 
points across. Not only are the clients referred to as, "johns," but 
almost all of the people John meets is named John, from a mystical 
homeless man (Keith David), who always seems to show up at just the 
right time to help people in their time of need, to a peculiar, 
frightening man (Arliss Howard) that picks John up during the 
unpredictable, and yet, inevitable, climax. Another bit of symbolism is 
that not only is it Christmas, but John was born on that holiday, and 
when his sneakers are stolen at the beginning, it is as if his luck 
vanishes.
Certainly, the most striking element of "johns," is David Arquette's 
unforgettable performance. Ever since the original, "Scream," came out, 
Arquette has been on a roll, delivering one strong role after another, 
most notably in 1997's "Dream With the Fishes." With his character of 
John, we are shown an insecure person who is hustling day after day, but 
knows deep down that it isn't what he was supposed to make of his life. 
Also of note is Arliss Howard, as the previously mentioned concluding 
customer of John's. Howard manages to be so creepy that he leaves a 
lasting impression.
Where "johns," misses the mark is in the brief subplot about John's 
fast-talking girlfriend (Alanna Ubach), which doesn't feel finished, and 
especially in the climactic moments. As simply a study of male 
prostitution, then it is fine, but after the end credits started to 
roll, it just didn't feel like it had much of a point, except that this 
underground business that isn't very well known, is meaningless and 
leads nowhere. I don't exactly know what I expected, but during the last 
scene, I think something else should have happened with Donner to add 
more of a finality to the conclusion.
The flaws of the ending can easily be overlooked, however, because, 
"johns," is a memorable, naturalistic drama, superior to the similar 
1997 indie, "Star Maps," which ran into trouble by feeling overstuffed 
with different story threads. The characters in, "johns," gained my 
sympathy, I liked them, and I found myself hoping that they would 
somehow find their way out of the abyss that they had buried themselves 
in. Although far from perfect, "johns," is an edgy and powerful motion 
picture.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Moulin Rouge! (2001)
Directed by Baz Luhrmann.
Cast: Ewan McGregor, Nicole Kidman, Richard Roxburgh, John Leguizamo, Jim 
Broadbent, Kylie Minogue.
2001 - 126 minutes
Rated PG-13 (mature themes and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, June 2, 2001.
One does not watch Baz Luhrmann's phantasmagoric ode to Hollywood movie 
musicals of yore, "Moulin Rouge," as much as one feels as if they're living 
it. A trippy carnival ride through sensory overload and non-stop visual 
marvels, it is a wildly imaginative and sincerely audacious motion picture 
that has the ability to single-handedly revive one's faith in the movies, as 
they have begun to dwindle with the summer season currently upon us.
The story is simple, yet powerful. Set in Paris, circa 1899, Christian (Ewan 
McGregor) is a penniless writer who has just arrived in the town of 
Monmartre, home of the infamous Moulin Rouge nightclub. When Christian has a 
chance encounter with a group of petty unconformists, led by dwarf Toulouse 
Lautrec (John Leguizamo), and helps them to come up with the lyrics of "The 
Sound of Music" for the musical revue they are preparing for the Moulin 
Rouge, they immediately hire him to be their writer. They also set up a 
meeting with gorgeous courtesan Satine (Nicole Kidman), whom they want for 
the female lead of what they have entitled "Spectacular Spectacular!" At 
first mistaking him for a wealthy duke, Satine falls instantly in love with 
Christian, and vice versa, much to the chagrin of the real duke (Richard 
Roxburgh), who has not only just staked a claim in Moulin Rouge, but has 
gotten the club's owner, Zidler (Jim Broadbent), to sign an agreement giving 
him exclusive rights to Satine. And although Christian and Satine do not yet 
know it, Satine has been diagnosed with a fatal case of tuberculosis.
"Moulin Rouge" is as deeply romantic as any film in recent memory. Christian 
is a wistful young man who believes in four aspects of life: "truth, beauty, 
freedom--and above all others--love." Satine, on the other hand, is both a 
singer/dancer and a prostitute, and has been trained to never fall in love. 
In one of the film's most awe-inspiring, magical sequences, Christian 
serenades Satine with Elton John's "Your Song," to which they get so caught 
up in their feelings for one another that they are lifted out of the building 
window and onto the clouds in the sky. For the first time in her life, Satine 
feels something other than fake emotions for a man in her life, and it's an 
exhilarating rush. Their joy in finding each other does not last, however, as 
the wealthy duke enters the picture with an unfair proposition to make.
The sparks that actors Ewan McGregor and Nicole Kidman ignite as hopeless 
romantic Christian and unsure realist Satine are so bright, they're almost 
blinding. Their chemistry, for once, feels genuine, rather than "written," 
and it is the doomed love story of these two people that turn the movie into 
such a complex and touching experience. McGregor (1999's "Star Wars: The 
Phantom Menace") and Kidman (1999's "Eyes Wide Shut") are stunning in their 
roles, eliciting both the passion and determination that any two people have 
who are in love. Both of them, as well as the rest of the actors, sing their 
own songs, and they turn out to be startlingly talented at it. Special notice 
must go to Kidman, who has never been better. Often coming off as somehow 
aloof, Kidman fills Satine with a warmth that has never before been witnessed 
from the actress.
Aside from its two stars, where "Moulin Rouge" excels is in the almost 
non-stop barrage of singing. About 85-percent of the story is told through 
the original art form of song, all of which are classic pop tunes and love 
ballads from post-1899. Just because we are in turn-of-the-20th-century 
Paris, director Baz Luhrmann so convincingly argues, doesn't necessarily mean 
that people back then couldn't have the right to sing everything from Dolly 
Parton's "I Will Always Love You," to The Beatles' "All You Need is Love," to 
David Bowie's "Heroes," to Madonna's "Like a Virgin," to Sting's "Roxanne," 
to Nirvana's "Smells Like Teen Spirit." The film plays like a veritable who's 
who of '60s, '70s, and '80s music, and it is not only smashingly 
entertaining, but actually serves a strong purpose within the narrative. Each 
musical number--and there are a lot of them--are orchestrated with such 
unabashed energy and passion that you can't help but drift away in its 
rapturous spell.
With "Moulin Rouge," Baz Luhrmann (1996's "William Shakespeare's Romeo + 
Juliet") has made his first masterpiece as a filmmaker. The camera is 
constantly moving, swooping around people and objects, or zooming into 
building windows or through beautiful city landscapes. It is not done to keep 
the interest of the attention-impaired, though, but to simply aid in creating 
a glitzy, one-of-a-kind universe. Additionally, the story, written by 
Luhrmann and Craig Pearce, is just strong enough to be fully satisfying, 
while not being bogged down by overplotted developments. 
In a day when so many motion pictures strive for nothing more than adequacy, 
"Moulin Rouge" is alive with creativity and wonder, proving that the medium 
of film can take us anywhere, and act upon us in any way possible. One part 
comedy, one part romance, and one part tragedy, "Moulin Rouge" is a 
remarkable triumph, as well as the first truly brilliant film of 2001.
 http://www.all-reviews.com/reviewers/dustinputman.htm
http://us.imdb.com/reviewsby?Dustin+Putman
http://www.atnzone.com

Title
Review for I'll Be Home for Christmas (1998)
Directed by Arlene Sanford.
Cast: Jonathan Taylor Thomas, Jessica Biel, Adam Lavorgna, Gary Cole, 
Eve Gordon, Andrew Lauer, Lauren Maltby, Sean O'Bryan, Lesley Boone.
1998 - 85 minutes.
Rated PG (for mild profanity).
Reviewed November 14, 1998.
By Dustin Putman 
Dustin Putman's Film Reviews >
"I'll Be Home for Christmas" surprised me. Granted, I wasn't expecting 
very much, especially when most live-action Disney films are admittedly 
terrible, but this film was actually quite enjoyable, thanks to mostly 
likable characters and a worthwhile, if not all that original, story.
Jake (Jonathan Taylor Thomas), an 18-year-old student at Palisades 
College in Southern California, has a sweet, understanding girlfriend, 
Allie (Jessica Biel), but is the type of person who mostly just thinks 
about himself. He is very apprehensive about going home to his family in 
New York for Christmas, especially after his father (Gary Cole) married 
another woman (Eve Gordon) only ten months after Jake's mother's death. 
Things turn around for him when his father makes him a proposition he 
can't refuse: be home by 6 p.m. on Christmas Eve and get the family's 
vintage porsche. Although Jake plans to ride home with Allie, who also 
lives in his hometown, he finds himself stranded in the desert with a 
Santa Claus suit glued to him, thanks to a bunch of jocks at school, 
leaving Allie no choice but to get a ride with Jake's rival at college, 
Eddie (Adam Lavorgna). Meanwhile, as Jake desperately tries to get home 
by any means possible, he has several run-ins with different people on 
the road, and through it all, he begins to understand what's really 
important in his life.
This sort of story and moral has been done in many other films, and is 
very closely related to the wonderful 1987 comedy, "Trains, Planes, and 
Automobiles," but what I liked about," I'll Be Home for Christmas," was 
the treatment that it was given. It was a delight to meet the different 
supporting characters, and a few of them were especially memorable and 
brightly written, particularly a policeman (Sean O'Bryan) whom Jake 
meets along the way that is trying to get his own girlfriend (Lesley 
Boone), a bubbly waitress working at a restaurant, back.
Jonathan Taylor Thomas has yet to make a great feature film, but it is 
obvious he is talented, and could be amazing in a more challenging role. 
And Jessica Biel, who starred in last year's "Ulee's Gold," is perfect 
as his girfriend, and perhaps the standout in the cast.
There are elements that don't work in the film, however, starting with 
the character of Eddie, who was very annoying and basically a 
one-dimensional creep. The overall plotting was also highly predictable, 
and it was obvious from the beginning how everything will turn out in 
the end. 
No one, I doubt, will be expecting a cinematic masterpiece when they 
see, "I'll Be Home for Christmas," though, and sometimes it is fine just 
to sit back and watch an entertaining, harmless family film for a 
90-minute duration. Nothing that occurred in it was earthshaking or 
shocking or particularly inventive, but it was well-done, all the same, 
and I really did like it.

Title
Review for Butcher Boy, The (1997)
Directed by Neil Jordan.
Cast: Eomann Owens, Stephen Rea, Fiona Shaw, Alan Boyle, Andrew 
Fullerton, Aisling O'Sullivan, Sinead O'Connor, Ian Hart, Milo O'Shea.
1998 - 111 minutes.
Rated R (for violence, gore, and profanity).
Reviewed November 15, 1998.
I have always been a fan of director Neil Jordan, from his early work, 
such as 1984's "The Company of Wolves," to 1992's "The Crying Game," and 
1994's "Interview With a Vampire." His latest film, "The Butcher Boy," 
is a return to his roots in Ireland, but unfortunately, it is not a 
successful homecoming.
Told through the eyes of a 12-year-old Irish boy, Francis (newcomer 
Eomann Owens), this peculiar film follows him as we learn a little about 
his decidedly unstable life. His father (Stephen Rea) is an indifferent 
alcoholic, his mother (Fiona Shaw) is mentally ill and always in and out 
of hospitals, and Francis himself delights in terrorizing the mother of 
one of his friends after he is forbidden to see him anymore. Francis is 
the type of boy who always has a lot to say, but mostly fluctuates 
between sarcasm and frightening honesty, and it quickly becomes apparent 
that he may very well be a little psychotic, even capable of brutal 
murder.
The premise of, "The Butcher Boy," is one that could have very well been 
turned into a thought-provoking, disturbing motion picture, but somehow 
nothing works. Francis is in almost every scene, but we learn very 
little about him, as if the film was distancing itself away from him 
when, I suspect, we were actually supposed to sympathize with him. This 
is definately not young Owens fault, however, because he gives a 
brilliantly accurate performance, and is able to also seem menacing as 
well. The fact that we don't get close to his character is because of 
the sloppy screenplay.
The supporting characters are no help, though. Rea is wasted, and has 
practically no scenes where he actually talks to his son, or to anyone 
else for that matter. He usually seems to just be sitting watching the 
television throughout. Shaw has a little bit more to work with, since 
she has one touching scene in which she talks to Francis in a time of 
despair, but is out of the picture just as we are beginning to know her. 
And singer Sinead O'Connor appears rather effectively as the Virgin Mary 
who occasionally gives Francis advice. 
The pacing is all off in, "The Butcher Boy." Although the story could 
have been dynamite, it moves at a deadeningly slow rate, and I found my 
mind wandering every once in a while. It is also very episodic, because 
the developments in the story fly by with no satisfying payoffs. At one 
point, Francis is sent away to a juvenile prison, and an odd, possibly 
sexual relationship begins to develop between a priest and himself, but 
nothing comes of it. 
I'd rather think of, "The Butcher Boy," as a brief diversion for 
director Jordan, rather than a total misfire. He has already proven to 
be a strong director, but he lucked out with this latest film. What 
could have been a courageous, unsettling character study of an 
emotionally disturbed young boy, only manages to be an ineffective, 
uninvolivng bore.
      - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
        Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Drive Me Crazy (1999)
Directed by John Schultz.
Cast: Melissa Joan Hart, Adrian Grenier, Mark Webber, Keri Lynn Pratt, Ali 
Larter, Susan May Pratt, Gabriel Carpenter, Kris Park, Stephen Collins, Faye 
Grant, Mark Metcalf, William Converse-Roberts.
1999 - 95 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and sexual innuendo).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, October 3, 1999.
If 1999 should go down in movie history for anything, it shouldn't be for the 
eagerly-awaited release of "Star Wars, Episode 1: The Phantom Menace" 
because, let's face it, people didn't seem to care about the film after they 
had seen how mediocre it really was. And although one of the year's few true 
masterpieces, it shouldn't be for Stanley Kubrick final motion picture, "Eyes 
Wide Shut," because it was overhyped and generally disappointed the average 
moviegoer expecting a sex-filled romp instead of the slow, contemplative 
"art" film it really was. No, what 1999 should be known for is the full-blown 
explosion of that timeless genre known as the "teen" movie. As is the case, 
not all were very good (the vapid "She's All That," the empty "Varsity 
Blues"), but some turned out to be the best since John Hughes, circa the 
mid-1980's ("The Breakfast Club," "Sixteen Candles," "Pretty in Pink"), such 
as the brilliant satire, "Election," the smart "10 Things I Hate About You," 
the instant teen classic, "American Pie," and the slick "Cruel Intentions." 
All were released this past Spring or Summer, so John Schultz's "Drive Me 
Crazy," a sort of "She's All That" reversal, at least holds the distinction 
of being the sole "teen" movie of the Fall. 
Based on the book, "How I Created My Perfect Prom Date," by Todd Strasser, 
the film version is in limbo between the successful "teen" movies, and the 
not-so-successful. On its side is an occasionally adept screenplay and two 
likable characters that are more appealing than the story they have been 
stranded in. On the other side of the spectrum, "Drive Me Crazy" faithfully 
follows the same stringent formula that most of these movies have, and it is 
instantly forgettable due to its own stubborn banality, and the inability to 
have many distinguishable qualities among the large crop of similar films.
The premise goes like this: Nicole Maris (Melissa Joan Hart), one of the most 
popular seniors at Timothy Zonin High School, is in the middle of preparing 
the big Centennial Dance, the 100-year anniversary of the school. She has her 
close eye on the star of the basketball team, Brad (Gabriel Carpenter), but 
when he falls for someone else, Nicole finds herself dateless for the dance. 
That's where her next-door neighbor and fellow classmate, Chase Hammond 
(Adrian Grenier), comes into the picture. A rebellious slacker type, Chase 
and Nicole used to be best friends until they hit middle school and drifted 
apart into their differing cliques, but now Nicole wants his help, and since 
his own girlfriend, Dulcie (Ali Larter), has just dumped him, he accepts. 
Buying him a whole new, stylish wardrobe, Chase starts to hang out with 
Nicole at school functions and her group of friends, and to his own surprise, 
he begins to enjoy it, including the company of Nicole. In the process, 
however, Chase seems to little-by-little forget about his old group of 
buddies, who are left waiting in the wings. Complications ensue, some truths 
will be spoken, the Centennial Dance arrives at the climax, and no awards 
will be given out to those who can guess how everything is sure to turn out.
If Chase had been paid by Nicole, "Drive Me Crazy" would almost be a carbon 
copy of 1987's "Can't Buy Me Love," a more-sappy, but also more satisfying, 
"teen" picture. Without that added gimmick, however, the storyline is easier 
to swallow and graciously spares us a lot of melodramatic speeches that 
plagued "Can't Buy Me Love." 
In her very first starring role in a feature film, Melissa Joan Hart (TV's 
"Sabrina, The Teenage Witch") is one of the most engaging and fresh young 
actresses to appear in any of this year's "teen" movies, second to only the 
wonderful Julia Stiles in "10 Things I Hate About You." Beautiful in a 
non-Hollywood type of way, Hart is refreshingly not pencil-thin, has lots of 
freckles on her face, and her more normal physical appearance only helps the 
film so that you can easily identify with her, much like Jason Biggs did for 
"American Pie." Not only that, but Hart really is a fine actress that 
definitely has an acting future ahead of her, as she never mugs for the 
camera or uses exaggerated body language to express her emotions. 
Adrian Grenier, last seen in the independent "coming-of-age" film, "The 
Adventures of Sebastian Cole," is well-cast to play off of Hart, and together 
they have a certain amount of winning chemistry. Better yet, in his scenes in 
which he is apart from Hart, Grenier is natural and instinctive, so good he 
very rarely ever appears to be acting much at all.
If there is one aspect of "Drive Me Crazy" that screenwriter Rob Thomas gets 
exactly right, it is in his view of teenagers, and the relationships between 
the different cliques in school. The popular group are pleasingly not looked 
upon as easy stereotypes, and are seldom portrayed as the one-dimensional bad 
guys that so many films of this ilk fall victim to (paging "She's All That"). 
For the most part, a few of the supporting performances should be pin-pointed 
for the way they are able to create added levels to their characters, 
particularly Mark Webber, as one of Chase's friends who is carrying on a 
relationship via the internet with a mystery person from the school, and Keri 
Lynn Pratt, as Dee-Vine, a fellow classmate who got her nickname before she 
lost 40 lbs. Pratt, especially, is one of the most charming performers I've 
come across in many-a-moons, and her character is both instantly appealing 
and even poignant in one of the best scenes in the film, in which she is 
verbally assaulted and put down because of her past weight problem.  
The film is also often visually impressive, signalling unusually high 
production values for a clearly low-budget effort. A quiet, effective 
sequence between Nicole and her estranged father (Stephen Collins) is 
absolutely stunning, as it takes place on a hot-air ballon, high above the 
gorgeous green landscape. Several of the song choices, on the other hand, are 
far too teenybopperish, including Britney Spears' tune that the film was even 
named after. If anything, Spears' relation to the picture should aid the 
picture financially. Tellingly, my friend and I, both in our first year of 
college, instantly felt like elder statesmen once we set foot in the theater, 
overrun with middle school girls who giddily sang along to Spears and The 
Backstreet Boys, one of which went as far as to use hand motions as she 
belted out the songs!
"Drive Me Crazy" is enjoyable on a minor level, and nothing more. It is fun 
to watch simply for Hart and Grenier, but its one fatal flaw is its own 
needlessly generic nature. Aside from a couple scenes in which the film deals 
with domestic issues within families, and the way kids sometimes drift apart 
the older they get, the film is little more than adequate, not a total 
washout, but nothing that hasn't been recycled a thousand times before, and 
done more ambitiously.

Title
Review for Someone Like You... (2001)
Directed by Tony Goldwyn.
Cast: Ashley Judd, Hugh Jackman, Greg Kinnear, Marisa Tomei, Ellen Barkin.
2001 - 95 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, March 31, 2001.
In the wrong hands, "Someone Like You" could have been the next "The Wedding 
Planner," the recent Jennifer Lopez romance that was perfectly wretched from 
one end to the other. As directed by Tony Goldwyn (1999's "A Walk on the 
Moon") and written by Elizabeth Chandler, however, it is an unusually 
smart-minded comedy-drama that works well wavering between both genres, 
garnering intermittent laughs and honest emotional insights. Whereas "The 
Wedding Planner" tried way too hard for guffaws, inspiring over-the-top 
performances and a clumsily dopey screenplay, "Someone Like You" is guilty in 
neither respect.
Jane Goodale (Ashley Judd) is an assistant producer on "The Diane Roberts 
Show," a successful television talk program. While many of the stories deal 
with passion, love, and relationships, Jane can't seem to find any of these 
things in her own life. This all changes, it seems, when she meets the show's 
new producer, Ray (Greg Kinnear), and falls head over heels for him. He says 
he loves her, and before she knows it, she has leased out her apartment and 
is preparing to move in with him. A stumbling block arises when Ray suddenly 
turns cold on her, dumping her abruptly and leaving her without a place to 
stay. 
Enter womanizing co-worker Eddie (Hugh Jackman), a self-confessed ladies' man 
who seems to have a different girl in his bed every night, and is looking for 
a roommate. Jane takes him up on the offer, as she finds herself sharing 
living quarters with a man whom she gets along with alright, but finds rather 
slimy in his dating habits. Still not over Ray, and distressed about whether 
something is wrong with her or not, she gathers up enough information to form 
the Cow Theory, which states that two cows will not mate with each other more 
than once, no matter what, and that such a fact might apply to most men. 
Egged on by her best friend and editor of a men's magazine, Liz (Marisa 
Tomei), Jane pens her thoughts into an editorial in which she creates an 
alias author, unprepared for the popularity and success it will achieve.
The generically-titled "Someone Like You," which was originally to be called 
"Animal Husbandry," based on the novel of the same name by Laura Zigman, is 
thankfully far from generic when it comes to how much it manages to stand out 
from the majority of romantic comedies made today. While most romances come 
off as if they have been processed by a computer, "Someone Like You" is more 
reality-based, as it stands as a delicate, involving character study of a 
woman who gradually finds solace in her own skin, and realizes she can be 
happy with or without a steady guy. 
As Jane Goodale, Ashley Judd has turned in her most accomplished performance 
since her career-making debut in 1993's "Ruby in Paradise." Judd strikes all 
the right notes, uncovering Jane to be a lovable working woman with a brain 
in her head and never with a loss of ideas and thoughts. We happily follow 
her through the entirety of the film because we grow to care about her as a 
true person, and want to know how everything turns out for her.
Last seen as Wolverine in 2000's "X-Men," Hugh Jackman is a charismatic, 
easy-on-the-eyes performer who proves to have what it takes to be a star. 
Eddie remains accessible throughout, even when he does things that we 
disagree with (such as using most women for one night stands), and it is a 
testament to Jackman's talent that he not once comes off as being a pig. 
In smaller roles, Greg Kinnear (2000's "The Gift") and Marisa Tomei (2000's 
"What Women Want") are fine with what they have to work with, but deserve 
better. Kinnear's Ray isn't simply a one-dimensional idiot, thanks to the 
relatively fresh character writing, but it is difficult to see why he took 
this role. The same goes for Tomei, an often delightful actress who too often 
gets throwaway parts that underutilize what she is so clearly capable of. 
Ellen Barkin (1999's "Drop Dead Gorgeous") shines in a brief role as talk 
show host Diane Roberts, who shares a nice moment with Jane late in the 
picture, as she discloses her own insecurities in her life.
"Someone Like You" is an enjoyable dramedy that is fairly obvious in where it 
is headed right from the start, but in getting there, it surprises in how 
moving and wise it becomes. The tale of a woman who, through the trials and 
tribulations of a failed romance and a possibly invigorating new one, finds 
her place in the world, it is a worthwhile movie that will likely exceed most 
people's wildest expectations on just how good something called "Someone Like 
You" could possibly be.
    - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
      http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman
http://www.atnzone.com

Title
Review for Patriot, The (2000)
Directed by Roland Emmerich.
Cast: Mel Gibson, Heath Ledger, Jason Isaacs, Chris Cooper, Joely Richardson, 
Lisa Brenner, Tcheky Karyo, Rene Auberjonois, Gregory Smith, Mika Boorem, 
Skye McCole Bartusiak, Donal Logue, Leon Rippy, Adam Baldwin, Trevor Morgan, 
Joey D. Vieira.
2000 - 164 minutes
Rated R (for graphic violence, gore, and mild profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, July 1, 2000.
An attempt by director Roland Emmerich and producer Dean Devlin (who both 
created 1996's "Independence Day" and 1998's "Godzilla") to make an 
Oscar-worthy motion picture set during the Revolutionary War just sounds like 
trouble. After all, for filmmakers who have spent their whole career creating 
aliens and giant lizards, a reality-based war epic simply would seem out of 
their league. The outcome of their endeavor is "The Patriot," and it is no 
better than anyone should have expected, which is to say that it isn't any 
good at all.
Strictly amateur night concerning the basic storyline, which does not 
thoughtfully examine the battle of the Colonies, circa the late-18th century, 
but lays out a threadbare revenge plotline that is as misguided in its ideas 
as it is in its lackluster delivery of them. Instead of creating characters, 
director Emmerich and screenwriter Robert Rodat have gone back to the old 
standby of "good versus evil," which is exactly what they did in 
"Independence Day," replacing extraterrestrials with the British. And the 
relationships that evolve throughout the story are stripped to their bare 
minimum, with each person getting their chance to deliver big, meaningful 
speeches about patriotism and independence, but little in the way of 
character-defining dialogue. Granted, shallowness may be difficult to pull 
off in a nearly 3-hour drama but Emmerich and Rodat have managed just that.
Mel Gibson toplines the respectable, if unextraordinary, cast as the 
conciliatory Benjamin Martin, who has lived in South Carolina raising his 
seven children by himself ever since his beloved wife passed away. Despite 
the callings of his comrades, Benjamin wants no part in joining the militia, 
instead set on continuing to be a parent to his kids. His eldest son, the 
patriotic 18-year-old Gabriel (Heath Ledger), however, does join his fellow 
men in the fight for his homeland. Returning home one night wounded, Benjamin 
takes it upon himself to treat Gabriel and the other hurt soldiers. When the 
Green Dragoons, headed by the conniving English Colonel Tavington (Jason 
Isaacs), catch wind of this, and ultimately capture Gabriel and 
cold-bloodedly murder Benjamin's 15-year-old son, Thomas (Gregory Smith), it 
sets off a timebomb within Benjamin that forces him to join Gabriel in the 
war, as well as avenge his late son by any means possible.
Following a promising opening thirty minutes that includes a courageously 
controversial depiction of two of Benjamin's young sons bearing arms and 
murdering the Green Dragoons, and, albeit briefly, showing their reactions, 
as well as Benjamin's, on the power of the weapons they hold, "The Patriot" 
careens off-course for the 135-minute duration, to which it never repairs 
itself. Aimlessly wandering around in a needlessly simplistic storyline that 
is drug out to an unbearable length, but without giving any depth or insight 
to what is occurring onscreen, the film is so problematic in so many 
different ways, it is almost surprising that Mel Gibson would have agreed to 
take part in the project.
Much of "The Patriot" is so unserviceable that it occasionally borders on 
some sort of Monty Python war parody, with pratfalls and unequivocally inane 
dialogue that I would never wish upon any actor, no matter how talented they 
are, to have to utter on the big screen. Worst of all is that much of the 
humor is, indeed, intentional, but not one attempt at comedy is the least bit 
successful or appropriate in the confines of the otherwise dark subject 
matter.
There are two inevitable romantic subplots, one of them between Gabriel and 
the fair maiden Anne (Lisa Brenner), whose father is hard of hearing and 
always misunderstanding what others are saying to him. Following three scenes 
together (one which is carried out with both of the principles having black 
ink smeared on their teeth), we are supposed to believe that Gabriel and Anne 
are deeply in love, and so they get married. The second romance, even more 
poorly handled than the Gabriel/Anne debacle (if that is possible), is 
between Benjamin and his late wife's sister, Charlotte (Joely Richardson), 
and is so inconsequential that only two brief scenes are afforded to their 
budding romantic relationship.
No less than three child death scenes are portrayed in "The Patriot," with a 
variation each time of a father weeping over the lifeless body, and followed 
by an alteration of how the parent deals with the death. The war scenes on 
display (many of which are filmed in slow-motion) are plentiful, as well, but 
become tedious long before the climactic battle has been carried out, 
primarily because there isn't enough substance present to withhold the amount 
of time you are asked to spend with the picture. The film basically runs 
around in circles with nowhere to go until the finale that pits Benjamin 
head-to-head with Colonel Tavington, whom he has vowed to kill.
Mel Gibson may be stuck in a creative wasteland here, but he is stunning and 
focused as Benjamin Martin, who cares for his family so much, he will do 
anything to get back at those who have wronged them. It is clear that Gibson 
does have his heart in the right place, and must have taken the role based on 
his connection with the character, since he himself has just as many children 
as Benjamin, and obviously loves them a great deal. The problem is, Gibson 
played a character much like this one in his far superior 1995 drama, 
"Braveheart," which had intelligence and complexity to go along with its 
intense scenes of violence.
Heath Ledger (1999's "10 Things I Hate About You"), an Australian actor who 
pulls off a believable American accent, is powerful and passionate as 
Gabriel, but it intermittently is difficult to watch him perform in a film 
that he is so clearly above. Meanwhile, Jason Isaacs, as the token villain, 
is appropriately slimy and despicable, efficiently creating a figure that 
audiences will be able to hate. I say 'figure,' rather than 'character,' 
because at no point throughout does screenwriter Rodat give Colonel Tavington 
any positive qualities or traits aside from his thirst for killing. All other 
performances mostly blend into the background and are wasted, including Joely 
Richardson, as Aunt Charlotte; Lisa Brenner, as Gabriel's love, Anne Howard; 
and Chris Cooper, as Colonel Harry Burwell, an old comrade of Benjamin's.
For someone who sees the majority of films released, I will be the first to 
admit that I am sometimes a little slow to predict what is going to happen, 
but at every point in "The Patriot," I made a guess on what would occur next, 
and was consistently right. Aside from its predictability, its views on 
patriotism, and the treatment the battle scenes get, were something that got 
deeply under my skin. As someone who personally finds war a sad, devastating, 
and pointless act, its music score, by John Williams, was utterly offensive, 
with its upbeat, flag-waving strains played over shots of death and the 
destruction of human life. There is a difference between portraying the 
facts, and sensationalizing war. Perhaps it would have been in Roland 
Emmerich's best interest to realize this, before turning his version of the 
Revolutionary War into some sort of fantasy where death is a chauvinistic 
punchline, rather than a tragedy.

Title
Review for Bone Collector, The (1999)
Directed by Phillip Noyce.
Cast: Angelina Jolie, Denzel Washington, Queen Latifah, Ed O'Neill, Mike 
McGlone, Leland Orser, Michael Rooker, Luis Guzman, John Benjamin Hickey.
1999 - 118 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, and gore).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, November 5, 1999.
Around this time two years ago, the public was blessed (or cursed) with "Kiss 
the Girls," one of the most ludicrous and dull films in the Serial Killer 
genre this decade. Beating it out for that shameful title is Phillip Noyce's 
"The Bone Collector," which bears more than a passing similarity with the 
former. Both star a highly regarded actor (Morgan Freeman, Denzel Washington) 
who sets out to stop the killer, as well as a resourceful, young woman 
(Ashley Judd, Angelina Jolie) who is forced, in one way or another, to take 
matters into her own hands.  Both films are so illogically plotted that you 
eventually give up attempting to care about the characters and situations, 
while the climax relies on that annoying standby, the Talking Killer cliche, 
in which the culprit's identity is revealed and instead of doing off with the 
main characters right away, conveniently chats with them until someone shows 
up to stop him from acting out his dirty deeds. One of the things that made 
1995's "Se7en" one of the most disturbing, memorable films in the genre in 
the last few years is because it took the conventions and stood them on their 
head, never going for what was to be expected by a mainstream audience. Just 
the thought of the frighteningly devastating conclusion still has the power 
to bring chills up my spine, while the thought of the culmination in "The 
Bone Collector" just makes me want to close my eyes and shake my head in 
disbelief.
After an enthralling opening credits sequence that owes most of its 
effectiveness to the subtly creepy music score by Craig Armstrong, things go 
downhill--fast. Lincoln Rhyme (Denzel Washington) is one of New York City's 
leading forensic cops until he becomes almost fully paralyzed in a freak 
accident on a crime scene. Forced to spend the rest of his life in a bed, 
Lincoln is cared for by his sassy, dedicated nurse Thelma (Queen Latifah), 
but doesn't see much reason for living anymore. When a grisly homicide is 
documented by model-turned-novice-cop Amelia Donaghy (Angelina Jolie), 
Lincoln is so impressed with her skills that he asks her to take over the 
case, despite her area not being forensics. Amelia reluctantly agrees, but 
soon has built a close rapport with Lincoln, who constantly is pushing her to 
do things she doesn't want to do, but that he knows will make her a better 
person in her profession. Meanwhile, the body count gradually builds up, with 
the killer posing as a taxi driver who, instead of taking his customers to 
their preferred destinations, drives them to their deaths.
"The Bone Collector" is a film that so closely follows the blueprint for the 
generic Serial Killer movie, you question its reason for being made at all. 
Offering no originality (unlike 1995's "Copycat"), no realism (unlike 1990's 
"Henry: Portrait of a Serial Killer"), no intelligence (unlike 1991's "The 
Silence of the Lambs"), no surprises (unlike "Se7en"), and not one character 
we get to know well enough to care about (unlike all of the above), the film 
is a lifeless product that is tiresomely directed by Noyce (who helmed such 
strong films as 1992's "Patriot Games" and 1994's "Clear and Present 
Danger"). Noyce's heart doesn't seem to be in his latest picture, nor does 
screenwriter Jeremy Iacone's, and no wonder. More than anything, "The Bone 
Collector" is the latest in a never-ending parade of movies that extract the 
feeling of "been there, done that" in the viewer. 
What can you say to Denzel Washington other than, "you got what was coming to 
you." Appearing in the far superior 1998 Serial Killer movie "Fallen," 
Washington apparently saw a reason in being in another the following year, 
and he was bound to stumble on a rotten apple sooner or later. Washington is 
a dynamic performer, but has nothing to do here, literally and figuratively. 
Since his character of Lincoln is paralyzed, he spends 99% of his screen time 
lying in a bed, without being able to move anything but his head, shoulders, 
and one finger. A challenge for any actor, to be sure, but Washington comes 
off as nothing more than a distraction to the storyline at hand, and he isn't 
given enough worthwhile material to rise above being merely an afterthought.
One of the most exciting young actresses to appear in the last couple years, 
Angelina Jolie was a standout in last year's touching "Playing by Heart," and 
a scene-stealer in last spring's "Pushing Tin," but her luck has momentarily 
run out with this deadly project. For one, the stunning Jolie should have 
fired her makeup person and hair stylist because she looks downright ragged 
here, and her performance seems rather muted and cold. Try as she might, 
Jolie is miscast in the role and isn't able to pull it off, unlike Ashley 
Judd in "Kiss the Girls," who was the one saving grace.
In the only notable supporting role, Queen Latifah is sorely wasted to the 
point where I am tempted to hunt down the filmmakers and slap them for 
throwing her surprising talents away. Thelma is the sole character I liked, 
and yet this is due completely to Latifah's bright presence, as her character 
is one-dimensional and stale. Ed O'Neill (TV's "Married...With Children"), 
Mike McGlone (1996's "She's All That"), and Leland Orser (1998's "Very Bad 
Things") all show up and make zero impression, while Michael Rooker, as shady 
Capt. Howard Cheney, is literally pointless in every way, giving off brooding 
looks at every turn just so we will think he is the killer. Sorry, folks, but 
the first rule in this type of film is that the character who is most 
obviously the killer is invariably just a red herring.
There is nary a sign of freshness in the whole overlong 118 minutes it took 
for "The Bone Collector" to reach its end. Someone who sees a lot of movies 
usually hopes, or at least should, that a film headed for oblivion will make 
a sudden U-turn and either get better or become more entertaining (even if it 
is on the "so-bad-it's-good" level). Not this time. The lack of enthusiasm 
for this misguided project shines through in every performance and in 
director Noyce's unsatisfying direction, and, therefore, it never has the 
ability to involve you, or make you give one iota about the proceedings. "The 
Bone Collector" is strictly cut-and-paste filmmaking, and it doesn't even do 
a respectable job at that, either.

Title
Review for Sex, Lies, and Videotape (1989)
Directed by Steven Soderbergh.
Cast: Andie MacDowell, James Spader, Peter Gallagher, Laura San Giacomo.
1989 - 99 minutes.
Rated R (for profanity and sexual situations).
Reviewed October 28, 1998.
Steve Soderbergh's "sex, lies, and videotape," which won the Grand Prize 
at the Cannes Film Festival in 1989, arguably began the resurgence of 
independent films. Made on a shoestring budget of $1.2 million, with 
then relatively unknown actors, it is a provocative, thoroughly original 
drama.
The film mostly focuses on the four central characters, all in their 
late 20's-early 30's. Ann (Andie MacDowell), an unfulfilled housewife, 
is married to John (Peter Gallagher), an insensitive lawyer, who, 
unbeknownst to her, is having an affair with her younger sister, Cynthia 
(Laura San Giacomo). Complicating matters even worse is Graham (James 
Spader, who won Best Actor at Cannes), John's old college buddy, who 
comes to stay at their house. Ann is absolutely won over by him, even 
though she clearly has stated that she has very little interest in sex.
That is the set-up for the last hour of the picture, and since the film 
is entitled, "sex, lies, and videotape," it is best to keep the rest of 
the story developments at bay so that they will come as a genuine 
surprise. 
Director Steven Soderbergh has proven to be a wildly offbeat filmmaker, 
ranging from the independent, to the mainstream (1998's "Out of Sight"), 
to the downright Kafkaesque (1997's "Schizopolis"). He is the type of 
director who obviously takes a lot of chances, and believes in the work 
that he does, and, "sex, lies, and videotape," is probably his most 
confident, and maybe even best, to date.
The performances are superb from all four leads, but MacDowell stands 
out in what is probably the main character. She is always a very winning 
actress, but this is probably her most three-dimensional role that she 
has had (with a close second being Altman's 1993 mosaic, "Short Cuts"). 
The other parts are perfectly cast as well, from Spader's ominous 
Graham, to Gallagher's self-involved John, to Giacomo's outspoken 
Cynthia.
The final act of the film, especially, comes right out of left field, 
and turns out to be both shocking and oddly touching, and it would be 
criminal to give away the film's secrets. Suffice to say that, through 
one powerful sequence, Ann is able to somewhat come out of her shell, 
and John learns a valuable lesson about honesty, as well as deception.
The film has one fault , however. The characters are almost all 
emotionally cold and isolated from one another, and often unlikable. If 
there had been a few extra scenes with Gallagher, it probably would have 
helped, since his relationship with MacDowell isn't quite as explored as 
I would have liked.
"sex, lies, and videotape," although minorly flawed, is still easily a 
brave and adult motion picture that is far more mature and honest about 
its subject matter than the usual film. Soderbergh clearly knew what he 
was doing while he was making it, and the final product certainly proves 
this. 
   - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
     Dustin Putman's
Film Haven >

Title
Review for Virgin Suicides, The (1999)
Directed by Sofia Coppola.
Cast: Kirsten Dunst, James Woods, Kathleen Turner, Josh Hartnett, Hanna Hall, 
Chelsea Swain, A.J. Cook, Leslie Hayman, Michael Pare, Scott Glenn, Danny 
DeVito; Narrated by Giovanni Ribisi.
2000 - 97 minutes
Rated R (for mature themes, mild profanity, and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, May 15, 2000.
What causes someone to grow so tired of the world--so unhappy and weary of 
going through the paces on a day-to-day basis--that they are driven to take 
their own life? Any one person can speculate such a question all they want, 
but inevitably will fail to draw a satisfying conclusion. There are 
occurrences in life that can't be explained, and the tragic mystery that is 
suicide is something that remains unresolved for everyone except the victim, 
who seems to hold all the answers, yet, at the same time, none at all.
Based on the 1993 novel by Jeffrey Eugenides, Sofia Coppola's "The Virgin 
Suicides" is an elucidating masterpiece, a film of both penetrating beauty 
and baffling perplexity. It is startling and maybe even a little frightening, 
not because it is a typical horror film, but because the unforgettable themes 
and images it presents are distinct, irrefutable, and unshakably puzzling. 
More questions than answers are posed throughout the story, and that is how 
it should be--its level of not knowing puts a stirring air of uneasiness over 
the proceedings and its sorrowful characters.
Set in the mid-'70s in the upper-middle-class Michigan suburbs, the film is 
told largely from the points-of-view of four neighborhood boys who live right 
down the street from the home of the much-talked-about Lisbon family, headed 
by a passive father (James Woods) and a restricting, Catholic mother 
(Kathleen Turner). The fascination for the four boys is based largely on the 
five Lisbon sisters--13-year-old Cecilia (Hanna Hall), 14-year-old Lux 
(Kirsten Dunst), 15-year-old Bonnie (Chelsea Swain), 16-year-old Mary (A.J. 
Cook), and 17-year-old Therese (Leslie Hayman)--each of which signify 
unattainable beauty and innocence unchanged.
Narrated by one of the boys as an adult (Giovanni Ribisi), who occasionally 
still holds reunions with his childhood friends, where they theorize on the 
notable gaps missing in the lives of the late Lisbon sisters, the first words 
uttered at the film's start are, "Cecilia was the first to go," as we see her 
face-up in a bathtub of water, her wrists slit open. It is her first suicide 
attempt, and although she survives, questions of the parents' upbringing and 
what goes on behind their closed doors become headline news for television 
stations, ready to exploit the grim subject of teenage suicide. 
Following her physical recovery, Cecilia is forced to see a psychiatrist 
(Danny DeVito), who doesn't have a clue how to help a 13-year-old girl 
fatally hurting internally. Weeks later, Cecilia attempts suicide again, and 
succeeds, impaling herself on the iron fence that surrounds their home. 
Heartbroken and confused, the father drifts into psychological seclusion, 
while the mother is bewildered to why her youngest daughter would do such a 
thing. 
The Lisbon girls, who are only allowed to leave the house's property long 
enough to attend school, are severely sheltered, with the exception of the 
flirtatious, somewhat rebellious Lux. Soon, things return to normal in the 
Lisbon household, until Lux catches the eye of the popular, smooth, 
pot-smoking Trip Fontaine (Josh Hartnett). For both Trip and Lux, it is their 
first experience with teenage love, and for the first and last time, Trip 
convinces the Lisbon father, who is a math teacher at the high school, to 
allow himself and three other classmates to accompany the sisters to the 
upcoming Homecoming Dance. All does not remain happy for long, as something 
occurs between Trip and Lux that forever changes the lives of the entire 
Lisbon family, and questionably plays a part in the inexorable, 
heartbreakingly lyrical final act.
In her directing debut, 29-year-old Sofia Coppola (daughter of Francis Ford 
Coppola) has conceived of a motion picture filled with overwhelming intensity 
and remarkable conviction. In 1990, playing the ill-fated Mary Corleone in 
"The Godfather III," Coppola gave an embarrassing performance that, for some 
critics, nearly ruined the entire production. After seeing "The Virgin 
Suicides," it is clear that Coppola's destiny lies in her adeptness of, not 
acting, but filmmaking and screenwriting. Reportedly, Jeffrey Eugenides' 
novel is Coppola's favorite novel, and so in adapting it for the screen, she 
felt it was her responsibility to not only be faithful to the source 
material, but to do it complete justice. While the book remains unread by 
myself, the film can easily stand alone as a showcase for a rightfully 
burgeoning career for Sofia Coppola.
The actors--every one of them--perfectly embody their characters, and it is 
their subtle performances that give the film an added level of realism and 
unforced poignancy. Kirsten Dunst (1999's "Drop Dead Gorgeous") just keeps 
getting better with every role, and she brings the sexually charged Lux, who, 
despite her closeness with her siblings, seems to have been meant to be born 
into an entirely different family, to pulsating life. Her desperation to 
break out from the strict confines of her household are palpably felt without 
having to use dialogue to explain her longings, and it is a tribute to 
Dunst's talent that she could possibly pull off such a tricky provocation. 
Of the rest of the Lisbon sisters, Hanna Hall (who played the young Jenny in 
1994's "Forrest Gump") makes the most lasting impression as Cecilia, the 
first to commit suicide. Although mostly absent following her suicide in the 
first half-hour, visions of her tragic soul are glimpsed throughout, and her 
sullen presence consistently hangs over all that follows.
As the sisters' parents, James Woods underplays to spectacular effect as the 
father, while Kathleen Turner, nabbing her first noteworthy role in years, is 
exceptional as the mother, who finally decides to take her four daughters out 
of school and keep them locked inside the house, cut off from all outside 
influences that she fears they are being brainwashed by. In one scene that 
rings mightily true, the mother forces Lux to burn all of her music records, 
all the while Lux tearfully begs her not to make her do such a thing.
Never even seeming like he is playing a character, Josh Hartnett (2000's 
"Here on Earth") is Trip Fontaine, the "oh-so-cool" Jim Morrison-lookalike 
who doesn't quite know how to react when, for once, he isn't the one being 
pined for, but rather becomes swept away himself by his crush on Lux. In only 
a few sequences, teenage first love is more accurately portrayed than in all 
of the previous teen movies of the last year combined. One particular scene, 
in which Lux and Trip sit next to each other in the darkened school 
auditorium and shyly flirt with the possibility of holding hands, is 
something that most anyone can relate to, yet is an almost always clumsily 
overlooked nuance about human nature that is bypassed in other similar films.
Aiding in capturing the '70s era is a soundtrack that is precisely on-target, 
including Heart's "Magic Man," Styx's "Come Sail Away," and Carole King's 
"Far Away," and the luminous music score by the French group Air, serves to 
strengthen the picture's already highly evocative tone.
The final ten minutes of "The Virgin Suicides" appear to be a collection of 
fragmented memories, told again by the neighborhood boys who still manage to 
keep in touch with the Lisbon sisters, even after they are closed in their 
home. The details are shady and purposefully disjointed, and the 
nightmarishly real action reaches a head when the boys finally are given a 
chance to come into face-to-face contact with their idealistic obsessions 
once again. 
There are no easy answers presented in Sofia Coppola's "The Virgin Suicides." 
Twenty-five years later, following the deaths of all five of the Lisbon 
sisters, their impact in the lives of those admiring boys lives on, and the 
mystery surrounding what the driving force was in their pact to 
simultaneously end their lives is what gives the film added weight, as well 
as a lingering impression on the viewer. "The Virgin Suicides" is a 
devastating, haunting motion picture of inconceivable power.

Title
Review for Almost Famous (2000)
Directed by Cameron Crowe.
Cast: Patrick Fugit, Billy Crudup, Kate Hudson, Frances McDormand, Jason Lee, 
Noah Taylor, Zooey Deschanel, Philip Seymour Hoffman, Fairuza Balk, Anna 
Paquin, Liz Stauber, Bijou Phillips.
2000 - 120 minutes
Rated R (for profanity, nudity, and drug use).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, September 23, 2000.
In lesser hands, "Almost Famous" would have solely been an ode to '70s rock 
music. But director Cameron Crowe (1996's "Jerry Maguire"), who himself 
became a rock journalist for Rolling Stone magazine as an adolescent, has 
taken his past experiences and woven them into a deeply personal, 
semi-autobiographical look at the power of music, the joys and pains of true 
love, and that crucial time of wide-eyed innocence while right on the verge 
of adulthood. The picture is so much more than it outwardly presents itself 
at the onset, and in a story about the occasionally smutty decadence and 
dangerous excesses that become prominent in many musicians' lives, it is 
simply amazing how non-cynical and affectionate the film remains. Crowe 
clearly holds the story and distinct individuals found in "Almost Famous" 
near and dear to his heart, and his passion for the subject matter shines 
through at every turn.
15-year-old William (Patrick Fugit) has always lead a rather unconventional 
lifestyle. Entering school a year early, and then being instructed to skip a 
grade by his unconditionally loving, if eccentric, mother (Frances 
McDormand), he hasn't truly ever fit in with his peers, and never even 
discovered he was a year younger than he thought until age 11. That was how 
old he was when his rebellious 18-year-old sister (Zooey Deschanel) ran off 
to live out her dream as a stewardess. Leaving her countless rock records 
with William, in the next four years he grows a deep passion for music that 
he has never felt with anything else in his life.
Starting with a column for his school newspaper, William eventually manages 
to spark the interest of Creem magazine journalist Lester Bangs (Philip 
Seymour Hoffman), who gives him the assignment of doing a story on Black 
Sabbath. It is at one of their concerts where he has a chance run-in with 
their opening act, Stillwater, headed by lead guitarist Russell Hammond 
(Billy Crudup) and singer Jeff Bebe (Jason Lee). One day, William receives a 
call from Rolling Stone, who gives him the chance to write a piece on 
Stillwater for $1,000. Much to the chargin of his mother, before he knows it, 
William has set out on Stillwater's concert tour, circa 1973, putting his 
final year of high school on the backburner for this once-in-a-lifetime 
chance.
Walking into William's life at this pivotal point is 16-year-old Penny Lane 
(Kate Hudson), a so-called Band Aid that is currently acting as one of the 
muses for Stillwater, following them on their country-wide tour. She 
immediately bonds with William, who in turn grows to care about her very 
much, even as she continues to carry on an affair with the married Russell.
The moral question that is raised in "Almost Famous" is a journalistic 
controversy. William has always been nothing more than completely honest and 
accurate in what he has written, but as he becomes friends with Russell he 
witnesses more and more that begins to lean him towards a negative view of 
the band. Upon the request of the rest of the band's paranoia, Russell 
suggests to William that he paint them in a highly favorable light, and 
William debates this issue, even as it threatens to go against everything he 
has ever believed in in his writing.
Above all, "Almost Famous" is a loving tribute to a distinct era in time, 
told from the viewpoint of a quietly opinionated observationist. As played by 
fabulous newcomer Patrick Fugit, William begins as a shy young man who can 
more easily express himself through writing rather than in everyday life, and 
gradually comes into his own with every new experience he takes with him. By 
the end, William has been on an adventure that very few people his age could 
ever dream about, and through it, he has become wiser and exceptionally more 
worldly, holding onto memories that he will never forget as long as he lives.
As an ensemble, the film has been perfectly cast from top to bottom, with 
many fine performances shining through. Frances McDormand (1996's "Fargo") 
adds a great deal of depth and tenderness as William's mother, who is 
constantly scared for her son while he is on the road ("Don't take drugs" is 
her motto), but knows that it is something very important to, and for, him. 
Philip Seymour Hoffman (1999's "Magnolia"), as the self-proclaimed nerd 
Lester Bangs, is his usual impressive self, and has the picture's most 
thought-provoking and truthful line of dialogue, as he tells William over the 
phone that the most genuine conversations usually come from two people who 
have managed to strip themselves bare from all their delusions, content to be 
nothing more than two losers talking. Zooey Deschanel (1999's "Mumford"), as 
William's older sister, leaves a striking impression and radiates both heart 
and intelligence, while Fairuza Balk (1996's "The Craft"), as Band Aid member 
Sapphire, handles her mostly comedic role with aplomb, even becoming quietly 
poignant in a late scene as she mourns the fans' decreasing appreciation of 
just what makes music such a miraculous and powerful form of art and 
expression.
It is Kate Hudson (1999's "200 Cigarettes"), however, who single-handedly 
steals the movie. She literally becomes Penny Lane, a teenage girl seemingly 
beyond her years and full of confidence, but who has just as many hidden 
insecurities about herself and the direction in which her life is going. As 
the light and newfound inspiration in William's life, Hudson radiates both 
beauty and infinite kindness, striking every note exactly right. And in many 
scenes, as in one where William confronts Penny about her blindness to the 
fact that Russell doesn't really care about her, Hudson is astonishingly 
heartbreaking. Enough cannot possibly be said about this star-making 
performance, but in a word, it is extraordinary.
Coming approximately an hour into the film, there is a simple sequence that 
completely sums up the feelings that director Crowe wants his audience to 
acquire. While riding to their next concert destination, the entire tour bus 
erupts into a passionate sing-along to Elton John's touching "Tiny Dancer," 
and for that moment in each of the characters' lives, simply the act of 
expressing themselves through listening to that song suddenly evaporates all 
of their worries and conflicts. 
One could say that the film might have been slightly improved had it not been 
reportedly cut from 170 to 120 minutes, and some of the characters are 
arguably one-dimensional, but these should not be looked upon as criticisms, 
merely observations. "Almost Famous" is a great motion picture that is not so 
much about the story and characters involved, as it is about evoking a 
distinct mood and penetrating emotions. And that's all right.

Title
Review for Sugar & Spice (2001)
Directed by Francine McDougall.
Cast: Marley Shelton, Mena Suvari, Rachel Blanchard, Marla Sokoloff, Melissa 
George, Sarah Marsh, James Marsden, Alexandra Holden, Sean Young, W. Earl 
Brown.
2001 - 80 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, January 23, 2001.
Diane Weston (Marley Shelton) is the famed head chearleader of the "A" squad 
at Lincoln High School. Her best friends and co-cheerleaders are the 
tough-as-nails Kansas (Mena Suvari), the religious-nut Hannah (Rachel 
Blanchard), the Conan O'Brien-obsessed Cleo (Melissa Georgia), and the 
book-smart Lucy (Sara Marsh). From the second Diane literally knocks sweet 
football jock Jack Bartlett (James Marsden) down while doing backflips at a 
school pep rally, they falls instantly in love. Before long, Diane is 
pregnant, and realizing their love for each other, she and Jack decide to get 
married. With her at home with a bun in the oven, and Jack working 
minimum-wage at a video store, Diane forms a plan for her and the girls to 
learn from the mistakes of movie character thieves, so that they can 
successfully rob a bank and get the amount of cash each of them needs for the 
future.
This is the setup of "Sugar & Spice," a highly satirical jab at cheerleaders, 
bank robberies, and teenage pregnancy from director Francine McDougall and 
screenwriter Mandy Nelson. What begins as an inanely unfunny "stupid teen 
movie" eventually finds its footing at the 20-minute mark to become a 
surprisingly clever and knowing comedy that curiously pays tribute to many 
popular gangster/thief movies, including "Reservoir Dogs," "Heat," "Dog Day 
Afternoon," and "Point Break." The writing miraculously becomes fresh and 
appropriately zany, and the film runs at a fast pace, never growing outwardly 
tedious for a minute (save for the whole terrible opening section).
Moving at the trajectory it was remaining successfully on, "Sugar & Spice" 
might have been an early moviegoing surprise for 2001. Unfortunately, just as 
the film has gained maximum momentum, it ends abruptly in midstream, never 
wrapping up its characters or the story in any satisfying manner. At just 80 
minutes (including end credits), the picture feels rushed and rather 
pointless--a nice enough diversion, but one that fails to go that extra mile 
to become anything other than such.
The characters, in staying with the satire of the piece, which often reminds 
one of 1999's far superior "Election" and "Drop Dead Gorgeous," fit neatly 
into the package and are entertaining individuals, except for one problem: 
they are never developed outside of one or two personal traits. Because of 
this, their potentially bright, inspired performances are more or less 
wasted. Marley Shelton (1999's "The Bachelor") appears in almost every scene 
as the put-upon protagonist, Diane, but she remains at arm's length with the 
viewer, never being allowed to break out from a broad caricature. The same 
goes for the rest of the girls, with rising star Mena Suvari (1999's 
"American Beauty") sorely wasted as the edgy Kansas. Marla Sokoloff (2000's 
"Whatever It Takes") does offer up some fun, however, as the spiteful Lisa, a 
member of the "B" squad cheerleading team who dispises the "A" squad and, 
coincidentally, witnesses the bank robbery and recognizes the girls (despite 
being equipped with Betty doll masks). Meanwhile, James Marsden (2000's 
"X-Men") has nothing to do but look and act like a lovable, if immature, 
doofus.
For the majority of its too-brief running time, "Sugar & Spice" runs so close 
to the line of delightfully savage lampooning that it is all the more 
disappointing when the movie never follows through with its ambitious nature. 
Writer Mandy Nelson surely knows how to write smart-allecky, at time even 
ingenious, dialogue, but she has failed in exposing any sort of emotional 
truths about its characters or the situations. Since that is the key to a 
good satire--playfully mocking people and valid societal issues while 
offering up a bit of ironic realism--"Sugar & Spice" ultimately misses the 
boat by a millimeter. 
    - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
      http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman
http://www.atnzone.com

Title
Review for Stigmata (1999)
Directed by Rupert Wainwright.
Cast: Patricia Arquette, Gabriel Byrne, Jonathan Pryce, Nia Long, Rade 
Sherbedgia, Portia De Rossi, Jack Donner.
1999 - 102 minutes
Rated R (for violence, gore, profanity, and sexual situations).
Reviewed September 11, 1999.
Not knowing any better, I would have guessed that "Stigmata," the new 
religious-themed possession tale, is just a fancy name for "Exorcist IV," and 
I may be right. Let's look at the evidence: a young woman possessed; a priest 
struggling with his own beliefs and feelings; mysteriously-inflicted slash 
marks; a climactic possession sequence; and pea soup. Well, okay, pea soup 
maybe be an exaggeration, but it might as well have been included, for, as 
directed by Rupert Wainwright, the film's only major differences to the 
classic 1973 horror film, "The Exorcist," are a quick-cut style for those 
whose attention span has been depleted by MTV, and a disappointing lack of 
any believable human story. On second thought, perhaps "Stigmata" is actually 
"Beyond the Door IV," in disguise.
In a prologue set in a dusty, Catholic region of Brazil, an American woman 
purchases a rosary that once belonged to Father Paulo Alameida (Jack Donner), 
who is now lying in a coffin in a nearby church, the statue of Mary beside 
him bleeding human blood from its eyes. Switch to the city of Pittsburgh, 
23-year-old Frankie Paige (Patricia Arquette), a talented beautician who, at 
night, likes to go club (and man)-hopping with her best friend (Nia Long), 
receives a gift from her mother that has arrived at her front door. Among the 
small presents is the rosary she bought in Brazil, and soon after, Frankie is 
attacked in her bath tub by an unknown force that causes her wrists to bleed 
straight through, as if large pegs had been nailed into her. At the hospital, 
the wounds are suspected to be self-inflicted, despite Frankie's argument 
that she loves herself and has no stress ("I cut hair!"). Before long, she 
also is tortured with slash marks across her body while on an out-of-control 
subway cart, thorn cuts on her face, and occasionally is being possessed and 
forced to recite the Aramaic language, which hasn't been used in thousands of 
years. Enter Father Andrew Kiernan (Gabriel Byrne), a part priest/part 
scientist from the Vatican, who travels to Pittsburgh to try and help 
Frankie. His guess is that she has the curse of the stigmata, the inflicted 
wounds of christ, and since she has had four of the five major wounds, she is 
in grave danger of dying if it occurs again. There's just one catch: 
Stigmatics are always highly religious individuals, while Frankie is an 
atheist who is quickly starting to believe in otherwordly forces.
"Stigmata" is a relentless and thoroughly unpleasant horror film that is so 
fast-paced and stylized, with loud alternative music and quick cuts popping 
up at every chance it gets, that the whole experience of watching it 
gradually became an ordeal. In one scene after the next, we watch Frankie 
being graphically mutilated by something we cannot see, and while it 
sometimes is powerful and unsettling, that mostly results from all of the 
bloodletting. In between, there are painfully few exposition scenes in which 
we get to know the characters because, every time some dialogue enters in, 
Frankie abruptly is pierced through her feet or various other body parts. A 
major flaw this is, because in order to care about this woman who is in a 
dire situation in which any moment could be her last, we have to be able to 
sympathize with her plight. According to screenwriters Tom Lazarus and Rick 
Ramage, their idea of satisfying character development is showing Frankie 
smoking and drinking at clubs, and then bringing men home with her. Patricia 
Arquette, who, at 31, admittedly looks a little long in the tooth to be 
playing a 23-year-old, tries her best in an unlikable role that helps none in 
displaying her considerable, but usually wasted, acting chops. 
Gabriel Byrne fares better, as a priest who is dedicated to his profession, 
but not enough to turn away from a romantic subplot that forms between 
Frankie and himself. And why the heck not? Byrne may very well be one of the 
better-looking priest characters in any movie I've seen (certainly more so 
than the various Fathers in "The Exorcist"), and aside from this casting 
flaw, he really is a strong presence in his more challenging moments 
on-screen.
At times, the repititious violence that fills the screen throughout grows 
overly tedious (I mean, how many near-fatal wounds can a normal person get 
without dying?), and the supporting characters may have helped break up the 
grisliness of the proceedings. They, too, are severely wasted, particularly 
Nia Long (a fine actress in her own right), who is stuck playing the 
"concerned friend" character. Unlike most, though, the film doesn't even 
follow through with her, as she disappears midway through and is never seen 
again.
As "Stigmata" plays out its bag of tricks, continuously growing more and more 
ludicrous with each passing moment until it completely collapses in its 
fire-and-brimstone climactic exorcism, one is led to wonder exactly how 
anyone would like the film. The story developments and character interactions 
are especially unrewarding, particularly the ending, which is supposed to be 
a greatly touching moment, but only comes off as cornball. The film 
ultimately leaves a bitter taste in your mouth, mostly from its lack of 
emotion, and comes off feeling overblown rather than the least bit scary. I 
think I've changed my mind about "Stigmata" being the third sequel in the 
famous possession series; on second thought, it's more akin to "Exorcist II: 
The Heretic."
 - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
    NZone Magazine

Title
Review for Get Over It (2001)
Directed by Tommy O'Haver.
Cast: Ben Foster, Kirsten Dunst, Melissa Sagemiller, Shane West, Colin Hanks, 
Martin Short, Sisqo, Mila Kunis, Ed Begley Jr., Swoosie Kurtz, Kylie Bax, Zoe 
Saldana, Vitamin C, Carmen Electra.
2001 - 90 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity, crude humor, and teen drinking).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, March 10, 2001.
"Get Over It," the new teen film surprisingly directed by Tommy O'Haver 
(1998's "Billy's Hollywood Screen Kiss"), has enough offbeat elements to 
distinguish it from the pack of cliched movies of its ilk that have been 
released in recent years. The movie is predictable, and isn't particularly 
original, but right from the opening credits sequence, in which singer 
Vitamin C, accompanied by the residents of a suburban town and even a 
marching band, perform a song-and-dance number to "Love Will Keep Us 
Together" while following the main character as he walks sullenly down the 
street, it becomes obvious that this isn't going to be just any ordinary high 
school comedy.
Nice guy Berke Lawrence (Ben Foster), a high school senior, is crushed when 
his girlfriend of sixteen months, Allison (Melissa Sagemiller), dumps him. 
Knowing her since they were still in diapers, Berke is sure that they are 
soul mates and deserve to be together. Hurting him even more is that she has 
begun a relationship with artificial former boy band member Striker (Shane 
West). When Allison and Striker decide to try out for the school play, a 
musical version of William Shakespeare's "A Midsummer's Night's Dream," Berke 
desperately auditions, as well, in an attempt to woo her back. Coaching him 
on acting, dancing, and singing is aspiring songwriter Kelly (Kirsten Dunst), 
the younger sister of Berke's best friend (Colin Hanks), who also has a part 
in the production and begins to grow strong feelings for him. In true 
inevitable fashion, Berke is too involved in getting Allison back to notice 
that the person right in front of him, Kelly, is his true perfect match.
While "Get Over It" is threatened into become a tiresome retread of 1999's 
"10 Things I Hate About You" and 2000's "Whatever It Takes," the bright 
performances and mostly non-stereotypical teenaged characters save the day. 
Although Kirsten Dunst (2000's "The Virgin Suicides") is perhaps too talented 
an actress to be wasting her time with material that is so obviously above 
her, if I could choose any young performer to appear in my own personal teen 
movie, it would be her. Dunst is not only extremely cute, but has the acting 
chops to add depth to any part she is given. While her previous excursion 
into high school territory, 2000's "Bring It On," was a better movie with a 
more demanding role, Dunst lights up every one of her scenes, and also proves 
to have a lovely singing voice.
Ben Foster (1999's "Liberty Heights") plays Berke, the main character, and as 
such, he does well with the part and shows off a great deal of charisma. 
Newcomer Melissa Sagemiller, as the aloof Allison, is also fine, and what a 
refreshing change of pace it was to not have her be portrayed as a bitch, but 
as a relatively likable person. Mila Kunis (TV's "That 70's Show"), as 
Kelly's friend, Basin, is attractive in a small role, as is Kylie Bax (2000's 
"Boys and Girls"), as a beautiful, but terribly klutzy classmate. 
On the other end of the spectrum, Shane West shows zero of the magnetism he 
presented in 2000's "Whatever It Takes," although, to be fair, it isn't all 
his fault. West's Striker is a shallow, distasteful individual with no 
redeeming qualities. Zoe Saldana, so wonderful in last year's "Center Stage," 
is wasted as Allison's friend, Maggie, and R&B artist Sisqo, as another 
friend of Berke's, gives an amateurish performance, to say the least. His 
appearance proves to be nothing more than a gimmick to draw his fans in, as 
his character could have been discarded completely without any change to the 
story at hand.
What really raises "Get Over It" above being just mediocre is Martin Short 
(1999's "Mumford"). As the tell-it-like-it-is theater director Dr. Desmond 
Forrest-Oates, Short is hysterical in every scene he's in. When he's not 
saying something funny, his brilliant facial expressions alone are, and it is 
a genuine treat to watch his comedic talents flow so joyously. This is almost 
an Oscar-caliber performance, and something that comes as completely 
unexpected in the film.
While not all of director Tommy O'Haver's stylistic choices work (the 
occasional leaps into the fantasy world of "A Midsummer's Night's Dream" grow 
annoying very quickly), his heart is always in the right place, and his 
ambition is admirable in a genre that is admittedly so worn out. The original 
songs, written by Marc Shaiman (1999's "South Park: Bigger, Longer, & 
Uncut"), are a lot of fun and also aid in raising the movie to a higher level 
than it otherwise would have gone. "Get Over It" isn't great, and it isn't 
deep, but it doesn't aspire to be. It's a lighthearted, frothy entertainment 
that goes down with ease, and is something that I am pleased I saw.
Special Note: Could someone please tell me when Carmen Electra's name is 
splashed on all of the ads and posters for this film, when she is onscreen 
for literally three seconds and has one line of dialogue. She does reappear 
during the music video over the end credits, but why? And even more 
mysterious, why did she choose to appear at all when her role is little more 
than akin to being an extra? Just wondering. On second thought, maybe I 
should just get over it (sorry, I couldn't resist).
    - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
      http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman
http://www.atnzone.com

Title
Review for American Beauty (1999)
Directed by Sam Mendes.
Cast: Kevin Spacey, Annette Bening, Thora Birch, Wes Bentley, Mena Suvari, 
Chris
Cooper, Peter Gallagher, Allison Janney, Scott Bakula, Sam Robards.
1999 - 120 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, sex, nudity, and drug use).
Opens 9/15 (NY, LA); 9/24 (Other Major Markets); 10/1 (Wide).
Reviewed September 9, 1999.
In recent years, films centering on dysfunctional families have been on the 
uprise, from Jodie Foster's 1995 sophomore directing effort, `Home for the 
Holidays,' to 1997's tragic Ang Lee drama, `The Ice Storm,' to 1998's Todd 
Solondz black comedy, `Happiness.' The question, of course, is why are 
today's filmmakers so interested in depicting the clearly unstable 
relationships going on within a seemingly normal American household? And the 
answer, no doubt, is that its appeal stems from the viewer being able to 
relate to the characters and circumstances because, let's face it, no family 
is `normal,' whatever that may mean. `The Ice Storm' was a searing film about 
the way some parents unknowingly fail their children due to their own 
shortcomings and selfishness, as was the shockingly brutal `Happiness,' about 
the dark areas that hide within the exterior calm of suburbia, but no film 
that I have ever seen has portrayed a family, or families, in this case, with 
quite the unnerving honesty and sharp-eyed realism and sympathy of `American 
Beauty,' Sam Mendes' flawless, heartbreaking directing debut. Simply put, it 
is the most thought-provoking and powerful motion picture of the whole 
decade. 
To summarize the premise is to trivialize its multi-layered and 
clearly-defined characters, and the wholly unpredictable story developments, 
but here goes. Like Robert Altman's most impressive work (1975's `Nashville,' 
1993's `Short Cuts'), `American Beauty' is a meticulously-written tapestry of 
the lives of two families living side-by-side in a suburban neighborhood in 
Anywhere, USA. Occasionally narrated by Lester Burnham (Kevin Spacey), a 
middle-aged man stuck in an emotionally dead and artificial marriage with 
Carolyn (Annette Bening), a real-estate agent, he tells us right from the 
very first scene that in a year, he will be dead, even though he doesn't know 
it yet. Without being told the particulars of his impending death, Lester 
decides to stop living his life the way everyone else expects him to, and 
immediately quits his sickeningly bland office job. Everything comes into 
focus for him when, while attending a high school basketball game to see his 
teenage daughter, Jane (Thora Birch), perform as a cheerleader, his undivided 
attention moves towards the most beautiful girl he's ever seen: the 
pixie-like, alluring Angela Hayes (Mena Suvari), who also happens to be a 
high school student and Jane's best friend. Soon, Lester is lifting weights 
and smoking pot, free of all worries aside from hoping to have a chance with 
the sexually promiscuous Angela. Meanwhile, Carolyn starts having an affair 
with `The King' (Peter Gallagher), the most successful real estate agent in 
the town and the figure whom she most wants to be like. Due to Lester and
Carolyn's obvious failure as parents and their own self-involvement, they 
don't realize
how neglected they are making Jane feel, and Angela is no help, as she is 
constantly bragging about her latest sexual conquests and repeated success in 
everything she does. Saving up money for a breast augmentation, even though 
she doesn't need it, and with the self-esteem of an gnat, Jane luckily finds 
solace in the form of 18-year-old Ricky Fitts (Wes Bentley), a dark, offbeat 
senior whom she first meets when she catches him filming her with his video 
camera, something he is never without. Ricky has also just moved in next door 
to the Burnham's, complete with a strict ex-Marine father (Chris Cooper) who 
checks his urine every few months to make sure he isn't on drugs, and a 
mother (Allison Janney) who inhabits the house as, more or less, a living 
zombie with no spontaneity of life left in her. 
`American Beauty,' which superficially refers to either Angela's physical 
appearance or the flowers Carolyn is growing in her garden, actually gets its 
name from the positive, existential way in which Ricky looks at the world. 
Constantly filming and documenting even the smallest thing with his camera, 
Ricky has escaped the unhappiness of his actual home life by finding simple 
beauty within the world, and in one lyrical sequence, he shows Jane `the most 
beautiful thing I've ever filmed,' which is the surprisingly extraordinary 
sight of a plastic bag blowing around outside on a blustery winter day, right 
before a snowfall. By looking closer at the people, objects, and nature 
around him, Ricky has discovered a truth within the world that not many 
people have the priviledge of ever seeing, and sometimes, he says, `the world 
is filled with so much beauty, I feel like I can't take it.' It is Ricky who 
also acts as the catalyst for Lester's drastic, personality-altering changes, 
as he believes that life is too short to waste your time doing what others 
expect you to do, and instead, should simply live your life as if each second 
were your last. 
In scene after marvelous scene, the trials, tribulations, and experiences of 
family life is portrayed as accurately as it ever has been in a fictional 
film, and every detail hits the bull's-eye. And as in real life, the film is 
carefully-structured in a way that it often feels like we are watching a 
series of moments in the lives of a group of people, rather than a 
cut-and-paste story, like so many conventional films fall victim to. The way 
Carolyn breaks down and cries in frustration after failing to sell a house; 
the way Ricky, camera in hand, zooms in on Jane's bedroom window, past Angela 
seductively dancing, and onto the mirror image of Jane smiling; the way 
Lester, liberated from quitting his job, belts out the 70s rock song, 
`American Woman,' by The Guess Who, as he drives down the street; the way 
Lester sneaks into Jane's room to find Angela's telephone number, only to 
hang up after calling this young girl who is at least twenty-five years 
younger than he; the way Jane, realizing she is falling in love, takes 
Ricky's hand and puts it in her own; the way Carolyn tries to have an honest 
mother-daughter moment, only for her to outrageously accuse Jane of being `an 
ungrateful little brat'; and the way Ricky's mom, an enormously depressed 
woman, doesn't even hear her son walk over to her and say,
`Hi,' are just a handful of individual moments that come together to form a 
magnificent whole, and that isn't even mentioning the tour de force climax, 
set on a stormy night, that left me physically reacting to the proceedings 
on-screen, on the edge of completely losing my composure with strong 
conflicting emotions of shock, curiosity, and absolute devastation.
There is no possible cast that could have improved upon this stunning group 
of actors, nor is there any way to pin-point just one outstanding 
performance. All six of the central thesps deserve Academy Award nominations 
come next year, and it would be criminal to overlook their incomparable work 
here. Kevin Spacey, a former Oscar winner for 1995's `The Usual Suspects,' 
gives his best performance to date, and one that is filled with such an 
overwhelming air of freedom that it is a treat just to watch him work. A man 
lacking in parenting skills, it isn't that Lester doesn't love Jane, but just 
that he is thoroughly fed up with his dead-end existence, and feels that it's 
about time he does what he wants to do.
Annette Bening, in her second stunning turn this year alone (after the 
underrated,
overlooked `In Dreams'), successfully paints her character of Carolyn with a 
vital
mixture of coldness and misery. Always hiding behind a phony facade of joy 
while out in public, she is desperate to fool everyone else into believing 
that she has an ideal marriage with Lester, even though they haven't actually 
been intimate in a long time. It seems the only thing keeping them from 
getting a divorce is their fear that it will only hurt Jane even more; little 
do they know it's probably making things even more of a disaster, as Jane has 
openly told Ricky herself that, `they've got to be psychologically damaging 
me in some way.'
Thora Birch, a 17-year-old actress who has been appearing in feature films 
for eleven
years, and someone I have watched closely since 1991 when she gave an 
Oscar-caliber performance in `Paradise,' practically blew me away with the 
maturity and
self-assuredness that she has gained as an actress since her last major role, 
in 1996's terrible `Alaska.' Birch, easily outdistancing the best 
performances from some of her peers, such as Christina Ricci and Gaby 
Hoffmann, is poignant and effective as the sullen Jane, and due to some 
surprisingly adult material, it obviously took a great deal of courage on her 
part, and she should be commended for it. Jane's relationship with her 
uninvolved parents is summed up early on when she matter-of-factly tells her 
father, `you've barely spoken to me in the last six months.'
Newcomer Wes Bentley, who won the important, decidedly difficult role of 
Ricky over
many of Hollywood's major young stars, is striking and intense throughout, 
but also
affecting, as this misunderstood teenager whose only claim to happiness is in 
his magical, bright-eyed world view. After all, he certainly doesn't get much 
familial support from his hot-tempered father, vividly and 
three-dimensionally played by Chris Cooper (1999's `October Sky'), or his 
zoned-out mother, in a performance of almost unbearable despair by the 
usually comedic actress, Allison Janney (1999's `Drop Dead Gorgeous').
And finally, Mena Suvari is a real discovery as the self-absorbed Angela, the 
character who triggers Lester's lust. Last appearing as the sweet choir girl, 
Heather, in this summer's `American Pie,' Suvari makes a full 180-degree turn 
to present us with a distinct character who, like everyone else, turns out to 
have many multiple layers behind her `cool' exterior. Angela, who judges her 
chances on becoming a model based on her desirability and the amount of 
people she has sex with, fears nothing worse than being ordinary, something 
that, if she would just stop to notice, she very well could be.
With a haunting, unnerving music score, by Thomas Newman; astoundingly 
gorgeous cinematography, by Conrad L. Hall, in which every frame and lighting 
decision turns out to be extremely important in its visual collage of the 
bleak corners in these characters' seemingly happy lives, as well as in the 
showstopping way it observes the things most people take for granted, such as 
a tree, or a person's face; and most importantly, in the literally 
pitch-perfect screenplay, by Alan Ball, `American Beauty' is an instant 
American film classic, and one that cannot be labelled under a certain genre, 
as it has both drama and comedy, both of which are sparked from its natural 
dialogue and sharp human observations. Entirely unpredictable as life's 
fortuitous turns and developments usually are, what we have here is a 
painstakingly on-target portrait of the human condition, as seen through the 
eyes of a group of always-original characters. Better yet, none of them are 
ever shortchanged or judged, nor are all of their dimensions revealed 
immediately, but instead, we learn about them as their true selves are 
gradually revealed. Because of this, there are no good or bad guys, but 
rather wholly sympathetic creations that, in one way or another, any adult or 
teenager will be able to identify with. By the time the ending arrived, a 
simply-filmed emotional powerhouse, the film had so deeply involved me that I 
felt as if I had known these characters all my life, and therefore, what 
happened to them meant just as much, if not more, to me, than in any
other film I have ever seen. `American Beauty' is a devastating motion 
picture of
unconceivable power, made with both intelligence and care, and it may just 
cause you to reevaluate the whole way you view the world. In an overstuffed 
Fall movie season  don't let this film fall through the cracks; it deserves 
all of the recognition and acclaim that has already been bestowed upon it, 
and should be trumpeted as an important turning point in the art of 
filmmaking, particularly with the start of the new millenium so quickly 
approaching. In one word, `American Beauty' is beautiful.

Title
Review for S.L.C. Punk! (1999)
Directed by James Merendino.
Cast: Matthew Lillard, Michael Goorjian, Annabeth Gish, Til Schweiger, 
Jennifer Lien, Summer Phoenix, Devon Sawa, James Duval.
1999 - 97 minutes
Rated R (for extreme profanity, mild violence, and sexual situations).
Reviewed April 25, 1999.
Director James Merendino's debut film, "SLC Punk!," short for "Salt Lake 
City," is said to be loosely based on his own experiences, and the film 
most definately does have an autobiographical feel to it. Although often 
uneven and flawed, it successfully and accurately captures the way of 
life for a certain group of people, as well as a definite time period.
Set in Salt Lake City during the Ronald Reagan era, circa 1985, Stevo 
(Matthew Lillard), a college graduate whose wealthy family wants him to 
continue his education at Harvard Law School, is one of the few 
so-called punks left in the seemingly dead-end town. Boosting short 
blue-dyed hair, Stevo is quick to narrate and talk to the camera about 
his personal views, including why he is an anarchist, and the reasons 
why he has chosen to be a punk, which is due to (1) rebellion, (2) 
individualism, and (3) because it is in his nature. Always with his best 
buddy in tow, "Heroin" Bob (Michael Goorjian) who, despite his name, is 
against all illegal drugs and is terrified of needles, Stevo lives in a 
torn-up, scummy building and spends his nights going to parties and 
punk-rock clubs. He definately has no desire to go to law school, 
believing it makes for a meaningless existence, but also realizing that 
he has no personal plans or goals of his own, and eventually begins to 
learn that he can't be a "punk" forever. Sooner or later, he's got to do 
something, anything, with his life.
Before seeing "SLC Punk!," actor Matthew Lillard's goofball, 
over-the-top persona had already grown tiresome for myself, and with 
such films as 1996's "Scream" and 1999's "She's All That," he 
essentially played the same character and didn't seem to be stretching 
or testing his acting abilities. That has all changed with this latest 
film, which not only makes Lillard the complete star, but also gives him 
a great deal of textural material to work with, thus helping him to 
fully develop into a three-dimensional and likable character whom you 
respect for his firm, individual beliefs, but still hope that he is able 
to make something more substantial of his life. To tell the truth, 
Lillard was the perfect choice for the role, and it's doubtful that 
anyone, not even someone more accomplished, could have pulled it off any 
better. There isn't a false note anywhere in his performance, and when 
he is on-screen discussing his opinions to the camera, he holds and 
mesmerizes the screen, which is something I never honestly expected from 
Lillard. Not only that, but without Lillard, "SLC Punk!" most likely 
would have been looked at as a failure of a movie, and I wouldn't have 
been able to give it a marginal recommendation. Fortunately, I can 
because for whatever weaknesses there appears to be in the writing, much 
of the material is salvaged by Lillard and miraculously has become 
oftentimes effective.
If only the screenplay, written by Merendino himself, had given the 
other various characters as much material to work with, "SLC Punk!," 
which premiered at this year's Sundance Film Festival, might have been a 
great movie, but it unfortunately misses that prestigious mark. Michael 
Goorjian is given a little something to do as the naive "Heroin" Bob 
who, even after meeting and falling in love with a free-willing woman 
(Annabeth Gish), is still unable to see that the road he is hidding down 
is very bleak. Devon Sawa makes a brief, touching appearance as a fellow 
punk who, late in the film, is discovered to have been thrown out of his 
mother's house and is now a bum on the streets. Sawa's character, in 
fact, was wholeheartedly an original and intriguing creation, and it's 
too bad he wasn't given more screen time. Ditto for Summer Phoenix 
(younger sister of River and Joaquin), as Brandy, a young woman whom 
Stevo meets late in the picture and only helps him to see how he needs 
to make a u-turn in his life. The aforementioned Gish is criminally 
wasted, as is Jennifer Lien as a wild gal that Stevo briefly falls for 
before she is discovered to be cheating on him. If the supporting cast, 
whom are obviously a group of talented young actors, had been as fully 
realized as Stevo was, it would have given the film a little boost in 
its potential.
Another downfall that the film has is that the pacing was often in need 
of slowing down, as the near-constant action and noise occasionally 
tended to grate on the nerves. A more deliberate pace, and an increased 
number of scenes where the characters simply talked, would have 
ultimately improved the film on the whole. 
Still, "SLC Punk!" is an assured first feature from Merendino, a 
filmmaker whom I look forward to his next film from. The basic morale of 
the film is eloquently hammered home and it was impossible not to get 
caught up in Stevo, who is one of the most unforgettable film characters 
I've come across so far this year. Greg Littlewood's magnificent 
cinematography paints Salt Lake City as a somewhat uneventful but 
pleasant place to visit, and various stylistic approaches, such as slow 
motion, freeze-frame, and quick editing flashes that give off a 
hallucinatory quality, all work well. "SLC Punk!" might have several 
flaws in its storytelling and writing aspects, which would have 
benefitted from tightening, but the film is an intelligent portrayal of 
a group of "punks" who are basically normal people struggling for their 
own freedom, and it is rare that we get such a realistic look into 
someone's life in today's films.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Crazy in Alabama (1999)
Directed by Antonio Banderas.
Cast: Melanie Griffith, Lucas Black, David Morse, Meat Loaf Aday, Cathy 
Moriarty, Louis Miller Jr., John Beasley, Elizabeth Perkins, Rod Steiger, 
Richard Schiff, Sandra Seacat.
1999 - 104 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for mild violence and profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, October 26, 1999.
Over the years, there have been innumerable films made about the Civil Rights 
movement of the 1960s, to the point where a filmmaker couldn't possibly say 
anything that hasn't already been said before. With that noted, "Crazy in 
Alabama" doesn't have any original insights into the era, nor is it 
particularly well-handled in that arena. Fortunately, we virtually get two 
45-minute movies that interweave between one another, until they come 
together in the climax, and the other story is the one that sparkles.
Based on the novel by Mark Childress, this comedy-drama, set in the summer of 
1965 in the Deep South, makes no excuses for its eccentricities, as Lucille 
(Melanie Griffith), a 34-year-old housewife with seven children, tells her 
mother (Sandra Seacat) even before the opening credits that she not only 
poisoned her husband, but decapitated him. Wacky, but otherwise not 
dangerous, Lucille did what she did because her abusive marriage was 
suffocating her, and she has no regrets. Leaving her kids with her mother, 
Lucille, and with her husband's head in tow, sets off for Hollywood to become 
what she's always dreamt of being--an actress. But not so fast, because as 
Lucille's story plays out, the film is narrated by her nephew, Peejoe (Lucas 
Black), a 13-year-old who admires his Aunt Lucille to no end, and is sent 
away to live with his loving uncle (David Morse) and narrow-minded aunt 
(Cathy Moriarty) for the summer. While at the city's public swimming pool, he 
briefly meets another kid (Louis Miller Jr.) just a few years older than he 
before witnessing him later thrown from a fence by the crooked sheriff (Meat 
Loaf Aday) after banishing him from the pools because of his race. The kid 
dies, the sheriff claims he never touched him, but Peejoe knows the truth, 
and doesn't want him to get away with it. Meanwhile, as Lucille garners a 
guest spot on the television show, "Bewitched," she senses that the police 
are soon going to close in on her.
While the story of Peejoe, as he learns several life lessons about the 
importance of equality and tolerance, feels rather by-the-numbers and 
predictable, "Crazy in Alabama" ultimately works due to the unforgettable 
character of Lucille, played by Melanie Griffith in her first truly 
worthwhile starring role since 1991's "Paradise." Griffith is often 
criticized for playing the ditzy blond with the childish, high voice, and 
those detractors of her work have always mystified me. While she may not 
always make the right career moves, Griffith is a wonderful actress who can 
effortlessly play both comedy and drama, and some people seem to forget that 
she was nominated for an Academy Award in 1988 for her breakthrough role in 
"Working Girl." "Crazy in Alabama" plays up both sides of her acting talent, 
and she steals the film away from everyone else within the first five 
minutes. Just take a look at the sequence midway through in which Lucille is 
talking on the phone with Peejoe, and after he asks her if she's alright, she 
replies, "Yes, I'm alright. I'm free! For the first time in my entire life I 
am free!" Griffith says the words with such effervescent life that it's 
obvious she is a performer who loves what she does, and is instantly charming.
As her counterpart, Lucas Black gives another effective, understated 
performance after his role in 1996's "Sling Blade." If the subplot about the 
wrongful murder of the black child, and Peejoe's struggle to let people know 
the truth concerning his death, is cliched, at least Black is able to create 
a character that is worth following, even when the plot surrounding him isn't.
Both characters end up together for a climactic trial, after Lucille has been 
arrested, and my heart almost sank. After all, did we really need to have to 
sit through another stock courtroom scene? Luckily, it worked, managing to 
pull both laughs and bittersweet truth out of the matters at hand, and never 
went sappy like so many films of its ilk usually do. On the downside, the 
picture ends before the other subplot, involving the crime that the sheriff 
commits, is solved, and so we are left hanging by a plot thread that we had 
just dedicated 45 minutes of our time with. 
"Crazy in Alabama" is helmed by actor Antonio Banderas, making his directing 
debut, and even when the film smells of the word, "amateur," Banderas can 
rest assured that, in a week which saw six major film releases, he made one 
out of only two movies that I liked (the other being Martin Scorsese's 
masterful "Bringing Out the Dead"). The premise may not sound like the most 
probable choice for someone from a foreign country, but Banderas proves that 
you can successfully make a film that doesn't relate directly to you, simply 
if the underlying themes are felt deeply enough.

Title
Review for Man on the Moon (1999)
Directed by Milos Forman.
Cast: Jim Carrey, Danny DeVito, Courtney Love, Paul Giamatti, Vincent 
Schiavelli, Jerry Lawler, Marilu Henner, Judd Hirsch, Carol Kane, Christopher 
Lloyd.
1999 - 118 minutes
Rated R (for profanity, sexual situations, and nudity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, December 24, 1999.
Comedy comes in many different forms in life. This could also be said about 
the humor of Jim Carrey, who began his rise to stardom with 1994's 
intentionally dumb (and unfunny) "Ace Ventura: Pet Detective," followed it up 
with that Summer's goofy comedy-fantasy "The Mask," and concluded the year 
with the also intentionally dumb (but, this time, very funny) "Dumb and 
Dumber." If humor is going to work, the setup and payoff have to be exactly 
right, and the material has to be strong. That's why "Ace Ventura" failed 
miserably in the joke arena, while the wittier "Dumb and Dumber" had me 
practically rolling in the aisles upon first viewing.
Andy Kaufman, who died in 1984 from lung cancer, while still only in his 
thirties, broke these rules. Not wanting to be a comic so much as an 
"entertainer," much of his routines stemmed from doing the opposite of what 
everyone expected him to do, and that utter unpredictability is what 
ultimately propelled him to stardom. A hilarious prologue opens the film with 
an ingenious bang, in which Andy (Jim Carrey) jokingly states to the viewer 
that the following movie isn't very good, and so proceeds to run the end 
credits at the beginning, only for the screen to go black for about 20 
seconds. This is a perfect example of what he got his pleasure out of doing: 
toying with the audience's expectations, just to conclude with a bang that 
could only be described as being from the mind of a comedic genius.
Constantly insisting that he does not wish to be a comic, however, the first 
time we see the adult Andy, he is working at a standup comedy club. His 
material is offbeat, to be sure, but he is a man who is able to get his 
audiences involved most of the time, even if that means angering them. Any 
reaction was better than no reaction at all, thought Andy. One night, talent 
agent George Shapiro (Danny DeVito) sees Andy in one of his acts, and 
immediately sets up a meeting with him. Before long, he has appeared as the 
"musical guest" on TV's "Saturday Night Live" and, although he hates sitcoms, 
after a few requests are met, he becomes one of the stars of the ABC series, 
"Taxi," gaining a sizable fan base. Andy also has an alter ego, as an 
offensive, uncooperative Las Vegas lounge singer named Tony Clifton, whom 
many people who know Andy don't even realize it is the same person. 
Milos Forman's "Man on the Moon" is a biopic that does not have a 
particularly strong story that pulls the happenings together into a whole, 
but that is because, as is, Andy Kaufman was a one-of-a-kind, eccentric 
person, but someone that probably did not warrant a full-length feature on 
him. Eventually, Andy meets Lynne (Courtney Love) and they fall in love. 
"Taxi" is canceled, to his delight. He has always longed to appear at 
Carnegie Hall, and he finally gets to live that dream. Unfortunately, because 
Andy was a man constantly trying to misconstrue the truth, when he finally is 
diagnosed with lung cancer, initially everyone believes it is just another 
one of his pranks. 
"Man on the Moon" is a fascinating film that, while not always dramatically 
sound, never stops being an entertaining picture. Forman and screenwriters 
Scott Alexander and Larry Karaszewski never stray far from Andy (come to 
think of it, he may very well be in every scene), as it follows him from one 
thing in his life to the next. Nothing that happens is extraordinary or 
surprising, particularly if you are familiar with Andy or have even seen the 
theatrical trailer, which is effective but pretty much a 2 1/2-minute version 
of the film. 
Instead, what pulls the viewer in so deeply is Jim Carrey himself. Whereas 
1998's "The Truman Show" was a step in the right direction towards a serious 
role, there were moments when his usual routine would break through. In "Man 
on the Moon," Carrey embodies the life and soul of Andy so completely and 
convincingly that it is almost like watching the real Andy, resurrected. A tou
r de force portrayal, Carrey is deserving, and should rightfully garner, an 
Oscar nomination for his work here, which is superior to anything else he has 
done on film.
Courtney Love, a surprisingly talented actress who was outstanding in 
Forman's last film, 1996's "The People Vs. Larry Flynt," is given a slight 
role this time around, as Lynne, Andy's true love later in his life. The 
writing severely botches this subplot as it feels rushed and uneven. In their 
first scene together, Lynne asks Andy if he is always such an asshole, and in 
the next scene, they are going out on a date and discussing traveling to 
Memphis to get married. Andy may not be like other guys, but Lynne loves 
him--is apparently attracted to his intentional multiple personalities. The 
mild truthfulness that stems from Lynne is thanks solely to Love, who does 
everything she can within the confines of the noticeably limited role.
If "Man on the Moon" is an intriguing film from start to finish, the only 
really powerful and dramatically impressive moment comes in the recreation of 
Andy Kaufman's funeral, which reunites most of the cast of characters, 
including some of the costars of "Taxi," such as Marilu Henner, Christopher 
Lloyd, and Carol Kane. This scene is tonally flawless, and builds up momentum 
to become an emotional powerhouse, signifying the grief that the people who 
knew Andy were feeling, even while he proved after death that what he truly 
was was a good-natured, caring human being. "Man on the Moon" is a 
respectable tribute to the memory of Andy Kaufman, but is nowhere near 
perfect, and in the confines of staying true to Andy's life, it probably 
could never be.

Title
Review for Babe: Pig in the City (1998)
Directed by George Miller.
Cast: Magda Szubanski, Mary Stein, James Cromwell, Mickey Rooney.
Voices: E.G. Daily, Glenne Headley, Danny Mann, Miriam Flynn.
1998 - 97 minutes.
Rated G (a PG would have been more appropriate, with an emphasis on 
destruction and death).
Reviewed November 27, 1998.
By Dustin Putman 
Dustin Putman's Film Reviews >
The original "Babe," came out of left field in 1995, surprising 
everybody with its charming story and original animal characters, and 
eventually led to being nominated for several Academy Awards, including 
Best Picture. I suspect, "Babe: Pig in the City," the first sequel to 
that picture, will have no such luck.
Starting off where the first film ended, Babe (voice by E.G. Daily), an 
intelligent, caring pig, and Farmer Hoggett (James Cromwell) return home 
after winning the Sheepdog contest. After Farmer Hoggett gets into an 
accident and is bed-ridden, and the farm becomes in danger of 
foreclosure, Hoggett's wife (Magda Szubanski) decides to take Babe to a 
faraway fair in hopes of winning the prize money. On their way there, 
however, she is suspected of being a drug smuggler at the airport, and 
finds herself and Babe stranded in a large, fantasy-like city, where 
looking out the window of their hotel, you can see the Eiffel Tower, the 
Statue of Liberty, the Hollywood sign, etc.
"Babe: Pig in the City," is in the style of "Babe," with three little 
mice introducing the different sections of the film with chapter names, 
and with the same storybook narrator. But, for some reason, director 
George Miller decided to evade this film with a preoccupation of 
sadness, death, and destruction. Its G-rating is a joke because of its 
darkness, but that is not really my problem with the film, since all of 
the best family pictures, like 1939's "The Wizard of Oz," and 1971's 
"Willy Wonka and the Chocolate Factory," have a wicked side. My 
objection is that it does not merily deal with these elements, but it 
dwells in it. Although there is comedy, most of it sinks under its own 
weight because of its somberness.
One of the most innovative ideas of, "Babe: Pig in the City," is that 
the city is not a certain place, but a mixture of every city in the 
world. Because of this, it was a huge letdown that the film did not 
venture out into the different places, but was set almost entirely in a 
hotel. For a film that cost $80-million to make, I think the makers got 
jipped, although the animals, with their mouths moving when they talked, 
was more seamless and real-looking than the first film.
"Babe: Pig in the City," is mostly a joyless sequel to the joyful 
original. James Cromwell obviously was just cashing a paycheck, since he 
only had three scenes and about three lines. Magda Szubanski was sweet 
as Wife Hoggett, but too often was the butt of the jokes. And I liked 
Mary Stein as the hotel manager and secret animal lover. The climax was 
nicely done and exciting, for the most part, and I liked the chimpanzee 
characters, but it simply felt like a missed opportunity to explore the 
unusual, but visually gorgeous city. The film is more action-oriented, 
rather than filled with the warmth of its predecessor. With all of the 
dark going-ons in "Babe: Pig in the City," at the end, it felt like Babe 
wasn't so innocent anymore.

Title
Review for Tomcats (2001)
Directed by Gregory Poirier.
Cast: Jerry O'Connell, Shannon Elizabeth, Jake Busey, Horatio Sanz, Jaime 
Pressly, Bill Maher, David Ogden Stiers, Bernie Casey, Garry Marshall.
2001 - 95 minutes
Rated R (for profanity, sexuality, brief nudity, and cringe-inducing humor).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, March 31, 2001.
At this point in today's mainstream cinema, gross-out humor has become as 
prevalent as the appearance of Friday during each week. Last week's bid for 
yuks (as well as yucks) was "Say It Isn't So," and this week, it's "Tomcats," 
a raunchy-as-all-hell comedy written and directed by first-time filmmaker 
Gregory Poirier. Some of the material is very funny, to be sure, but much of 
it doesn't work because, like "Say It Isn't So," the editing isn't sharp 
enough to do the jokes complete justice. It doesn't help that a complete 
20-minute portion of the movie forgets the premise and is solely devoted to 
the setup and payoff of a joke so gross it makes "Scary Movie" look 
relatively tame in comparison. Another 10-minute section sets up a dominatrix 
sequence involving an elderly woman that also has nothing to do with the 
story. There is a fine line between a movie that just so happens to be crass, 
and one whose only purpose is to turn stomachs.
The "plot" goes something like this: a group of male friends make a pact to 
make annual monetary contributions to a pot that will go to the one who 
remains single the longest, without getting married. By the time they hit 27, 
the pot has hit a cool half-million dollars, and only two of them have yet to 
tie the knot--Michael (Jerry O'Connell) and Kyle (Jake Busey). When Michael 
goes in debt after a bit of failed gambling in Vegas, he tracks down Natalie 
(Shannon Elizabeth), the one woman Kyle has slept with in his life whom he 
had actual feelings for. Having lost her virginity to Kyle seven years 
before, only to be nastily spurned by him and left with only a roll of 
quarters to call a taxi, Natalie decides to help Michael out and give Kyle a 
taste of his own medicine. Their plan entails her managing to steal his heart 
(no easy feat for such a cold-hearted womanizer) and marrying him, only to 
quickly get it annulled and share half of the money Michael will receive. In 
the process, Michael begins to fall in love with Natalie himself.
Sharing certain similarities with 2000's despicable "Whipped," "Tomcats" is a 
step above that picture, but shares the same downfall: none of the characters 
are likable people. Michael may be the protagonist, and therefore the nicest 
guy to be found, but his foregoing conclusion that all women are merely sex 
objects is awfully shallow and distasteful, particularly for a young man in 
his late-twenties. Michael is played by Jerry O'Connell (1999's "Body 
Shots"), a bright-faced veteran actor best known for playing the chubby, 
scaredy-cat Vern in 1986's "Stand by Me." O'Connell runs with the part, and 
goes all out in embarrassing himself in certain scenes, but he can't overcome 
the fact that Michael isn't a particularly interesting or amiable individual.
If there is anyone to care about (and I use such a term loosely), it is 
Natalie, played with an undeniable sweetness by Shannon Elizabeth (2000's 
"Scary Movie"). Natalie is a police officer who also happens to be an 
enormously beautiful woman. She is smart, strong-willed, and doesn't put up 
with being disrespected by anyone, so it comes off as somewhat of a 
contradiction that she would waste her time helping Michael out with 
something so childish. If Natalie is harmed by the confines of the dumb, if 
ambitiously disgusting, screenplay, it is solely thanks to Elizabeth that she 
remains an intelligent girl. 
If the idea of watching a big, hospital-set chase scene for an enlarged, 
cancerous testicle that concludes in a cafeteria sounds potentially funny, 
then "Tomcats" may be worth a look. It most certainly can't be criticized for 
a lack of energy, and is entertaining to a point, but one has to wonder how 
low this crude genre can possibly go before it stops being innocently fun and 
just becomes an example of pointlessly offensive bad taste. "Tomcats," more 
so than most of the other recent films of its ilk, treads dangerously close 
to becoming the latter.
   - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
     http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman
http://www.atnzone.com

Title
Review for Pleasantville (1998)
Directed by Gary Ross.
Cast: Tobey Maguire, Reese Witherspoon, Joan Allen, Jeff Daniels, 
William H. Macy, J.T. Walsh, Don Knotts, Marley Shelton.
1998 - 122 minutes.
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and sexual situations).
Reviewed October 24, 1998.
By Dustin Putman 
Dustin Putman's Film Reviews >
After fighting for the remote control that they have just received from 
a mysterious television repairman (Don Knotts), teenage siblings, David 
(Tobey Maguire), and Jennifer (Reese Witherspoon), are transported into 
the t.v. set and find themselves on the black-and-white 50's sitcom, 
"Pleasantville," taking over the places of the children in the show, Bud 
and Mary Sue. Their parents in the show are, as are the rest of the 
parents, the type that you might see on "Father Knows Best," or "Leave 
It to Beaver," with a housewife (Joan Allen) who does all of the cooking 
and cleaning, and a husband (William H. Macy) who goes to work during 
the day, only to return by saying, "Honey, I'm home," and to find his 
dinner waiting for him in the kitchen. Since David is a fan of the show, 
he can always tell which episode is occurring at a certain time, and 
urges Jennifer not to do anything that would disrupt their routine. 
Soon, however, Jennifer has had sex with one of the boys from school, a 
thing that no one in the show has previously even known about, and as 
many of the people in Pleasantville become open to new, fresh ideas, 
parts of the fictional world begin to subtly turn to real colors, 
including the people themselves.
If there was one word to describe Gary Ross' new fantasy, 
"Pleasantville," it would be the word, magical, and the less said about 
the story, the better. The film is a wholeheartedly original motion 
pcture, visually beautiful, and, while it starts off as a sort of 
"fish-out-of-water" story, it quickly turns it something far more 
meaningful and mature than expected. Although basically a comedy, 
"Pleasantville" also contains many serious moments, including one scene 
in which David helps his mother, played splendidly by Allen, who has 
turned to real colors, and frightened at the prejudices of the other 
people in the town, to cover up her face with gray makeup.
One of the big treats of "Pleasantville" is the way that the film very 
gradually begins to transform things into technicolor. At first, it may 
just be small things in the background, such as a clock or a flower, and 
it is quite entertaining picking out all of the delicate changes. As far 
as I can tell, "Pleasantville" is the first film to actually blend 
black-and-white and color together in the same frame, and it is never 
less than convincing and always gorgeous and strangely poetic to look 
at. Credit certainly must go to production designer Jeannine Oppewall 
and cinematographer John Lindley, for creating a whole new, unexpected 
world.
"Pleasantville" easily could have been the fantasy of this generation, 
just like "The Wizard of Oz," but there are a few minor problems that 
ultimately hold it back from being a downright great film. One problem 
is the Don Knotts character, who has no point in the story but to give 
the kids the remote so they would be put inside "Pleasantville." We 
never really get to know who he is, or what his goal was. Witherspoon, 
who has proven herself a fine actress, and doesn't disappoint here, is 
nonetheless underused, and seems to all but disappear from the middle 
section of the picture. And my last minor quibble is that one of the 
climactic scenes set in the courtroom owes more than a little to, "To 
Kill a Mockingbird," right down to the way the building looks.
These slight distractions take very little away from "Pleasantville," 
however, because as previously mentioned, the film is a magical 
experience. It contains enchanting, one-of-a-kind images, a memorable, 
Oscar-worthy music score by Randy Newman, and then, and this is the big 
surprise for a mainstream film, it actually adds profundity and realism 
to what, on the surface, might appear to be merely a 50's sitcom satire.

Title
Review for Ladies Man, The (2000)
Directed by Reginald Hudlin.
Cast: Tim Meadows, Karyn Parsons, Billy Dee Williams, Will Ferrell, Lee 
Evans, Tiffani Thiessen, Tamala Jones, Julianne Moore, Eugene Levy.
2000 - 87 minutes
Rated R (for profanity, nudity, and sex).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, October 15, 2000.
It has become a sort of yearly tradition that Paramount Films teams up with 
SNL Studios to adapt one of their popular television skits into a 
feature-length film, for release each successive October. 1998 saw the 
surprisingly funny "A Night at the Roxbury," arguably the best SNL adaptation 
since 1992's "Wayne's World," and 1999's "Superstar," based on the Catholic 
school girl character Mary Katherine Gallagher, was generally entertaining, 
yet far too thin to fill up its already-brief 82-minute running time. Of 
their three most recent stabs at big-screen stardom, this year's "The Ladies 
Man," based on the exploits of shallow womanizer Leon Phelps, is, by far, the 
worst of the lot. Mostly unfunny and truly misguided in every respect, the 
film has neither the laughs of "Roxbury" nor the heart of "Superstar," 
exposing itself as merely a very shallow and forgettable comedy.
Ever since appearing on the doorstep of the Playboy mansion as a baby, Leon 
Phelps (Tim Meadows) has been a high-stylin', trash-talkin', woman-usin' 
sexual fanatic whose wardrobe and poofy hairstyle apparently haven't changed 
since the 1970's. Along with loyal producer and long-time friend Julie (Karyn 
Parsons), Leon runs a nightly radio call-in show called "The Ladies Man," in 
which he tries to solve the listeners' "romantic queries." When his raunchy 
and offensive show steps over the line, Leon and Julie find themselves 
jobless, hopping from one local radio station to the next in hopes of being 
hired. 
All the while, a disgruntled man (Lee Evans) who caught his wife sleeping 
with Leon, joins a support group for husbands whose wives' have cheated on 
them with the mysterious black man with the smiley-face tattooed on his 
buttocks. They do not yet know his identity, of course, because all any of 
them have ever glimpsed was his naked backside as he ran away.
When SNL producer Lorne Michaels puts his head together each year with 
Paramount to develop a film based on one of their skits, is there ever any 
thought into actually developing it outside of its sketchy mediocrity? This 
question plagues the entirety of "The Ladies Man," inauspiciously directed by 
Reginald Hudlin (1992's "Boomerang") and written by Tim Meadows and Dennis 
McNicholas, which includes an enjoyable opening five minutes and then settles 
into complete tedium, its novelty run out before the middle of the first 
reel. 
At least, at 87 minutes, it is mercifully short, though not short enough. In 
bringing his spicy Leon Phelps character to the big screen, Tim Meadows has 
done very little to make him more than a one-dimensional figure with middling 
appeal. In all fairness, Meadows is clearly having fun with his performance, 
but he isn't terribly charismatic, and pales in comparison to female costar 
Karyn Parsons (TV's "The Fresh Prince of Bel Air"), who shows a great deal of 
star presence and makes for a naturalistic romantic counterpart. It's just 
too bad she is stuck in disposable films such as "The Ladies Man" when her 
talent as an actress is obvious.
The supporting cast is nothing special--strictly television-star level. The 
usually enjoyable Will Ferrell (1999's "Dick") slums it up as the leader of 
the support group for Leon Phelps' victims, who is allegedly outraged that 
his wife, Honey DeLune (Tiffani Thiessen), slept with Leon, despite his 
fevered attraction to man-on-man body wrestling. Tiffani Thiessen (TV's 
"Beverly Hills, 90210") is sorely wasted in a brief appearance, although she 
is the most memorable of the minor characters. And for reasons unknown, as if 
out of some especially bizarre "Twilight Zone" episode, Academy Award nominee 
Julianne Moore (1999's "Magnolia") has a cameo as one of Leon's "women of the 
past." A truly bizarre casting decision, but also really the only noteworthy 
element of the otherwise dispensable "The Ladies Man."
Since Leon is a purely sexual and outrageous creature, as that is all he has 
ever been portrayed as on NBC's "Saturday Night Live," we are supposed to buy 
the conclusion's twist in "The Ladies Man," which is that he gradually begins 
to realize how infinitely more satisfying love is, rather than just a series 
of meaningless trysts. It's difficult to imagine SNL ever being able to 
feature this character on their show any longer, since the turning point for 
the character is one that defies his personality and loose attitude seen on 
the show. Congratulations must go out to Lorne Michaels; not only did he make 
a very bad movie, but he also managed to destroy the possible longevity of 
one of his brightest on-going SNL skits.

Title
Review for 200 Cigarettes (1999)
Directed by Risa Bramon Garcia.
Cast: Courtney Love, Paul Rudd, Martha Plimpton, Gaby Hoffmann, Kate 
Hudson, Jay Mohr, Angela Featherstone, Nicole Parker, Christina Ricci, 
Brian McCardie, Casey Affleck, Dave Chappelle, Guillermo Diaz, Janeane 
Garofalo, Catherine Kellner, Ben Affleck, Elvis Costello.
1999 - 100 minutes.
Rated R (for profanity).
Reviewed February 27, 1999.
Obviously obtaining its inspiration from 1973's classic, "American 
Graffitti," "200 Cigarettes," casting director Risa Bramon Garcia's 
uneven feature film directing debut, is set exclusively on the night of 
New Year's Eve on New York City's East Side, circa 1981, as we follow 
sixteen different characters, all of which are set to attend a big New 
Year's blowout at the heavily-decorated apartment of Monica (Martha 
Plimpton) who, as nine o'clock rolls around, fears that no one is going 
to come and everyone hates her. Even her friend (Catherine Kellner), who 
has kept her company for the early part of the night, ends up running 
out on her. And to make matters worse, her first guest turns out to be 
her Scottish ex-boyfriend (Brian McCardie), whom she claims is "the 
worst lover I've ever had...including high school." This is one of the 
brightest vignettes of the film, thanks fully to Plimpton's stand-out, 
high-enegy, hilarious performance. 
As for the rest of the wide array of characters, Lucy (Courtney Love), 
who has had her fair share of boyfriends, is trying to cheer up her 
friend, Kevin (Paul Rudd), who is not only burdened with having his 
birthday fall on New Year's Eve, but is also suffering from his recent 
break-up with his long-time girlfriend, Ellie (Janeane Garofalo). 
Although this subplot, perhaps, is given the most attention in the film, 
it is also one of the more dull sections and doesn't really go anywhere. 
Garofalo, alas, is also wasted with only three scenes, although she is 
given one of the funniest lines of dialogue. As she tries to light a 
cigarette with no luck, she exclaims, "these matches are disappointing 
me!"
One of the better stories in the film belongs to the klutzy Cindy (Kate 
Hudson, Goldie Hawn's daughter), who has just lost her virginity the 
night before and after telling the guy, Jack (Jay Mohr), who is afraid 
of commitment, he becomes overjoyed, that is, until she tells him she 
loves him. Hudson is so winning in this, her film debut, and appears to 
have such a firm handle for comic situations, that she is always fun to 
watch. I wonder, however, if director Garcia could have focused more on 
her character, rather than her on-going pratfalls (she slips on some 
doggy poop, knocks drinks over, stumbles over people, smashes 
chandeliers, etc), even though they are a hoot.
Meanwhile, Val (Christina Ricci) and Stephie (Gaby Hoffmann) are two 
teenage girls from Long Island with accents as thick as thieves who have 
stopped over into NYC to go to the party (Val is Monica's cousin), but 
get hopelessly lost. Val doesn't mind so much, since all she's worried 
about is getting laid, while the more uptight Stephie fears for her own 
life on the mean streets, particularly the dreaded "Ave. B!" A movie 
that wastes the talents of Christina Ricci should be ashamed of itself, 
and that is exactly what happens here, as Ricci is forced to portray a 
one-note character without any distinctive qualities. Faring better and 
given a little bit more screen time is Hoffmann, who I can't recall ever 
being so funny in a film before. With her heavy, caricaturized Brooklyn 
accent and clever way with words, Hoffmann gives one of the few notable 
performances, along with Hudson and Plimpton (whom she shares a 
hysterical moment with in the last scene of the film, as she keeps 
saying, with her accent, mind you, "Yea! Yea!").
The last and least vignette in the film goes to two women and so-called 
friends (Angela Featherstone and Nicole Parker) who both are vying for a 
hunky bartender (Ben Affleck), until he actually speaks and reveals how 
cornball he actually is. There is nothing of interest here, and Affleck 
especially is given nothing to do.
Like the recent "Playing by Heart," "200 Cigarettes" is a toss-up 
between wonderful moments and weak moments. The former, however, spent 
an adequate amount of time with its character so that I felt that I got 
to know them well by the end. On the contrary, director Garcia has cast 
"200 Cigarettes" with a virtual who's-who of young, hot stars and then 
has chosen to put very few of them to good use. As mentioned, Plimpton, 
Hudson, and Hoffmann are irresistible high points in a marginally 
entertaining film that spends too little time with too many characters, 
and then never really adds up to much. The only suspense coming from the 
film (or more like the only twist) is that the conclusion reveals who 
each character got together with the night before. Some of them are 
surprising, others are inevitable, but it didn't really make much 
difference to me since I didn't necessarily care about any of them. If 
there is any sort of compensation for this non-payoff it is the ending 
scene in which we are shown photos of the New Year's party (it is never 
actually shown in live-action), narrated hysterically by a cab driver 
(Dave Chappelle) who has a run-in with all of the characters throughout 
the movie. And what is revealed that occurred to the Plimpton character 
is almost worth a marginal recommendation, but not quite. "200 
Cigarettes" blares '80s music from scene-to-scene, but other than that, 
this picture could have taken place during any time period since no 
mention is made of even the smallest current event of the time. 
Something tells me director Garcia was a little lazy while researching 
the year of 1981, and something also tells me that writer Shana Larsen 
was a little too lazy to even run the screenplay through another 
rewrite. Believe me, it certainly needed it.
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Mighty Joe Young (1998)
Directed by Ron Underwood.
Cast: Charlize Theron, Bill Paxton, David Paymer, Regina King, Rade 
Sherbedgia, Mika Boorem, Linda Purl, Naveen Andrews.
1998 - 110 minutes.
Rated PG (for violence).
Reviewed December 28, 1998.
The 1949 original remained unseen by myself while walking into "Mighty 
Joe Young," the big-budget Disney remake, which was probably a good 
thing since I didn't have anything to compare or hold it up to. 
In the entertaining prologue, which owes quite a bit to the opening of 
1982's "E.T.," a primatologist (Linda Purl) in Africa is wounded and 
ultimately killed while desperately trying to save a gorilla and her 
unusually large baby, Joe, from a group of nasty poachers (are there any 
other kind?). Before she dies, however, her young daughter, Jill Young 
(Mika Boorem), promises to always take care of Joe. Twelve years later, 
Jill (the always-stunning Charlize Theron) is now a beautiful young 
woman still living in Africa and friends with Joe, who has grown to be 
considered "the largest-known ape in the world." For fear of the 
impending doom that is setting upon Joe's fate, due to inevitable 
poachers, Jill accepts the proposal of kind zoologist Gregg O'Hara (Bill 
Paxton) to ship Joe to Los Angeles where he will be kept in a peaceful 
and safe nature preserve. Before long, however, two of the hunters from 
Jill's childhood, including one poacher (Rade Sherbedgia) who got two of 
his finger's bitten off, tracks Joe down with a vendetta to settle. 
For a great deal of its running time, I was rather surprised to find 
myself captivated by "Might Joe Young," but its small charms and 
underlying love story between Joe and Jill were overpowered by the 
action-oriented and overly-violent climax, in which Joe escapes from the 
poachers and sets out into the city of L.A. Maybe the problem is that 
the story and tone of the picture are outdated from 1949 (even though I 
am personally not familiar with how close this remake follows the 
original), because even if the film had simply remained a "quiet and 
sweet little film," I doubt if I still would have liked it. If it had 
kept its deliberate pace, the film would have come off seeming ho-hum, 
but with the alternate adventure ending, my reaction was 
"been-there-done-that." Once the penultimate sequence arrived, set at a 
carnival, "Mighty Joe Young" even lost its mild level of believability, 
since it was forced to resolve itself with Joe saving a boy from a 
burning ferris wheel, thus giving the city's people a reason to stand up 
for Joe, who really was not a bad or cruel animal, but, instead, faced 
with unfortunate circumstances. 
Because of the picture's faults and overall air of uneventfulness, I am 
not giving "Mighty Joe Young" a full recommendation, but it was 
certainly not what would be considered a bad film. In fact, there is a 
lot to like, including, as previously mentioned, the charming 
relationship between Joe and Jill, whom I found myself actually 
believing to love one another. Most of the scenes leading up to the 
ending were well-done and pleasant enough (save for the throwaway 
poacher subplot), and there were even a few moments between Jill and 
Gregg that were intelligently written.
Another aspect that I would like to remark about is Charlize Theron, 
who, since making her standout debut in 1996's "2 Days in the Valley," 
has created one original and totally distinctive character after the 
other, from playing Keanu Reeves' distraught, tragic wife in last year's 
"The Devil's Advocate," to a multi-orgasmic supermodel in Woody Allen's 
"Celebrity," to playing a nice, caring pseudo-parent to an ape in this 
film. Theron, who is still only in her early 20's, has shown in only a 
handful of films that she has got a lot of range as an actress and is 
willing to physically and emotionally transform herself for every single 
role. In her scenes with Joe, and with her potential love-interest 
Gregg, the screen came alive with not only her beauty, but her wonderful 
talent and spark.
"Mighty Joe Young" is an agreeable time-waster for older kids (it's much 
too violent for the youngest viewers) and perhaps some adults, but in a 
season when children could also choose to see the marvelous "The Prince 
of Egypt," and adults could pick any number of far superior films, 
"Mighty Joe Young" simply pales in comparison. Although you could 
certainly do much worse, there is only one really distinctive quality 
about the film, and that is Charlize Theron's charismatic performance.
          - Copyright 1998 by Dustin Putman
            Dustin
Putman's Film Haven >

Title
Review for Hole in the Head, A (1998)
"A Hole in the Head," a documentary which premiered in February on cable's 
The Learning Channel and is now available on video for $19.95 through Mad Dog 
Films, Inc. (1-800-475-2233), is the first in a planned series of films from 
Eli Kabillio on unconventional topics in medical, biological, or other 
scientific realms. The title, "A Hole in a Head," says it all, as this 
fascinating, but ultimately empty, documentary focuses on the development of 
"modern" trepanation, a controversial procedure that some people have been 
known to perform on themselves, in which a sizable hole is drilled out of the 
skull, allowing greater brain blood volume and increasing the person's 
metabolism and their energy. Trepanation is a hotly-debated surgery that I 
knew nothing about going into the film, and although informative and 
educational, as a documentary film it is decidedly lackluster, with the 
majority of it merely being the "talking heads" of professionals and patients 
discussing their opinions on the subject. While we learn a lot about 
trepanation, we learn virtually nothing about the people on view, thus giving 
us no emotional center or added interest.
   - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
     Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Skulls, The (2000)
Directed by Rob Cohen.
Cast: Joshua Jackson, Paul Walker, Leslie Bibb, Hill Harper, Craig T. Nelson, 
William Petersen, Christopher McDonald, Steve Harris.
2000 - 106 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity, violence, and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, April 1, 2000.
Rob Cohen's "The Skulls" is a handsomely produced disaster of a movie, filled 
with such ludicrous plotting and inconsistencies that it has to be seen to be 
believed. At least when Universal Pictures hired Shane Hurlbut as the 
cinematographer, they got their money's worth, which is more than can be said 
about virtually everyone and everything else involved in the making of this 
"thriller," a so-called "'The Firm' for teens." The problem is that that 1993 
Tom Cruise-starrer was also a dumbed-down version of a John Grisham novel. 
Drop its IQ down yet another 50 points, transform its characters into college 
students, and what you are left with is "The Skulls."
Luke McNamara (Joshua Jackson) is a former street kid whose key to being 
accepted at the prestigious Yale University is his expertise on the college's 
famed rowing team. Planning to go to law school after graduation, he is 
unsure of how he is going to manage it, considering he has twenty bucks in 
the bank, considerably less than the annual $45,000 tuition fee. Lurking 
about the campus is a much-talked-about secret society called The Skulls (if 
it is such a secret, how come everyone knows about it?), to which we are 
informed at the on-set that at least two of the United States' presidents 
have been members. Once initiated, there is no exempting, but The Skulls 
promise inductees unlimited amounts of wealth and fortune, as well as a few 
trophy women to go along with it. 
Despite the warnings of Luke's two best friends, Will (Hill Harper) and Chloe 
(Leslie Bibb), he is chosen to join The Skulls, and without hesitation, 
accepts. A pair of new members are chosen to be soul mates, and Luke is 
partnered with Caleb Mandrake (Paul Walker), whose father, Judge Litten 
Mandrake (Craig T. Nelson), coincidentally, is the head of the society. Luke 
is overjoyed to later discover that $20,000 has been added to his bank 
account, but being a member of The Skulls means inevitably slighting Will and 
Chloe, whom he is secretly in love with. Then an apparent suicide of someone 
close to Luke occurs on campus, but evidence points to foul play, and it 
becomes believed that the victim was murdered. All suspicions of Luke point 
to The Skulls being involved in a cover-up scheme.
What can be said about "The Skulls" other than it's one of the most 
unintentionally silly movies so far this year, not to mention one of the 
worst? The screenplay, by John Pogue, is a real howler, and should never have 
been given the chance to see the light of day. In one scene, a female 
character is chased across campus in broad daylight, which conveniently 
appears to be deserted. In another, Luke is drugged to an almost catatonic 
state, to the point where saliva is uncontrollably dribbling out the side of 
his mouth. Then, all of a sudden, out of the blue, he jumps right into a 
conversation as if nothing had happened. Was he just playing an April Fool's 
joke on everyone, and decided it would be funny to pretend he was a human 
vegetable? And who could forget the laughable duel climax, complete with real 
guns, that takes place in what looked like the courtyard of the school?
The dialogue is no better, with one distressingly stilted scene in which 
Luke, Will, and Chloe discuss the history of The Skulls, reciting dialogue 
that not for a second seems natural, but simply an excuse to relay to the 
audience some background information. "The Skulls" might have at least been 
funny had director Rob Cohen (who made the far superior 1996 action film, 
"Daylight") and screenwriter Pogue let the audience know that it was meant as 
a comedy. To my dismay, however, it appears like the movie is very well 
attempting to be a serious-minded thriller. 
"The Skulls" marks the debut of Joshua Jackson (TV's "Dawson's Creek") in a 
lead film role, after supporting parts in 1998's "Urban Legend" and 1999's 
"Cruel Intentions," and it's unfortunate that he had to choose such an 
unusually bad movie to take that next step in his career. All other actors 
are handed throwaway roles, except for Paul Walker (1998's "Pleasantville"), 
who makes next to no impression, and Leslie Bibb (TV's "Popular"), who is the 
only one in the cast who projects even the slightest hint of intelligence. 
Bibb has a bright screen presence, but she is surrounded by such inanity that 
all she can do is struggle to come away from the wreckage unscathed (she 
succeeds, for the most part).
Worst of all, when "The Skulls" isn't downright awful, it's just a chore to 
sit through. Dull and oddly outdated, only the lush photography by Hurlbut, 
accentuating its gorgeous Toronto-based setting, saves the picture from being 
a surefire cure for insomniacs. On second thought, maybe Universal should 
have hired someone less accomplished to work as cinematographer. That way, 
when viewers would fall into a deep slumber for its duration, it would cause 
them to forget that such an absurd motion picture was actually ever committed 
to celluloid. It would also save the actors from any further embarrassment.

Title
Review for Inspector Gadget (1999)
Directed by David Kellogg.
Cast: Matthew Broderick, Rupert Everett, Joely Fisher, Michelle Trachtenberg, 
Michael G. Hagerty, Cheri Oteri, Dabney Coleman, Andy Dick, Rene Auberjonois, 
Frances Bay.
1999 - 77 minutes.
Rated PG (for mild violence).
Reviewed July 25, 1999.
The question abounds: Why is it that every single year Walt Disney Pictures 
will release a big summer animated movie that is usually of high quality, 
both enjoyable and smart enough for kids and adults alike, and yet they 
constantly are willing to churn out live-action films that are about as fun 
as having a route canal done...without being put to sleep or given any form 
of medication. I just don't understand it. "That Darn Cat," "My Favorite 
Martian," "Meet the Deedles," "Flubber," "101 Dalmatians," and "Inspector 
Gadget," which is the worst of the lot, by the way. Did anyone who made these 
films, the director, the cast, the producers, the studio, for once actually 
believe that they were making a worthwhile film for families that was both 
intelligent and entertaining, heartfelt and truthful, funny and clever? If 
they ever did believe such a story, they were either brainwashed, fooling 
themselves, or under the heavy influence of LSD. There is, simply put, no 
excuse at all for Disney, or any other high-profile studio for that matter, 
to be unleashing such vile garbage unto the world that does not have one 
redeeming element to be found anywhere. I've got news for you, Disney: these 
live-action movies you are making are not enjoyable for the entire family; 
they are demeaning and show that you have no respect for any sort of thinking 
human audience at all. Check out such non-Disney family film winners, such as 
"The Wizard of Oz," "Willy Wonka and the Chocolate Factory," "A Christmas 
Story," and "Prancer." Maybe studying these wonderful entertainments that do 
not talk down to children or grown-ups will knock some sense into you.
Based on the early-'80s animated series, "Inspector Crap-on-it," oh, I mean 
"Gadget," the movie follows John Brown (Matthew Broderick, whose career has 
been shot to hell once again after appearing in the brilliant satire, 
"Election"), a single security guard who cares for his young, precocious 
niece, Penny (Michelle Trachtenberg), and longs for beautiful scientist 
Brenda (Joely Fisher). When the villainous Sanford Scolex (Rupert Everett) 
breaks into Brenda's lab, killing her father (Rene Auberjonois) and stealing 
their research projects, John comes to the rescue, but in the process is 
blown up in his car, and Sanford himself accidentally gets his hand severed. 
In appreciation, Brenda decides to save John's life by putting to use her 
latest invention, and before long John Brown is Inspector Gadget, a 
part-human/part-mechanical creation that has the ability to do almost 
anything, with some sort of gadget or weapon planted into each of his body 
parts. Meanwhile, Sanford has constructed a claw-like device to be put on his 
hand and changes his name to Claw, "one word...like Madonna." Hardee-har-har! 
Anyway, Claw invents a robotic replica of Inspector Gadget who is set out to 
destroy everything in its path, including John.
You know, I could have been generous and given "Inspector Gadget" a 
marginally kinder 1/2-star rating, but the more I thought about it, the more 
I realized there was not one scene, element, or even frame that I could 
honestly say I liked while looking someone straight in the eyes. The story is 
brief (thank the Lord!), but makes no actual sense, with little clouds coming 
up from Inspector Gadget's head now and then to show him using one of his 
many gadgets to good use. But how does this actually fit into the plot at 
hand? Better yet, how did the haphazard screenplay, by the clearly-talentless 
duo of Kerry Ehrin and Zak Penn, get past the written page? And even better 
yet, why would Disney spend millions and millions of dollars on this 
instantly forgettable, ineffective piece of junk when they could instead be 
making generous donations to help out the sick, disabled, and needy?
The movie may think it's funny, but I've got news for it: I lightly, and 
quickly, laughed once during the interminable 77-minute running time, and 
that was only thanks to Saturday Night Live talent Cheri Oteri (who is 
otherwise criminally wasted as the town's goofy mayor). The rest of the movie 
has scene after mindless scene pounding the audience with almost non-stop 
action, effects, chaos, and cheap humor. Did you see character development or 
simple charm on that list? I didn't think so.
"Inspector Gadget" is unredeemably bad, and shockingly so. I wasn't expecting 
a masterpiece going into the theater, but the film also sunk well below the 
lowest expectation that could have possibly occurred in my mind. Every actor 
should not only be embarrassed to have appeared in this film, but they should 
change their names in private and hide out for a couple years until everyone 
has forgotten about this worthless piece of shameful celluloid. I'm not going 
to mention any actors, but you can take a gander at my cast listing up above 
to decide for yourself what could have possibly gone wrong. "Inspector 
Gadget" is one of the few movies I've seen in which every cast and crew 
member involved should have billed themselves as Alan Smithee. Maybe Disney 
should even change their name after this debacle, but not to "Alan Smithee." 
They should change it to "sell-out."
    -Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
     Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Carnival of Souls (1962)
Made in 1962 on a shoestring budget of only $15,000, Herk Harvey's 
"Carnival of Souls" is not a perfect film by any stretch of the 
imagination, but when considering its low-budget and amateur actors, it 
turned out about as good as could possibly be expected. The film is like 
a nightmarish puzzle, one that you think you've figured out, but really 
haven't until the final twist arrives in the last scene.
The film begins abruptly, as a carload of young women are challenged to 
a drag-race by some guys. While passing over a narrow bridge, the 
women's car accidentally loses control and plunges into a deep river. 
Hours later, as the police have arrived and are attempting to find the 
car in its deep watery grave, one of the passengers of the ill-fated 
car, Mary Henry (Candace Hilligoss), miraculously appears climbing out 
of the river. Not remembering anything about the accident, and looked 
upon by everyone as a miracle, Mary immediately moves to a small town in 
Utah to play as the church organist. She rents out a room from a kind, 
elderly landlady (Frances Feist), meets and is somewhat charmed by the 
other resident of the home, John Linden (Sidney Berger), and attempts to 
begin putting the pieces of her life back together. Everything is not 
perfect, however, as Mary begins to frequently see a ghoulish, 
frightening phantom figure everywhere she goes, even though no one else 
claims to see anything. Is it simply a hallucination, sparked from the 
trauma of the car crash? Not only that, but Mary also begins to feel a 
sort of connection to an adjacent, closed-down, desolate amusement park.
At a decidedly too-brisk 75-minute running time, "Carnival of Souls" 
moves at a gradual, dream-like pace that makes it almost impossible not 
get caught up in the proceedings. And although only with a miniscule 
budget, since its release, the film has quickly become a cult classic 
for all horror afficionados. Even George Romero has mentioned, in fact, 
that he got his idea for 1968's "Night of the Living Dead" from 
"Carnival of Souls," and it is obvious that so did David Lynch when he 
made "Blue Velvet," "Twin Peaks," and "Lost Highway." That these 
filmmakers were influenced by such a "petty" movie from the early-'60s 
proves of the extraordinary power that the film ultimately holds, both 
in its storytelling techniques and glorious style.
Candace Hilligoss, an unknown who was cast in the lead role, contains 
just the right amounts of vulnerability and strong will to bring Mary to 
life as a sympathetic character. One of the major highlights of 
"Carnival of Souls" is the magnificently atmospheric, brooding 
black-and-white cinematography that paints the settings, including the 
unforgettable images of the somehow off-kilter amusement park, as major 
characters themselves. The sequences of Mary simply walking around the 
eerie park, which is out on the dock of a bay, are some of those rare 
moments in motion picture history that will forever be ingrained in my 
long-term memory.
The story goes that director Herk Harvey scratched the money together to 
make "Carnival of Souls," but never made another film again. That's 
really too bad, since he obviously was a major filmmaking talent and I 
would have loved to have seen a sophomore effort. Ultimately, Harvey 
died in 1996, but left, in his memory, his one and only film, a movie 
that affected, as well as inspired, many different people, thanks to its 
untarnished storyline and visual expertise. 
Note: Viewing this motion picture right before its direct-to-video 1999 
remake, I was appalled to see how much the '90s version trashed the 
memory of this classic. By complicating the story from its originally 
simple premise, the makers of the '99 edition simply made everything 
feel contrived, as well as frustrating and confusing. And, tellingly 
enough, the original "Carnival of Souls" is also infinitely more 
disturbing, even though it was made thirty-seven years ago. It's aged 
very well.
      - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
        Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Implicated (1998)
Directed by Ray Parks.
Cast: James LeGros, Jennifer Beals, Drew Barrymore, Jon Stewart, Eric Thal.
1999 - 89 minutes.
Rated R (for profanity and sexual situations).
Capsule Review - July 19, 1999.
One of several movies Drew Barrymore made in 1997 that dodged the big screen 
and are only now reaching home video, Adam Park's "Wishful Thinking" is at 
least a step above "Best Men," which is also currently available on video, 
but that isn't saying much. The film is clearly an indie and not a big-budget 
studio picture, which may have been another reason it bypassed theaters, as 
it recounts the troubles that a close couple are having from three different 
points-of-view: Max (James LeGros), the jealous boyfriend; Elizabeth 
(Jennifer Beals), the misunderstood girlfriend; and Lena (Drew Barrymore), 
Max's co-worker at a movie theater who pines for him from afar. All three 
leads are charismatic (particularly Beals, who deserves more film roles), and 
the unorthodox structure is similar to "Pulp Fiction" and "Go," but the 
screenplay, including the dialogue, too often wanders into unnecessary 
silliness, and the ending leaves something to be desired. Jon Stewart, as a 
good-natured man Elizabeth falls for, is a standout. Too bad the movie itself 
isn't as entertaining as he is. 
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Nekromantik (1987)
Directed by Jorg Buttgereit.
Cast: Daktari Lorenz, Beatrice M, Harald Lundt, Susa Kohlstedt, Heike Surban.
1988 - 68 minutes (in German w/ English subtitles)
Not Rated (equivalent of an X for extreme violence, sex, nudity, profanity, 
massive gore, and graphic depictions of necrophilia, with an emphasis on 
bodily functions).
Reviewed June 21, 1999.
WARNING! Due to the nature of the film, this review may offend some readers. 
Read with caution.
You'd be surprised how many movies I've seen. Everything from high-class 
brash to low-rent trash, to the unimaginably gory and disgusting. There's 
nothing I could have watched, however, that could possibly have prepared me 
for the German film, "Nekromantik," which is just about the most repugnant, 
vile piece of garbage to pass itself off as a kosher feature-length motion 
picture that I'm sure has ever been made. There doesn't appear to be any 
rhyme-or-reason behind director Jorg Buttregeit's extremely low-budget 
production, aside from to be shocking. And that it is, so I guess he achieved 
his goal, in a morbid sort of way.
Rob (Daktari Lorenz) is a young morgue attendant who lives with his 
girlfriend, Betty (Beatrice M). You see, they like to steal decomposing 
corpses, take them home, and have a manage a trois with them. When Rob is 
fired from his job, Betty gets fed up with her dead-end existence and leaves 
him (taking the skeletal remains with her!). On his own, and not having the 
access anymore to deceased bodies, Rob turns to murder to achieve his 
necrophilic urges.
If you are not already repulsed, there is more! Necrophilia can be treated in 
a serious, thoughtful manner (just rent the effective 1997 drama, "Kissed," 
for proof), but this isn't one of those instances. "Nekromantic" is so vacant 
of ideas, and cohesive storytelling techniques and characters, that to write 
a review in the normal way wouldn't be doing justice to the film at hand. 
Therefore, a list seems more appropriate, and here are just some of the 
things you view in this lovely piece of "art."
1.) Right at the beginning, there is a freak car accident, and afterwards we 
see the remains of a woman thrown from the car and torn in half, her insides 
oozing out onto the grassy knole.
2.) The cruel slaying of a rabbit (which is real footage that Buttgereit 
happened to obtain, and thought it would be a nice, little addition to this 
picture, even though it has nothing to do with anything). He seems to be 
laughing, saying, "Watch as I show you a bunny getting his throat slit, and 
then see the blood drain out onto the ground as the bunny twitches and 
breathes his last breath! Watch as the bunny is hung upside down and is 
skinned! Watch as the bunny's eyes are torn out of the remains of his head! 
Watch as the insides of the bunny are pulled out!" I do not get grossed out 
easily, but this scene (coming at around the 15-minute mark) had me putting 
my hands over my face, as I peaked out from behind my fingers.
3.) A protracted soft-porn sequence in which Betty, Rob, and the cadaver have 
sex. As a pleasant bonus, Betty sticks some sort of pipe down where the dead 
body's private parts have rotted away and literally *&%$! it!
4.) Another scene in which Betty reads to the corpse and begins making out 
with it, even going as far as licking it up and down.
5.) Rob brings a cute cat home with him to surprise Betty with as a gift, 
only to discover she has left him. So does Rob take the cat back to the 
animal shelter? Not a chance! He puts it in a bag, and forcefully hits it up 
against the walls and tables.
6.) Next, Rob is taking a bath, with the dead cat lying above the tub on a 
shelf, his tail leaking blood into the water. Getting lonely, I guess, Rob 
reaches up, pulls out the cat's insides and begins rubbing them all over his 
face and body as some sort of mourning ritual. 
7.) The strangulation and rape of a prostitute (in that order!).
8.) The next morning, a man almost catches Rob with the street urchin. To get 
rid of the possible witness, he grabs a shovel and chops off the man's head. 
Well, almost. Actually, he chops off the head from the mouth up. This way, he 
can fall to the ground and twitch a little before his heart stops.
9.) To reach the height of fantastic delight, Rob decides to murder himself 
while reaching orgasm! He achieves this by coming as he stabs himself in the 
stomach with a large knife. Soon, his bodily fluid (you know what I'm talking 
about) turns to blood, as it squirts out all over everything.
10.) Finally, we see Rob's grave, freshly buried. But here's the zinger! 
Right before the fade-to-black, a shovel comes down on the dirt, with the 
sight of a high heel pushing the shovel into the ground, signifying that a 
necrophilic woman (perhaps Betty?) was going to do the same thing to his body 
as he did to everyone else's.
There. I gave away practically the whole film, in gory detail. I did this for 
the simple reason of repulsing you, the reader, so that you will not, under 
any circumstances, venture to rent this movie. "Nekromantik" is a sickening 
excursion into the twisted life of a necrophiliac, but the treatment of the 
subject is both severely exploitative and offensive, and there is absolutely 
no talent involved in any of it. The film, if you can call it that, actually 
goes beyond the state of bad taste into a shameful, meaningless, extreme 
realm all its own. At least now I can safely say I've seen it all.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Sixth Sense, The (1999)
Directed by M. Night Shyamalan.
Cast: Haley Joel Osment, Bruce Willis, Toni Collette, Olivia Williams, Donnie 
Wahlberg.
1999 - 113 minutes.
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and intense situations).
Reviewed August 7, 1999.
And the winner of the second creepiest film of the year (after "The Blair 
Witch Project") goes to director M. Night Shyamalan's "The Sixth Sense." To 
say that the picture is merely "creepy," however, is not giving it nearly as 
much credit as it deserves, as it is that special type of gem that quietly, 
and gradually, sneaks up on you so that you are immediately absorbed into the 
story and characters, but still question throughout where everything could 
possibly be leading. Predict all you want, but it is virtually impossible to 
figure out the ending before it comes, and even though it's right out of left 
field, I hasten to say that it is not used as a gimmick, sort of like 1995's 
"The Usual Suspects." No, the conclusion to "The Sixth Sense" is very 
different, for in one ingeniously simple scene every single plot hole is 
thoroughly patched up, and the film, with that vital turn of the switch, 
gracefully moves right out of being merely a 'psychological thriller,' and 
becomes something far more profound and ruminant that anyone could possibly 
have anticipated when the opening credits began 113 minutes earlier. 
After a stirring prologue in which psychiatrist Dr. Malcolm Crowe (Bruce 
Willis) and his wife, Anna (Olivia Williams), get paid a visit by one of his 
past patients which ends with Malcolm getting shot and the patient committing 
suicide, the film switches to "The Next Fall," as Malcolm has recovered from 
his injury but whose relationship with Anna has turned into a distant one in 
which they don't even speak to each other anymore. Dr. Malcolm's current 
patient is 9-year-old Cole (Haley Joel Osment), a quiet loner of a boy living 
with his hard-working single mother (Toni Collette), who is expected to have 
a behavioral disorder. Cole tells him right away that he seems like a nice 
doctor, but one that can't help him, for this deep, dark, and terrifying 
secret that he is hiding is not known by anyone but himself. So what is the 
secret? Although this revelation is discovered midway through, the trailers 
for the film foolishly give it away, but in respect for those that have been 
fortunate enough not to see them, I will not reveal it. As for those who have 
seen the ads, well, you already know the "secret" and therefore, I don't have 
to give it away for you, either.
The recent releases of "The Blair Witch Project" and "The Sixth Sense" 
couldn't have come at a more opportune time, because both films visually show 
very little of the actual horrific things terrifying the characters, which 
does nothing but add a deep intelligence and eerie effectiveness that 
probably would have been lost in a special-effects extravaganza. Just look at 
Jan De Bont's piss-poor remake of "The Haunting," a $75-million film which 
left nothing to the imagination and, coincidentally, did not have one 
frightening moment in the whole movie. The "less-is-more" theory appears to 
be becoming a tradition recently, and it's a tradition I'd like to see 
continue if these two marvelous films are any indication. Shyamalan is wisely 
very discreet in his storytelling approach to "The Sixth Sense," and the film 
never rushes along to the next scene for the insulting reason of keeping the 
audience awake. If every scene isn't action-packed, that is perfectly fine, 
as the movie progressively draws you into the proceedings as if you were 
reading an intriguing book, so that when a fleeting moment of visual horror 
is seen, it is all the more unexpected and emotionally stirring. 
The highly important role of the child was, no doubt, a tricky part to cast 
because having a sickeningly precocious kid actor who mugs for the camera at 
every opportunity possible would have ruined the whole film. 11-year-old 
Haley Joel Osment (1996's "Bogus") is different, and thankfully so. Simply 
put, Osment is a real actor, one that, with every line of dialogue and 
memorable facial expression, is wholly believable and sympathetic without 
being overly 'cute.' Incredible and unassured, Osment is perfect in relaying 
his character of Cole's personal confusion and terror at the things he is 
able to see. It is the best performance from a child I've seen since 
3-year-old Victoire Thivisol in 1997's "Ponette." 
Because Osment is so very good, the "star" and veteran of the cast, Bruce 
Willis, is unable to hold his own ground as firmly as if a more accomplished 
actor had been playing this same role. Willis has to be given a round of 
applause for choosing this one-of-a-kind film project, which is far better 
than anything else he has been in since 1994's "Pulp Fiction," but there is 
something about Willis' face that keeps him from selling most of his 
characters. Seemingly always smirking as if he is in on the "joke," kind of 
like Adam Sandler, Willis recites some of the dialogue in his "ultra-serious" 
mode, which usually causes him to not fully sell his lines. Still, Willis is 
not, I repeat not, bad in the film, and this somewhat negative reaction 
probably stems more from the brilliance of Osment than from Willis' own 
acting talents.
Right next to Osment on the performance scale is Toni Collette (1995's 
"Muriel's Wedding," 1998's "Clockwatchers"), a prodigious, versatile actress 
who is remarkably poignant and compassionate as Cole's frustrated, caring 
mother. Also of interest is Olivia Williams (1998's "Rushmore"), as Willis' 
long-suffering wife. The role is underwritten and doesn't give her enough to 
do to equal what she is capable of, but intently watch Williams when she is 
on-screen and you will see that the subtle expressions on her face speak 
volumes over spoken words. 
When it all comes down to it, "The Sixth Sense" is a film that shines the 
spotlight brightly on the two main characters, Cole and Dr. Malcolm, and that 
is the rightful centerpiece in which everything else revolves around. 
Amazing, too, how the ending has the sheer power to completely blindside you 
when the final, ultimate twist occurs. This whole review, I know, has been 
fairly vague in description, but that is how it should be. "The Sixth Sense" 
is a genuine experience--genuinely scary, genuinely touching, and genuinely 
thought-provoking--so much so that it is one of those special films released 
in the confines of Hollywood that somehow squeezed through the cracks to 
present an audience with several truly original ideas. Surprisingly, a late 
scene between Cole and his mother may even bring you to tears (it came very 
close for me), the emotions of which come refreshingly from the honesty of 
the situation, rather than from syrupy melodrama. And the real kicker of it 
all is, it turns out "The Sixth Sense" isn't really a typical horror movie at 
all, but actually a contemplative, thoughtful look at the process of life. 
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Rugrats Movie, The (1998)
Directed by Norton Virgien and Igor Kovalyov.
Voices: E.G. Daily, Christine Cavanaugh, Kath Soucie, Cheryl Chase, Tara 
Charendoff, Tim Curry.
1998 - 76 minutes.
Rated G (nothing objectionable, except for the film itself).
Reviewed November 21, 1998.
By Dustin Putman 
Dustin Putman's Film Reviews >
Although I had not been a viewer of the "Rugrats" television series, I 
went into their first animated feature film, "The Rugrats Movie," with a 
positive attitude. The trailer looked cute enough, after all. After 
seeing it, I think the words in my recent "Antz" review, in which I 
stated that it was the worst film of its type since 1995's "The Pebble 
and the Penguin," were a bit premature. "The Rugrats Movie," is 
bottom-of-the-barrel children's fare at its worst, and starts to make, 
"Antz" look good in comparison.
As in the show, "The Rugrats Movie," is about a group of very little 
friends, ranging from babies to a three-year-old. The head of the group, 
Tommy Pickles (E.G. Daily), becomes distraught when his mother has a 
newborn baby named Dill (get it? Dill Pickles?...hardee-har-har!) and is 
informed by his three-year-old cousin, Anjelica (Cheryl Chase), that the 
new babies always take all of the attention away from the other 
children. When the other children, Chuckie, and twins Lil and Phil, 
suggest taking Dill back to the hospital, Tommy goes along with it, but 
on their way there, they crash in the forest, and become lost, running 
into wolves and circus monkeys, among other things.
"The Rugrats Movie," judging from the idea of being lost in the woods, 
could have been a potentially fun family film, and there were many 
different things that could have been done with the story. So what did 
the writers choose to do? Why, they set up a protracted, cliched scene 
where the children almost go over a waterfall, of course!
For the youngest of children (ages 3-7), "The Rugrats Movie," may very 
well entertain them, judging from the audience I saw this with. Of 
course, if you looked around at all of the older kids and their parents, 
they were all desperately struggling to stay awake, and that included 
me. For an adult, "The Rugrats Movie," is a piece of garbage. The 
plotline is unoriginal and the writing has absolutely no wit or charm. 
There isn't one laugh to be had in the film, nor is there any 
excitement. 
If anything is even marginally good in the picture, it is the bright 
animation style, so it is especially unfortunate that it wasn't to 
service a more quality film.
"The Rugrats Movie" is DOA from the start. I am all for a worthwhile 
family movie, but sometimes an animated film comes along that is simply 
awful. As said before, young children may like it, but even they deserve 
better than this. For adults, it is a nearly unbearable, excruciating 
chore to sit through. As for me, "The Rugrats Movie," is not the worst 
of the year, nor is it the most deeply hated, but it is the most boring. 
Parents: do yourselves a favor and take your kids to see the rerelease 
of, "The Wizard of Oz." That is a picture that contains a great deal of 
magic and wonder, two things of which, "The Rugrats Movie," is 
completely missing. 

Title
Review for Gossip (2000/I)
Directed by David Guggenheim.
Cast: Lena Headey, James Marsden, Norman Reedus, Kate Hudson, Joshua Jackson, 
Marisa Coughlan, Edward James Olmos, Sharon Lawrence, Eric Bogosian.
2000 - 91 minutes
Rated R (for mild violence, sexual situations, and profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, April 22, 2000.
There was this one rumor that I heard, about this movie named "Gossip," 
directed by TV veteran David Guggenheim ("NYPD Blue"). Supposedly, it started 
out a little shakily, but once it got going (at around the 30-minute mark), 
the pacing, performances, and plot developments really crackled. All elements 
were building up momentum to the ever crucial climactic moments, and 
then--like a swift kick in the pants--the final twist startles you and, at 
the same time, makes you angry and feeling like you have wasted your time.
Brainy Jones (Lena Headey), struggling artist Travis (Norman Reedus), and 
womanizer Derrick (James Marsden) are students at a posh university who share 
an even more posh (if that's possible) apartment. It looks like it has the 
type of extravagantly hip living arrangements that would be made for the cast 
of MTV's "The Real World." But anyway, one night while the trio are at a 
party, Jones gets an idea of what they could do for their class project in 
their Journalistic Ethics class: start a harmless rumor, and then track it 
down to see how far it spreads, and how the gossip's subject evolves from 
person to person. While up in the bathroom with a drunk potential 
one-night-stand, Derrick spies on the wealthy Naomi (Kate Hudson) and her new 
boyfriend Beau (Joshua Jackson). Both have had too much to drink, and once 
Naomi passes out on the bed, Beau ends his advances and leaves. Or maybe he 
doesn't, as the rumor the three start up is that Beau and Naomi had sex, 
something hard to believe considering that Naomi is known to not put out for 
guys. 
Soon, the news has spread to practically the whole school population, with 
each person believing something different. Supposed to be a funny experiment, 
Jones grows more and more guilty when the rumor transforms into something 
potentially very dangerous, as it becomes believed that Beau raped Naomi, and 
the police are brought in. Jones urges Derrick and Travis that all three 
should come clean, confessing to starting something that was far from the 
truth, but without any textual evidence, none of them can prove a thing. 
Meanwhile, the lives and futures of Naomi and Beau begin to crumble.
Ultra-glossy and stylishly filmed by cinematographer Andrezej Bartkowiak, 
from what I've also heard, "Gossip" is sort of like a cross between "Cruel 
Intentions" and "Body Shots," but without the humor and feeling of the 
former, and a noticeably giant step up from the vacuous latter. Like both 
pictures, every shot is picturesquely planned out to look beautiful and 
atmospheric, a production designer's wet dream; all of the actors are 
appealing, fairly talented, and physically to die for; and several of the 
characters are cold, emotionless people who do very bad things but, 
ultimately, are bound to receive their just desserts. 
Where "Gossip" fails is in its fairly empty, rushed screenplay by Gregory 
Poirier and Theresa Rebeck, which often moves so quickly (especially in the 
first-third), it's as if you are viewing an outline to a finished product, 
one in which the figures onscreen have not been fully written or thought out. 
When, midway through, there is a quiet, one-on-one sequence between Jones and 
the distraught Naomi, it is a startling shift, but one that comes 
refreshingly not a moment too soon, and throws the entire second half on a 
far more successful, taut, and involving course.
Lena Headey and James Marsden both manage to stand out in the central roles 
of Jones and Derrick, with Headey turning in a sympathetic portrayal of a 
young woman who realizes her mistakes but fears it is too late to turn things 
around, and Marsden is every bit her match as her brooding, highly sexual 
friend-cum-potential-bedmate. Norman Reedus has less to do as the 
work-starved Travis, the final piece of the three major players. Rounding out 
the cast in relatively brief, less-developed roles are Kate Hudson (as the 
confused Naomi), Joshua Jackson (as Beau), and Marisa Coughlan (as Jones' 
friend, Sheila). 
"Gossip" has many intriguing elements that might have equaled up to more in a 
tighter screenplay, but it ultimately doesn't satisfy once the end credits 
have begun to roll. And the final turn in the plot simply leaves you angry, 
as its own contrivances fail to hold up scrutiny upon inspection. I heard all 
of this through the grapevine, though, and although only a rumor, "Gossip" is 
an allegedly OK type of movie--a film worth a look if there's nothing better 
to do (or see), but one than can also afford to be missed. 

Title
Review for Eyes Wide Shut (1999)
Directed by Stanley Kubrick.
Cast: Tom Cruise, Nicole Kidman, Sydney Pollack, Todd Field, Madison Eginton, 
Rade Sherbedgia, Vinessa Shaw, Marie Richardson, Leelee Sobieski, Fay 
Masterson, Alan Cumming.
1999 - 159 minutes.
Rated R (for nudity, sex, and profanity).
Reviewed July 17, 1999.
Leave it up to Stanley Kubrick to spend the last two years of his life making 
the most humane, emotional motion picture of his career. A planned 
eight-month shoot that began in late 1996, the filming kept going, finally 
surpassing years of dedication on the parts of known-perfectionist Kubrick, 
and stars Tom Cruise and Nicole Kidman. Two actors (Jennifer Jason Leigh, 
Harvey Keitel) dropped out after filming their roles due to scheduling 
conflicts, and so their scenes had to be reshot; filming for the actors 
making virtual cameos stretched from a couple weeks to several months; a 
cloak of secrecy was heavily shrouded over the particulars of the plot, and 
only weeks before the release was the premise confirmed; talk of a possible 
NC-17 rating due to soft-core sex scenes was denied when the picture got an 
R, and it was only days before its July 16 release that it was discovered 
images were digitally added, allegedly with Kubrick's permission before his 
death, in a now-hotly-debated and controversial 65-second sequence involving 
an orgy. Kubrick has, to be sure, always been a master of the camera and 
filmmaking in general (just take a gander at 1968's "2001: A Space Odyssey," 
1971's "A Clockwork Orange," and 1980's "The Shining" for proof of his 
one-of-a-kind nature), but his previous films all have had an obvious cold 
detachment about them. It wasn't a flaw on Kubrick's part, but simply one of 
the defining elements of each of his films. His latest, and final, triumph is 
"Eyes Wide Shut," which is a Kubrick picture in every sense of the word, 
except for in the lasting impression it leaves on the viewer. At once 
downbeat and intellectually-draining, the unforgettable characters that make 
up the world of "Eyes Wide Shut" nonetheless are more tender and, simply put, 
human, than in any of Kubrick's past films.
Set during the week before Christmas in New York City, Dr. Bill Harford (Tom 
Cruise) and his wife, Alice (Nicole Kidman), live in a large Central Park 
West apartment with their 7-year-old daughter, Helena (Madison Eginton). 
Happily married, when Bill and Alice make their way to a ritzy holiday party 
given by their friend, Victor Ziegler (Sydney Pollack), they find themselves 
both having to turn down members of the opposite sex that make sexual 
advances toward them. The next night, after smoking a little pot, Alice finds 
herself confessing to Bill that in the previous summer, while on vacation at 
Cape Cod, she briefly met a devastatingly handsome naval officer, and if he 
would have happened to want to be with her, she was ready to give up her 
husband, her daughter, her whole life, just for one night. Immediately 
afterwards, called to be told that one of his patients has died, Bill, 
emotionally distraught by his wife's revelation, sets off on a night-long 
odyssey of his own through the streets of Manhattan that concludes at a 
secluded and highly guarded mansion in which a suspicious masquerade ball is 
in full swing.
It's difficult to describe the premise of "Eyes Wide Shut" because, for one, 
the story has been so heavily secretive for so long that to say anymore 
wouldn't be fair, and two, words merely could never do justice to the film as 
a whole. Deliberately-paced and eerily beautiful, the film is an ultimately 
rewarding experience that, when all is said and done, adds up to 159 minutes 
of sheer cinema artistry. One of the biggest delights of "Eyes Wide Shut" is 
in its completely unpredictable nature. Rarely ever can you detect which 
direction the film is going in, or where things will end up, and, therefore, 
for the entire running time I was completely glued to the screen, eager to 
find out what would happen, and subsequently who we would meet, next. 
Reminiscent of Ingmar Bergman's "Wild Strawberries," the film is lyrical and 
passionate, but never sexually titillating as was so widely predicted, and 
there is a strange, rewarding fascination in watching one character go 
through his own journey, whether it be in physical or emotional terms.
Written by Kubrick and Frederic Raphael, "Eyes Wide Shut," like very few 
films I've seen, slowly but surely wrapped around me and put me under its 
rapturous spell. Every character, including each of the supporting ones, have 
been created with such subtle, truthful details that it would be very 
difficult to forget or not be affected in some way by all of them. Tom 
Cruise, often times, and unfairly, criticized for, in essence, playing the 
same role over and over again, strips away every one of those exterior 
pretenses this time around and never strikes a false note, handling every one 
of his difficult scenes with matured aplomb that I don't think I've ever seen 
from him. Meanwhile, Nicole Kidman in a slightly smaller role than expected, 
is the heart and soul of the film, as the alternately distanced and loving 
Alice who, in a tour de force monologue, admits to, once, having the desire 
to put everything behind her simply to be with a stranger. "And yet," as she 
says to Bill, "at that exact moment I've never felt closer to you." A 
particularly moving, seemingly minor but vitally important moment, comes when 
Bill gets home from work later at night to find Alice helping their daughter 
with her school work. Alice clearly loves her child so very much, but as Bill 
observes her, he questions how she could ever have considered leaving her.
As for the supporting characters, no one is let off without making some sort 
of long-term impression. The now-23-year-old Vinessa Shaw, previously a teen 
actress (1992's "Ladybugs," 1993's "Hocus Pocus"), makes a warm, delicately 
touching turn as Domino, a prostitute whom Bill comes into contact with and, 
for one fleeting moment, finds a comforting solace in her understanding, 
strangely virtuous personality. Todd Field, as Bill's old medical school 
buddy, Nick Nightingale, who later dropped out and is now a piano player, 
works very well with Cruise and they have one scene together set in a small 
night club/bar that really cooks, both for the fabulous dialogue and their 
effortless accord with one another. Sydney Pollack is dynamite as the 
friendly Victor Ziegler who may or may not be harboring a few secrets of his 
own. Pollack treats every one of his lines as if it were his last, and 
therefore, is able to make the character his own. In a scene towards the end 
between Bill and Victor, Pollack also happens to leave us with a 
thought-provoking notion: "Life goes on. It always does, until it doesn't." 
Rade Serbedgia, as a man who runs a costume shop, is memorably off-kilter and 
amusing, and as his sexually promiscuous teenage daughter, Leelee Sobieski 
lights up the screen with her angelically devilish smiles. And Faye 
Masterson, as Domino's roommate, Sally, has a poignant scene with Bill in 
which she reveals something that I never saw coming, and that may at first 
seem pointless but, on closer introspection, couldn't be any further from the 
truth.
The centerpiece of "Eyes Wide Shut," of course, coming midway through, is the 
private masquerade party that Bill manages to get into when he acquires the 
password. It should be noted that it is in this scene that the infamous 
65-second orgy occurs, in which digitally-created images were placed in front 
of the perverse sexual acts to only partially hide what was going on. At once 
ludicrous of the MPAA to treat American adults like children, the added 
figures really do look believable and, dare I say it, contributes to, rather 
than hurts, the dream-like air of the scene. As for the approximately 
17-minute sequence as a whole, things develop at such as gradual, foreboding 
pace, and aided magnificently by the ominous, red-letter music score, by 
Jocelyn Pook, which is the repetitive striking of two piano keys, that the 
suspense builds up to an almost unbearable crescendo. This scene is, by and 
far, virtuoso filmmaking, one of the most indelible moments on film this 
decade, and only goes to prove what a brilliant craftsman Kubrick was. 
Throughout the film, there are passing references to dreams, including one 
moment at the end when Alice suggests to Bill that they really should stop 
dreaming, in relegation to their potentially troubled marriage, and 
admittedly, the whole film feels like an ostensibly aimless dream with no 
final destination (which, in many ways, it does indeed have). The lighting 
cinematography by Larry Smith is perfect, choosing to go for a somewhat 
grainy, washed out look that only makes the often-seen colorful decorations 
and Christmas lights all the more powerful. Finally, the production design by 
Les Tomkins and Roy Walker, is sumptuous and wholeheartedly Kubrickesque 
(similar in look to "The Shining"), as they have taken the nearly impossible 
job of creating New York City on a London soundstage. Occasionally the sets 
look just as they are, sets, but that odd mixture of NYC realism and 
artificiality only compliments what the film is about.
So, what is "Eyes Wide Shut" about, anyway? No, I don't mean the clearcut 
story, but what exactly lies underneath that? One of the joys of Kubrick was 
in the way that he respected and treated his audience like thinking adults, 
to draw their own conclusion to many of his films' occurences. To me, "Eyes 
Wide Shut" is a morality tale in the classic tradition, about a married 
couple who, over a couple days, discover more about each other--their dreams, 
feelings, and fears--than they ever thought they would in a lifetime, and 
through that, must come to terms with their relationship, as well as their 
own decisions as individuals, before they can decide what will happen next. 
Truly unlike Kubrick, however, "Eyes Wide Shut" concludes with a marvelous, 
powerful last scene that ends on a relatively hopeful, positive note. As the 
screen went to black and the words, "Directed by Stanley Kubrick," filled the 
screen, the masterful, final chapter in Kubrick's highly-respected, 
forever-remembered life came to a close.
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Exit Wounds (2001)
Directed by Andrzej Bartkowiak.
Cast: Steven Seagal, DMX, Isaiah Washington, Anthony Anderson, Tom Arnold, 
Jill Hennessy, Michael Jai White, Bill Duke, Eva Mendes, Bruce McGill, David 
Vadim.
2001 - 103 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, sexual situations, and nudity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, March 17, 2001.
Steven Seagal's face must be crazy-glued, or something. That is the one 
overwhelming thought that plagued me throughout "Exit Wounds," his first 
big-screen motion picture since 1997's "Fire Down Below." In every single 
shot of Seagal, he has  the same brooding facial expression, as if he has 
been constipated for the last week. Either the look on his face has been 
permanently molded and glued down, or he should seriously consider flexing 
the muscles a little more. It wouldn't hurt to take some acting lessons while 
he's at it.
Seagal may be a mannequin who coasts through the 103-minute duration, but his 
annoying presence isn't the only problem this generic actioner has. "Exit 
Wounds" is a cliched journey through incomprehensible storytelling, 
fast-paced car chases, violent shoot-outs, a speech on the importance of gun 
safety, and everything else you would expect from a "Steven Seagal movie." On 
that level, the film delivers for his die-hard fans, but does he really have 
enough to warrant its dubious existence? Probably not.
Because "Exit Wounds" painstakingly keeps its mid-story plot twists under 
wraps (all of which can be seen ten miles ahead by any viewer with an IQ over 
-3), much of the picture has no story at all. What can be said is that Seagal 
plays Detroit detective Orin Boyd, a hot-tempered character who is fired and 
relocated to the infamous Precinct 15 after an unprofessional, irresponsible 
job at saving the Vice President's life during an assassination attempt. 
Saddled, at first, with the embarrassing job of directing traffic, Boyd soon 
catches wind of a planned drug deal that leads him to Latrell Walker (DMX), a 
mysteriously wealthy, young man whose brother is in prison. Latrell may not 
be the bad guy he seems, however, and some of Boyd's fellow cops at the 
precinct may not be as honorable as they appear.
"Exit Wounds," laughably based on an actual novel by John Westermann, and 
directed with mild aplomb by Andrzej Bartkowiak, has little to offer in the 
way of substance and characters worth caring about, but does manage to fire 
off a few exciting sequences. While not what one would exactly call 
"action-packed," there are several scenes that are edited and directed with 
such energy (including a slam-bang car chase), it's a shame the rest of the 
movie is so very bad.
Recording artist DMX (2000's "Romeo Must Die") is in every way a perfect 
match for Steven Seagal, in that he sleepwalks through a part without showing 
the slightest alteration on his emotion and facial expression. Better is 
Anthony Anderson (2000's "Me, Myself, & Irene"), a funny, charismatic rising 
star who, here, plays Latrell's buddy and the owner of a strip club. In the 
future, he should turn his back on weak material such as this. Other 
supporting players include Isaiah Washington (1999's "True Crime"), as 
Seagal's partner at the 15th Precinct; Jill Hennessy (2000's "Autumn in New 
York"), beautiful, but wasted, as Seagal's superior; Eva Mendes (2000's 
"Urban Legends: Final Cut"), even more beautiful, and even more wasted; and 
Tom Arnold (2000's "Shriek If You Know What I Did Last Friday the 13th"), 
grating as a morning talk show host whom Boyd meets at an Anger Management 
class.
The screenplay, by Ed Horowitz and Richard D'Ovidio, is a strictly 
cut-and-paste job that shows up to lay out the basic groundwork, and then 
makes way for more blasting guns than I've seen within a two-hour radius 
since the last John Woo opus. What "Exit Wounds" ultimately never escapes is 
its low-rent, unpolished feel--a position that fails to give the film any 
credibility. It's a stupid action pic made exclusively for those select 
people whose ability to stay awake during a movie is judged by how frequently 
an explosion occurs. 
   - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
     http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman
http://www.atnzone.com

Title
Review for Drop Dead Gorgeous (1999)

Drop Dead Gorgeous * * * 1/2 (out of * * * * )
Directed by Michael Patrick Jann.
Cast: Kirsten Dunst, Denise Richards, Kirstie Alley, Ellen Barkin, Allison 
Janney, Sam McMurray, Brittany Murphy, Amy Adams, Mindy Sterling, Matt 
Malloy, Will Sasso.
1999 - 99 minutes.
Rated PG-13 (for violence, profanity, and non-stop offensiveness).
Reviewed July 24, 1999.
"Drop Dead Gorgeous" may be a breakthrough in mainstream comedy. The first 
standard-made faux-documentary to be released wide, the typicals of the film 
are anything but standard, as it manages to grab almost non-stop jokes out of 
the red-hot, fast, and furious screenplay by Lona Williams, many of which are 
more offensive--and hilarious--than, dare I say it, "American Pie" or "South 
Park: Bigger, Longer & Uncut." Like 1997's marvelous mockumentary, "Waiting 
for Guffman," "Drop Dead Gorgeous" captures small-town life dead-on, but with 
an obvious satiric edge, and is entertaining from the first frame to the last.
At the outset, we are told that a documentary crew has travelled to the 
sleepy farming town of Mount Rose, Minnesota to make a film about the 
upcoming annual Mount Rose Miss Teen Princess America Pageant. Preparation is 
well underway for the nine contestants, all of which we get to meet through 
the course of the film. The shoo-in to win is stuck-up Becky Leeman (Denise 
Richards), whose wealthy mother, Gladys (Kirstie Alley), is a former Mount 
Rose Pageant winner, and who is the president of this year's festivities. 
Becky's obvious main opponent happens to be Amber Atkins (Kirsten Dunst), an 
innocent soul who lives in a trailer home with her beer-guzzling, caring 
mother, Annette (Ellen Barkin), and often practices her tap-dancing steps at 
work--as she puts make-up on the corpses at a funeral home. Amber's main 
motive for entering the pageant in the first place is because she sees it as 
her only way of getting out of Mount Rose, and dreams of being the next Diane 
Sawyer. However, being the back-stabber that Becky is, there is no hiding the 
fact that she will stop at nothing to triumph over everyone else, even if 
that means murdering some of the other contestants. Meanwhile, we are told, 
the documentarians are required to act as merely spectators, and cannot get 
involved in the goings-on that are occurring around them.
"Drop Dead Gorgeous," vibrantly directed by Michael Patrick Jann, pulls out 
all the stops to give us one of the most snappy, biting comedies to come out 
in some time, and that the film is rated PG-13 is rather amazing considering 
some of the sure-to-be-controversial story elements. Taking its cue from 
1974's similar teen beauty pageant movie, "Smile," which may have been more 
realistic but is nowhere near as amusing, director Jann and writer Williams 
will do anything for a good, hearty laugh, even if it means going over into 
the bad-taste arena, and it serves up enough fresh, saucy ideas for two 
movies. 
The plot thickens when Amber receives a picture in her school locker of one 
of the recently-deceased ex-contestants, with the words, "You're Next," 
sprawled along the back. Soon after, her trailer home mysteriously explodes 
with her mother inside. Luckily, Annette survives (she luckily landed in a 
flower-bed) and is just sent to the hospital, albeit with a severely burnt 
hand that has a beer can welded to it. Amber understandably begins to fear 
for her own life, but is convinced by her mother and mother's best friend, 
Loretta (Allison Janney), to carry on. The pageant itself is the centerpiece 
of the film, and it is a true show-stopper, with last year's Mount Rose 
princess, currently residing in a wellness home for anorexics, coming 
on-stage in a wheelchair and an IV machine by her side to lip-sync a song. 
Call it sacrilegious, but another hilariously off-kilter scene has one of the 
contestant coming out for the talent section and singing "You're Just Too 
Good to Be True," as she serenades and dances with a dummy of Jesus on the 
cross.
The cast is uniformly excellent across the board, particularly 17-year-old 
Kirsten Dunst, as the sweet Amber, who, no doubt about it, has one of the 
brightest acting futures ahead of her for anyone in her age group. Dunst 
constantly chooses interesting, intelligent roles and does not conform to 
anything she doesn't believe in. She also has proven that she can perform in 
any genre and will sparkle, and here she does just that in one of her few 
comedic roles (although briefly appearing in 1997's comedy satire, "Wag the 
Dog"). As Amber's nemesis, Becky, Denise Richards plays her bitchy role 
perfectly, even though she isn't given nearly as much to do as Dunst. She 
sure can carry a shotgun well, though! Kirstie Alley, like Richards' 
character, is extremely spiteful, but also very funny, especially in the 
final section of the picture, when her character goes right off the deep end. 
Ellen Barkin, as well as the irreplacable queen of quirky supporting roles, 
Allison Janney, add a certain warmth to their scenes, as Amber's loving 
family and confidants ("It was never hid from me," says Amber 
matter-of-factly, "that my dad put work over family. After all, once a carny, 
always a carny."). Also in notable smaller roles is Matt Malloy, as one of 
the slimy judges who is constantly trying to hide from the camera that he has 
a thing for underage girls; Will Sasso ("Mad TV") as another of the judge's 
retarded grown sons; Amy Adams as a good-hearted, if flaky, pageant 
contestant who tells Amber if she dies, to "be sure to cover up the hickeys 
on my neck, and ears, and upper thighs;" and Brittany Murphy, as the upbeat, 
giggly Lisa, another Mount Rose Teen Princess hopeful.
Topped with a memorable, catchy soundtrack, successful documentary-like 
cinematography, by Michael Spiller, and an endless stream of laugh-inducing, 
outrageous dialogue, "Drop Dead Gorgeous" is a huge comic winner, and one of 
the best times at the movies I've had all year. The offensive (to some) 
subject matter is sometimes mean-spirited, but doesn't get so bad as to 
become repugnant, and balancing out the savage comedy is a big, warm heart. 
Amber (who, in her spare time, visits and cares for the current anorexic 
Pageant winner), Annette (who hopes that her daughter will be able to follow 
her dreams and not end up like her in a dead-end existence), and Loretta (who 
doesn't have a true family but acts as a sort of loving surrogate mother for 
Amber) are such likable people, and an endearing combination, that you find 
yourself very much rooting for them, and wondering just why Becky and Gladys 
and the other spoiled sports of Mount Rose couldn't all just get along.
   - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
     Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Smooth Talk (1985)
Directed by Joyce Chopra.
Cast: Laura Dern, Mary Kay Place, Elizabeth Berridge, Treat Williams, 
Margaret Welsch, Levon Helm, Jill Inglis.
1986 - 92 minutes.
Rated PG-13 (for sexual situations and profanity).
Reviewed September 1998.
"Smooth Talk," which is the best independent film I have ever seen, won 
the Grand Jury Prize at 1985's Sundance Film Festival, then known as the 
U.S. Film Festival. It is an alternately funny, touching, tragic, 
unexpected gem.
Laura Dern stars as Connie, a bored 15-year-old girl who is sometimes 
naive and selfish, like most teenagers are, and has an unhappy home 
life, especially because her mother (Mary Kay Place) completely doesn't 
understand her. Her dad (Levon Helm) is often so involved in himself and 
his own dreams that when he talks to Connie, it is as if he is speaking 
a foreign language. She also suffers because her parents obviously 
prefer her older sister, June (Elizabeth Berridge). It is summer break, 
and all Connie wants is some excitement in her life. Every day she goes 
to the mall with her two friends and they slip into the bathroom, change 
into more revealing clothes, and run around the building like little 
children. She also decides to venture across the road from the mall and 
go to the burger joint where the older people hang out, hoping to find a 
boy, but it is obvious she is still too immature for a relationship. 
Connie briefly comes in contact with a handsome, but mysterious older 
man who obviously has an ulterior motive.
To give away the last 30 minutes of "Smooth Talk" would be criminal, 
because one of the best things about the film is the element of surprise 
at what comes at the conclusion. What happens is one of the most 
unpredictable, shocking things I have ever seen, but it leads up to a 
moment in the last scene that leaves closure for what had happened, and 
is one of my all-time favorite scenes in any film.
"Smooth Talk" is the best type of film. It obviously was made for not 
much money, but was written and directed by Joyce Chopra, based on the 
short story, "Where Am I Going? Where Have I Been?" by Joyce Carol 
Oates, with a great deal of delicacy and care. The screenplay is 
especially impressive, and perfectly realized, because not only is it 
perfect at being a "coming-of-age" story, and a "slice-of-life" picture, 
but the characters are also all written to be three-dimensional, and 
each one of them is given the chance to have at least one scene in which 
we really get to know or sympathize with them. 
At the center of the story, however, is Connie, who is one of the most 
memorable and realistic teenage characters in recent memory. And what 
definately brings her to life is Dern, who is flawless in her portrayal 
of this girl who at one moment has the stature and ability to act like 
an adult, and in the next frame turn into this child. It is Dern's best 
performance to date, and was worthy of winning the 1986 Academy Award 
for Best Actress. The other cast members also couldn't be better. 
Berridge, as Connie's lonely sister, gives a truly poignant performance, 
as does Jill Inglis as one of Connie's friends whom Connie ignores once 
she starts hanging out at the burger place. The music by James Taylor is 
perfect for the movie, and fits very well, especially in the last 
sequence already mentioned, which makes the scene all the more powerful. 
I wouldn't change a thing about "Smooth Talk." It is one of the few 
motion pictures I've seen that enraptured me in its story and characters 
so well that at the end, I was left with a lot of deep emotions and 
feelings about what I had witnessed, and also about the brilliance and 
subtlety of the last touching scene.
   - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
     Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Bowfinger (1999)
Directed by Frank Oz.
Cast: Steve Martin, Eddie Murphy, Heather Graham, Christine Baranski, Jamie 
Kennedy, Adam Alexi-Malle, Terence Stamp, Robert Downey Jr.
1999 - 97 minutes.
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and sexual situations).
Reviewed August 16, 1999.
Writer-actor Steve Martin has a genuine love for the art of cinema and 
filmmaking in general. How did I come to this conclusion? Easy. Because no 
one could have possibly written the new comedy, "Bowfinger," without having 
an overwhelming fondness for movies, as the main character is the 49-year-old 
struggling novice director, Bobby Bowfinger (Steve Martin), a man whose 
inspiration was no doubt Edward D. Wood, Jr., the '50s and '60s filmmaker who 
had a passion for his craft, but made what some widely consider the worst 
films ever made, most notably "Plan 9 From Outer Space" and "Glen or Glenda." 
With his stock acting troupe that includes a Mexican screenwriter (Adam 
Alexi-Malle) and Carol (Christine Baranski), his loyal sole actress, Bobby 
Bowfinger has been attempting to get a film greenlit in Hollywood for years 
now, even having set up his own production company (without any productions 
to its name, thus far), Bowfinger International Pictures. One day, a light is 
sparked in Bobby when his writer hands him a sci-fi script entitled, "Chubby 
Rain," about aliens that fall to Earth within raindrops. Cleverly running 
into distinguished film producer Jerry Renfro (Robert Downey Jr.), Renfro 
lets Bobby know after reading the first and last pages that he will have a 
"go" picture if he can get popular movie star Kit Ramsey (Eddie Murphy) to 
agree to topline the project. After a disasterous encounter with him at his 
mansion, Bobby, in ultra desperation, devises a plan to still make "Chubby 
Rain" with Kit: he will get his assistant (Jamie Kennedy) to stake out Kit's 
every move, hide a video camera out of sight, and instruct the rest of his 
actors, playing aliens, to walk up to him, say their lines, and let Kit react 
to the scene as if it is real--because for Kit, of course, it is real, and he 
soon becomes convinced that people are actually out to get him. To Bobby's 
surprise, this unconventional, decidedly illegal, method of filmmaking starts 
off very well, but when Kit finally goes into hiding, it is up to the team to 
find someone to be Kit's stand-in, which he finds in Jiff, a nerdy, 
braces-wearing McDonald's employee.
As the premise for a big-studio comedy, "Bowfinger" is dynamite in the story 
department. Reminiscent in some ways to Tim Burton's 1994 film, "Ed Wood," 
"Bowfinger" is fascinating throughout due to its meticulous, intriguing look 
at moviemaking. The way that Bobby Bowfinger gets his actors to interact with 
an unknowing Kit Ramsey is ingenious, and cause for many big laughs, while 
director Frank Oz (1991's "What About Bob?" and 1997's "In & Out") is just 
the right man for the job, a talent who is almost a sure-thing when it comes 
to making a feature comedy.
Unfortunately, aside from its sheer inventiveness, which helps to make the 
picture worth seeing for this reason alone, "Bowfinger" is fairly shallow 
when handling its many characters. As the at-first-innocent Daisy who comes 
to L.A. to be a star and decides to sleep with everyone she comes into 
contact with to get a boost in the biz, Heather Graham is wonderfully giddy 
and high-spirited, and her performance is an improvement on a comedic level 
from her ho-hum appearance in this summer's earlier, "Austin Powers: The Spy 
Who Shagged Me." What is so disappointing about Daisy, however, is that her 
character would have been more funny and likable had she not metamorphosized 
virtually overnight from a ditzy, innocent country girl (she makes her first 
appearance by getting off a bus, walking into an audition for Bowfinger, and 
earnestly asking, "Is this where you come to be a star?") into a promiscuous 
actress who goes through men (and women) like she goes through packets of 
ketchup. In perhaps the film's best performance and a more substantially 
large role than she usually plays, Christine Baranski is top-notch and 
hilariously wacky as an astoundingly over-the-top actress who, in "Chubby 
Rain," plays the role of a knife-wielding alien who repeatedly screams, 
"Bastard!" every time she sees Kit. As for Jamie Kennedy (1996's "Scream" and 
1997's "Scream 2"), as Bowfinger's camera operator and assistant, he is 
almost just as wasted as he has been in every film following his stint in 
that popular horror series.
All of the talk I had heard going into "Bowfinger" was about Eddie Murphy's 
standout duel roles as Kit Ramsey and Jiff, but that is where the film's most 
major flaw lies. Although Murphy appears throughout the film and is engaging 
with what he is given, he plays the two roles only half of the time, 
therefore making both Kit and Jiff one-dimensonal supporting characters. Once 
Jiff enters into the film midway through, Kit mostly disappears, and nothing 
is really done with Murphy's second personality, aside from using him in one 
of the comedic centerpieces, in which he has to run across a roaring, busy 
freeway. Regardless of the hype, it is Steve Martin who is the star of the 
picture, and his Bobby Bowfinger feels tailor-made for the actor (no shock 
there, since Martin wrote the screenplay). The problem is, for a comedy, 
Martin isn't particularly funny either, but mostly "the straight man" for 
which everyone else plays off of. 
And so lies the outcome of "Bowfinger," which is that the film is far more 
successful in its examination of pedestrian moviemaking, and gains most of 
its laughs from this aspect, rather than in the mostly forgettable 
characters. For example, one of the highlights of the picture is a sequence 
set in a parking deck in which Kit keeps hearing a second pair of footsteps 
every time he walks. I won't give away the comic payoff, but it is a laugh 
riot the way that the scene is milked for all its worth, as well as in its 
perfect comic timing. Too many problems detract from "Bowfinger" to make it 
be considered a "great" comedy, but it is a good one, not to mention the most 
entertaining movie about movies that I've seen in a few years (at the very 
least, better than the disasterous 1998 bomb, "Burn Hollywood Burn: An Alan 
Smithee Film"). For its amount of laughs, however, it places below the likes 
of this summer's "American Pie," "Drop Dead Gorgeous," and "Dick," well above 
that of "Austin Powers" and "Mystery Men," and about equal to "Big Daddy." 
Not at all a bad place to stand in a comedy-crowded summer season.
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman. 
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Get Carter (2000)
Directed by Stephen Kay.
Cast: Sylvester Stallone, Rachael Leigh Cook, Mickey Rourke, Alan Cumming, 
Miranda Richardson, Michael Caine, Rhona Mitra, John C. McGinley, Gretchen 
Mol.
2000 - 102 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, sexual situations, and blood).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, October 7, 2000.
"My name is Jack Carter, and you don't want to know me," says Sylvester 
Stallone in the opening line of dialogue from "Get Carter," a loose remake of 
the same-named 1971 film starring Michael Caine (who has a supporting role 
here). An hour and forty minutes later, it was safe to agree with him that, 
yes, I didn't want to know him, after all. "Get Carter" is a dimly lit, 
brooding film noir that is as technically stylish as it is utterly mediocre. 
With very little action to satisfy the appetites of die-hard Stallone fans 
(save for two boring car chases), and a premise that is older than stale 
bread, the film plays out in a way that more often than not causes the viewer 
to question if they have seen the same proceedings all before. And, 
unfortunately, they probably have.
Jack Carter is a violent, Las Vegas-based debt collector who has been 
settling scores and making loads of cash for many years. Although he has 
effortlessly adapted to his unconventional lifestyle, things change for him 
with the news that his brother, who lives in Seattle, has been found dead at 
the wheel of his car, the victim of an apparent drunk driving accident. 
Carter, feeling guilty over not staying in touch with him over the years, 
knows that his brother would not drink and drive, and suspects that he was 
murdered--but by who? In an attempt to not only seek vengeance on his only 
sibling's demise, but to also protect his apprehensive sister-in-law Gloria 
(Miranda Richardson) and teenaged niece Doreen (Rachael Leigh Cook), Carter 
sets out to find the truth about his untimely death.
In the depiction of a city where the sun never shines and the rain looms 
ominously over the heads of the inhabitants, Mauro Fiore's evocative 
cinematography is easily a highlight in the otherwise unextraordinary "Get 
Carter," which boosts little interest outside of its camera trickery 
(jump-cuts, overexposed lenses, etc.) and sparkling cast of familiar faces. 
It's too bad, then, that no one besides Stallone, Cook, Rourke, and Cumming 
make anything but a cursory appearance.
Sylvester Stallone, in his first return to the big screen since his 
well-received 1997 foray "Copland," inhabits a sense of irresistibly 
bad-assed coolness not seen since Mel Gibson in 1999's "Payback." While 
Stallone is unable to paint Carter with more than two or three shades 
throughout, he stands as a formidable symbol of how one should dress and act 
if in the same line of work as he. 
Everyone consistently plays second fiddle to Stallone, and some handle 
themselves better than others, based not only on their talent, but how strong 
(or ludicrous) the writing is at any given moment. Rachael Leigh Cook (1999's 
"She's All That"), as the distraught Doreen, quickly warms up to the 
appearance of Carter, who is not only her uncle, but someone whom she places 
as a sort of father figure to replace her own dad. Cook equips herself with 
finesse and clear signs that she is more than just a pretty face on the big 
screen, even when asked to do silly or ridiculous things. Mickey Rourke 
(1997's "The Rainmaker") is at his attractively slimy best as Cyrus Paice, 
perhaps the only man Carter knows who is any sort of match for him. And Alan 
Cumming (1999's "Titus," Broadway's "Cabaret"), as young millionaire computer 
aficionado Jeremy Kinnear, stands out in all of his sparse scenes, adding 
depth and memorable acting choices to a character simply vacant from the 
written script, by David McKenna. 
On the other end of the spectrum, the usually talented Miranda Richardson 
(1999's "Sleepy Hollow), as Gloria, is merely cashing a paycheck, briefly 
popping up only a handful of times and adding nothing to the film. The same 
goes for Michael Caine (1999's "The Cider House Rules") and an unbilled 
Gretchen Mol (1998's "Music From Another Room"), as Stallone's trophy 
girlfriend back in Vegas.
Amidst the appropriately gloomy atmosphere and Stallone's star turn, "Get 
Carter" is little more than a shallow retread of many, many movies gone by. 
Attempts at character-building moments mostly fail due to the usually 
lame-brained dialogue that screenwriter McKenna has ill-fatedly penned, 
leaving us to follow a perplexing lead character whom we never grow to care 
about, or even understand. Save for one mild surprise, the picture also 
remains painfully predictable, leading to a conclusion that does nothing 
except beg for a reason why anyone's time or energy was wasted making such a 
throwaway movie in the first place.

Title
Review for October Sky (1999)
Directed by Joe Johnston.
Cast: Jake Gyllenhaal, Chris Cooper, Chris Owen, William Lee Scott, Chad 
Lindberg, Laura Dern, Natalie Canerday.
1999 - 108 minutes
Rated PG (for mild profanity).
Reviewed February 20, 1999.
"October Sky," a film directed by Joe Johnston ("Honey, I Shrunk the 
Kids," "Jumanji"), had a fair amount going against it. For one, Johnston 
previously had specialized in mostly special effects-laden productions; 
it's film studio was Universal, who recently released the painfully 
manipulative "Patch Adams," and the story, judging from the trailer, 
could have easily gone the same easy route into utter corniness. 
Fortunately, "October Sky" appears to have been written instead with a 
great deal of care by Lewis Colick, and therefore comes across as a 
realistic portrait of a certain moment in time. The film is based on a 
true story, by the way, and also unlike "Patch Adams," appears to have 
stayed very, very close to what actually happened, instead of taking 
noticable liberties in exchange for cheap, artificial melodrama.
Set in Coalwood, West Virginia, circa 1957, "October Sky" begins on the 
monumental day of Oct. 5 when Russia beat the Americans to space with 
their first satellite, called Sputnik. Homer Hickum (Jake Gyllenhaal), a 
teenager whose father (Chris Cooper), a stubborn coal mining supervisor 
in the town, clearly favors his older brother who has just gotten a 
football scholarship to college, knows that he was not meant to be a 
miner, and doesn't want anything to do with it. Soon, inspired by 
Sputnik, Homer acquires his two buddies (William Lee Scott, Chad 
Lindberg) and the class brain, Quentin (Chris Owen), to begin to make 
small rockets. Their understanding and friendly school teacher, Miss 
Riley (Laura Dern), encourages them to enter the state science fair 
because she truly believes in them, and Homer automatically sees this 
opportunity as a way to possibly get away from his ultimate dead-end 
existence as a coal miner (the winner of the state goes on to the 
country, and the person who takes first place gets a college 
scholarship).
Although "October Sky" follows a fairly predictable pattern, the film 
turned out to be first-rate, thanks to the delicate and innocent way 
that the story was told, and in the satisfying way that the characters 
were handled. The subplot involving Homer's stern father could have 
easily characterized him as a one-dimensional jerk, but instead, played 
terrifically by Chris Cooper, who also stood out in John Sayles' 1996 
film, "Lone Star," we learn that he does care about his son, even if he 
has a difficult time showing it. Quite a few moments between father and 
son are finely-tuned and ring with a resounding truthfulness that you 
don't often see in mainstream films today. Also making an impression are 
Gyllenhaal, in his first major feature film role, who acts as our 
likable and sympathetic protagonist; Natalie Canerday, as Homer's loving 
mother who becomes torn between her feuding husband and son; and Laura 
Dern, radiant as always, in the relatively small, but touching role of 
Miss Riley, a young woman who sees teaching as a pointless means of work 
if she can't inspire and help her students get out of their nearly 
unavoidable destinies to become miners. It is ultimately in the exact 
performances and writing that are the primary reasons "October Sky" 
works so well. 
If there is one subplot in the film that could have been dealt with in a 
more gratifying manner, it is that of Homer's crush on his older 
brother's girlfriend, and another girl who does like Homer, even though 
he mostly ignores her. This almost same exact situation was far more 
satisfying in the recent brilliant motion picture, "Rushmore." One 
slapstick-style sequence that seems out of place shows the four boys, 
early on, testing out their rockets, only to see them fail in some way; 
the way that the scene was filmed and edited together, played to the 
tune of a '50s song, didn't really seem to belong in the context of the 
rest of the film.
These, of course, are mostly insignificant criticisms when compared to 
the whole of the film, which is a rare film that does not short-change 
its characters or their plight in any way, nor does it trivialize them. 
In its surprisingly effective, subtle concluding moments when we find 
out the fates of all the characters, shown with home-movies of the real 
people the film was based on, I had realized that "October Sky" was made 
by a group of filmmakers and actors who cared deeply enough about the 
people and true accounts that the story was based upon that they in no 
way attempted to add a bunch of flashy extra stories that would make the 
film more accessible or commercial to a wider audience. Good for them.
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Baby Geniuses (1999)
Directed by Bob Clark.
Cast: Leo Fitzgerald, Myles Fitzgerald, Gerry Fitzgerald, Kim Cattrall, 
Peter MacNicol, Kathleen Turner, Kyle Howard, Ruby Dee, Dom Deluise, 
Christopher Lloyd.
1999 - 93 minutes
Rated PG (for mild profanity and violence).
Reviewed March 19, 1999.
In "Baby Geniuses," directed by the wildly uneven director of some great 
movies (1974's "Black Christmas" and 1983's "A Christmas Story") and a 
particularly awful one (1981's "Porky's"), the key selling-point that is 
brought up is that babies are actually geniuses who hold the key to all 
of life's questions and are able to understand all languages (even 
though they speak in "baby talk"), and it is only once they "cross over" 
at about age two that they forget everything and become a so-called 
normal person. Although this theory is far-fetched in the extreme, it 
also is admittedly kind of intriguing. The film itself, however, throws 
all original ideas out the window in the very first scene to become a 
sort of junior version of "Look Who's Talking," minus practically all 
the wit and brightness of the story and situations. After enduring this 
mainstream family movie (kids deserve a lot better than this, even if 
they may enjoy some of it), I think it's safe to say that director Clark 
should go back to making movies about Christmas, since that is 
apparently the only thing he's good at.
Partially set at Babyco, a company that includes the world's largest 
indoor amusement park (a visual delight for the limited amount of time 
it recieves), the evil founder, Dr. Childers (Kathleen Turner), has 
secretly turned the basement into a scientific test area where she keeps 
a slew of baby prodigies and studies them. One of the children, Sly, who 
is the leader of the baby group, actually has a twin named Whit (both 
are played by real-life triplets, Leo, Myles, and Gerry Fitzgerald), who 
is living with a nice family unknowing of this separation (Whit was 
adopted). Through a series of incidents, Sly escapes from his confines 
at Babyco and gets loose out in the city where, the following morning at 
the mall, he comes into contact with Whit and is switched with him by 
his mother (Kim Cattrall). And so on...and so on...and so on...
In its whole 93-minute running time, "Baby Geniuses" included about four 
or five amusing lines of dialogue by the babies ("The first words I say 
to my parents aren't going to be 'mama' or 'papa,'" says Whit's 
15-month-old sister, "I'm just going to recite the whole Gettysburg 
Address"), but that's painfully stretching things, especially when 
nothing else works at all. Director Clark and screenwriters Clark and 
Greg Michael assume that audiences will fall for the movie if they stuff 
a whole bunch of "as-cute-as-sbutton" babies down our throats, but in 
the process, they forgot to add a few vital elements, such as charm and 
entertainment. To top everything off, the baby talk that we hear in 
english is completely unconvincing when looking at the children, who 
obviously are the subjects of cheesy visual effects that make it look 
like they are moving their mouths.
That there are a few actors in "Baby Geniuses" that have proven to be 
talented in the past, the fact that they have stooped so low to appear 
in this clap-trap is mind-boggling. Kathleen Turner vamps her villainess 
role up, but like everyone else, has nothing at all to do except look 
mean and bothered. Faring even worse is Christopher Lloyd, who has 
lately fallen on hard times (he also appeared in the award-winning "My 
Favorite Martian" in this year alone!), and it was only once the movie 
was over that I wondered to myself, "did I really even see Christopher 
Lloyd in it?" I questioned myself on this not because Lloyd had a 
blink-and-you-miss-him part, but because he seemed to simply stand in 
the background of shots (or in extreme close-ups) and do nothing but be 
Turner's nasty henchman. Also making embarrassing appearances are the 
aforementioned Cattral, MacNicol, Dom Deluise, and of all people, Ruby 
Dee! By the way, feel free to laugh at these actors' plummeting film 
careers whenever the mood hits you.
By the time the tiresome, surprisingly violent climax began, the last 
nail had already been hammered in this unfortunate film's coffin, as we 
are subjected to seeing giant robotic babies and scary-looking clowns 
jumping out, and people falling from helicoptors onto the roof of a 
building. If this sounds at all like a nice, fun-for-the-whole-family 
children's movie, then I feel sorry for you, but by all means, take the 
kids. If, on the other hand, you think that your children deserve 
better, then I am sure you will also agree with my final point: the 
makers of "Baby Geniuses" were so concerned with, yes, making the babies 
geniuses, that they seem to have forgotten to include an inkling of 
intelligence into the film itself.
       - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
         Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Edtv (1999)
Directed by Ron Howard.
Cast: Matthew McConaughey, Jenna Elfman, Woody Harrelson, Ellen 
DeGeneres, Rob Reiner, Sally Kirkland, Martin Landau, Adam Goldberg, 
Elizabeth Hurley, Dennis Hopper, Clint Howard, Viveka Davis, Jennifer 
Elise Cox.
1999 - 120 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity, brief nudity, and sexual situations).
Reviewed March 28, 1999.
Usually you can tell when you are watching a Ron Howard film, since they 
all have many things in common, including a large cast of characters put 
into a slick, smart screenplay that is enjoyable while at the same time 
always taking the "safe" route. And aside from his landmark motion 
picture from 1989, "Parenthood," Howard has never really proven to be a 
great filmmaker, but surely a good one. "Ed TV" is no exception, as it 
takes a premise that is similar to last year's more thought-provoking, 
superior Peter Weir drama, "The Truman Show" (a man who is being taped 
24 hours a day and watched by all of America), but does not come off as 
any sort of rip-off since there are a few vital differences: Ed, unlike 
Truman, knows and agrees to be taped, and its overall mood relies more 
on comedy than drama, even though there are a few subtle, poignant 
moments that surprisingly do pack a wallop.
Ed (Matthew McConaughey) is a 31-year-old video store clerk living in 
San Francisco who, by chance, is seen by a cable television station, 
Real TV, that is interviewing people for the arduous, but well-paying, 
job of having their lives taped around the clock. Ed's show-off older 
brother, Ray (Woody Harrelson), was actually the one auditioning, but it 
is Ed who catches the eye of program director Cynthia Topping (a 
scene-stealing Ellen DeGeneres). After a brief meeting, Ed is hired, and 
his family, including his mother (Sally Kirkland) and wheelchair-bound 
stepfather (Martin Landau), are somewhat cautious but nonetheless see it 
as a way for Ed to get out of his dead-end job at the video store. The 
show starts off rockily as the first image viewers see is of Ed waking 
up and scratching his privates, but ratings start to pick up when it is 
discovered on national television that Ray is cheating on his sweety-pie 
fiancee, Shari (Jenna Elfman), and Ed's true feelings come out when he 
ends up comforting, and then ultimately kissing, her. Quickly, being on 
television constantly begins to put an inevitable strain on their very 
unprivate relationship, and Shari becomes discouraged to find that many 
viewers think Ed could do a lot better than her.
The entertainment value of "Ed TV" is due, in part, by its intriguing 
storyline, as well as in its voyeuristic approach to the subject matter 
of someone's life being constantly recorded (save for when they go to 
the bathroom). In its first, and arguably most successful, half, is when 
most time is given to this simple quality, as we follow Ed around in his 
everyday life, as well as in his blossoming romance with Shari. 
Hampering the second half, even though it brings up several thoughtful 
statements about the price famous people have to pay, is a distracting 
subplot that comes about in the form of bombshell model, Jill (Elizabeth 
Hurley), who has obviously been hired to spice up Ed's love life. As the 
big night that America is awaiting arrives, when Ed is supposed to sleep 
with Jill, I had a difficult time believing that the caring Ed would do 
such a thing. Although Ed learns a vital piece of information about the 
media afterwards, Hurley is wasted in a needlessly one-dimensional role, 
and a whole minor storyline that could have been completely discarded. 
Fortunately, the film's final half-hour made a comeback from the 
penultimate section, with Ed discovering some shocking news about his 
family's history while trying to rekindle the flame with Shari, who 
still loves him. 
In his first starring role in 1996's "A Time to Kill," Matthew 
McConaughey became a full-fledged star, but since then hasn't been able 
to come back with another totally satisfying role, until now. Unlike 
some of these recent pretty-boy actors who have become stars not 
necessarily because of talent, but because of looks (ahem, Brad Pitt), 
McConaughey has the acting chops to be successful, and with "Ed TV," I 
hope he makes his breakthrogh. Appropriately toned down from her giddy 
character on ABC's "Dharma and Greg," Jenna Elfman is a fresh face whom 
has a genuine innocence about her that works well with the screen. 
Meanwhile, Sally Kirkland and Martin Landau are both effective as Ed's 
parents, Woody Harrelson is often annoying, but in a good way, as his 
brother, while Dennis Hopper, as Ed's real-life father, must have been 
hired for a day's worth of work. The standout in "Ed TV," amongst all of 
the other strong performances, however, is Ellen DeGeneres, who, to me, 
at least, finally comes into her own as an accomplished actress. Her 
character of Cynthia is more complex than it first appears, and she goes 
through several distinct character transformations, as she discovers 
what she has been doing is heartless and uncaring, with much of the 
blame going to the station's backstabbing boss (Rob Reiner). Also 
appreciated is that Cynthia is not portrayed as a one-liner comedian, 
since she is played by DeGeneres, but instead as a real person.
Even though I hate to compare them once again since they are only alike 
in the most basic terms, "Ed TV" lacks the overall profoundity that made 
"The Truman Show" one of the better motion pictures of last year. Coming 
away from "Ed TV," I had spent two hours with a group of people I liked, 
and had some fun with its story, but it really isn't a film that will 
strongly stick with you for a long period of time. Director Howard has 
once again created a respectable, intelligent film, but one, to be sure, 
that prospers more while in the individual moments, rather than one that 
remains deeply ingrained in your long-term memory. 

Title
Review for Ideal Husband, An (1999)
Directed by Oliver Parker.
Cast: Rupert Everett, Jeremy Northam, Julianne Moore, Cate Blanchett, Minnie 
Driver, John Wood, Jeroen Krabbe, Lindsay Duncan, Peter Vaughan.
1999 - 97 minutes.
Rated PG-13 (for mild sexual situations).
Reviewed July 6, 1999. 
Period movies set south of 1940 rarely ever interest me. Most of them seem 
very similar, with lots of fancy costumes and characters who always say one 
thing but mean another, or don't even say something to begin with. Some 
certainly work (Martin Scorcese's ravishing 1993 drama, "The Age of 
Innocence" and 1998's Best Picture Oscar winner, "Shakespeare in Love"), but 
most of them end with me more often than not saying to myself, "so what?"
Leave it up to director Oliver Parker's "An Ideal Husband," based loosely on 
famed 19th-century writer Oscar Wilde's play, to prove that all a period film 
needs to jump vibrantly to life is a remarkable cast. This picture sure has 
lucked out with this group of actors, who make up one of the most flawless 
and talented ensembles I've seen at the movies in a long time. Luckily, the 
screenplay, adapted by Parker, has also translated Wilde's token charm and 
wit to the screen successfully, even if the particulars of the story have 
been slightly altered.
Set in England, circa the 1890's, the prominently wealthy politician (Jeremy 
Northam) is paid an unwelcome visit by Lady Cheveley (Julianne Moore), 
visiting for a week from Vienna, who reveals that she has obtained a letter 
that reveals the untruthful way in which he got his large sum of money: he 
once passed on key information to a German count concerning the Suez Canal. 
Not only would this info, if it were to get out, destroy Sir Robert, but it 
would also devastate his lovely wife, Lady Chiltern (Cate Blanchett), who 
believes she is married to a completely honest man. An ultimatum is given by 
Lady Cheveley, however: if he will endorse a highly controversial upcoming 
waterway project in Argentina, she will give him back the letter. Coming to 
his aid is Sir Robert's best friend, Lord Goring (Rupert Everett), a 
self-involved, but alluring 36-year-old man whom has an admirer in Robert's 
younger sister, Mabel (Minnie Driver), and who, secretly, was once engaged to 
the scheming Lady Cheveley. 
The complicated premise of "An Ideal Husband" might have been needlessly 
daunting for such a lightweight comedy, but somehow it never once becomes 
confusing, as we instantly are absorbed into this group of characters' lives 
and relationships. And every character, by the way, is genuinely fascinating 
and likable, even the "bad girl" of the piece, Lady Cheveley. At first 
playing as simply the catalyst that spins the plot into motion, Cheveley 
could have easily become the stock villain in the film, but is eventually 
revealed to possibly have a warmer heart than we first may have anticipated. 
The always-radiant Julianne Moore doesn't miss even the most subtle nuance 
throughout, obviously having a lot of fun with her character. Moore certainly 
had a difficult task of turning Lady Cheveley into someone who wasn't wholly 
despicable, but amazingly, she never is. 
The main character in the film, Lord Goring, who seemingly doesn't have much 
to do with the predicament at hand but somehow becomes more deeply embroiled 
in the conflict than anyone else, is played to the classy, eloquent hilt by 
Rupert Everett, a wonderful talent who deserves more richly textured roles 
like the one he has in this film. Playfully showing off his own infatuation 
for himself, Goring says in the scene in which we first meet him, "To love 
oneself is the beginning of a lifelong romance." Even when Goring is saying 
such conceited things, none of the characters can do anything but be swept 
off their feet by him, even though that never is his true intention.
After her Oscar-nominated role in 1998's Elizabeth" (which was the only 
saving grace of that mediocre film) and her truly diverse turn in last 
spring's "Pushing Tin," Cate Blanchett is quickly becoming one of our 
biggest, freshest talents. Her Lady Chiltern clearly cares for her husband 
(also well-played by Northam), but sometimes evidence comes before us that 
questions just what she loves about him. Does she really love the real him, 
or is she enamored more by the thought of his perfect innocence and idealism? 
Aside from the hidden complexities of her character, Blanchett also is given 
ample chance to show offer her comic talents, and is particularly funny, 
especially in a late scene in which she herself must hide something from her 
husband.
Finally, Minnie Driver is glorious as usual, looking more like Minnie Mouse 
than usual. This isn't an insult, believe me, but merely an observation of 
her unique, but certain, beauty. Driver, at first, is asked to do nothing 
more than give admiring glances toward Lord Goring, but instantly comes into 
her own despite this, and is especially given more substantial things to do 
in the last half-hour.
Entertaining is the perfect adjective to describe "An Ideal Husband." Since 
the story and, subsequently, the winning screenplay are cleverly designed and 
written, and the actors demonstrate such a delight in their respective 
performances, the film breaks out of the usual mold of "period movies" to 
become a picture that, more or less, could be set in any decade of any 
century. Aside from there being at least two or three false endings too many 
that left me getting ready to see the end credits only to have another plot 
development form, "An Ideal Husband" is an absolute joy from start to finish. 
In a summer filled with many flashier, bigger, and more brainless films, this 
is one to seek out.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Celebrity (1998)
Directed by Woody Allen.
Cast: Kenneth Branagh, Judy Davis, Joe Mantegna, Winona Ryder, Famke 
Janssen, Charlize Theron, Melanie Griffith, Leonardo DiCaprio, Bebe 
Neuwirth, Michael Lerner, Hank Azaria, Gretchen Mol, Kate Burton, 
Allison Janney, Karen Duffy, Sam Rockwell, Andre Gregory, Heather Marni, 
Donald Trump.
1998 - 113 minutes.
Rated R (for profanity, drug use, and sexual situations).
Reviewed December 5, 1998.
By Dustin Putman 
Dustin Putman's Film Reviews >
Woody Allen, one of the most celebrated and acclaimed modern-day 
directors, has, in recent years, experimented with different types of 
films, straying from his regular New York comedy-dramas. 1994's "Bullets 
Over Broadway," was a period piece set in the 1940's; 1995's "Mighty 
Aphrodite," was a modern day Greek interpretation; 1996's "Everyone Says 
I Love You," was a magical return to the musical genre; and 1997's 
"Deconstructing Harry," was a deliberately graphic and offensive comedy. 
Woody Allen's new film, "Celebrity," is perhaps his strongest picture 
since 1992's "Husbands and Wives," a winning and often hilarious comedy 
that delves into the lives of the rich, the famous, and the struggling.
The film follows its main character, Lee Simon (Kenneth Branagh), a 
journalist, around throughout one year, as he has interesting run-ins 
with some of Hollywood's most powerful celebrities, all the while 
searching for true love. He recently has gotten a divorce from his wife 
of sixteen years, Robin (Judy Davis), who was devastated to find out he 
had been having an affair. Many of the people he encounters include a 
blonde bombshell actress (Melanie Griffith), who gives him a tour of her 
small childhood home; a supermodel (Charlize Theron), who is 
multi-orgasmic and gets off on simply being touched anywhere on her 
body; a popular teen hunk (Leonardo DiCaprio), who trashes a hotel room 
and beats his girlfriend (Gretchen Mol), all the while telling her that 
he loves her; and a kind live-in lover (Famke Janssen). While all of 
these people come and go through Lee's life, the woman he seems most 
right for is Nola (Winona Ryder), a waitress and struggling actress, 
despite their age difference. Meanwhile, the unhappy Robin, to her 
astonishment, meets a man (Joe Mantegna) in the talk show arena whom 
falls in love with her and gives her her first big break in showbiz, a 
profession she had never expected to go into. 
One of the problems that last year's "Deconstructing Harry," ran into 
was that it had such a large cast that everyone ultimately felt 
criminally wasted. I was fearing the same fate for, "Celebrity," but all 
of the characters are infinitely more well-handled, and the story and 
screenplay feel far more assured and satisfying. 
One of the qualities of, "Celebrity," which is very appropriate, is the 
dream-like black & white cinematography that constantly reminded me of 
films from the 1930's and 40's. The way that the story drifts from one 
character vignette to the next was entertaining to watch because I was 
enthralled by every single one of the characters, and couldn't wait to 
see who Lee would meet next.
As in all of Allen's films, he has recruited a wonderful, large cast. 
Kenneth Branagh, obviously doing an Allen impersonation, is convincing 
as the central character, and Judy Davis gives a touching performance as 
Robin, a woman who has been so unhappy for so long that she can't really 
believe the happiness she feels when she meets Mantegna. Charlize Theron 
is, to say the least, bewitching as an uninhibited supermodel; Bebe 
Neuwirth, as a hooker, has a hilarious scene with Davis where she 
teaches her how to have oral sex with a banana; and Leonardo DiCaprio is 
annoying, but plays the rebellious, out-of-control teen superstar to a 
T. Finally, and perhaps giving the best performance is Winona Ryder, who 
brings so much life and spark to her scenes that I feared the film might 
burn up in the projector. One particular sequence set at a party where 
Branagh and Ryder are trying to talk amidst the various conversations 
around them is fabulously developed and shot.
Although set amidst the glitz and glamour of Hollywood, what, 
"Celebrity," is really about is the things that people desperately long 
for in order to be happy. Lee only wants to find love, but has several 
character flaws that he needs to get over first, and Robin is so used to 
not being appreciated that when she finally feels wanted, she doesn't 
know how to react to it. The final sequence of the film, in which Lee 
and Robin meet up at a film premiere and are able to talk rationally for 
the first time since their divorce, is especially powerful, and the last 
shot, which circles around to the opening shot, is an alternately clever 
and thought-provoking image that I think says quite a lot.

Title
Review for Waterboy, The (1998)
Directed by Frank Coraci.
Cast: Adam Sandler, Kathy Bates, Fairuza Balk, Henry Winkler, Jerry 
Reed, Larry Gilliard Jr., Blake Clark, Clint Howard, Rob Schneider.
1998 - 86 minutes.
Rated PG-13 (for profanity).
Reviewed November 7, 1998.
By Dustin Putman 
Dustin Putman's Film Reviews >
Like Jim Varney in the "Ernest" movies, Adam Sandler has made his living 
almost consistently playing a dim-witted doofus, as in 1995's 
embarrassing, "Billy Madison" and 1996's slight, but funny, "Happy 
Gilmore." This all changed, however, this past February, with the 
release of his first great film, "The Wedding Singer," in which Sandler, 
for once, actually had a normal character to play, but proved that he 
could still be funny. Going into Sandler's latest picture, "The 
Waterboy," I was optimistic since it was written by Tim Herlihy and 
directed by Frank Coraci, the same people who worked on "The Wedding 
Singer." The fact that that film was good only makes "The Waterboy," an 
even more diappointing follow-up. Sandler has sadly gone back into his 
"idiot" mode, and gone, also, is any real hints of charm or wit.
Sandler plays Bobby Boucher, a constantly made fun of 31-year-old 
waterboy for a small-town Louisiana football team, who, in the opening 
scene, is fired by the hateful coach (Jerry Reed). Bobby still lives 
with his overprotective, but loving Cajun mama (Kathy Bates), who 
constantly warns him of women, who, she says, are the "devil." Although 
she desperately wants Bobby to stay with her all day and keep her 
company, he goes behind her back and becomes the waterboy for another 
football team, headed by distraught Coach Klein (Henry Winkler), and 
after defending himself by tackling one of the players, he is actually 
offered a spot on the team, and a chance to go to college. 
One of the surprises about, "The Waterboy," is that it isn't very funny. 
The typical sports stuff has been overdone to death, and is now just 
boring. And to top it all off, it inevitably ends with "the big game," 
and if you have an IQ north of 20, I'm sure you can guess how it all 
turns out. Since all of the football material was dead-in-the-water, it 
should have been scrapped, instead, focusing on Bobby's relationship 
with the only two interesting characters in the film, his mother (played 
effervescently by Bates) and his potential girlfriend, bad-girl Vicki 
Vallencourt (Fairuza Balk). Balk, who I have always liked, is 
wonderfully likable and surprisingly funny, so much so that it's 
unfortunate she wasn't given more screen time. It is these two fine 
performances that save, 'The Waterboy," from being a complete misfire.
The material in "The Waterboy" is so cliched and recycled that I wonder 
why Sandler, Coraci, and Herlihy decided to make this after the huge 
success of, "The Wedding Singer." They should have known this was a big
step down for all involved. They should have known that Sandler was 
much better off actually having a realistic character to play, and they 
also should have known that sports-type movies have been way overdone. 
"The Waterboy," is the type of film that must have been made for 
8-year-olds. It is sophomoric, and it is dumb. 

Title
Review for 13th Warrior, The (1999)
I first saw the teaser trailer for John McTiernan's "The 13th Warrior" in the 
Fall of 1997. Of course, back then it was still called "Eaters of the Dead," 
which is the same title as the novel it's based upon, by Michael Crichton 
("Jurassic Park"). Sometime in 1998, however, it generically was retitled, 
"The 13th Warrior." Does a name really play a part in how good an actual 
movie is? Well, no, probably not, but my interest in seeing the picture 
plummeted down at the speed of light at the thought of this new name, and 
then the movie kept being pushed back and pushed back to the point where I 
began to wondering if it was ever going to be released. Stories and rumors 
abound of the studio, Buena Vista, frantically trying to reshoot and recut 
much of it after disasterous test screenings, much to the reluctance of 
McTiernan. Now that "The 13th Warrior" has finally been released theatrically 
over two years after it was filmed, it's difficult to say how McTiernan's cut 
might have turned out, but I know this much: no matter how much was reshot 
and edited, there is no possible way this film could be anything other than 
stupefyingly horrendous. Move over "Inspector Gadget"; I think I've found a 
new "Worst Film of 1999."
>From what I can gather about the specifics of the film, "The 13th Warrior" 
has no signs of an actual plot, or even a reason for being made and wasting 
reportedly over $100-million. Shouldn't it be illegal to spend so much money 
on a movie that is akin to my cat's stool sample? Antonio Banderas cashes a 
paycheck as Ahmed Ibn Fahdlan, an Arab aristocrat who is banished from 
Baghdad after being accused of looking at the King's wife crossways. Taking 
up with a ragtag team of Norse mercenaries in the 10th-century, Ahmed is 
called upon to become the 13th warrior and travel to Europe to fight a 
barbarous tribe of half-man/half-beasts. "I am not a warrior!" Ahmed says, 
but pretty soon, he will be.
There isn't an act, scene, shot, or frame in "The 13th Warrior" that I could 
say I liked, which is no small feat to achieve considering that, even in my 
review for "Inspector Gadget," I mentioned I liked one cast member. Abruptly 
starting off with nary a line of exposition, the film's structure goes like 
this: man forced to become 13th warrior, man fights barbarians, man leaves. 
Who is this man, you ask? I couldn't tell you, aside for saying that he is 
played by Antonio Banderas with a lot of eye-liner on. Throughout the 
excruciating 106 minutes this movie takes to reach its victorious end credits 
(victorious because I knew I could finally leave the theater!), there is not 
one fact I could tell you about any of the thirteen warriors, aside from 
saying that they love to fight and casually stab each other with swords, only 
to think nothing of it. And if we don't grow accustomed to the main 
characters, or feel like we've even been properly introduced, how do the 
filmmakers expect any of us to care at all about how things will turn out and 
who will live and die?
The screenplay was written by two people: William Wisher and Warren Lewis. 
They must have been comatose when they penned it, because I'll be damned if I 
can detect anything even resembling a script at work here. The movie's idea 
of a romantic subplot has Ahmed enchanging literally one line of dialogue 
with a pretty villager (Maria Bonnevie), only to see them in bed together in 
the next scene. The movie's idea of excitement is having the whole film 
revolve around three big battles with the barbarians, with lots of cut-off 
heads flying about, and no sense of understanding how to set up an action 
set-piece. And the movie's idea of atmosphere is having the cinematography, 
by Peter Menzies Jr., be so dimly-lit and washed out that, on a visual 
stance, you feel like turning your head away every minute. Maybe an 
overwhelming amount of dirt particles got on the camera lense, and director 
McTiernan never even realized a little Windex would do the trick. Or, better 
yet, maybe they spent so much money on the "breathtaking," "extravagant," 
"one-of-a-kind" action sequences, that they didn't have enough left to invest 
in some bright lights. That was supposed to be an example of sarcasm, just to 
let you know.
"The 13th Warrior" ends with them beating the barbarians, and Ahmed getting 
on a ship to sail off. Since there was no actual entertainment value that 
stemmed from one second of the film, nor did we ever satisfactorily learn who 
the barbarians were, why they were fighting, or even one character trait from 
the "heroic" central figures, I'd love a little insight into the point of 
making the film in the first place. "The 13th Warrior" is the most depressing 
cinematic experience to grace (or curse) the silver screen this year.

Title
Review for Book of Shadows: Blair Witch 2 (2000)
Directed by Joe Berlinger.
Cast: Jeffrey Donovan, Kim Director, Stephen Baker Turner, Erica Leehrsen, 
Tristen Skylar.
2000 - 90 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, brief nudity, sexual situations, and gore).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, October 29, 2000.
1999's "The Blair Witch Project" was a landmark, groundbreaking motion 
picture--a $250,000 cinema verite-style pseudo-documentary that ended up 
becoming the must-see film of the summer and making over $140-million. Its 
financial and mostly critical success, however, did not win over some 
viewers, who passionately hated everything about its shaky-cam, 
"you-are-there" style of filmmaking. For every person who felt it was one of 
the most frightening movies they had ever seen, there was another who 
disliked it for the exact opposite reason, stating that it wasn't scary in 
the least. A horror film that became the biggest-grossing independent movie 
of all time, still, can only mean one thing, and that's a sequel.
With the directing reigns being handed over from Eduardo Sanchez and Daniel 
Myrick to, coincidentally, documentarian Joe Berlinger (making his fictional 
feature film debut), "Book of Shadows: Blair Witch 2" is the type of hugely 
hyped sequel that is just asking for trouble. By taking a more mainstream 
approach to the Blair Witch legend, in the auspicious screenplay by Dick 
Bebee and Joe Berlinger, the movie is bound to disappoint fans who were 
expecting more of the same, while keeping those detractors of the original in 
the dark with another story that raises more questions than answers. 
Nevertheless, "Book of Shadows: Blair Witch 2" is clever, entertaining, and 
thought-provoking, a purely original thriller that is able to stand on its 
own two feet.
A fictional account of what happened to five grad students following the 
release of the original "Blair Witch Project" in the summer of 1999, "BW2" 
follows a group of twentysomethings who agree to take part in the 
self-proclaimed Blair Witch Hunt, an Internet-based organization begun by 
Jeffrey (Jeffrey Donovan), in which he and four curiosity-seekers, including 
a couple (Stephen Baker Turner, Tristen Skyler) writing a book on the Blair 
Witch hysteria, a Wiccan (Erica Leehrsen), and a psychic goth girl (Kim 
Director), travel to the Black Hills of Burkittsville, MD to retrace the 
footsteps of Heather, Mike, and Josh. Following a night spent partying and 
drinking among the ruins of Rustin Parr's house (the place where the original 
climaxed), they awaken to discover that they have no recollection of the past 
five hours, with the only possible answers lying within the video camera that 
Jeffrey had been using, a 'la Heather Donahue.
Setting up shop at Jeffrey's apartment (in the form of an old, dilapidated 
factory located in the middle of the woods), the five of them plan to sift 
through the tapes, hoping to put the aforementioned fragmented night 
together, which left them all with mysterious marks on their body. As Tristen 
grows more and more unhinged following a miscarriage, Erica starts to fear 
for her life, and they all begin to have spooky hallucinations from beyond 
the grave, the questionable Blair Witch myth gradually proves itself to be 
all too real.
A one-of-a-kind masterpiece that ultimately saw itself overcome with hype, 
the novelty of "The Blair Witch Project" could never be duplicated, and 
luckily, director Berlinger (1996's brilliant "Paradise Lost: The Child 
Murders at Robin Hood Hills") realized this before filming a carbon copy. 
Equipped with a script, subtle special effects, a steadicam, and a more 
visceral approach, "Book of Shadows: Blair Witch 2" succeeds in the fresh way 
in which it tells its story, which is not a direct sequel to its predecessor 
as much as a fictional, occasionally satirical study on the effects the first 
film had on audiences and the media.
Unlike the unflinchingly real, improvised performances of Heather Donahue, 
Joshua Leonard, and Michael Williams, the cast populating "Book of Shadows" 
have an actual screenplay to work with and, thus, are not nearly as 
impressive. Granted, many of their acting abilities are questionable, and the 
characters played by Erica Leehrsen and Tristen Skylar are overly annoying, 
but they do respectable jobs for primarily newcomers. Easily the standout in 
what could be a star-making appearance, Kim Director (whose only previous 
credits include bit parts in many recent Spike Lee films, including 1999's 
"Summer of Sam" and 2000's "Bamboozled") is an alluring, charismatic presence 
in the role of a good-natured fan of "The Blair Witch Project" who finds 
herself under suspicions simply because of her goth chick persona.
While never truly scary, the picture does contain several disturbing moments, 
not the least being the way the film toys with the fine line between 
perception and reality, and the hallucinatory sights of dead children, 
previous victims of dead serial killer Rustin Parr. With an ominous music 
score by Carter Burwell and atmospheric cinematography by Nancy Schreiber, 
"Book of Shadows: Blair Witch 2" is inferior to the incomparable series 
opener (as expected), but is much better than could possibly be expected. By 
concluding on a cliffhanging note that leaves much of what happened in the 
previous 85 minutes up to you to decide, the film is nothing short of 
intriguing, and as a horror-mystery opening on Halloween weekend, is the 
perfect way to spend the spooky holiday.

Title
Review for Corruptor, The (1999)
The Corruptor 1/2* (out of * * * * )
Directed by James Foley.
Cast: Chow Yun-Fat, Mark Wahlberg, Ric Young, Paul Ben-Victor, Brian 
Cox, Andrew Pang, Byron Mann, Elizabeth Lindsey, Marie Matiko.
1999 - 111 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, nudity, and sexual situations).
Reviewed March 13, 1999.
One of the things I noticed most while watching acclaimed-director James 
Foley's ("At Close Range," "Glengarry Glen Ross," "Fear") first foray 
into the action genre, "The Corruptor," is that there were a lot of 
subtle signs of disappearances throughout, most notably filmmaking 
skill, intelligence, and even one of the fundamental things you need to 
survive: a brain. Chinese action star Chow Yun-Fat made his U.S. film 
debut last year in "The Replacement Killers," and although no award 
winner, at least it contained style and the much-needed appearance of 
the wonderful actress Mira Sorvino. Unfortunately, the style of the 
former film is replaced in "The Corruptor" with generic, deadeningly 
boring shoot-outs, and in place of Sorvino is the less-talented Mark 
Wahlberg who, like everyone else, sleepwalks through his role. 
Wahlberg stars as Danny Wallace, a young, caucasian cop who is partnered 
with Nick Chen (Yun-Fat), a detective in the 15th Precinct's Asian Gang 
Unit, to stop a gang war in Chinatown between the Fukienese Dragons, and 
the Tongs, led by Henry Lee (Ric Young). Wallace and Chen are basically 
the polar opposites of each other (aren't they always?), but gradually 
become good friends (don't they always?).
And that's it. That's the highly "intricate" story of "The Corruptor," 
which could have saved a lot of people the time and money if the 
filmmakers had realized this exact same premise has been done so many 
times before, and better, that it was pointless to make it again. To pad 
out the excruciatingly long 111-minute running time for such a one-note 
film, screenwriter Robert Pucci (who doesn't deserve to work in Holywood 
ever again) has opted to include a smattering of one-dimensional, 
cliched sub-plots, including one involving Wallace's money-grubbing 
father (Brian Cox), and another in which the two central characters' 
identities come into question. Although I had to dig pretty hard for 
this compliment, there is one (but only one) element that I felt had 
potential, and that was the relationship between Chen and a sweet 
prostitute named May (Maria Mitiko) whom he wants to get out of danger. 
Of course, this chance of adequacy was stripped to the bare minimum of 
involvement and development, and Mitiko, a promising new face, showed a 
lot of potential in a five-minute role (if that).
Aside from that ridiculously small distraction, "The Corruptor" really 
is a brain-dead action movie of the worst type, one without thought or 
excitement. All of the characters were thoroughly unlikable and 
uninteresting, and so when the main characters' lives were put into 
danger, I found myself wondering why director Foley would think that we, 
the audience, would even remotely care about what was happening. There's 
no time to get acquainted with anyone and no apparent screenplay to help 
us in even trying to. Like most of the recent reprehensible Jean-Claude 
Van Damme and Steven Seagal movies, "The Corruptor" is constantly on 
auto-pilot from anything resembling believability or originality, and so 
far Yun Fat has not in any way impressed me with his action star status. 
Although not a fan of Jackie Chan, at least you can always see that he 
is giving his own 200% in everything he does.
One of the most annoying elements of "The Corruptor" is in the 
stereotypical way that the villains are presented. Not only are we not 
given the chance to know the villains by name, but I was never really 
sure exactly what their goal was, except that there was an on-going war 
between the two gangs. At any rate, by the half-hour mark, I had already 
begun to understand the manner in which they were treated. It never 
failed: in every single scene in which the "bad guys" appeared, a 
repetitive, loud rap song would burst onto the soundtrack; I guess that 
was Foley's way of introducing them. Bad Guy = rap music. Okay, got it. 
If anything, this is the first movie I can remember seeing in which one 
of the baddies points a gun at a man, to which the targetted man 
responds, "no, hold on," and pulls out his own gun and shoots himself in 
the head!
As for the supposedly shocking twist during the climax, my b.s. detector 
was sounding off like a steam engine. This same "twist" is now being 
recycled over and over in every other action/cop movie nowadays, and so 
there's no use in hiding the secret. Suffice to say, either Chen or 
Wallace isn't who he says he is, and their newfound buddy-buddy 
relationship suddenly is put at stake. 
"The Corruptor" is a film that is so constantly struggling for ideas 
that it really is quite amusing when you think about it. Here we have 
director James Foley, a man who has made good films in the past, paired 
with Chow Yun-Fat and Mark Wahlberg (so very good in "Boogie Nights"), 
who most likely wasted at least a year of his life bringing this 
no-brainer to the screen. Someone should have really spoken up during 
the pre-production stage and broken the news that this was not a movie 
that was exactly begging to be made. With all of the rainforests being 
torn down and people dying of hunger in the world, it boggles the mind 
at why New Line Cinemas actually had the nerve to waste millions of 
dollars on a piece of wretched trash like this.
Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Bliss (1997)
Directed by Lance Young.
Cast: Craig Sheffer, Sheryl Lee, Terence Stamp, Spalding Gray, Casey 
Siemaszko, Lois Chiles, Ken Camroux, Pamela Perry, Leigh Taylor-Young, 
Theresa Saldana.
1997 - 103 minutes.
Rated R (for sex, nudity, and profanity).
Reviewed November 25, 1998.
"Bliss" is an enthralling motion picture, and one of the most 
educational films I've ever seen, but that is where it somewhat runs 
into problems, because it plays as an instructional guide on making your 
sex life better, rather than one that has a thorough story and 
characters.
"Bliss" tells of Joseph (Craig Sheffer) and Marie (Sheryl Lee), two 
newlyweds who are having some trouble relating to each other sexually. 
While at an appointment with their sex therapist (Spalding Gray), Joseph 
is surprised and upset when Maria admits that she has never had an 
orgasm while making love to him, instead faking it each time. Meanwhile, 
at the construction site where he works, Joseph and his coworkers 
delight in spying on an older man, who constantly all day, has different 
women come in his apartment and have sex with him, until Joseph sees 
Maria going in there one day. When Joseph goes to confront him at his 
apartment, he discovers that the man, named Baltazar Vincenza, also 
works as a sex therapist "on the edge of the law," and that Maria has 
been secretly going to him. Baltazar believes that he can help all 
people with their love lives, but that first, his customers must 
understand that the highest point in a sexual relationship is not an 
orgasm, but "emotional bliss."
I don't really want to give anything else away, since there are a few 
surprises that occur towards the end that should be discovered on their 
own, and from reading my synopsis, I am sure it does not sound like your 
usual drama. 
The central storyline between the couple could be described as 
uninvolving, since much of the picture takes place during the training 
sessions between Joseph and Baltazar, but the reason that, "Bliss," is a 
worthwhile film to see is because I feel that I learned a lot from it, 
and the subject was treated in a mature, respectful manner.
Craig Sheffer and Sheryl Lee are both appealing actors, and they are 
very good here, creating a lot of warmth in the scenes they were in 
together. And Terence Stamp is just right as this mysterious man who 
says he has the answer to all people's sexual sufferings.
When I said that, "Bliss," is a worthwhile motion picture to see, the 
target audience I was referring to were people from about ages 16 and 
up. The material dealt with in this film contains many sexually graphic 
sequences, and in order for the true point of the film to be fully 
understood, it really is only for more older viewers. "Bliss," is an 
intelligent and informative instruction guide, but it does not offer 
much more than that, nor should it have to.
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Scary Movie 2 (2001)
Directed by Keenen Ivory Wayans.
Cast: Anna Faris, Marlon Wayans, Shawn Wayans, Regina Hall, Christopher 
Kennedy Masterson, Chris Elliott, Tim Curry, David Cross, Kathleen Robertson, 
Tori Spelling, James Woods, Natasha Lyonne, Andy Richter, Veronica 
Cartwright, Richard Moll.
2001 - 82 minutes
Rated R (profanity, violence, sexual situations, and nudity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, July 4, 2001.
Literally three days away from a whole year since the release of Keenen Ivory 
Wayan's mega-grossing horror spoof, "Scary Movie," "Scary Movie 2" comes with 
the same director, many of the same writers (there are seven screenwriters 
listed in the credits!), and several cast member returnees. What has, 
unfortunately, not returned in "Scary Movie 2" is its predecessor's 
rapid-fire energy, shockingly raunchy humor, or even its joke-to-laughter 
ratio. What was once a novel idea just last summer has since grown rather 
stale, and it shows. "Scary Movie 2," while occasionally uproarious (but not 
occasionally enough), is a wasted opportunity that comes off less as a major 
motion picture, and more as an endless parade of comedic skits strung 
together by the thinnest of stories, with no purpose other than to make the 
studio heads mucho dinero.
Bypassing the lampooning of slasher films, "Scary Movie 2" takes direct aim 
at the supernatural genre, and loosely follows the plotting of 1999's "The 
Haunting," which was a very bad movie in and of itself. Sweet-faced heroine 
Cindy (Anna Faris) and her college friends, including pothead Shorty (Marlon 
Wayans), repressed homosexual Ray (Shawn Wayans), and sassy Brenda (Regina 
Hall), are chosen by a college professor (Tim Curry) to participate in a 
study taking place at the infamously haunted Hell House. Once the setup is 
finished, there isn't much in the way of a cohesive narrative, with Cindy and 
her college pals getting stalked by a bunch of ghost, one of which is drawn 
to Cindy because she bears a striking resemblance to his beloved mistress.
The first thirty minutes of "Scary Movie 2" are its best. Getting off to a 
side-splitting start with a spoof of "The Exorcist" (with James Woods and 
Andy Richter playing priests out to exorcise the possessed Natasha Lyonne), 
the film remains fast-paced and snappily written until, following a 
disgustingly funny dinner scene, it completely falls apart, jumping 
inconsistently from one scene to the next without any sort of coherence. It 
is as if the opening half-hour was fully written and planned, and then 
director Keenen Ivory Wayans and his ragtag team of "writers" just began 
randomly pulling stuff out of their head to shoot on any given day.
Direct movie spoofs make up the majority of the picture's running time, 
whether it be "Poltergeist," "The Haunting," "Hollow Man," "Charlie's 
Angels," "Hannibal," "Dude, Where's My Car?," or "Save the Last Dance." While 
some are certainly amusing, most feel merely desperate, tired, and 
predictable. It's one thing to turn a film's memorable moments on their head, 
and quite another to simply remake the scene without any skewering. This is 
basically what Wayans has done here, and it is lazy filmmaking. 
Whereas the original developed characters with distinct, yet appropriately 
silly, personalities, the sequel wastes its cast terribly, with only one 
person making a notable impression. Chris Elliott (1998's "There's Something 
About Mary") is an absolute showstopper as the mansion's weirdo caretaker, 
Hanson, who has a deliriously deformed left hand that is the subject of many 
tear-inducing laughs. Whenever Elliott is onscreen, the movie jump-starts to 
life just as it has begun wading through an abyss of unfunny material. Anna 
Faris, as good-girl Cindy, doesn't get as much to do as she did in "Scary 
Movie" #1, despite remaining the central character. Faris is a promising 
actress, and could very well hold her own in a more down-to-earth kind of 
movie. The only other actor worth positively mentioning is Regina Hall, who 
has resurrected her spicy role of Brenda, and brightens up her scenes.
The movie's new additions don't fare nearly as well. Every single one has 
next to nothing to do but stand around and recite myriad lines of dialogue 
that are supposed to be funnier than they actually are. Tim Curry (2000's 
"Charlie's Angels"), so talented, is so transparent as to not even seem, in 
retrospect, like he was even in the film. The same goes for Tori Spelling 
(1999's "Trick"), as Alex, a supposed innocent who begins a lurid affair with 
a ghost; Kathleen Robertson (2000's "Beautiful"), as the voluptuous Theo; and 
Christopher Kennedy Masterson (TV's "Malcolm in the Middle"), as Cindy's 
token horny love interest.
Filled with gags involving sex, semen, urine, puke, and farting, "Scary Movie 
2," nonetheless, feels tame in comparison to the original, perhaps because 
the jokes are shameless rehashes of scenes that were already done last year. 
"Scary Movie" was shocking in what it could get away with, and what it was 
willing to show; this follow-up, on the other hand, is predictable and 
doesn't even attempt to outdo its competitor.
"Scary Movie 2" does have some big laughs, as expected. The "Exorcist" 
prologue, as already mentioned, is deliciously zany, as is an ongoing gag 
involving a foul-mouthed, trash-talking parrot, and the unforgettable role of 
Chris Elliott. Even still, long stretches are vacuous of successful humor, 
and at 82 minutes, the whole thing plays like little more than an 
afterthought that seems to have taken about five days to shoot. Choppily 
edited and obviously rushed to theaters to quickly make a tidy profit, "Scary 
Movie 2" reinforces the age-old adage that sequels really do usually suck.
   - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
     http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman

Title
Review for Wing Commander (1999)
Directed by Chris Roberts.
Cast: Freddie Prinze Jr., Matthew Lillard, Saffron Burrows, Ginny 
Holden, Tcheky Karyo, Jurgen Prochnow, David Suchet, David Warner.
1999 - 105 minutes.
Rated PG-13 (for sexual situations, mild violence, and profanity).
Reviewed March 14, 1999.
Well now I've seen everything. "Wing Commander," based on the popular 
video game and directed by the game's creator, Chris Roberts, makes 
1994's "Street Fighter" and, dare I say it, 1997's "Mortal Kombat: 
Annihilation," look good in comparison. The only thing I'd like to say 
is that I so very much wish the late Ed Wood (director of "Glen or 
Glenda" and "Plan 9 From Outer Space," both widely considered two of the 
worst films of all time) were alive today. After viewing "Wing 
Commander," even his immediate reaction would be, "what complete and 
utter garbage!"
Although I suffered through the entire 105-minute running time of "Wing 
Commader," I couldn't tell you what it was about if you paid me, and 
it's not because I wasn't paying attention, either. Instead of reading 
someone else's review and then trying to reword their synopsis of the 
story, I'm going to instead tell you what I did understand. Set during 
the 27th-century, there's this big space ship thingy in space with a big 
crew, which gets even bigger when a few new recruits board on, including 
two young men, Blair (Freddie Prinze Jr.) and Maniac (Matthew Lillard). 
Every once in a while they go out in their own little space fliers and 
shoot other space thingys and blow them up. Blair is smitten with the 
wing commander of the crew (whatever that means), Deveraux (Saffron 
Burrows), even though she is a tough and stern little cookie who mostly 
ignores or hollers at him. Blair is also having some problems since 
people judge him because he's part-pilgrim ("My father was a pilgrim!"). 
Later, another crew member tells Blair, "there's nothing wrong with 
being a pilgrim." Meanwhile, Maniac likes the smart and sassy black crew 
member, Rosie (Ginny Holden), who is so sex-crazed and horny she gets 
off on flying space crafts and then blowing up in them! So, anyway, near 
the end, the crew has to fight the bad Kilrathis, people dressed up in 
clunky cat costumes with retractible Freddy Krueger claws who basically 
stand still in their spaceship and talk in "Kilrathian." At the end, a 
couple of the people we've grown to...well, grown to feel nothing for, 
get into danger and their lives are put at stake. They mostly pull 
through though and in the end, I wasn't sure what I had just sat and 
watched. 
"Wing Commander" is such a mind-numbing, awful, embarrassing, idiotic, 
corny, ludicrous, laughable, superficial, just plain bad, movie that I 
almost couldn't believe my own eyes or ears most of the time. How could 
20th-Century Fox, the movie's studio, have the nerve to even release 
this...this...I can't even think of a word awful enough to criticize it 
with. Although they, no doubt, decided to release it wide after both 
Prinze Jr. and Lillard had huge success with the box-office hit "She's 
All That," "Wing Commander" is going to hurt their careers rather than 
help them, since I now relize that they both had absolutely no excuse to 
make this movie. Heck, Prinze Jr. would have been better off making, "I 
Still Think I Know, But Refresh My Memory About Twenty-Five Summers Ago" 
than this depressing "product," which might have been pretty funny if I 
hadn't been so sorry for the people involved in its making. Of course, 
they did get what they deserved since they obviously forgot to read the 
screenplay (if there even was one) prior to signing on. As for Saffron 
Burrows, how in the world could she go from the sweet, realistic 1995 
Irish film, "Circle of Friends," to this? 
There's honestly not much else to say about "Wing Commander." I saw some 
Halloween cat costumes, some cheesy effects, and some stick people 
arguing about the nobility of being pilgrims. Several times while 
watching it, I clenched my eyes shut praying to fall asleep, but then I 
fought against it because I knew I'd have a little fun tearing the movie 
apart in my review if I stuck with it. When someone like Ed Wood, who 
loved all films, good or bad, would have laughed this movie off the 
screen, you know you're in trouble. Even Akiva Goldsman (the much-hated 
hack screenwriter who destroyed the "Batman" film series) would brush 
this waste of film space off as "rubbish." Roger Ebert once compared, in 
his review for 1996's "Mad Dog Time," the film to watching a blank 
screen for the same period of time. I'll go one step further and say 
that staring at a blank screen would be at least fifty times more 
entertaining and visually stimulating than all of "Wing Commander" 
combined.

Title
Review for Bringing Out the Dead (1999)
Directed by Martin Scorsese.
Cast: Nicolas Cage, Patricia Arquette, Ving Rhames, Tom Sizemore, John 
Goodman, Marc Anthony, Cliff Curtis, Mary Beth Hurt, Aida Turturro, Martin 
Scorsese, Queen Latifah.
1999 - 118 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, and blood).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, October 23, 1999.
It's quite appropriate that world-class filmmaker Martin Scorsese and 
screenwriter Paul Schrader have teamed up once more after their critically 
lauded work in such films as 1976's "Taxi Driver" and 1980's "Raging Bull," 
because "Bringing Out the Dead" is Scorsese's most impressive, dramatically 
sound piece of celluloid in at least the last seven years. Grim, 
unrelentingly downbeat, yet fascinating and thought-provoking, the film is 
one of those rare big-budget efforts that doesn't have a plot hook or a 
flashy storyline to bring in audiences, which is unfortunate. Instead, most 
of the major developments occur within the central character, as he struggles 
to find meaning and resolution in a life that often seems too depressing to 
bear.
Frank Pierce (Nicolas Cage) is a worn-out ambulance driver working the 
graveyard shift on the mean streets of New York City. Night after 
discouraging night, Frank is paired up with a coworker to drive around with, 
picking up calls on their CBs, and traveling to assist people who are either 
fatally ill or hurt, or too far gone down their own paths of destruction to 
be helped. Constantly transporting patients to Our Lady of Perpetual Mercy 
hospital, which is always so jam-packed that many patients are usually left 
unattended, Frank, in narration, tells us about how he can't even remember 
the last time he saved another person's life. A sign that maybe he should 
quit his job before he goes completely crazy, he has begun to see the image 
of Rose, a deceased 18-year-old girl he failed to save, who solemnly asks 
him, "Why did you kill me, Frank?" 
Set over the period of exactly three days on the job, the first night Frank 
is paired up with Larry (John Goodman), an obese, somewhat unhappy 
foodaholic. One of their first calls is to save an older man who has 
collapsed on the floor and gone into cardiac arrest. Acquiring a faint pulse, 
he is taken to the hospital, but with little hope of pulling through. This is 
where he meets Mary Burke (Patricia Arquette), the grown daughter of the man, 
who starts to hang around the hospital, praying her father will survive just 
so she can make amends with him (they haven't spoken in a few years). Over 
the following two nights, in which Frank is paired with the happy-go-lucky, 
preacher-imitating Marcus (Ving Rhames) and the loudmouthed Walls (Tom 
Sizemore), he forms a sort of infatuation with Mary and attempts to get close 
to her. This is not, however, the starting point for a blossoming romance, as 
it becomes clear what Frank and Mary need is each other, but more to come to 
terms with themselves and their own personal demons.
Motion pictures about a person's own redemption have been on the resurgence 
as of late, most recently in the devastatingly profound "American Beauty" and 
the promising, but ultimately uneven "Fight Club," and "Bringing Out the 
Dead" belongs with the former movie in successfully telling the story of a 
man basically at the crossroads of his life who wonders what the point of it 
all is. Films concerning one's redemption is a tricky subject that must be 
told with utmost care and subtlety, so as to not make it cornball, and in 
"Bringing Out the Dead," we are put directly in the life of Frank Pierce, a 
memorably likable creation who may not be as unforgettable or stirring as 
that of Travis Bickle (Robert De Niro) in "Taxi Driver," but who could be?
Quick-paced, but still satisfyingly dedicating time to the characters at 
hand, the film is comparable to a rollercoaster ride through the job of an 
ambulance driver, with the camera often moving at a furious, off-kilter rate, 
and the film speed increased so as to parallel the way life passes you by. 
Cinematographer Robert Richardson ably handles the feat, and aiding it along 
is the rock soundtrack that is a strangely appropriate and stylistically 
brilliant. When the camera does stop for a breather, we get elongated, 
important takes that try to capture human nature, none more so than in a 
marvelous scene where Frank and Mary are sitting beside each other in the 
back of an ambulance, played to the enlightening song by 10,000 Maniacs, 
"These Are Days." 
In the crucial role of Frank Pierce, Nicolas Cage has returned to the type of 
challenging roles he was taking in the mid-'90s, such as his Oscar-winning 
work in 1995's "Leaving Las Vegas." Choosing to work with a master such as 
Martin Scorsese (whose voice, along with that of Queen Latifah's, show up in 
cameos) was one of the best career moves Cage could have made, and his Frank 
is a man filled with interior conflict that we learn through his personality 
and ponderous narration. 
As his three main coworkers, John Goodman, Ving Rhames, and Tom Sizemore all 
show up for about a thirty-minute stretch each, and leave lasting impressions 
on the viewer, particularly Goodman, whose character of Larry, we sense, has 
more going on underneath than meets the eye. Additionally, Latino pop singer 
Marc Anthony shows up in a crucial supporting role and is outstanding as 
Noel, a repeat offender who gets himself into trouble on a daily basis, 
stemming from a hard drug he once took that left his mind altered.
The heart and soul of the film lies on Mary Burke, an ex-junkie who has 
straightened her life out in the last year and now wishes to rekindle her 
relationship with her father before he dies. Mary is played by Patricia 
Arquette, Cage's wife and an underrated actress in her own right, who gives a 
powerful, quietly shattering performance that is so much deeper on every 
level than in her other current film, "Stigmata." Arquette and Cage, who are 
working together for the first time, turn out to have a great deal more 
chemistry than expected, and even when you feel as if their relationship may 
not be one with romance, but simply compassion for each other, you find 
yourself desperately hoping for them to get together.
"Bringing Out the Dead" is a highly assured, meditative look on the fragility 
of life, and it also acts as both an intriguing guide into the profession of 
ambulance drivers, as well as the atmosphere within the walls of a hospital, 
which, from secondhand experience, is realistic in almost every one of its 
details. Returning to his New York roots after several years, Scorsese is 
near the top of his game, as he has crafted a truly powerful, delicately 
balanced motion picture of both real poignancy and humor. "Bringing Out the 
Dead" may not have the wide commercial prospects of, let's say, Cage's 
haphazard, but financially successful, 1997 action product, "Con Air," but is 
a remarkably superior creation. It's not too often that a film this 
innovative and emotionally gratifying is made, and it should be embraced.  

Title
Review for What's the Worst That Could Happen? (2001)
Directed by Sam Weisman.
Cast: Martin Lawrence, Danny DeVito, John Leguizamo, Carmen Ejogo, Glenne 
Headly, Bernie Mac, Larry Miller, Nora Dunn, Richard Schiff, William 
Fichtner, Ana Gasteyer, Sascha Knopf, GQ.   
2001 - 94 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity, sexual innuendo, and violence).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, June 2, 2001.
What's the worst that could happen, you say? Well, for starters, getting 
locked in a theater showing this movie on a continuous, 24-hour loop. Seeing 
it once is bad enough. Sam Weisman's "What's the Worst That Could Happen?" is 
a comic dead-zone trying to pass itself off as a boisterous crime caper. As 
such, it is just about as dull as one could possibly fear, and the 
overflowing screenplay by Matthew Chapman is no help to the bright performers 
who understandably flounder here.
Kevin Caffery (Martin Lawrence) is a professional thief at the top of his 
game. While out on a heist one night with his partner (John Leguizamo), he 
makes the mistake of paying a visit to millionaire Max Fairbanks' (Danny 
DeVito) mansion. In a spontaneous attempt to beat him at his own game, Max 
steals Kevin's prized ring that his girlfriend, Amber (Carmen Ejogo), just 
gave him--right in front of the cops who have come to arrest Kevin. For 
Kevin, this means war, as he sets out to take back the ring that is 
rightfully his, and turn Max's gradually crumbling life upside down.
For such a nonsensical, forgettable little movie, the talent roster is 
surprisingly filled to the brim, and all of the actors more or less embarrass 
themselves. Martin Lawrence, who was a comic revelation in 2000's "Big 
Momma's House" is back in the type of role he always plays--a jewel thief. 
Lawrence can be so good that it amazes me to keep seeing him playing the same 
character over and over. As Kevin Caffery, he performs his usual shtick, and 
wins very few laughs in the process. Danny DeVito (1998's "Living Out Loud"), 
likewise, fits comfortably, but unspectacularly, in a role that he has played 
before, and is sure to play again. DeVito's Max Fairbanks is a nasty man with 
no true redeeming qualities, and so he neither captivates nor amuses us. One 
comedic scene--the only one--that does work has DeVito spitting off a 
rapid-fire stream of four-letter-words, only for it to be translated, 
verbatim, by a sign language interpreter.
The supporting cast list is quite impressive, which makes their appearances 
all the more unfortunate. Carmen Ejogo shows promise as Kevin's understanding 
girlfriend Amber, while William Fichtner (1999's "Go") has some fun as a 
police detective who is about as flaming as a neon sign. And SNL cast member 
Ana Gasteyer (2000's "What Women Want") manages to be fetching in only a 
handful of scenes, as John Leguizamo's wife. Meanwhile, Nora Dunn (1999's 
"Three Kings"), as Max's wife, Glenne Headly (1996's "2 Days in the Valley"), 
as his astrology-obsessed assistant, and Richard Schiff (2000's "Lucky 
Numbers"), as his long-suffering lawyer, are painfully wasted. How painful it 
is to watch good actors without a sign of worthwhile material to work off of.
In a week that has featured two comedy misfires, "What's the Worst That Could 
Happen?" pales even in comparison to the Rob Schneider flick, "The Animal," 
which was no great shake, either. And there's even less to say about this 
movie. Based on the novel by Donald Westlake (who also penned the smart "The 
Grifters"), "What's the Worst That Could Happen?" is the worst kind of poorly 
made film, because it is so very plain and mediocre it doesn't even inspire 
palpable hatred--the one fun thing about negative reviews. What I'm left 
with, then, is 94 minutes of wasted time and a dreary write-up that can't 
possibly do anything other than mirror how dreary the picture itself is.
    - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
      http://www.all-reviews.com/reviewers/dustinputman.htm
http://us.imdb.com/reviewsby?Dustin+Putman
http://www.atnzone.com

Title
Review for Nobody (1999)
Directed by Toshimichi Ohkawa.
Cast: Masaya Kato, Riki Takeuchi, Hideo Nakano, Jinpachi Nezu.
1999 - 100 minutes.
Not Rated (equivalent of an R for violence, profanity, sexual situations, and 
blood).
In Japanese with English subtitles.
Opens in limited release 8/20/99.
Reviewed August 2, 1999.
Watching filmmaker Toshimichi Ohkawa's Japanese film, "Nobody," it struck me 
several times that this picture could be scripted and made in the same exact 
fashion as an American revenge thriller, although here it includes a 
no-nonsense, assured style that is rarely found in the U.S. mainstream. 
Tautly filmed and tightly developed without getting side-tracked with a bunch 
of needless subplots, the film includes three flawed heroes, easily 
discernible villains, mucho action sequences, and even a few clever, if 
somewhat cliched, plot twists. Moving at a brisk pace and highly entertaining 
for the genre, "Nobody" ultimately falls apart in its last five seconds, 
which does not solve the film in any way, but instead adds another conflict 
that makes you question what the point was to begin with.
Taki (Masaya Kato) and his two friends, the hard-edged Nambu (Riki Takeuchi) 
and weak Konishi (Hideo Nakano), are everybody businessmen in Japan enjoying 
themselves in a bar when they wrongfully are caught talking negatively about 
three mysterious men at the table next to theirs. When the three men pick a 
fight, their confrontation ends anticlimactically, but later, while going 
back to get the umbrella he left inside the bar, Konishi is severely beaten 
up. This means war for Taki and, especially, Nambu, who become set on finding 
out the three mens' indentities and hunting them down. Just when they begin 
to realize they probably will never see them again, they unexpectedly come 
into contact with one of the culprits and beat him up in the same manner that 
they did to Konishi. Receiving a threatening telephone call the next day, 
however, they are told that the man died, and they are not going to get away 
with what they have done.
"Nobody" is a conventional action-thriller that works particularly well 
because of director Ohkawa's expertise in stylish filmmaking, with a noir 
undertone and a collision of effective, chic elements, including moody 
camerawork, a memorably creepy music score, and thrilling action setpieces. 
There is very little in the way of character development or multi-layered 
plotting, aside from an unsatisfactorily realized subplot in which Taki's 
girlfriend discovers he has cheated on her, but that doesn't matter too much, 
just as long as the film is able to sweep you up in its basic, simple 
storyline, which it does.
A substantial amount of suspense is mustered up in many masterful scenes, 
including one in which Konishi foolishly meets the two remaining villains in 
a restaurant, expecting to simply talk with them, and another in which Nambu 
has a confrontation with an unidentified man in a black car that takes a 
violent turn. The color scheme of the film only adds to the atmosphere, as 
the night scenes are lit in varying shades of blue and black, while the day 
scenes are painted as gloomy and rather pallid. Accordingly, the climax is 
appropriately grisly and somewhat unpredictable.
Unfortunately, "Nobody" becomes problematic in its cheap conclusion and 
wrap-up section, which includes a terribly-performed, artificial scene 
between Taki and his girlfriend, which, to begin with, is an inadequately 
developed relationship that has not earned the right to be as emotionally 
rewarding as it's supposed to be. Worst of all is the film's last few 
seconds, which are a complete and utter letdown that shows Taki has not 
actually won anything. He's practically back where he started at the film's 
ten-minute mark, and therefore, proves that in the ninety minutes that 
followed, he solved nothing. It is difficult giving a recommendation to a 
film that asks you to devote your time with it, only to add a final twist 
that is in no way justifiable. Perhaps this would not be such a severe flaw 
in a horror movie, where a sequel is almost inevitable, but in a Japanese 
thriller, it is doubtful we will be seeing a "Nobody Part 2" in the future. 
Still, "Nobody," Part 1, is a prime example of style over substance (which 
there is very little of), and its one major blunder does not erase the 
success that the rest of the film achieved.
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman.
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Home Page (1999)
Directed by Doug Block.
Featuring: Justin Hall, Doug Block, Lucy Block, Patrick Farley, Denise 
Tenorio, Julie Petersen, Jim Petersen, Howard Rheingold, Judi Rose, John 
Seabrook, Marjorie Silver, Josh Silver, Carl Steadman, J. Carew Kraft.
1999 - 102 minutes
Not Rated (equivalent of an R rating for profanity and brief nudity).
Reviewed November 23, 1999.
Documentarian Doug Block won raves in 1995 (and I was one of them) for his 
quietly poignant "Jupiter's Wife," about a homeless woman living in NYC's 
Central Park. His latest film, made in 1996 and premiering at the 1999 
Sundance Film Festival, is "Home Page," an alternately fascinating and 
disappointing look at the way the Internet has changed peoples' lives since 
1996, the first year it officially caught on with growing popularity. The 
documentary is fascinating because its subject is about something that I, 
myself, am intrigued with. Ever since getting AOL in the summer of 1997, my 
life has been altered in many way, and all for the better. Not only is it an 
enormous outlet in which you can do almost anything on, but it also has paved 
the way for what I am doing right now--writing film reviews and attempting to 
get my voice heard in the profession. 
What makes "Home Page" unsatisfying on many levels, however, is its shaky, 
flawed storytelling. Centering, in large part, on Justin Hall, a fellow 
student at his son's school, Swarthmore College, what starts as a film on 
Block's own daughter quickly turns as he is overtaken by Justin's obsession 
with the net and his own home page (www.links.net). Justin, an alternatively 
dressed and groomed 21-year-old, is a self-proclaimed "physical embodiment of 
the Internet," a young man who has no qualms about revealing the most 
personal things about himself and the people around him on his site. 
Temporarily moving from New York City to San Francisco to stay with Howard 
Rheingold, his mentor, Justin becomes involved in launching Howard's aspiring 
"virtual community" website, called Electric Minds. 
>From here on, the film branches off on several different paths, as we meet 
other web site fanatics, including a few of the employees at Justin's former 
intern job at HotWired, such Julie Petersen and Carl Steadman. Of note, Julie 
reminisces about leaving her husband for Patrick Farley, a fellow web 
designer. 
Through everything, "Home Page" always leads right back to the life of 
Justin. While an eccentric, interesting individual, and the only person whose 
life and website is really delved satisfactorily into, filmmaker Doug Block's 
misstep is in relegating the other people virtually into the background. 
Also, Block disregards quite a lot of other aspects of the Internet and that 
of home pages, and so the film always seems one-sided, as we never are given 
a glimpse into others' relationships with this great, recent technological 
advancement.
In discussing the titled subject, its details remain sketchy, at best. Rarely 
are we ever shown the content on the people's pages, with Block seemingly 
leaving it up to the viewers to go see for themselves when he pops up each of 
the characters' home page addresses at the film's conclusion. Why make a film 
about something, and then not even attempt an effort in exploring that topic? 
As Doug Block follows Justin around more and more, he is inspired to create 
his own site. One scene in which he is trying to learn how to set his page 
up, and is shown to be absolutely delighted when he begins to catch on to 
webmaking, may have been an ultra-realistic portrait of human nature. Block 
botches the effect, however, by not pointing the camera at the computer 
screen to show us what he is looking at or doing.
"Home Page," which is currently in limited theatrical release and is then 
expected to go to cable and home video, is filmed in a very matter-of-fact 
way, with not enough insight into the World Wide Web or home pages to be 
fully recommended. One of Block's goals is to show how a portion of the world 
population has been so romanced by the Internet that they are at a point 
where they can function far better through a computer, rather than in real 
life. The Internet, you see, is sort of like an alternate-reality reality, in 
which many people can speak their mind more honestly through a screen because 
it is a more protected environment. If you don't like something, you can just 
close it and not look at it, but in life, it isn't as simple as that. Block 
is successful in relaying this message, but the target audience (Internet 
fans), I suspect, already knows this. "Home Page" is a documentary not nearly 
intimate enough in its portrait of the people the film inhabits. For 
webaholics, at least its never boring, even at a prolonged 102 minutes.
Special Note: If "Home Page" is not worth the trip to the movie theater or, 
later on, the video store, the film is currently available to download--for 
free--at the IFILM web site. Anyone 
interested in the topic is urged to at least seek the film out here. 

Title
Review for Hurricane Streets (1998)
Directed by Morgan J. Freeman.
Cast: Brendan Sexton III, Isidra Vega, Shawn Elliott, David Roland 
Frank, L.M. "Kit" Carson, Edie Falco, Jose Zuniga, Lynn Cohen, Heather 
Matarazzo.
1998 - 89 minutes.
Rated R (for violence and profanity).
Reviewed November 29, 1998.
"Hurricane Streets," which won an unprecedented three 1997 Sundance Film 
Festival awards, for Best Director, Best Cinematography, and the 
Audience Award, is one of the most accurate films about teenagers I've 
seen in a while.
Marcus (Brendan Sexton III), who lives in the East Village in NYC with 
his grandmother, is about to turn fifteen, and spends his day stealing 
petty things from stores with his friends. His mother is in prison, and 
he hopes that for his birthday, his father will send him a plane ticket 
so he can visit him in New Mexico. While selling some CD's that he has 
stolen to a bunch of young kids, he meets a 14-year-old girl, Melena 
(Isidra Vega), and they quickly become friends, much to the disapproval 
of her abusive father. To his surprise, Marcus finally does get the 
ticket to go to New Mexico, but his hopes begin to diminish when he 
discovers some secrets that his mother has been hiding from him. 
Although the story is occasionally a little bleak, at its center is the 
sweet, gentle love story between Marcus and Melena, played marvelously 
by Brendan Sexton III (1996's brilliant, "Welcome to the Dollhouse) and 
newcomer Isidra Vega. To prove that the screenplay is so well-written 
and unpredictable, director Morgan J. Freeman (not to be confused with 
the actor) does not include exploitation and sex to their relationship, 
which is what a typical film would have done, but relies more on the 
realism of being 15 and in love. 
One of the pleasures of, "Hurricane Streets," is watching all of the 
characters interact with each other, which is basically what the film is 
about. There is no particular storyline, because it would have put a 
damper on the effectiveness of the relationships. Watching it, I was 
surprised by how completely uncliched the film was. Since Marcus is a 
teenage thief, the banal thing to do would to simply make him act tough 
and uncaring. Instead, Marcus is a kid with a pretty good head on his 
shoulders. He does not do drugs, is not promiscuous, but does have the 
insecurities that teens his age have, and has a very good relationship 
with his grandmother, who owns a bar.
"Hurricane Streets," did not, or rarely, step wrong until the very 
ending, which abruptly ends while in midstream, as if the final ten 
minutes had never been shot. A great many twists and revelations comes 
during the climax, but they are not solved, and I cared so much for the 
two main characters of Marcus and Melena that I desperately wanted to 
see what would happen next. Maybe this is just a sign of an exceptional 
film, since I got so involved in it, but the conclusion could have been 
better.
What came before the end, however, was masterfully written and memorably 
performed. An added bonus was briefly seeing Heather Matarazzo (also of, 
"Welcome to the Dollhouse), one of the best young actresses working 
today, as Vega's friend, Ashley. "Hurricane Streets," is a gritty, 
highly impressive directing debut by Morgan J. Freeman, and I greatly 
look forward to seeing his next film called, "Desert Blue," which is due 
out in 1999, and stars Sexton III, Christina Ricci, Casey Affleck, Sara 
Gilbert, among others. To get so many talents in only your second 
picture is a sign of a talented director.

Title
Review for Faculty, The (1998)
Directed by Robert Rodriguez.
Cast: Elijah Wood, Josh Hartnett, Clea DuVall, Shawn Hatosy, Jordanna 
Brewster, Laura Harris, Robert Patrick, Bebe Neuwirth, Famke Janssen, 
Piper Laurie, Jon Stewart, Salma Hayek, Christopher McDonald, Usher 
Raymond, Susan Willis, Daniel von Bargen, Louis Black, Megan Gallagher, 
Joe Hatton, Harry Knowles, Duane Martin, Jason D. May, Katherine Willis, 
Summer Phoenx. 
1998 - 101 minutes.
Rated R (for violence, gore, profanity, nudity, and drug use).
Reviewed December 27, 1998.
"The Faculty," the heavily-hyped and advertised sci-fi/horror film that 
has teamed up director Robert Rodriguez (1995's "Desperado" and 1996's 
"From Dusk Till Dawn") and screenwriter Kevin Williamson (1996's 
"Scream" and 1997's "Scream 2"), is being called a cross between 
"Invasion of the Body Snatchers" and "The Breakfast Club," and I don't 
think I could describe it any better than that.
The film sets up the six central teenage characters who do not seem to 
have much in common, and then the science-fiction aspect is added, 
involving the fear that the faculty at Herrington High School are 
actually aliens who are quickly transforming everyone in the town. The 
six characters, as in "The Breakfast Club," can be easily labeled as a 
stereotype, but as they are developed, they become far more complex: 
Casey (Elijah Wood), the much picked upon nerd; Stokely (Clea DuVall), a 
goth outcast who hides behind the false facade of being a lesbian so 
everyone will avoid her; Zeke (Josh Hartnett), a drug dealer who turns 
out to be a science whiz; Stan (Shawn Hatosy), the star football 
quarterback who is considering quitting the team to concentrate more on 
academics; Delilah (Jordanna Brewster), the popular cheerleader and 
newspaper journalist; and Marybeth (Laura Harris), the sweet 'n southern 
new girl in town. Although the characters are only slightly connected 
(i.e. Casey is Delilah's photojournalist assistant; Marybeth tries to 
become buddies with Stokely, since they both don't have friends, etc.), 
when they all begin to suspect the teachers due to some grotesque and 
strange occurrences, the only people they can count on for help is each 
other, even though they aren't really even sure if they can trust one 
another.
"The Faculty" is another smart and pop-culturally hip film from 
Williamson, although it does not equal up to his best film, the original 
"Scream," and Rodriguez, whose "From Dusk Till Dawn" is still one of the 
more original genre films of the 90's. Williamson and Rodriguez are so 
assured at their professions, respectively, that the idea of teaming up 
together is pretty much a no-brainer. The plotline of "The Faculty," 
involving aliens taking over other people's bodies, has been done quite 
a lot before, from "Invasion of the Body Snatchers," to "The Puppet 
Masters," to "Invaders from Mars," so one of the obstacles that 
Williamson and Rodriguez had to overcome was to somehow make the idea 
seem fresh, and by setting the goings-on at a high school and having the 
protagonists be a group of teens, they were mostly successful. Surely, 
the conventions of the story are still the same, and the climax was 
inevitable, but there were a few surprises along the way, including the 
question of who were the aliens, and who weren't. The epilogue was also 
a refreshing change-of-pace as it did not set up a sequel but ended on a 
note that probably could not have been any better.
The performances in "The Faculty" were a treat throughout, since there 
were so many recognizable actors in roles that were the polar opposite 
of what they usually do. One exception were the teens, who, aside from 
Elijah Wood, are not very well-known, but they all aquit themselves 
nicely, particularly Wood (the seasoned pro), Clea DuVall, and Jordanna 
Brewster. As members of the faculty, Robert Patrick ("T2: Judgement 
Day") was creepy as the gym coach; Piper Laurie was amusing and 
threatening as the drama teacher; Bebe Neuwirth actually was somehow 
able to look like an alien; and Salma Hayek, as the school nurse with a 
bad case of the cold, was very funny in a small role. The standout, in 
my opinion, of the whole cast was Famke Janssen who turns in an oddly 
touching performance as the shy and meek english teacher who, after 
turning into an alien, becomes the sex bombshell. If there was any 
problem I had with the faculty, it was that some of them were given no 
real payoff in the climactic sequence. Since the teenagers realize that 
in order to save everyone they must kill the "Queen" alien, many of the 
faculty members disappear. It might have been more fun if they had to 
face every one of the teachers, although the finale is still pretty 
impressive, and includes some showstopping creature effects, especially 
for a relatively low 15-million-dollar budget.
Although not one of the best horror or science-fiction films I have 
seen, "The Faculty" is still an exciting and worthy film that Dimension 
Films was smart to release around the Holiday Season when this type of 
genre offering is usually not released. While the story is as old as the 
hills, it is also, in a way, timeless, because everyone, I think, has 
suspected at one time or another that a certain person simply did not 
act right, as if they really weren't human. And by putting this idea in 
the setting of a small-town high school, it perfectly contrasts with the 
alienation that most teenagers usually go through when relating to 
adults and other peers. 
+ Note: The ad and poster campaign for this film is hugely misleading, 
as it features R & B artist Usher Raymond as one of the main characters. 
In actuality, he only has a small role as one of Stan's buddies who 
becomes quarterback after Stan resigns from the team. If I were one of 
the heads from Dimension, I would change this advertising at once, since 
it is unnecessary and rather deceiving.
           - Copyright 1998 by Dustin Putman
             Dustin
Putman's Film Reviews >

Title
Review for 28 Days (2000)
Directed by Betty Thomas.
Cast: Sandra Bullock, Dominic West, Viggo Mortensen, Elizabeth Perkins, Azura 
Skye, Alan Tudyk, Diane Ladd, Marianne Jean-Baptiste, Steve Buscemi, Michael 
O'Malley, Margo Martindale, Reni Santoni.
2000 - 104 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and adult themes).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, April 15, 2000.
"28 Days" would like to be an honest portrayal of a person attempting to 
rehabilitate from an alcoholic pill-popper to someone who is able to live a 
normal life, but it simply isn't. With themes similar to that of 1988's 
"Clean and Sober" and 1994's "When a Man Loves a Woman" (with a remarkable 
performance by Meg Ryan), "28 Days" is the black sheep of the trio--a sketchy 
and predictable dramedy with little insight or intelligence, and a story 
outline that is merely skin-deep. Welcome to planet Hollywood!
For the past fifteen years, Gwen Cummings (Sandra Bullock) has lived her life 
in the fast lane, speeding along from one drink and pill, from one party and 
bedroom romp, to the next, without any clear destination as to where her life 
is headed. After yet another round of late-night partying, Gwen awakens with 
her equally troubled boyfriend Jasper (Dominic West) only to realize that it 
is the wedding day of her older sister (Elizabeth Perkins), and she is 
already late. Making a scene at the reception (where she arrives drunk), Gwen 
accidentally falls into the wedding cake and, following a car accident in 
which she drives into a home while trying to find a cake store, is 
immediately sent to Serenity Glen Rehab Center, where she is to serve 28 
days. 
At first, Gwen refuses to admit she even has a problem, and finds it 
difficult to believe she is like her fellow drug patients, including her 
teenaged, heroin-and-soap-opera-addicted roommate, Andrea (Azura Skye); a 
divorced mother (Marianne Jean-Baptiste); and a light-hearted gay dancer 
(Alan Tudyk). But the more difficulty she has sustaining an abruptly sober 
life, and the more she flashes back to her childhood when she was living with 
her now-deceased alcoholic mother, Gwen realizes the discouraging footsteps 
in which she has followed thus far in her adult life. It's time to set things 
straight, for once, she believes, and that includes getting off drugs, 
mending her rocky relationship with her sister, and dealing maturely with her 
boyfriend, whom she cares about but knows is not the best influence for her.
Written by Susannah Grant, the mastermind also behind this season's biggest 
hit, "Erin Brockovich," "28 Days" is a sloppily made motion picture with nary 
the depth nor the realism to be a truly powerful or even memorable 
experience. Quickly moving from one scene to the next, none of the supporting 
characters are given the space or time to break free of their one-note, 
stereotypical roles, while the workings of the plot fail to overcome its 
cliches. 
Meanwhile, Sandra Bullock remains in the forefront from the first scene to 
the last, and she is her usual good self, but in a decidedly less glamorous 
role this time, respectively. Bullock injects the flawed Gwen as a likable 
character, even when she is being reckless, since we realize that she is a 
woman with a great deal of problems, both exterior and interior, that 
decisively need to be worked out.
Surrounding Bullock are a parade of stock characters, with only Elizabeth 
Perkins, as Bullock's fed-up sister, and Azura Skye, as Bullock's troubled 
roommate, particularly standing out in effective performances that are given 
more than a few fleeting moments of screen time. Late in the picture, hints 
of a romance are brought up involving Gwen and a new patient, the ruggedly 
handsome alcoholic baseball player Eddie (Viggo Mortensen), but there is 
little chemistry between the two, and even less interest in them within 
Grant's oversimplified screenplay, which basically disregards the subplot 
before the silly conclusion.
"28 Days" may be a so-called "feel-good" comedy-drama, but it is rarely 
funny, and its emotions, which thankfully never go overboard in the schmaltz 
department, nevertheless neglect to exude much tangible feeling. Alcoholism 
and drug abuse are serious diseases that are never solved or overcame; 
instead, they are life-long battles that rely on willpower and the amount of 
desire a person has to stay clean. The recovery process, as delineated here, 
is a relatively easy and sugarcoated one, at a loss for any signs of 
authenticity. The final minutes of "28 Days" particularly fail to do this 
idea legitimate justice, as we are led to believe Gwen has, once and for all, 
gotten her priorities in order, and will never go back to drinking. Maybe she 
will, and maybe she won't; who knows? Sigh...if only the big L (as in 
L-I-F-E) was really so simple.

Title
Review for Dr. T & the Women (2000)
Directed by Robert Altman.
Cast: Richard Gere, Helen Hunt, Kate Hudson, Tara Reid, Laura Dern, Shelley 
Long, Farrah Fawcett, Liv Tyler, Robert Hays, Matt Malloy, Andy Richter, 
Janine Turner.
2000 - 122 minutes
Rated R (for profanity and nudity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, October 14, 2000.
After several years of making less-successful motion pictures (1999's 
"Cookie's Fortune," 1996's "Kansas City") that lacked the memorable nature of 
his earlier work, it was with a slight sense of pause that made me question 
if director Robert Altman was possibly losing his surefire touch. Although 
never losing his loose stylishness and quirkily realistic characters, 
Altman's last great film was 1993's "Short Cuts," which, in fact, beared a 
close resemblance to his most masterful achievement, 1975's "Nashville," a 
multi-layered expose of a week in the lives of twenty-four characters in the 
title city of country music. 
With the aid of Anne Rapp's precise, accurately drawn screenplay, Altman's 
latest film, "Dr. T and the Women," is not only a thoroughly enjoyable and 
satisfying piece of work, but one of the better, more thought-provoking 
movies he has made. Richard Gere exquisitely stars as princely Dallas 
gynecologist Sullivan Travis ("Dr. T"), who, for as long as he can remember, 
has dedicated himself to the many, many females in his life. Women to him, 
you see, are all alluring and unique in their own special ways, and feels as 
if they should be treated like such. Because of his studly looks, intermixed 
with his kind, purely professional demeanor, Dr. T's office is constantly 
swarming each day with patients, primarily wealthy debutantes from Dallas' 
upper crust of society.
Tragedy hits close to home when his beloved wife, Kate (Farrah Fawcett), 
somehow snaps and acquires a rare mental disorder known as the Hestia 
Complex, in which the sufferer resorts to a virginal, child-like state. Also 
on his already full plate is the upcoming wedding of his cheerleader daughter 
Dee Dee (Kate Hudson), who may or may not be hiding her true feelings for old 
college friend and maid-of-honor Marilyn (Liv Tyler), much to the concern of 
Dee Dee's conspiracy buff sister Connie (Tara Reid). Also in Dr. T's life is 
daffy sister-in-law Peggy (Laura Dern), who can't go much longer than a 
minute without a swig of booze, and who has just moved back into his mansion 
with her three little daughters; sprightly office assistant Carolyn (Shelley 
Long), who secretly pines for Dr. T from afar; and Bree (Helen Hunt), the new 
golf pro in town who proves to not only be sexually-charged, but also a good 
listener, and whose very independence deeply attracts Dr. T to her.
"Dr. T and the Women" is an extraordinarily assured comedy-drama about a man 
whose very love for women has made him want to spend his entire life 
satisfying and making them happy. While many of his patients are overly 
materialistic, Dr. T's very nature is to be non-critical of each and every 
one of them, and to really listen to what they have to say. Additionally, his 
extended family, composed solely of the opposite sex, all love, trust, and 
rely on him, and this very fact makes him utterly satisfied. One of the best 
things about the writing, by Anne Rapp, is not only the way she truthfully 
portrays the female characters, but, like Dr. T, holds no preconceived 
judgments of the people that comprise the title character's entire being.
In what has become a token trademark of his, Altman paints his story and 
characters with enough shading and layers that something is almost always 
going on in the background, as well as the foreground, whether it be a subtle 
character idiosyncrasy, or an uneventful, superfluous string of dialogue that 
permeates through everyday interactions. Whatever it may be, this distinct 
filmmaking choice helps to develop and get the viewer to somehow come to know 
the characters better, even when they aren't given too much to work with on 
the scripted page.
The cast in "Dr. T and the Women" couldn't possibly get any better. Aside 
from veteran Richard Gere's star-making (yes, you heard that right) 
performance that makes you feel as if you are glimpsing him as an actor for 
the first time, the rest of the actors are no less impressive. In standout 
turns, Laura Dern (1996's "Citizen Ruth") is exceptionally funny and 
entertaining as joyful alcoholic Peggy; Helen Hunt (1997's "As Good As It 
Gets) thoughtfully underplays her complicated role as the idealistic woman 
Dr. T falls for; and Tara Reid (1999's "American Pie") is extremely likable 
and brightly cast as Dr. T's faithful daughter Connie. It should be quickly 
added that singling out the best performances in the picture is almost a 
pointless task, since everyone fits right into the proceedings, including 
Kate Hudson (2000's "Almost Famous"), touching as confused bride-to-be Dee 
Dee, Shelley Long (1995's The Brady Bunch Movie"), and Liv Tyler (1999's 
"Plunkett and McLeane").
Nearly flawless until its final minutes, in which Altman weaves a highly 
ambiguous surprise conclusion that could be interpreted any number of ways, 
but feels mildly disappointing in relation to everything that has come 
before, "Dr. T and the Women" is the best type of comedy--one that not only 
makes you laugh, but that makes you deeply care, too. Above everything else, 
this is a one-of-a-kind motion picture that treats all of its characters with 
respect and dignity, whether they fully deserve it or not, and never once 
attempts to pick sides. Too often, female roles in Hollywood are underwritten 
or unfairly looked over, but director Altman has always fondly treated them 
as intelligent individuals with thoughts, ideas, and a whole lot of heart. 
With "Dr. T and the Women," he has adoringly created a love letter especially 
for them, and in the process, made one of the very best films of the year. 
Way to go, Bob. Way to go.

Title
Review for Road Trip (2000)
Directed by Todd Phillips.
Cast: Breckin Meyer, Seann William Scott, DJ Qualls, Paulo Costanzo, Amy 
Smart, Tom Green, Rachel Blanchard, Fred Ward, Anthony Rapp, Andy Dick, Ellen 
Albertini Dow.
2000 - 91 minutes
Rated R (for profanity, nudity, sexual situations, violence, and drug use).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, May 20, 2000.
Last summer, "American Pie," an outrageous teen raunchfest, became one of the 
biggest sleeper smash hits of the year. With a style that harkened back to 
the sleazy  high school/college movies of the early '80s, such as "Porky's" 
and "National Lampoon's Animal House," but with brighter stars and an overall 
sweeter screenplay, "American Pie," along with the success of 1998's "There's 
Something About Mary," have regenerated a seemingly dead genre, much like 
"Scream" did for slasher films in 1996. The first copycat out of the gate is 
"Road Trip," directed by documentary filmmaker Todd Phillips (1998's 
controversial "Frat House"). Maybe 'copycat' is too strong a word, as 
Phillips, who also cowrote the script with Scot Armstrong, has used "American 
Pie" as an inspiration to make his very own rowdy, lewd, and crude college 
comedy that, like its predecessors, goes straight for the jugular and doesn't 
mind shocking its audience, just as long as it gets everyone to laugh. And it 
does, in spades.
Josh (Breckin Meyer) has always been best friends with Tiffany (Rachel 
Blanchard), and once they became teenagers, their friendship turned to love. 
After graduating from high school, however, they were separated by college, 
Josh at Ithaca in NY, and Tiffany at Austin University in TX. Successfully 
holding a long-term relationship thus far, and making sure to call each other 
every day, Josh begins to suspect that Tiffany has started to cheat on him 
after she doesn't return his calls for several days. Egged on by his best 
friend, E.L. (Seann William Scott), Josh ends up sleeping with college cutie 
Beth (Amy Smart), who has had a crush on him. Taping their bedplay, Josh is 
horrified the next morning to discover that their sex tape was actually sent 
in the mail, headed for Tiffany in Austin, instead of the "I Miss You" tape 
that was supposed to be mailed. Worse yet, Tiffany finally calls apologizing 
for not answering his calls. It seems her grandfather passed away and she's 
been out of town.
With finals approaching in less than a week, one of which Josh needs at least 
a "B+" in to pass the class, he frantically sets out on an 1800-mile trek to 
intercept the tape before Tiffany gets ahold of it. In true comedic fashion, 
everything that could go wrong does for Josh, E.L., fellow friend Rubin 
(Paulo Costanzo), and geeky Kyle (DJ Qualls), whose car they force him to let 
them take. Meanwhile, Beth sets off for Boston (getting it mixed up with 
Austin) to admit to Tiffany that she slept with Josh, after feeling guilty. 
All of this is told in story flashback format by wacky 8-year Ithaca student 
Barry (Tom Green), while he is giving a campus tour for prospective students 
and parents.
"Road Trip" is neither deep, nor meaningful, nor particularly substantial, 
and it doesn't try to be. While "American Pie" seriously focused on 
relationships amidst the outlandish comedy, "Road Trip" is strictly a wild 
comedy, and it works surprisingly well, sure to attract wide audiences that 
break out from the teenage crowd. Trips to a sperm bank, an all-black frat 
house, a school for the blind, and the sight of an old man with an erect 
penis are all on display here, and while surely madcap and shocking, the 
movie is never mean, and unlike the gratuitous, offensive "Porky's," treats 
its female characters with respect, rather than looking upon them as merely 
sex objects with breasts. There are, however, some of the latter frequently 
on display here.
As with "American Pie," the entire cast works as a unit, and without any one 
of them, something would feel missing from the proceedings. Breckin Meyer 
(1999's "Go") is a likable, if somewhat bland, leading man as Josh, but he is 
ably supported by the cast that surrounds him. Seann William Scott ("American 
Pie") is a standout as the trash-talking E.L., who discovers, to his delight, 
a new way to receive sexual pleasure, and DJ Qualls, in his film debut, is 
well-cast as the meek, virginal Kyle. Absent from films for quite a while 
while he starred in Broadway's Tony Award Winner, "Rent," it is nice to see 
Anthony Rapp (1987's "Adventures in Babysitting") again, this time playing a 
creepy Ithaca student who grows progressively jealous of Josh when Beth is 
stolen from his grasp (nevermind that she has no interest at all in him, 
anyway). In the female department, Amy Smart (1999's "Outside Providence") is 
fresh-faced and proves to have a knack for humor, as Beth, while Rachel 
Blanchard (1999's "The Rage: Carrie 2") is underutilized and mostly wasted as 
the object of Josh's affections, Tiffany. Best of all, however, is Tom Green, 
hysterical as the loony Barry, who gains the most pleasure of all when Rubin 
assigns him the job of feeding a mouse to his pet boa constrictor. Green gets 
most of the best lines and overall funny scenes, despite not even being 
onscreen during the actual road trip itself.
It's difficult to discuss "Road Trip" without giving away its many 
laugh-inducing sure-to-be-talked-about scenes, but suffice to say, it is a 
very funny comedy, perhaps the best since last year's largely underrated 
"Drop Dead Gorgeous." It is also the type of movie that was meant to be seen 
in a crowded theater of high school and college students with a sense of 
humor, ready and willing to laugh. If, for some unknown reason, you miss 
"Road Trip" during its theatrical release, you will also be missing out on a 
genuinely entertaining filmgoing experience.

Title
Review for I Know What You Did Last Summer (1997)
Directed Jim Gillespie.
Cast: Jennifer Love Hewitt, Sarah Michelle Gellar, Ryan Phillippe, 
Freddie Prinze Jr., Bridgette Wilson, Anne Heche, Johnny Galecki, Muse 
Watson.
1997 - 100 minutes.
Rated R (for violence, gore, and profanity).
Reviewed November 12, 1998.
By Dustin Putman 
Dustin Putman's Film Reviews >
"I Know What You Did Last Summer," the first high-profile slasher 
thriller to be released after 1996's "Scream," and written by the same 
screenwriter, Kevin Williamson, is a stylish, effective horror film that 
became 1997's biggest hit of the Fall season. While "Scream" was a more 
knowing film about the genre, "I Know What You Did Last Summer" is more 
reminiscent of a straight-forward slasher flick, but it is far more 
intelligent than such bottom-of-the-barrel guilty pleasures as all nine 
of the "Friday the 13th" films (well, okay, "Jason Goes to Hell" was
 pure hell to sit through).
The film starts off with four talented, aspiring teenage friends who 
have just graduated from high school in their small boating town of 
Southport, N.C. It is the 4th of July, and they will soon be heading 
their separate ways. Kind-hearted Julie (Jennifer Love Hewitt), and 
outsider Ray (Freddie Prinze Jr.) will be headed off to college, while 
Helen (Sarah Michelle Gellar), who has just been honored Croaker Queen 
in the town, and her ignorant jock boyfriend, Barry (Ryan Phillippe), 
are going to New York to become an actress and football player. When the 
four of them travel to a nearby mountain-side beach for the evening, 
they are dismayed after hitting a man in the road on their way home. 
Distraught and confused, they decide they can't go to the police because 
they will be charged with manslaughter, so they devise a plan to throw 
the apparently dead victim off a peer into the ocean, in hopes no one 
will find him. Julie is apprehensive about it, but is forced into it by 
Barry. Switch to exactly a year later, Julie, still unable to come to 
terms with what she did, reluctantly returns home from college to find 
that all three of her old friends are still in the town because their 
career plans did not work out. Almost immediately, Julie recieves an 
ominous letter that simply reads, "I know what you did last summer," and 
that is the start of their problems as they find themselves being 
terrorized by a mysterious figure dressed in fisherman gear and yielding 
a giant hook.
"I Know What You Did Last Summer," is a successful horror film for a 
number of reasons. The cinematography by Denis Crossan could very well 
be described as Hitchcockian, as it put shadows, fog, steam, and other 
clever devices to add atmosphere to the proceedings. The characters, 
particularly Julie and Helen, are realistically written, and the film 
amazingly deals with their broken relationship in a few scenes, which is 
largely uncharacteristic in films of this sort. And last, the film 
creates a few dazzling and scary set-pieces that are some of the most 
memorable I've seen in a horror movie, particularly the suspenseful, 
superbly shot sequence involving Helen at her family's store with the 
killer inside with her.
Perhaps the best character is that of Missy Egan (Anne Heche), a lonely 
backwoods woman whose brother was the one Julie thinks they hit. Heche's 
performance is a standout, as she is able to create a full character in 
only about ten minutes of screen time.
"I Know What You Did Last Summer," could have been a great horror movie 
if not for a few problems. Prinze Jr. gives a performance to be desired 
here, and much of his dialogue sounds wooden coming out of his mouth. 
Also, the climax of the film almost completely loses its frightening 
grip after it unveils the mystery killer, who is a decidedly bad actor 
and should not have been given any lines. Luckily, the penultimate scene 
saves the disappointing finale, which includes an expertly crafted 
"jump-in-your-seat" scare.
In the main roles, Hewitt and Gellar are highly talented, and Hewitt, 
especially, is one of the best screamers I've ever heard. She honestly 
could give Jamie Lee Curtis a little competition for the best "scream 
queen." And Gellar is touching as a young woman who, in the course of 
one year, finds her dream of being an actress ultimately shattered.
Although not up to the level of either "Scream" movies, or the more 
recent, "Urban Legend," "I Know What You Did last Summer" is a 
respectable, smartly-scripted slasher film that firmly proved good
 horror movies were once again being made.

Title
Review for Angel Eyes (2001)
Directed by Luis Mandoki.
Cast: Jennifer Lopez, Jim Caviezel, Terrence Howard, Jeremy Sisto, Sonia 
Braga, Victor Argo, Monet Mazur, Shirley Knight.
2001 - 102 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, and sex).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, May 19, 2001.
While watching the theatrical trailer and television ads for "Angel Eyes" 
would lead you to believe the film is a supernatural romance, along the lines 
of 1990's "Ghost" or 1998's "City of Angels," it really isn't at all. "Angel 
Eyes" is a romance, to be sure, but it goes so much deeper than the soapy 
genre usually permits, and turns out to not have any connection with 
otherworldly entities. Infinitely more mature and delicately plotted than 
most big, studio-distributed love stories, it enraptures you in its humane 
characters and their plight from the very beginning, and doesn't let go until 
the emotionally honest conclusion.
Chicago P.D. officer Sharon Pogue (Jennifer Lopez) has had a rough year. 
Although she loves her job, she is mostly estranged from her entire family, 
and is living a lonely, single life. During a near-tragic fight with a 
drive-by shooter, her life is spared with the help of Chase (Jim Caviezel), 
an alluringly mysterious man with no last name who stops the suspect just 
before he is about to shoot Sharon in the head. Chase doesn't ever seem to 
want to talk much about himself, but he is helplessly attracted to Sharon, 
and she can't help but be drawn to his obscure mystique--and his willingness 
to go out of his way to be "good" to people, and do the right thing. Chase is 
hiding something, though, and Sharon knows it. After all, people just don't 
show up in the middle of nowhere and risk their life for a complete stranger.
In what has, thus far, been a lackluster year with virtually no truly great 
movies, "Angel Eyes" is one of the better films of 2001. Directed by Luis 
Mandoki (1994's "When a Man Loves a Woman"), it is a rare motion picture that 
refreshingly doesn't feel the need to create big plot twists and 
mechanically-created problems. The movie falsely sets the viewer up for 
surprises and unforeseen turns, only to uncover a stirring multiple character 
study of two people who may or may not have met by chance, and are struggling 
to make sense of everything--the good, as well as the bad--that has happened 
in their lives.
In what is her most powerful performance, to date, Jennifer Lopez (2001's 
"The Wedding Planner") is really shaping up to be one of the great actresses 
of her generation. So much more than just a pretty face, Lopez is 
strong-willed and profoundly touching as officer Sharon Pogue, not to mention 
completely plausible as a professional, trained cop. The journey that Lopez 
takes through the duration of the story is one of great catharsis and 
understanding, and the pain she feels from being shut off by her father for 
doing something she firmly believed was right is palpably  sustained.
Fulfilling his part of the bargain, and more, Jim Caviezel (2000's 
"Frequency") is appropriately subtle, and all the more effective because of 
his on-target portrayal of the inscrutable Chase. Chase's backstory, which is 
intentionally hidden until the third act, is fairly predictable, but the 
realism that he brings to these grievous circumstances could not have worked 
so well with a lesser actor in the role.
The rest of the actors taking up space along the edges have small, but 
pivotal parts, all of which are fully realized. Sonia Braga (1995's "Two 
Deaths") and Victor Argo (2000's "The Yards") are poignant as Sharon's 
parents, and Jeremy Sisto (1995's "Clueless") strongly plays Sharon's 
brother, of whom she's seen her relationship with also falter. Veteran 
actress Shirley Knight (2001's "The Center of the World") also turns up as an 
equally mysterious acquaintance of Chase's.
The romance that blossoms between Sharon and Chase is one that is sharply 
written by screenwriter Gerald Di Pego, capturing all of the nuances of the 
growing love that occurs between two people. There is an obligatory love 
scene between the two characters, but it also happens to be one of the most 
simplistic and steamy that has ended up onscreen in some time. For once, the 
entrance of sex into the story is not gratuitous, but powerful, as it is 
about characters coming together and connecting in the closest way they know 
how, rather than to just merely titillate the audience.
"Angel Eyes," grittily photographed by Piotr Sobocinski and lushly scored by 
Marco Beltrami, is of a growingly scarce breed. It is an intelligent, 
impassioned adult romance that has a lot to say, and doesn't feel the need to 
let a rock soundtrack full of love ballads explain it. Director Mandoki lets 
his characters actually talk, and lets the viewer get to know and care about 
what happens to them. And at the center of everything, Jennifer Lopez, once 
and for all, exposes herself to be exactly what she has been hinting at for 
several years: a genuine movie star.
   - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
     http://www.all-reviews.com/reviewers/DustinPutman.htm
http://us.imdb.com/reviewsby?Dustin+Putman
http://www.atnzone.com

Title
Review for A.I. Artificial Intelligence (2001)
Directed by Steven Spielberg. 
Cast: Haley Joel Osment, Jude Law, Frances O'Connor, William Hurt, Sam 
Robards, Jake Thomas, Brendan Gleeson, April Grace. 
2001 - 145 minutes 
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and sexual situations). 
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, June 30, 2001. 
Loosely based on the story, "Supertoys Last All Summer Long," by Brian 
Aldiss, and the late Stanley Kubrick's dream project up until his death in 
1999, "A.I.: Artificial Intelligence" is as accomplished a motion picture as 
anything director Steven Spielberg has ever made. Following Kubrick's 
unfortunate passing, Spielberg, who had prior been collaborating ideas with 
him concerning "A.I.," decided to make it his next directorial effort, both 
as a movie that he was passionate and excited about, and as a loving tribute 
to one of the great masters of the cinema. 
The end result of the long, arduous, 25-year journey of "A.I." is a 
science-fiction film filled with endless imagination and wonder; a mature, 
almost devastating fairy tale; and a thought-provoking rumination on the 
importance of love, and determined hope, in one's life. The movie is, indeed, 
a Spielberg production, although it does feature an icy, somehow bleak, 
emotional core that is certainly Kubrickian in spirit, and undoubtedly 
intentional. Using the approach of differing styles of moviemaking (with 
Spielberg more of a wide-eyed optimist) turns out to work extraordinarily 
well in this film's case, as the picture is deeply touching and effective 
without being maudlin, and occasionally sterile without coming off as 
cold-hearted. 
Set in a futuristic setting, following the melting of the ice caps which has 
drowned entire U.S. cities (including Manhattan), Professor Hobby (William 
Hurt) has created a string of mechas--robots with the physical appearance of 
humans--to live in the world. With all mechas having been made into adults up 
until this point, Hobby introduces his most life-like creation yet: an 
11-year-old boy named David (Haley Joel Osment). Programmed to be able to 
love (the first of his kind to be able to do such a thing), David is taken in 
by Monica Swinton (Frances O'Connor) and her husband, Henry (Sam Robards), as 
a child "substitute" for their own young son, Martin (Jake Thomas), who has 
been cryogenically frozen while they await a cure for the disease he has. 
At first creeped out by David, Henry and Monica quickly warm up to him, and 
in Monica's case, falls in love with what is now her new son. Aside from not 
being able to eat or sleep, David is exactly like a regular boy, delighting 
in mimicking and picking up new information, as well as being able to play 
games. When Martin suddenly awakes from his comatose state and begins to get 
better, he rejoins his parents' lives, and in the process, David 
progressively loses the attention and, through a series of circumstances out 
of his control, made to look potentially dangerous. Forced to get rid of him, 
but not wanting him destroyed by the company for returning him, Monica drives 
David into the forest one day, and leaves him there alone, with only a 
mechanical, talking teddy bear as company. 
Leading up to its release, "A.I.: Artificial Intelligence" was purposefully 
advertised in an obscure manner that didn't give away much of its premise, or 
hardly any scenes from the film itself. This was the wisest choice anyone 
could have made, as "A.I." is a gloriously creative film that prospers from 
its sheer unpredictability, and constant reminder that it is not just another 
"dumb sci-fi movie," but a motion picture overflowing with exciting ideas and 
relevant themes. 
Believing that Monica will love him if only he becomes a real boy, David sets 
off to find the Blue Fairy from the fairy tale, "Pinocchio," whom he 
earnestly believes is the only one with the power to grant him his wish. On 
his journey, he meets a fellow mecha named Gigolo Joe (Jude Law), whose name 
reveals what he has been programmed to do. Joe is a cynic, but forms a bond 
with David, and consequently, helps him to accomplish his mission, even if it 
is a lost cause. It is never clear to the viewer if the Blue Fairy does 
genuinely exist, and this mystery is what fuels the entire second half of the 
film. 
Haley Joel Osment (2000's "Pay It Forward") is a revelation as David, even 
more so than in 1999's box-office smash, "The Sixth Sense," which led him to 
an Oscar nomination. At only 13-years-old, Osment's ability to convey utter 
realism and subtlety in each of his performances is remarkable, to say the 
least. This has never been so apparent as right here, in a difficult and 
complex role as a sympathetic character who is, nonetheless, not real, but a 
machine. Osment must carry the whole movie solely on his shoulders, and he 
hits every note exactly right. Simply no other child actor could have done as 
refined and impressive of a job. 
The cast that surrounds Osment is truly fine, as well. Jude Law (1999's "The 
Talented Mr. Ripley") is self-assured and appropriately cocky and cool as 
Gigolo Joe. Law  plausibly paints Joe as a person (read: robot) who is suave, 
undeniably sexy, and devoted to pleasing women. As the increasingly 
distraught, yet caring, Monica, Frances O'Connor (2000's "Bedazzled") is 
heartbreaking, particularly in the bravura sequence in which she takes David 
on a trip that she knows will only have one of them returning home. Finally, 
William Hurt (1998's "One True Thing") is emphatically low-key and memorable 
as David's inventor, Professor Hobby, who may have an ulterior motive behind 
his creation of a mecha child. 
The technical credits of "A.I." are awe-inspiring. Spielberg regular Janusz 
Kaminski's cinematography is both beautiful and understated, as is John 
Williams' unusually poetic music score. And the production design and visual 
effects, by Industrial Light & Magic, are a sight to behold. There are images 
throughout that will stick with you long after the lights in the theater have 
gone up, especially the depiction of New York City engulfed in an endless 
sea, as well as the haunting underwater creation of Coney Island. 
A tragic, if inspiring, motion picture event, there are impassioned issues 
about humanity that are brought up which will resonate with every viewer. And 
the imagination and artistry which the film has been made with is 
second-to-none. To watch "A.I.: Artificial Intelligence" is to experience a 
visually astounding and emotionally rewarding triumph that, in time, is sure 
to go down as one of the all-time brilliant achievements in modern 
moviemaking. Stanley Kubrick sure would have been proud. 
  - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman 
    http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman 

Title
Review for Princess Diaries, The (2001)
Directed by Garry Marshall. 
Cast: Anne Hathaway, Julie Andrews, Heather Matarazzo, Hector Elizondo, 
Caroline Goodall, Robert Schwartzman, Mandy Moore, Erik Von Detten, Sandra 
Oh, Kathleen Marshall, Patrick Flueger, Terry Wayne, Larry Miller. 
2001 - 115 minutes 
Rated G (nothing objectionable). 
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, August 3, 2001. 
A rare G-rated, live-action Disney movie that could have almost been filmed 
in the 1960s as a starring vehicle for Hayley Mills ("Pollyanna," "The Parent 
Trap"), Garry Marshall's "The Princess Diaries" evokes a time when so-called 
"family films" were completely harmless for all ages, as well as absent of 
bodily function humor. It's almost refreshing, really, to see a movie with no 
coarse language or objectionable material that is able to retain every bit of 
the effectiveness it might have had with a little bit of both of these things. 
15-year-old Mia Thermopolis (bright newcomer Anne Hathaway) is a 
frizzy-haired wallflower who is terrible at public speaking and isn't a part 
of the cool crowd at her private San Francisco high school. Aside from her 
infatuation with a jock classmate (Erik Von Detten), Mia is perfectly 
comfortable with her no-name existence, and even has a best friend in the 
equally unconventional Lilly (Heather Matarazzo). When her distant 
grandmother (Julie Andrews), whom she has never seen before, pays a visit, 
she discovers that she is Queen Clarisse Rinaldi of the European country of 
Genovia. Even more, as the only living heir to her now-deceased father, Mia 
is set to become Princess of Genovia. Not exactly the royal type, Mia is 
forced to endure training on how to act and look the part, and must decide 
whether she wants to extend this honor as a lifetime title by the night of an 
impending ball. 
Yet another take on the classic story of "Pygmalion," "The Princess Diaries" 
treads in well-worn territory and, thus, is neither surprising nor original. 
It is a charmer, however, and coasts on this simple quality for the entirety 
of its overlong 115-minute running time. About as innocent as a beach movie 
starring Frankie Avalon and Annette Funicello, the film is good-natured and 
sprightly, with just enough energy to also work as a particularly funny 
comedy. 
Veteran actress and singer Julie Andrews, in her first starring role in over 
a decade, may add a touch of class to the proceedings as Mia's loving 
grandmother, but it is Anne Hathaway, in her film debut, who is the real star 
of the show. Hyped by director Garry Marshall as the next Julia Roberts (who 
shot to fame herself with Marshall's 1990 romance, "Pretty Woman"), Hathaway 
has a natural talent for both physical comedy and human drama, and the 
personal issues she struggles with are realistically brought to life. A 
genuinely likable presence, Hathaway definitely has what it takes to be a 
huge star. 
Surrounding Andrews and Hathaway with varying degrees of success are a large 
supporting cast of familiar faces. Hector Elizondo (1999's "Runaway Bride" 
and Marshall regular) has a nice, little role as the Queen's tender-hearted 
limo driver, while Heather Matarazzo (best known for 1996's "Welcome to the 
Dollhouse") makes an impression as Mia's friend, Lilly. Pop singer Mandy 
Moore, as Mia's stuck-up classmate, Lana, makes Selma Blair in the recent 
"Legally Blonde" look like an absolute angel in comparison. Moore does fine 
with what she's given, and even has a fun scene in which she gets to sing, 
but her character has zero redeeming qualities. 
Where "The Princess Diaries" falters is in the mixed messages it sends out to 
viewers. After Mia's obligatory makeover scene, her long, frizzy hair is 
trimmed down and straightened, and she replaces her glasses with contacts. 
After "becoming" beautiful, her popularity at school skyrockets and she is 
meant to look more like a Princess. Mia's makeover doesn't work, because (1) 
it doesn't stay true to her character's admirable, individualistic attitudes, 
and (2) it falsely tells impressionistic young audience members what the 
word, "beautiful," is supposed to mean. This entire plot point should have 
been extracted in the early screenplay stage, and the movie would have been 
stronger for it. 
Flaws aside, "The Princess Diaries" is an enjoyably featherweight piece of 
fluff that does a good job of creating a motion picture exemplary for all age 
groups. Glossy and picturesquely photographed by Karl Walter Lindenlaub, 
painting San Francisco as a beautiful place to visit, the movie is 
entertaining, light-hearted, and maybe even a little wise. For all of its 
missteps in trying to portray what is conventionally attractive, it does have 
a lot to say about staying true to one's beliefs and dreams. Not exactly an 
innovative notion, but a good one, all the same. 

Title
Review for 15 Minutes (2001)
Directed by John Herzfeld.
Cast: Robert De Niro, Edward Burns, Karel Roden, Oleg Taktarov, Kelsey 
Grammer, Melina Kanakaredes, Vera Farmiga, Avery Brooks, John DiResta, Darius 
McCrary, James Handy, Charlize Theron, Bruce Cullen, David Alan Grier, Kim 
Cattrall.
2001 - 120 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, gore, sexual situations, and nudity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, March 10, 2001.
In today's day and age, when it seems like a progressive amount of people are 
committing extreme criminal acts in order to, at least in part, become famous 
(i.e. last week's San Diego high school shooting), writer-director John 
Herzfeld's "15 Minutes" stands as a timely, thoughtful motion picture. Taking 
a satirical, if on-the-mark, look at the outrageous lengths some people will 
go to get their fifteen minutes of fame (a term coined by Andy Warhol), as 
well as their learned savviness thanks to the media around them, the film is 
an intense, well-written thriller that, for once, has more of a purpose than 
to simply entertain. It actually has a brain in its head, and a sharply 
observed '70s-era sensibility that recalls such classic films as "The 
Parallax View," "The French Connection," and "Dog Day Afternoon."
The second that the scummy Czech immigrant Emil (Karel Roden) and Russian 
movie-lover Oleg (Oleg Taktarov) step foot into America, hell starts to break 
loose. Equipped with a snazzy video camera that Oleg steals, he and Emil set 
out on a precisely-planned, murderous rampage throughout Manhattan that 
includes stabbings, beatings, shootings, and arson to anyone they feel like 
doing it to. Their purpose is very simple: to commit enough murders to 
catapult them to the top of every media outlet in the world, intentionally 
get caught, plead that they were the subjects of physical abuse growing up, 
get acquitted, and reap in loads of money on movie and book deals.
After a fatal building fire, arson investigator Jordy Warsaw (Edward Burns) 
meets famed homicide detective Eddie Flemming (Robert De Niro), who has been 
assigned to the case. They soon team up together to investigate the string of 
killings that have begun to escalate in the city, with Eddie not knowing Oleg 
and Emil already are familiar with his celebrity, and have plans of their own 
for him.
Always involving and often exciting and downright unsettling, "15 Minutes" is 
a bravura police/media drama that has been written and directed by John 
Herzfeld (1996's "2 Days in the Valley") with a clear precision that offers 
up more than the usual glossy, mainstream grab-bag of senseless action and 
pointless violence. The picture is clever and knowing in its attitudes about 
violence in the U.S., and the effects their outcome have on the criminals 
themselves. It also has plot developments that, for once, are not easily 
predicted (including a twist at the beginning of the second half that is 
absolutely shocking), and the strengths of these, as well as the 
thought-provoking material dealt with, are able to overcome many of the 
weaknesses found in the uneven character development.
While Robert De Niro (2000's "Men of Honor") and Edward Burns (1998's "Saving 
Private Ryan") both start off with a somewhat shaky, unfocused grasp on their 
roles of Ed Flemming and Jordy Warsaw, respectively, they manage to 
strengthen the evolution of both personalities by the film's latter half. 
Burns, especially, starts off with a noticeable blandness, but somehow 
transforms along the way to the conclusion into a striking, memorable 
character. 
The stars of the film, however, are Eastern European newcomers Karel Roden 
and Oleg Taktarov, whose frightening, unhinged bad guys turn out to be the 
center of the movie. Arresting every second they are onscreen, Roden and 
Taktarov are utterly talented finds that will hopefully find more film work 
based on what they have accomplished here.
In supporting roles, Melina Kanakaredes (TV's "Providence") shows much 
promise as news reporter Nicolette Karas, who is also carrying on a romance 
with Eddie. Nicolette is not given an overly generous amount of screen time, 
but Kanakaredes makes the best of it, fleshing out her character into a 
sympathetic, realistic individual. Kelsey Grammer is okay as tabloid show 
anchor Robert Hawkins, successfully getting rid of his "Frasier" image, but 
is so one-dimensional that he spends his time making little to no impression, 
or going over-the-top. Meanwhile, Charlize Theron (2001's "Sweet November") 
makes a splashy cameo as the black-wigged worker of an escort service.
What ultimately makes "15 Minutes" such a success is its willingness to try 
novel techniques not seen in many years that throw the viewer off balance, 
making them unsure, and sometimes even a bit nervous, of what is to come 
next. Not only that, but it is one of those rare recent thrillers that 
doesn't go the easy route, nor does it present a nonsensical and exploitative 
storyline for mainstream mass consumption. "15 Minutes" actually has 
something to say, and it says it remarkably well.
   - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
     http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman
http://www.atnzone.com

Title
Review for Halloween H20: Twenty Years Later (1998)
Directed by Steve Miner.
Cast: Jamie Lee Curtis, Josh Hartnett, Michelle Williams, Jodi Lyn 
O'Keefe, Adam Hann-Byrd, LL Cool J, Adam Arkin, Nancy Stephens, Joseph 
Gordon-Levitt, Branden Williams, Janet Leigh, Emilee Thompson, Lisa Gay 
Hamilton, Chris Durand.
1998 - 82 minutes.
Rated R (for violence and profanity).
Reviewed October 27, 1998.
John Carpenter's 1978 classic "Halloween" was a masterpiece, the best 
horror film I have ever seen. I am sure no genre film of its type will 
ever surpass it, but when I heard that Jamie Lee Curtis was returning 
for a 20th-anniversary sequel, my hopes ran sky-high. I thought to 
myself, while no sequel could equal the original, it could very well be, 
for once, a truly worthy follow-up. Going into "Halloween: H20," I was 
all set to see a great horror film in the vein of the original, and with 
the talent involved, I was almost positive it wouldn't be anything less 
than superb. Well, I have now seen "Halloween: H20," and I am very 
saddened to say that the film was a disappointment.
Most people are very familiar with the original "Halloween," as it was 
about a teenage babysitter, Laurie Strode, played by Curtis, on 
Halloween night whose evil, psychotic brother went after her on 
Halloween night, thus hoping to have murdered both of his siblings.
"Halloween: H20" picks up exactly twenty years later, as Laurie Strode 
now lives under the false name of Keri Tate, has a 17-year-old son (Josh 
Hartnett), is the headmistress of a posh, exclusive private school, and 
lives every day of her life terrified that her brother, Michael Myers, 
will come back, thus hiding behind prescription drugs and alcohol. 
Laurie's fears happen to come true on Halloween night, as all of the 
children have gone on a vacation, except for Curtis' son, his 
girlfriend, Molly (Michelle Williams), and their other two friends (Adam 
Hann-Byrd, Jodi Lyn O'Keefe), leaving them, as well as Laurie's 
boyfriend (Adam Arkin) and the school security guard (LL Cool J), alone 
at the school to fend off Michael Myers, who has found out where his 
sister has been hiding all of these years.
That is the set-up for "Halloween: H20," a film that all but disregards 
Parts 4-6, which is alright with me, since they started to get off 
track, focusing on ridiculous druid claptrap. This new film also 
obviously has a larger budget, has moody, atmospheric cinematography, 
and pays homage quite cleverly to the original. Luckily, it also 
includes enough suspense for two movies, and a good amount of scares, 
most prominently in the lengthy prologue, which is flawless and 
terrifying, and could stand well on its own as a short film. The movie 
playfully 
toys with you quite a lot, especially in a creepy scene set at a 
desolate rest stop, and involving a young child and her mother...not to 
mention the man with the mask. There is another moment involving a 
garbage disposal that is absolutely nerve-racking. There is also a very 
funny small perforamance by Lisa Gay Hamilton, as LL Cool J's 
girlfriend. Although we only hear her voice on the telephone throughout, 
she is dynamite. All that I have mentioned so far is simply great. It is 
probably scarier than all of the other sequels, and is more stylish. It 
even has a sweet cameo by Janet Leigh ("Psycho"), Curtis' real-life 
mother.
But, overall "Halloween: H20" is an incredibly huge letdown. The biggest 
problem with the film, and this large quiff pretty much leads to all of 
the smaller problems, is that the movie is 82 minutes long! If the 
makers are going to take the time to bring back Curtis, not to mention 
the feel of the first one, then why did they make the movie little more 
than an hour in length? By making it so short, it seemed almost utterly 
empty. I liked all of the actors, but the characters were so slight and 
sloppily written that we didn't get to spend nearly enough time with any 
of them or learn anything about them. Even the star of the film, Curtis, 
isn't in it nearly enough. 
To make a long story short, this is what "Halloween: H20" feels like: 
the movie contains a first act and a third act, but the middle 20 
minutes are missing. It feels as if a reel was somehow lost, and that is 
truly disheartening. The picture had so much potential, so much suspense 
and scares, and...a second act that is nowhere to be found.
Another thing that is disappointing is that, aside from the first scene 
and one scene set in the town, the movie doesn't even feel like 
Halloween. By setting the movie mostly away from the town and in the 
confines of the school, we miss out on the establishing shots that have 
made the Halloween films so memorable; moments that show pumpkins 
outside of houses, and trick-or-treaters running from house to house as 
a killer lurks outside with them. That is all missing, and an incredibly 
big mistake. 
No matter how good a "Halloween" film is, they always have had that 
classic music score, and this one has it too, sort of. But aside from 
two scenes, a lot of the music doesn't sound anything like it. In fact, 
the score sounds exactly like the one from "Scream," and this is no 
surprise since the person who did that score, Marco Beltrami, also 
lended himself to perform additional music for this one. Big mistake.
"Halloween: H20" had a lot going for it, and I could praise it endlessly 
for all of the fabulous moments within, but I'd rather criticize it for 
only giving hints to how truly impressive it could have been, but 
wasn't. It is a missed opportunity. After all, why make a 
20th-anniversary sequel when it is going to have a running time less 
than most animated features? 
   - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
     Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Dudley Do-Right (1999)
Directed by Hugh Wilson.
Cast: Brendan Fraser, Sarah Jessica Parker, Alfred Molina, Eric Idle, Robert 
Prosky, Alex Rocco, Regis Philbin, Kathie Lee Gifford.
1999 - 75 minutes.
Rated PG (for cartoonish violence).
Reviewed August 28, 1999.
"From the director who saw 'George of the Jungle,'" touts the ads for 
Universal's live-action remake of the old cartoon, "Dudley Do-Right." At 
least they aren't afraid to admit it, as "Dudley Do-Right," which features 
Brendan Fraser in the title role, is almost a carbon copy of that 1997 hit, 
right up to the jokey narration (by Corey Burton) over many of the scenes. 
While I wasn't one of the supporters of "George of the Jungle," it at least 
felt like a full-length movie, while the 75-minute "Dudley Do-Right" is so 
fast-paced and determined to push on to the next scene that it never stops 
long enough for you to even grow attached to, or involved in, the characters. 
You're obviously supposed to root for Dudley to triumph, but his character 
remains nothing more than a clumsy, accident-prone doofus.
The simple story goes like this: Dudley Do-Right is a Canadian Mountie for a 
quaint town who must stop his nemesis, Snidely Whiplash (Alfred Molina), from 
stealing his main squeeze, the sprightly Nell (Sarah Jessica Parker), and 
turning Semi-Happy Valley into Whiplash City through an elaborate gold hoax. 
To tell the truth, there's not much more to it than that. Through his fight 
to win Nell over and stop the dastardly villain, Snidely, Dudley is always 
falling off of his office chair, stepping on loose floor boards that fly up 
and hit him in the face, and accidentally smashing through windows. His loyal 
horse, named Horse, is always breaking the wind and sticking out his tongue 
at Dudley, and in a goofy dream sequence, played to the song, "Reunited," 
Dudley runs up a large hill to Horse and lovingly hugs him as they 
are--yep--reunited. As I said before, there's not much story to speak of.
"Dudley Do-Right" is an ideal example of a movie that is perfectly cast, but 
otherwise is a wasted opportunity that has forgotten about its story, written 
by Wilson. It even skips right over its trademark plot point, of Nell being 
tied to the railroad tracks by Snidely as a train is coming towards her. 
Since this would be politically incorrect (insert rolling of eyes here), we 
get a similar scene early on with a banker, and an overblown, creatively 
bankrupt climax that features motorcycle and speedboat chases. I don't recall 
speedboats ever appearing prominently in the cartoon, but why question such 
things when most of today's family films show no interest in quality 
entertainment for children (just look at the easily inferior "Inspector 
Gadget"). It is only when parents show contempt for what their children watch 
("Gadget" has made approximately $85-million to date!) that studios, most 
notably Disney, will start making smart live-action family films
As already mentioned, the cast couldn't get any better than this, and the 
three principles are so very right for their roles that it's almost scary. 
Brendan Fraser, I'm afraid, should branch out a little bit more, as I fear he 
is beginning to make the same types of films over and over again, such as 
blockbusters (1999's "The Mummy"), children movies based on cartoons, and 
"fish-out-of-water" comedies (1992's "Encino Man," 1999's "Blast From the 
Past"). My advice for him is to go back to making more challenging work, such 
as 1992's "School Ties" and 1998's "Gods & Monsters," rather than taking on 
roles that are so familiar he could sleepwalk through them. Alfred Molina, 
clearly having a lot of fun, is outstanding as Snidely Whiplash, capturing 
the exact physical look and speech of his animated counterpart. Sarah Jessica 
Parker is appropriately innocent as Nell, but for someone who is 
characterized as being very intelligent, she's fairly stupid, particularly in 
being smitten by Snidely. Finally, Eric Idle gains a few laughs as the bum 
who "discovers" the gold in the town, and ends up appearing on the Regis and 
Kathie Lee talk show.
With a cast so right, how did director Wilson go so wrong? The movie is 
needlessly empty and uneven, and for every good idea (setting the story in 
the present day, even though it is filled with old-fashioned values), there 
are dozens of bad ones. No effort is made to add much originality to the 
proceedings, or give you a strong sense of Dudley or Nell or their budding 
romance. Instead, we get some action chases more appropriate for "Universal 
Soldier: The Return," and the way Dudley overcomes Snidely is ridiculous. For 
one thing, in the cartoon there's no way Dudley would have been able to 
defeat him so easily, because Snidely would always come back for another 
feud. Think of "Dudley Do-Right" as a failed movie not much longer than a 
one-hour television show, and take the kids to see "Tarzan" for the umpteenth 
time.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman.
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Josie and the Pussycats (2001)
Directed by Deborah Kaplan & Harry Elfont.
Cast: Rachael Leigh Cook, Tara Reid, Rosario Dawson, Alan Cumming, Parker 
Posey, Gabriel Mann, Missi Pyle, Paulo Costanzo, Breckin Meyer, Seth Green, 
Donald Faison, Carson Daly.
2001 - 98 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for mild profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, April 11, 2001.
"Josie and the Pussycats," writing-directing team Deborah Kaplan and Harry 
Elfont's (1998's "Can't Hardly Wait") big-screen ode to the '60s Archie comic 
and the short-lived '70s animated television show, is silly, fun, paper-thin, 
and cleverly satirical. It's not going to win any major awards (unless its 
catchy main tune, "3 Small Words," gets a much-deserved Oscar nomination come 
next year), and it doesn't quite hold up after close scrutiny, but it's 
entertaining while it lasts, which is probably what the movie's major goal 
was in the first place.
MegaRecords managing executive Wyatt Frame (Alan Cumming) and his diabolical 
boss and CEO of the company, Fiona (Parker Posey), have one goal, and one 
goal only: to hire a band and wickedly hide subliminal messages and product 
placements within their songs, brainwashing the youth of America. When DuJour 
(translation: "[soup] of the day"), MegaRecords' all-boy band of the moment, 
threatens to cause the company problems, they are quickly dispatched of. 
Fiona gives Wyatt just one day to find their "next big thing," which, by 
chance, comes in the form of three bubbly young women and aspiring musicians 
living in the peaceful town of Riverdale, who wish for nothing but to hit it 
big. Before long, Wyatt has signed The Pussycats (now known as "Josie and the 
Pussycats") to a scorching record deal, and in a week, have shot to the #1 
spot on the Billboard charts, with millions of obsessive fans around the 
world clamoring to see them perform in person. Little do starry-eyed Josie 
(Rachael Leigh Cook), densely sweet Melody (Tara Reid), and serious-minded 
Valerie (Rosario Dawson) know, their music is being used to send out mixed 
messages to those listening. 
Zippy and cute, "Josie and the Pussycats" does nothing but achieve at making 
a pitch-perfect version of the Archie comic from which it is based on. 
Everything from the bright color scheme to the fantastically off-beat 
premise, the film just oozes "comic." Luckily, there is a bit more going on 
underneath than just a direct interpretation of the source material. The cast 
has a blast with their respective roles, and the music by Josie and the 
Pussycats (lead vocals by Kay Hanley of Letters to Cleo, with backup by the 
actresses) is unpredictably--almost shockingly--good, so much so that they 
could truly-to-goodness pass for a talented real-life, all-girl, alt-rock 
group.
As Josie herself, Rachael Leigh Cook (2001's "Antitrust") shows charismatic 
promise with a front-and-center role that hasn't been equaled since her 1999 
hit, "She's All That." Tara Reid (2001's "Just Visiting") is easily the 
standout, with her Melody an absolutely endearing character who may be looked 
upon as a "ditzy blonde," but happily trudges through life always looking on 
the bright side. Reid springs Melody to life, as her character could actually 
act as a very positive role model for pre-teens and teenagers everywhere. 
Rosario Dawson (2000's "Down to You") is the weakest link of the three, but 
only because her character of Val isn't as memorable as the other two are. 
Dawson remains likable, nonetheless, and a perfectly respectable way to round 
out the trio of Pussies.
Alan Cumming, more or less replaying his character from the current "Spy 
Kids," and Parker Posey (2000's "Scream 3"), ham it up as the scheming 
villains who are hiding an added secret to themselves. Cumming is good in 
anything he's in, and Posey gets many laughs from her overtly evil, 
occasionally lisping, food-obsessed diva. In other supporting roles, Gabriel 
Mann (2000's "Cherry Falls"), as Josie's best friend and potential boyfriend, 
Alan M, is appropriately bland, as is Paulo Costanzo (2000's "Road Trip"), as 
the girls' novice agent. Meanwhile, Missi Pyle (1999's "Trick") is a comic 
delight as Costanzo's dedicated sister.
Although it is there to make a point, and does directly correlate with the 
plot, the over-the-top product placements present in "Josie and the 
Pussycats" do grow monotonous after a while. Not only do they sometimes 
distract, and detract, from the subject matter of the given scene, but they 
also feel artificial and antithetical. Sure, the movie deals with product 
placements being used as subliminal messages, but all of the companies 
(including McDonalds, Target, Tide, Colgate, MTV, Entertainment Tonight, 
Evian, Krispy Kreme, among literally hundreds of others) were sure to 
compensate the producers real well with the added promotion. In this case, 
less might have been more.
In an age of cynicism, "Josie and the Pussycats" is innocent, light-hearted, 
and charming. Perfect for children, as well as adults, the movie might not be 
free of flaws (actually, it is far from it, with an opening half-hour that 
has trouble finding its footing), but it is free of terribly risque or 
raunchy humor, which works in the film's favor. And Tara Reid's Melody 
Valentine most definitely gives us an idea of the zestful mindframe of the 
Pussycats with one of the movie's best lines: "If I could go back in time," 
she cheerily proclaims, "I would love to meet Snoopy."
 http://www.all-reviews.com/reviewers/DustinPutman.htm
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman
http://www.atnzone.com

Title
Review for Small Time Crooks (2000)
Directed by Woody Allen.
Cast: Woody Allen, Tracey Ullman, Elaine May, Hugh Grant, Tony Darrow, Michael
Rapaport, Jon Lovitz, Elaine Stritch, George Grizzard.
2000 - 95 minutes
Rated PG (for mild profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, May 22, 2000.
Woody Allen, one of the most critically admired, but publically underrated, 
filmmakers working today, makes one film a year, and almost without fail, 
they are small, but memorable and well-acted, gems. Allen has a talent for 
dialogue and getting the best out of his performers (just look at Mira 
Sorvino's brilliant, Oscar-winning turn in 1995's "Mighty Aphrodite"), and in 
his comedies, is as quick and snappy in his wordplay as they come. 
Allen's latest picture, "Small Time Crooks," is the type of sharp-witted and 
smart caper comedy that you would expect from him, similar to 1993's 
"Manhattan Murder Mystery" and 1971's "Bananas," with a hint of 1977's "Annie 
Hall" thrown in for bittersweet measure. There is always a joy that goes 
along with watching Allen's films, and a comfort, too, due to their often 
similar format, each one an obvious tribute from someone who is in love with 
the movies as much as I am.
Ray (Woody Allen) and Frenchy Winkler (Tracey Ullman) have been married for 
years, living day to day and paycheck to paycheck (he as a dishwasher, she as 
a manicurist) in their Manhattan apartment. An ex-crook who once did time for 
theft, Ray is always dreaming of the most elaborate or crazy schemes on how 
they can get more money, and while a sassy straight-shooter who tells it like 
it is, Frenchy finds herself consistently going along with his plans, no 
matter how risky, because she loves him. So when Ray tells French about his 
latest, and most dangerous, plan yet, in which they are going to buy out a 
closed-down pizza shop so they can shovel through the ground and rob the back 
next door, she quickly dismisses the idea, but soon goes along with it. 
Partnered with Tommy (Tony Darrow), former cellmate Benny (Jon Lovitz), and 
dimwitted Denny (Michael Rapaport), they plan to cut the money equally 
between them once they get to it. In the meantime, to distract the public, 
Frenchy acts as a cookie maker in the front of the shop, and unforseeably, 
her baking becomes the overnight sensation of the city.
Switch to a year later, Ray and Frenchy's bank heist plans have fallen 
through, and
instead, they have become millionaires overnight, the owners of the most 
successful
cookie franchise in the area, Sunset Cookies. But as their wealth 
dramatically rises, Frenchy yearns to become a sophisticated socialite, while 
Ray still prefers the simpler things in life. For the Winkler's, their 
relationship, and their goals in life, have become as distant as night and 
day.
The pleasure that comes from watching "Small Time Crooks" lies prominently in 
its reliably fresh screenplay. Although some may falsely accuse Woody Allen 
of making the same basic movie over and over, that is far from the truth, as 
each of his films may have the markings of himself as a filmmaker, but are 
almost consistently satisfying and creative, a refreshing retreat from 
today's increasingly boring big-budget Hollywood movies. Allen not only has a 
way with writing intelligent characters, but he gives his top-notch actors a 
chance to truly shine and prove their talent. Relatively underappreciated 
actors such as the aforementioned Sorvino, Jennifer Tilly and Chazz 
Palminteri (1994's "Bullets Over Broadway"), Kirstie Alley (1997's 
"Deconstructing Harry"), and Juliette Lewis (1992's "Husbands & Wives") have 
all been given the chance to do superb work in recent Allen endeavors.
In "Small Time Crooks," the champion performers are Tracey Ullman, as Ray's 
wife Frenchy, and Elaine May, as Frenchy's dim-bulb, sweet-natured cousin. 
Ullman (an Emmy-award winning actress for HBO's "Tracey Takes On...") conveys 
a genuine delight for acting here, and is equipped with the second central 
role, not to mention the flashiest, in the film. Her fast-tongued line 
deliveries to Allen are often hysterically funny and honest, and while 
Frenchy and Ray are involved in a rocky marriage, both she and Allen 
believably seem like two people who are in love with each other. 
As with many of Allen's actors, Elaine May deserves a Best Supporting Actress 
Oscar nomination next year for her delightful, and lovable, turn as May, who 
is brought into the action when Frenchy (May's cousin) hires her to help sell 
the cookies while Ray and his comrades sneakily dig and drill in the back, 
dead set on finding their way to the bank through the ground. Ray and Frenchy 
figure May is so ditzy that she won't realize what is going on, but when 
asked by customers about the racket in the back, she blindly tells them the 
matter-of-fact truth. A climactic scene, set at the home of a wealthy couple 
(Elaine Stritch, George Grizzard) whom Ray plans to swap a highly valuable 
jewel necklace from, and who uses May as a coverup downstairs at the party, 
gains much of its momentum not only from Allen's comic timing, but from May's 
charm and effortless comedic abilities. In the only other major role, Hugh 
Grant stars as David, a British aristocrat whom Frenchy hires to educate her 
on art and culture. 
Despite its advertising, "Small Time Crooks" is not a film about a bank heist 
(that ultimately only takes up the first half-hour of the picture), but a 
truly winning comedy about a couple whose hearts lie in their small, but 
agreeable, lives, and the journey they must go through to realize that money 
is not the key to happiness. A simple moral, to be sure, but one that fits 
comfortably within the confines of "Small Time Crooks," Allen's first motion 
picture of the 21st-century, and, no doubt, one of his brightest and sunny in 
years.

Title
Review for True Crime (1999)
Directed by Clint Eastwood.
Cast: Clint Eastwood, Isaiah Washington, Lisa Gay Hamilton, Denis Leary, 
James Woods, Diane Venora, Francesca Fisher-Eastwood, Michael Jeter, 
Mary McCormack, Frances Fisher, Lucy Alexis Liu.
1999 - 127 minutes
Rated R (for profanity and violence).
Reviewed March 21, 1999.
As with 1995's "The Bridges of Madison County" and 1997's "Midnight in 
the Garden of Good and Evil," actor-director Clint Eastwood has 
successfully adapted a well-recieved novel to the screen, this time it 
being Andrew Klavan's "True Crime." Although unread by me, this film 
version is a taut, if somewhat overstuffed, suspense-drama, that is 
worlds better than a similar Eastwood picture that was also adapted from 
a novel, 1997's "Absolute Power."
Eastwood stars as crackerjack newspaper reporter Steve Everett, a man 
pushing his late-60's who nonetheless is always getting involved with 
much younger women, and cheating on his wife, Barbara (Diane Venora). 
When a well-liked young colleague of his (Mary McCormack) is in a car 
accident after drinking-and-driving and is killed, Everett finds himself 
getting her original job of interviewing Frank Beachum (Isaiah 
Washington), a black man on death row for a crime he claims he didn't 
commit, only hours before his planned execution that night. Looking 
through the case records, Everett finds that there were two witnesses 
during the fateful day when Frank allegedly went into a convenience 
store and shot and killed the female worker there, who happened to be 
six months pregnant. One of the witnesses only saw Frank run out of the 
store, while the other walked in to only see him holding the gun, but 
neither heard the shot. While investigating the store, Everett discovers 
that the witness' story of seeing Frank with a gun was impossible since 
there was a large stand of potato chips blocking his view. Convinced 
Frank really is innocent, Everett only has a small number of hours to 
find out what actually did happen, so that Frank will be saved from his 
impending death.
As with the superior "Midnight in the Garden of Good and Evil," one of 
the delights in "True Crime" is Eastwood's, as well as screenwriters' 
Larry Gross, Paul Brickman, and Stephen Schiff, effortless handling of 
the wide array of character, from those already mentioned, to Beachum's 
grieving wife (Lisa Gay Hamilton), Everett's precocious, neglected 
daughter (Eastwood's real-life daughter, Francesca Fisher-Eastwood), and 
Everett's fast-talking editor (James Woods) and edgy co-worker (Denis 
Leary). The treasure of watching these characters is in the writing, 
which might only give some of the people a handful of scenes, but is 
able to develop each one enough so that we feel we know them. On the one 
hand, the many characters and stories swarming around occasionally 
become slightly unbelievable since the movie takes place within a 
24-hour period, but on the other hand, they are very well-done. One of 
the unexpected subplots that snuck up on me and acquired a heartbreaking 
pay-off involved Everett's rocky relationship with his wife, played by 
Venora in an assured, precise turn. All performances, in fact, are 
memorable, but the others that stand out include Washington, who doesn't 
make one false note in portraying a man terrified of dying, and yet 
knows he must be strong for his wife and daughter; Hamilton, who was 
also wonderful in last year's "Beloved"; and Michael Jeter, as one of 
the witnesses who firmly believes Beachum was holding a gun...or does 
he?
At the center of everything is Eastwood in his first screen appearance 
in two years, and he really is very good here, although I did have some 
problems with the way his sex life was portrayed. Portrayed as 
irresisitible to all women, even those still in their teenage years, 
Eastwood has significantly aged recently, looking even slightly older 
than his actual age of 68. Unlike Robert Redford, who is now in his 70's 
and still could pass for a good-looking fiftysomething, Eastwood holds 
no such scrutiny in a plot contrivance that I could have done without.
Another irksome matter, though one that might have stood out even more 
in the hands of a less-professional filmmaker, is the story itself. So 
many similar movies have been made recently about the exact same subject 
(1995's "Dead Man Walking," 1996's "Last Dance," 1996's "The Chamber") 
that there could virtually be a new film genre invented. Even if 
intelligent and effective, Eastwood might have been better off choosing 
a more original premise for a movie he was going to spend at least a 
year of his life on.
Despite its commonplace storyline and a few small qualms, "True Crime" 
is a respectable film, particularly in its unequivocal details involving 
the characters and genuinely unpredictable outcome (even though the very 
last scene didn't quite sit well with me). Clint Eastwood is a true 
craftsman, as he usually proves with each of his directing jobs, and it 
is due largely to his expertise in character and dialogue that "True 
Crime" rises above its tried-and-true plot outline.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Next Friday (2000)
Directed by Steve Carr.
Cast: Ice Cube, Mike Epps, Justin Pierce, John Witherspoon, Don "DC" Curry, 
Jacob Vargas, Lobo Sebastian, Rolando Molina, Lisa Rodriguez, Tommy "Tiny" 
Lister Jr., Kym E. Whitley, Amy Hill, Tamala Jones, Robin Allen, Michael 
Rapaport.
2000 - 93 minutes
Rated R (for profanity, sexual situations, and drug use).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, January 13, 2000.
I was spoiled last weekend when I got to see two of the best pictures of 
1999--P.T. Anderson's "Magnolia" and Scott Hicks' "Snow Falling on Cedars." 
But, you know, it's the first month of the new year, and as any "in-the-know" 
person should realize, the quality of films significantly drop with each year 
crossover. 2000 is a new millennium, to some a chance to start anew, whether 
it be concerning something minor, or even the full direction of their life. 
Could movie releases also possibly start fresh this January? Well, the rest 
of this month's upcoming films have yet to be seen by me, but 2000 has begun 
with Steve Carr's "Next Friday," the sequel to the despicably low-rent 1995 
comedy hit, "Friday." To put it in as gentle of a manner as humanly possible, 
"Next Friday" is an instant front-runner for the absolute worst motion 
picture to be unleashed upon movie screens in 2000.
If anyone should have the blame put on them, it should be Ice Cube himself, 
since it was he and some writing genius by the sophisticated name of D.J. 
Pooh, who penned the maddeningly stupid, dull, and completely unfunny 
screenplay. The fact that there are a string of great films each year that 
never get their rightful recognition because they fail to be awarded a strong 
theatrical release, and yet "products" by the name of "Next Friday" instantly 
come out on thousands of screens across the country, is not only a sad 
statement about the moviemaking business, but also one concerning the 
validity of audiences who will actually throw down the cash to see something 
as brain-numbingly inept as this. Granted, I went to see it opening night 
(with a theater fairly packed for a Wednesday evening), but at least I have 
two excuses: (1) It's sort of my duty to wade through such trash to get to 
the film gems, so I can ward readers away from the former category, and (2) I 
got in with my Hoyts 2000 Season Pass, and didn't have to pay one cent. What 
I lost, however, are 93 minutes of my precious life that I could have been 
putting to better use--you know, by getting my head smashed in with a large, 
metal hammer, or receiving refreshing root canal surgery.
Now this is only a guess, so don't hold it against me if I get it wrong, but 
I think the premise of "Next Friday" goes something like this: Craig Jones 
(Ice Cube), the pot-smoking "hero" of the film's predecessor, is still living 
at home with his father, Mr. Jones (John Witherspoon), showing no signs of 
attempting to partake in responsibility for his fully adult self, or even 
getting a job. Believing that what Craig needs is a change of atmosphere, Mr. 
Jones takes him to stay with his Uncle Elroy (Don Curry), who has recently 
won the lottery and moved to the suburbs with a much younger wife by the name 
of Suga (Kym E. Whitley). 
The rest of the movie, all of which is set on a Friday, of course, consists 
of nothing more than one occurrence happening after the next, none, or rarely 
any, of which are connected to anything else in the so-called story. There 
are two crooks from the original who have escaped from prison and have set 
out to seek revenge on Craig. Then there is a crazy pregnant woman (Tamala 
Jones) and her chubby sidekick (Robin Allen) who are out to destroy the 
belongings of Craig's cousin (Mike Epps) until he takes responsibility for 
his unborn child. Nothing comes of this subplot, by the way, and like every 
other character in the film, it is played for gratuitous laughs and no 
attempts is ever made to develop anyone beyond a broad caricature. In fact, 
'caricature' may be too kind a word to describe the zero-dimensional 
characters, all of which are so inanely vacuous that I often felt as if I was 
watching a blank, white wall that kept cussing at me, with an occasional gust 
of marijuana smoke blowing in front of my view.
I've got one question for the entire cast, crew, and studio, New Line 
Cinemas, and then I'm just leaving this movie alone forever. It's something I 
ask many films of this low, low caliber, because I am always left wondering 
it. I never get an answer, but if anyone who was involved in "Next Friday" 
happens to read this, could you please e-mail FilmFan16@aol.com and offer up 
an insightful answer? Here goes: Was there ever a minutiae of a second, 
either during preproduction, filming, or post-production, where you actually 
warped your mind into thinking that you were making a motion picture worth 
any sort of value whatsoever?
Okay, I'm through. May I never have to think about this heaping piece of 
rancid garbage for the remainder of my life--well, okay, at least until I 
write my Worst of 2000 essay next January.

Title
Review for Stepmom (1998)
"Stepmom," directed by Chris Columbus (1990's "Home Alone" and 1993's 
"Mrs. Doubtfire"), is an earnest and well-made film with, perhaps, one 
unfair flaw: It is very similar to the recent, and far superior, "One 
True Thing," starring Meryl Streep and Renee Zellweger. "One True Thing" 
was a more serious and seemingly accurate portrayal of a family coping 
with cancer, while "Stepmom" is a more sleek and "mainstream" motion 
picture. That is not to say it still isn't a marginally good film, 
however.
The film begins as Isabel (Julia Roberts), a young woman looking to be 
in her late 20's, is rushing around her house trying to get two 
children, 12-year-old Anna (Jena Malone) and 7-year-old Ben (Liam 
Aiken), off to school without much success. Before long, an older woman, 
Jackie (Susan Sarandon), shows up, and we learn that she is the 
children's actual mother, while Isabel lives with the children's father, 
Luke (Ed Harris), much to the spitefulness of Ben, and especially Anna. 
It is clear that Isabel is trying very hard to help take care of the 
children, but still has a lot to learn about parenting, and isn't helped 
very much by the uncooperation of the kids and Jackie, who obviously 
isn't too fond of Isabel, a woman whom she informs Luke, "is half his 
age." Meanwhile, as Isabel is trying to become friends with the 
children, Jackie learns that she has lymphatic cancer, and when all of 
her treatments fail to work, she decides that she has a lot of things to 
settle before she dies.
"Stepmom" follows a fairly predictable line throughout its 124-minute 
running time, but is helped immeasurably by the beautifully-done and 
touching performances from, particularly, Sarandon, Roberts, and Malone, 
a talented young actress who could very well be the next Jodie Foster 
(and, sure enough, she did play Foster as a child in 1997's "Contact"). 
The performers are so good, in fact, that they easily rise above the 
admittedly thin material and help make scene after scene their own. 
Sarandon, like always, is realistic and heartbreaking as a woman who 
realizes she has a lot of things she needs to do before the illness 
takes over her life; and Roberts gives one of her best performances to 
date, and smoothly is able to convey her character's frustration of 
becoming a second-rate parent who will never be able to equal up to the 
children's real mother. 
Through the performances and screenplay, we often do get some extremely 
well-written and intelligent scenes. Particular sequences that stand out 
include a subtle, but observant scene where Isabel helps Anna with an 
art project; Isabel gives Anna advice about some boy troubles that she 
is having; a moving scene between Jackie and Luke at a restaurant; and a 
concluding scene set during Christmas between Jackie and her children. 
In the individual moments of accuracy and truthfulness, "Stepmom" is a 
suberb and nicely-drawn drama, but, unfortunately, there are a couple 
noticable problems.
For one, Isabel might be too ideal of a girlfriend and substitute 
parent. Scene after scene, we are shown how hard and diligently Isabel 
is working to care for Anna and Ben, but we are not really given a 
reason why this is. We are supposed to believe it is because Isabel 
truly loves Luke, but he is often out of the picture for long stretches 
of time, so much so that I found it hard to accept, later in the film, 
when one character observes how great of a parent he is. Meanwhile, 
sitting back watching the picture, I was thinking to myself that if he 
was such a "great" parent, why was he never watching his kids? The flaws 
of the Luke character come from that particular weak area in the script, 
and should not be blamed on Ed Harris, who is nonetheless good in the 
film, even if he is stuck with a largely underwritten role. Another 
problem, but to a lesser extent, are some subplots that are brought up 
but not resolved in any way, such as when Isabel is fired from her job 
as a photographer.
Even after taking into consideration the film's many missteps, "Stepmom" 
still remains a worthwhile and honest drama that is able to portray the 
many dilemmas a family often must go through. While a few moments seemed 
to strain for melodrama, they were able to look like prime examples of 
unstrained subtlety compared to a film opening on the same exact day, 
"Patch Adams," which was shameless in its quest for "heartwarming" 
(read: superficial) emotions. As said before, "Stepmom" is nowhere near 
as strong as "One True Thing," but the several top-notch performances and 
scenes were able to raise it above the level of mediocrity.
           - Copyright 1998 by Dustin Putman
             Dustin
Putman's Film Reviews >

Title
Review for Instinct (1999)
Directed by Jon Turteltaub.
Cast: Cuba Gooding Jr., Anthony Hopkins, Maura Tierney, Donald 
Sutherland, George Dzundza, John Aylward, John Ashton.
1999 - 126 minutes
Rated R (for violence and profanity).
Reviewed June 6, 1999.
So the theatrical trailer set the film up to be an exciting thriller, 
when in actuality it is a deliberately-paced prison drama. I can live 
with this deceivement, of course, because motion picture trailers 
falsely advertise all the time (remember how 1998's marvelous "Rushmore" 
was billed as a crazy, lowbrow, madcap comedy?). What is an outrage, 
however, is how director Jon Turteltaub's "Instinct" is a direct rip-off 
of hundreds of other movies, and not even a passable one at that, as it 
piles on such thick, nauseating layers of weepy, unbelievable melodrama 
when, judging from the overall premise, we should be on the edge of our 
seats. Do not put the blame on the actors for this film's failings, 
although they all should have known better. No, the culprits of 
"Instinct" are Turteltaub, whose direction is flat and emotionless (even 
though, strangely enough, the characters all wear their caricaturized 
emotions on their sleeves), and screenwriter Gerald DiPego, adapting 
from the 1992 novel, "Ishmael," by Daniel Quinn, who apparently has no 
idea how to construct interesting or stimulating dialogue. If anything, 
DiPego does have the non-virtue of corniness down pat.
"Instinct" begins as dedicated primatologist Ethan Powell (Anthony 
Hopkins) is being transported to the run-down Harmony Bay Correctional 
Facility, following a 2-year disappearance within the jungles of Rwanda, 
where he lived with the apes, and the animalistic murders of two park 
rangers. Enter novice psychiatrist Theo Caulder (Cuba Gooding Jr.), who 
is assigned to take on the case by his mentor, Dr. Ben Hillard (Donald 
Sutherland), and travel down to Harmony Bay to speak with Powell, who 
has since stopped talking and obtained a nasty temper, to put it mildly. 
After arriving, Caulder is almost instantly repulsed by the way the 
inmates are treated by the prison warden (John Aylward) and guards, 
being shocked or severely beaten simply for looking at their superiors 
crossway. After their first few meetings, Powell surprisingly begins to 
talk again, discussing his tranquil experiences among the apes of the 
Rwanda jungles, as well as his apprehension to reunite with his loving 
daughter (Maura Tierney), whom he feels he has drifted too far from for 
their relationship to be salvaged. There's really not much more to 
discuss story-wise, since the majority of the running time is dedicated 
to endless babbling between Caulder and Powell, neither of whom have 
anything worthwhile to say to each other.
"Instinct" is a strange film, indeed. On one end is the relationship 
that forms between Powell and Caulder. Many viewers have compared this 
film to "The Silence of Lambs," but they have very few similarities, 
even though Powell is supposed to be a killer, and the performance by 
Hopkins is very different than that of Hannibal Lecter. As Caulder 
learns more and more about why Powell was lead to murder after his 
beloved apes began to be hunted, we are supposed to believe that Caulder 
has a life-changing transformation. This aspect of the film is about as 
easy to swallow as a chicken bone, and when Caulder tells Powell in the 
groan-inducing climax that he has been "saved," I didn't believe it for 
a second. For one, how can audiences understand how Caulder has been 
saved when throughout the film, the only thing we learn about him is 
that he is a young psychiatrist. Do we learn about his past? His family? 
No. Apparently he has no actual life outside of his profession, and it 
is this problem that thoroughly peeves me. Why exactly is it that in the 
majority of films about lawyers or psychiatrists, we are never allowed 
to learn anything about them? Are screenwriters so lazy, or clueless, in 
today's times to write at least a few scenes in which we actually get to 
know the characters? I guess so. And the sight of Caulder late in the 
film, with his arms outstretched in the middle of a rainstorm, is 
blatant plagarism of 1994's somewhat similar prison drama, "The 
Shawshank Redemption."
Unexpectedly, about half of the running time is actually dedicated to 
the way the one-dimensional guards and warden abuse the inmates which, I 
guess, is a direct ode to "One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest." This 
subplot is written in such a heavy-handed, manipulative manner that we 
are even pushed to suffer through an "uplifting" riot scene, headed by 
Caulder, who wants to overthrow the unjust way in which the inmates are 
chosen to go outside each day (it is done by giving out playing cards, 
and the winner is the holder of the ace of diamonds). As everyone begins 
to chant the same triumphant thing in unison, one at a time they tear up 
their cards and through them to the floor. This is peeve #2 in the 
annals of syrupy moviemaking.
Finally, the third section of the film, which is given the least amount 
of time but is the only bearable one, deals with Powell's neglected 
daughter. A possible romance is brought up briefly between Caulder and 
she, but it is quickly dropped, leaving me to wonder why the whole scene 
wasn't simply cut out. This subplot does mildly work, nonetheless, 
mainly because of Maura Tierney's touching performance and it holds the 
best scene in the film, the inevitable reunion between father and 
daughter.
Aside from the disasterous writing and directing, "Instinct" has its 
fair share of other problems, as well, beginning with the painfully 
overlong 2-hour-plus running time, about fifteen minutes of which is 
unnecessarily dedicated to Powell sitting around in the jungle with the 
apes. Speaking of the scenes set in the Rwandan jungles, it is so poorly 
shot, and the cinematography, by Philippe Rousselot, so insipid, that it 
more or less could have been filmed in the woods right next to my house. 
The usually reliable composer Danny Elfman (long-time collaborator with 
Tim Burton) also has struck out this time with a generic, forgettable 
music score.
With a film headed by talented performers Anthony Hopkins and Cuba 
Gooding Jr., you are ultimately led to believe that there will be at 
least some source of worthwhile material. Not this time. "Instinct" is a 
consistently dull, meandering motion picture that is never anything more 
than difficult to sit through and cannot be salvaged by the relatively 
unextraordinary performances of Gooding Jr. and Hopkins. About 25% of 
the audience I was with got up and left even before the end credits 
appeared. They had the right idea.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Deuce Bigalow: Male Gigolo (1999)
Directed by Mike Mitchell.
Cast: Rob Schneider, Arija Bareikis, William Forsythe, Eddie Griffin, Oded 
Fehr, Gail O'Grady, Richard Riehle, Jacqueline Obradors, Big Boy, Amy 
Poehler, Dina Platias, Torsten Voges, Deborah Lemen, Bree Tucker, Andrew 
Shaifer, Norm Macdonald, Marlo Thomas.
1999 - 88 minutes
Rated R (for profanity, sexual situations, and extreme scatological humor).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, December 12, 1999.
At first appearance, "Deuce Bigalow: Male Gigolo" might seem akin to the 
(dis)likes of "Ace Ventura: Pet Detective" or, even more horrifying, a Pauly 
Shore movie. Executive produced by Adam Sandler and starring his good pal and 
SNL alum Rob Schneider, this politically incorrect and relatively 
good-natured comedy pleasantly surprises for a number of reasons, and comes 
off being one of the funniest films of the year.
In its story of fish tank cleaner Deuce Bigalow (Rob Schneider) and the turn 
of fate that causes him to take over the profession of Antoine Laconte (Oded 
Fehr), a gigolo, in order to make quick cash to pay for the extreme damages 
that are accidentally inflicted upon his home, there is ample opportunity for 
comedic situations, and screenwriters Harris Goldberg and Rob Schneider are 
up to the challenge. Occasionally snappy dialogue and, especially, an 
overabundance of clearly lowbrow, yet insufferably humorous, physical comedy, 
help to give the picture a breezy, entertaining pace.
While the film's myriad jokes target everyone from the obese, to the tall, to 
the blind, to those with Tourette's Syndrome and Narcolepsy, it never seems 
downright mean because there are lessons that are learned and the characters 
are mostly likable people. All of Deuce's clients, it seems, have some sort 
of shortcoming, and although the aforementioned groups are featured at the 
expense of some tasteless humor, the characters still, strangely, keep away 
from being cartoonish with no purpose but to be laughed at. For example, the 
young woman Deuce takes out who has Tourette's (Amy Poehler), is very funny, 
as she uncontrollably yells profanities at random, but it turns out to 
develop a kinder edge when they go to a baseball game and, in his attempt to 
not make her feel out of place, tries to incorporate her profanities into 
their discussion of the ball players.
Amid all of the silliness, a genuinely sweet romance develops between Deuce 
and recent college graduate Kate (Arija Bareikis). Originally hired to take 
her out, posing as a blind date, but then unintentionally falling head over 
heels for her, problems arise when Kate discovers Deuce has been lying to 
her. One of the more sensitive aspects of this subplot is in its treatment of 
Kate, who turns out to have an artificial leg. Instead of only being played 
for laughs, Deuce is easily able to overlook such a thing, as he nonetheless 
sees her otherwise inner and outer beauty. Arija Bareikis (1997's "The Myth 
of Fingerprints"), as Kate, is a sparkling presence onscreen, and in many 
ways, this romance that is played out against the backdrop of occasional 
gross-out humor, is reminiscent of 1998's "There's Something About Mary." 
While the latter picture was overhyped, and thus, was a disappointment, 
"Deuce Bigalow: Male Gigolo," surpasses all expectations for its usually 
disreputable genre, and is almost consistently funny from start to finish. 
As in most comedies of this ilk, there is a little excessiveness in some of 
the humor, and not every joke works. Accordingly, the film is light in tone 
and its message is sophomorically simple-minded, but it somehow works. More 
than anything, "Deuce Bigalow: Male Gigolo" has arrived at a time when 
theaters are currently being overrun by serious films vying for Oscar 
statuettes, and it was nice to finally see a movie that isn't 3 hours long 
and requires a strong train of thought to process. Director Mike Mitchell 
shows a spark for filming comedic setpieces, and Rob Schneider acts as an 
enjoyable protagonist, not overly annoying or imbecilic, and someone that we 
are willing to follow throughout the story. "Deuce Bigalow: Male Gigolo" may 
not be a masterpiece, but it has no aspirations to be. It is simply a very 
funny comedy--no more, no less--and sometimes, that is enough.

Title
Review for Joe Dirt (2001)
Directed by Dennie Gordon.
Cast: David Spade, Brittany Daniel, Dennis Miller, Adam Beach, Christopher 
Walken, Rosanna Arquette, Jaime Pressly, Kid Rock, Erik Per Sullivan, 
Caroline Aaron.
2001 - 92 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, April 11, 2001.
"Joe Dirt" is woefully unfunny. Directed by television alum Dennie Gordon (in 
his feature film debut) and executive-produced by Adam Sandler, it is another 
halfhearted attempt to inundate audiences with bathroom humor and dog-humping 
jokes. The only problem is, these jokes are, by now, getting moldier than 
three-month-old bread, and it has a watered-down PG-13 rating. Every physical 
joke and every line of dialogue that is supposed to be humorous are both 
predictable and boring. I didn't laugh, or lightly chuckle, or even smile, 
once throughout the duration of "Joe Dirt," and it takes a really, really bad 
comedy to achieve such a dubious feat.
Joe Dirt (David Spade) is a radio station janitor in Los Angeles with a 
cheesy mullet hairdo straight out of the '70s. Living in the building's 
boiler room, lightning strikes one day when he finds himself on the air with 
"tell-it-like-it-is" radio personality Zander Kelly (Dennis Miller), 
unspinning his fascinating life story, from the moment when he was abandoned 
by his trailer trash parents at the Grand Canyon when he was eight, up until 
the present day, circa twenty years later. Passed along from one wacky foster 
family to the next as a child, Joe has spent his adult years desperately 
searching for the whereabouts of his parents, who have seemingly vanished 
into thin air. Amidst it all, he lost touch with the one person who ever 
really cared about him, Brandy (Brittany Daniel), a fetching young woman who 
is about to marry the oily Robby (Kid Rock) by default.
An uninspired road-movie-cum-love-story, "Joe Dirt" leaps from one comic 
setup to the next, without any actual care for the story at hand, or the fact 
that the comedy is D.O.A. David Spade (1999's "Lost & Found"), who also acts 
as co-writer to the episodic screenplay, can be a charming performer, but he 
tries too hard here to be like fellow comedians Adam Sandler and Rob 
Schneider. In the process, he flounders in a story that would be above the 
most listless actor in Hollywood.
Cameos are prevalent, perhaps to make up for the lacking material, as they 
include everyone from Christopher Walken (what is he doing her?), to rapper 
Kid Rock, to Rosanna Arquette. The only person who permeates any sort of 
cinematic screen presence is Brittany Daniel (a former recurring actor on 
TV's "Dawson's Creek"), as the sweet Brandy, who makes for an attractive love 
interest. Daniel's scenes, and one admittedly clever vignette in which Joe is 
captured and put into a well by a cross-dressing serial killer with a 
white-haired poodle, a 'la "The Silence of the Lambs," are the only elements 
that raise "Joe Dirt" above being utterly worthless. The classic rock 
soundtrack, including Blue Oyster Cult's "Burnin' for You" and Bachman 
Turner-Overdrive's "You Ain't Seen Nothing Yet," isn't bad, either.
There are so many things wrong with "Joe Dirt," however, that these passing 
bright spots are only cause for cursory interest. The whole of the film is 
birdbrained and silly, and doesn't work for a second. Likewise, director 
Dennie Gordon shows no flair for filmmaking, unable to set up even the most 
simple jokes for an acceptable payoff. "Joe Dirt" aspires to be the next 
"Deuce Bigalow: Male Gigolo" or "Dumb & Dumber," but it ends up landing 
closer in quality to "Billy Madison" and "Black Sheep."
 http://www.all-reviews.com/reviewers/DustinPutman.htm
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman
http://www.atnzone.com
--part1_83.98b5acf.28061539_boundary

Title
Review for Lara Croft: Tomb Raider (2001)
Directed by Simon West. 
Cast: Angelina Jolie, Daniel Craig, Iain Glen, Chris Barrie, Noah Taylor, Jon 
Voight. 
2001 - 98 minutes 
Rated PG-13 (for violence, profanity, and brief nudity). 
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, June 16, 2001. 
It has been said that no motion picture based on a video game can be any 
good, because to watch a movie with live-action characters and surroundings 
isn't even remotely the same, or as satisfying, as directly interacting with 
their digital counterparts. With 1995's "Mortal Kombat" being the only 
feature film I can think of to break the video-game-to-movie curse, "Lara 
Croft: Tomb Raider," drearily directed by Simon West (1997's "Con Air"), has 
no such luck. 
This latest potential summer blockbuster has a lot riding on it; not only 
could the movie catapult Academy Award Winner Angelina Jolie (1999's "Girl, 
Interrupted") to superstar status, but it could be the first in a potential 
big-screen series. Never having played the video game, but with a brother who 
is a fan, he couldn't have summed it up better as we left the theater: "Aside 
from a few of the action scenes, the rest of the movie is sleep-inducing." 
Rarely has such a big-budget action movie been as utterly boring as "Tomb 
Raider" is. 
Lara Croft (Angelina Jolie) is a tomb raider (whatever that is) who lives in 
an 85-bedroom mansion, complete with a servant, an assistant (Noah Taylor), 
and a pet robot, passed down to her from her deceased father, Lord Croft 
(Jolie's real-life dad Jon Voight). Just as all nine planets are about to 
align (an occurrence, we learn, that only happens every 5,000 years), Lara 
stumbles upon a clock her beloved father hid in the house that holds half of 
the key to taking control of time. The other part--a Triangle of Light broken 
into two pieces--has been hidden on opposite sides of the earth, something 
that the evil Manfred Powell (Iain Glen) has set out to locate in time for 
the eclipse. With not much time remaining, Lara ventures off after Powell and 
his henchmen, determined to do her dear dad proud. 
The convoluted plotting of "Lara Croft: Tomb Raider" doesn't make a whole lot 
of sense, but that wouldn't matter if the movie was at least absorbing and 
exciting. It isn't, however, so what we get is a slow-moving snoozer that 
features so much dull exposition it hardly has time for what the viewer has 
come for--action. At 98 minutes, the film feels as if it is well over two 
hours, with little of interest occurring at any point. In their attempt to 
explain who Lara Croft is for the uninitiated, screenwriters Patrick Massett 
and John Zinman spend far too much time setting things up, and even then, we 
still don't get a true idea of what makes Lara tick. 
Angelina Jolie is physically perfect for the coveted role of Lara Croft, but 
as a person, she is nothing more than a blank slate. Jolie has been a 
terrific actress in the past, and even has an Oscar to prove it, but she 
isn't able to give us an idea of who her character is, or why we should even 
like or care about her. Aside from the fact that her father died and she is 
crafty with weapons and fighting, Lara is an uninteresting, underdeveloped 
presence, and the part gets no help from Jolie. Though no fault of the 
actress, one other problem with Lara is, funnily enough, her breasts. At 
almost no point throughout do they ever look remotely real, and for Jolie's 
body frame, they are humorously too large and stand directly out, rather than 
naturally slope downward. I mention this minor criticism because Jolie's fake 
breasts serve no purpose for either her character or the movie; they're 
merely exploitive. 
"Tomb Raider" has two good scenes amidst the creative dead zone that 
surrounds them. One involves stone statues coming to life in a tomb, which 
Lara has to fight off, and the other is the climactic action sequence set in 
a snowy cave, which is appropriately taut and well-shot. They not only hint 
at the thrilling movie this could have been, but expose the other lifeless 75 
minutes for what they truly are: a waste of time. 
  - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman 
    http://us.imdb.com/reviewsby?Dustin+Putman
http://www.all-reviews.com/reviewers/dustinputman.htm
http://www.atnzone.com 

Title
Review for Beautiful (2000)
Directed by Sally Field.
Cast: Minnie Driver, Hallie Kate Eisenberg, Joey Lauren Adams, Colleen 
Rennison, Leslie Stefanson, Bridgette L. Wilson, Kathleen Robertson, Kathleen 
Turner, Linda Hart.
2000 - 113 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, September 30, 2000.
Some people, no matter what they look like or who they are, have the 
incessant urge to always succeed, whatever the cost. Such is the case with 
26-year-old Mona Hibbard (Minnie Driver), who has been practicing for the 
Miss American Miss pageant ever since she was 8. With her pretty, but 
unconventional looks, she has rarely won any of the contests she has entered, 
even going as far as sabotaging other contestants' routines simply to give 
her a better chance at winning. Growing up in a lower-class household with a 
white-trash mother and no-good stepfather, Mona hasn't exactly gotten the 
love that she has wanted, but who could blame the people around her when she 
is such a self-centered person herself?
At 19, Mona had a child out of wedlock, and instead of caring for her 
daughter, Vanessa (played at age 7 by Hallie Kate Eisenberg), her best friend 
Ruby (Joey Lauren Adams) has taken over as surrogate mother, unbeknownst to 
most people. The resemblance between Mona and Vanessa is uncanny to many, but 
they manage to brush such things off, as Mona remains to her daughter simply 
her "mother's" obnoxious best friend.
After winning Miss Illinois at the state competition, Mona finally has come 
thisclose to fulfilling her dream, being eligible for the Miss American Miss 
pageant. But then an unforeseen event strikes, and Mona, somewhat of a child 
herself, finds herself having to take care of Vanessa by herself, including 
taking her to the competition, despite mothers not being allowed to be 
runners in the contest.
"Beautiful," the feature film directorial debut of Sally Field, is, like Mona 
Hibbard, an unconventional comedy-drama that is surprisingly biting in its 
treatment of the central character, who is often distasteful and conceited. 
In an average film on the same subject, Mona would be presented as far more 
sympathetic just so she could be more likable for mainstream audiences, but 
director Field and screenwriter Jon Bernstein hold nothing back in showing 
how reprehensible someone can be simply to achieve a decidedly petty goal. 
As Mona, the talented Minnie Driver (2000's "Return to Me") perfectly creates 
this person who is unknowingly a monster on the outside, a side effect of 
never experiencing love and compassion before in her own family. Mona is not 
always likable, but there are very few actresses who could aid as a bridge 
between such a difficult character and the viewer, and Driver is luckily one 
of them. Moreover, as the film progresses and she begins to experience what 
she has missed by having her sights set on only one thing, Mona gradually 
does become more compassionate, and the catharsis she finally has is 
effectively done in the climax.
Best known as the Pepsi girl who imitates the likes of Aretha Franklin and 
Ray Charles, young Hallie Kate Eisenberg (1999's "Bicentennial Man") is very 
good and thankfully not unctuous as the strong-willed, confused Vanessa, who 
Mona discovers possesses many of the same traits she did as a child. 
Eisenberg and Driver work well together, and the familial relation between 
the two is believable. Meanwhile, Joey Lauren Adams (1997's "Chasing Amy") is 
her usual impressive self, even when her character's motivations are a little 
fuzzy and you unavoidably question why she would stay friends with someone 
like Mona for all these years.
In supporting roles, Leslie Stefanson (1999's "The General's Daughter"), 
while doing a professional job, is more of an annoyance than an interesting 
character, as a news reporter out to expose the many unwholesome things Mona 
has done over the years. Kathleen Turner is even more wasted as beauty 
pageant expert Verna Chickles, and it is unfortunate to see her return to 
such a throwaway role after her wonderful work in this year's best film (so 
far), "The Virgin Suicides." As fellow Miss American Miss contestants, both 
Bridgette L. Wilson (1999's "House on Haunted Hill," but when did she start 
getting credited with the middle initial?) and Kathleen Robertson (1999's 
"Splendor") are surprisingly memorable, as a poignant twist in the story's 
conclusion exposes both of them as being exactly like Mona, something she 
herself fears.
Along with some extremely funny moments and the occasional insightful 
character moments, "Beautiful" is an entertaining, if flawed, motion picture 
all the way up until the disastrous final five minutes, which turn up the 
self-appreciation and cheeseball meters so high that it becomes sickening. 
The sudden shift in tones in that last stretch of running time is both 
jarringly and seemingly out of another movie altogether, and it largely 
undermines the integrity of the film as a whole. "Beautiful" is the type of 
movie whose basics have been traveled many times before, but it is done well 
for the most part. Its successfulness in the first 105 minutes only makes its 
stay of execution in the finale all the more depressing.

Title
Review for Little Bit of Soul, A (1998)
Directed by Peter Duncan.
Cast: David Wenham, Frances O'Connor, Geoffrey Rush, Heather Mitchell.
1999 - 84 minutes
Not Rated (equivalent of an R for mild profanity, sexual situations, and 
blood).
Opens 8/6/99 (limited release).
Reviewed July 21, 1999.
"A Little Bit of Soul," an Australian film, directed by Peter Duncan (1997's 
"Children of the Revolution"), is about as crazy as a mental patient and just 
about as painful as poking your eyeballs out with a sharp scalpel. What 
starts off as a subdued comedy takes an unforeseen downward turn south (in 
more ways than one; think about it) and becomes a preposterous, asinine 
horror movie (also, in more ways than one) that is about as subtle as a 
freight train crashing into your house.
As the film opens, a down-on-his-luck scientist, Dr. Richard Shorkinghorn 
(David Wenham), who believes he has discovered the key to stopping the aging 
process based on experiments with chickens, is invited for the weekend to the 
home of Grace Michael (Heather Mitchell), of the Michael Foundation, for 
potential funding. Once Richard arrives, he is discouraged to find that his 
ex-girlfriend and ex-research assistant, Kate (Frances O'Connor), has also 
been invited for the weekend, and whoever convinces Grace the most 
successfully will be the one who receives the money. Also present at Grace's 
country house is her evidently twisted husband, Godfrey Usher (Geoffrey 
Rush). The weekend grows more and more curious after one of their other 
guests is found dead in the bathroom, of an apparently very bloody suicide. 
Predict all you want to what's going on with Grace and Godfrey, but you are 
never going to figure it out.
The twist that comes midway through "A Little Bit of Soul" is so inanely 
far-fetched and loony that the only excuse for the movie's ludicrous nature 
is that director Peter Duncan was taken over by an escapee from an insane 
asylum. Either that, or...you get the picture. One of the most confusing 
things about the film is the question of what genre the movie belongs in. As 
the press release makes note, is it supposed to be a "Howard Hawksian 30's 
comedy," a bloody horror movie, or something in between? The problem is, the 
movie has all of two laughs with the rest just posing as an embarrassment for 
the good actors, and the movie is more imbecilic than scary. One thing's for 
sure: after the first 45 minutes, the film unplants itself so loosely from 
reality that it definitely transforms itself into a sort of dark fantasy. 
Make that a dark fantasy without an ounce of sense or vacant thought.
Scene after scene, the four actors run around trying to add energy or an air 
of "knowing" ridicule to compensate for their foolish decision to star in the 
film to begin with. Of the thespians, Geoffrey Rush turned in a star-making, 
Oscar-nominated performance in 1996's "Shine" before wasting his time since 
in numerous inferior roles that do not do justice to his talent. Frances 
O'Connor (1997's "Kiss or Kill") is the standout here, if there is one, but 
only because she is such a fresh face that I felt bad watching her and 
everyone else destroy their careers just a little bit more with this turkey. 
David Wenham, the main actor in the piece, is a dull presence and seriously 
miscast, considering that both female characters are supposed to lust after 
him even though he could put an insomniac to sleep and has no distinctive 
physical features. And Heather Mitchell, who I don't believe I've seen 
before, may be a fine actress, but you can't tell it with this role. The big 
mystery regarding the cast is how they would even consider making such a 
lame-brained movie in the first place, especially when none of them have a 
challenging character to work with. The only challenge they apparently had 
with this film is trying not to look like a bunch of morons.
So what exactly was director Duncan's purpose for making "A Little Bit of 
Soul?" Is there any sort of point to be made about anything, or an actual 
purpose for the wacky "twist" that he has in store for the (unlucky) viewers 
who may stumble into a theater playing this? Even the superb music by Ted 
Hawkins and Louis Armstrong is poorly-used, as it appears in practically 
every scene to the point of annoyance, and is clearly trying to cover up the 
story flaws. "A Little Bit of Soul" has sat on the shelf for close to three 
years awaiting release in the U.S., and after viewing the film, I now know 
why. There is, frankly, no good reason that this ill-conceived movie ever 
needed to be made.
      - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
        Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Next Best Thing, The (2000)
Directed by John Schlesinger.
Cast: Rupert Everett, Madonna, Benjamin Bratt, Malcolm Stumpf, Michael 
Vartan, Lynn Redgrave, Josef Sommer, Neil Patrick Harris, Illeana Douglas, 
Stacy Edwards.
2000 - 107 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and brief partial nudity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, March 4, 2000.
If "The Next Best Thing" had come out prior to 1998's remarkably similar "The 
Object of My Affection," it still wouldn't be a good film, but in comparison 
with that picture's thoughtful nature, smart writing, and intelligence, it 
especially flounders. On nearly every level, "The Next Best Thing" is an 
inferior piece of work, which is all the more surprising considering the film 
feels like a recent film school graduate is at the helm making his debut, 
rather than Academy Award winning director John Schlesinger (1969's "Midnight 
Cowboy"). Calamitously moving at a snail's pace, apparently edited by an 
octogenarian, and with more amateurish performances than usual in a studio 
picture, "The Next Best Thing" is bad filmmaking.
Abbie Reynolds (Madonna) is a single yoga instructor approaching 40, and who 
still hasn't found that special someone in her life. She wants to have a 
child, but feels that it should only be something to share with that person 
she loves. As usual when anything happens to her, after being dumped yet 
again by her sometimes boyfriend Kevin (Michael Vartan), she seeks solace in 
her very best friend, Robert (Rupert Everett), a gardener. Robert is the most 
wonderful, most understanding man Abbie knows, and it is sensed that they 
would be perfect for one another if not for him being gay.
Following the funeral of one of their close friends, who has died of AIDS, 
Robert and Abbie decide to spend the night together to keep each other 
company, but in the process consume just a little too much alcohol, have sex, 
and in a few weeks, like clockwork, Abbie discovers she is pregnant. He very 
much wants to be a father to the child, so Robert and Abbie move in together 
and decide to live platonically, thus providing a healthy family life. 
Switch forward six years, their son, Sam (Malcolm Stumpf), is a caring, happy 
young boy, and Abbie and Robert have been able to maintain their pact. Then a 
complication arises: Abbie meets Ben (Benjamin Bratt), in California from New 
York City on business, and they instantly hit it off. With a new man in 
Abbie's life, Robert begins to sense that their happy existence together, 
thus far, is about to come to an end.
The premise for "The Next Best Thing" sounds amiable enough for it to likely 
be an enjoyable film, but so much of it is flawed, or a missed opportunity, 
that it is amazing the people involved in its making didn't realize there 
needed to be some serious changes, both in the sloppily underwritten and flat 
screenplay, by Thomas Ropelewski, as well as in the basic filmmaking 
approach, which is unprofessional at best.
The first hour, which is about as alive as a three-day-old corpse, does not 
move as much as it slinks depressingly slow across the ground. You sit there, 
watching as one misdirected scene after the next shows up on the screen, and 
you long for something substantial, or at least vaguely interesting, to arise 
from the proceedings. 
Sitting through the opening sixty minutes is one of the biggest endurance 
tests in a film so far this year.
Once the action moves to the present day, when Sam is 6-years-old, things 
thankfully become more tolerable. The light, yet painfully dull, tone of the 
first half is replaced by more serious matters, including a vicious custody 
battle that ultimately leaves Abbie and Robert on opposing sides. Issues of 
fatherhood, biology, and the bearing that homosexuality does, or does not, 
have on caring for a child, are touched upon, and while this section of the 
picture works somewhat, it is all thanks to Rupert Everett's powerhouse 
performance. You feel the pain and betrayal that Robert is feeling, thanks to 
Everett's realistic portrayal, and therefore, you end up finding yourself 
rooting for him, and getting involved in how everything will turn out for him.
Less appealing is Abbie. This is the sole case, however, in which it is not 
the writing that should be put to blame, but the actress. Whereas Madonna was 
exceptionally vibrant in 1996's "Evita," here she is surprisingly stiff, 
delivering her lines in a stilted manner that does not feel real, and suffers 
noticeably more when sharing scenes alongside the vastly more talented 
Everett. If there is a bright side, it is that as the film progresses, 
gradually so does Madonna's performance. That is not to say, though, that she 
is ever good.
All supporting players either try valiantly, or don't know what to do when 
given such unsatisfying roles. Benjamin Bratt is not written as the "bad 
guy," but as a compassionate man who sympathizes with Robert, and he equips 
himself nicely. Lynn Redgrave is warm and memorable as Robert's mother, but 
she has very little time to create a well-rounded character, and ultimately 
never gets to. Likewise for Neil Patrick Harris, as one of Robert's gay 
friends who is given an AIDS subplot that is so undernourished one wonders 
why it was even included in the film. There is no payoff, and it adds nothing 
to the central storyline. As Sam, Malcolm Stumpf may be one of the few kid 
actors in recent memory who didn't drive me up the wall, and his performance 
was stronger and more assured than even Madonna's. Finally, the usually 
reliable Illeana Douglas, as Robert's attorney, is so unconvincing that it 
seems as if she is doing nothing more than playing dress-up.
Characters and minor plotlines are brought up and dropped without a moment's 
pause throughout, while Robert and Abbie remain the star attractions. 
Unfortunately, Everett is the only individual who makes us care about the 
fate of the story, and without him, the film would be even more of a failure. 
As is, "The Next Best Thing" is a depressing, lugubrious film experience, and 
Everett deserves much better.

Title
Review for Shrek (2001)
Directed by Andrew Adamson, Vicky Jenson.
Voices: Mike Myers, Eddie Murphy, Cameron Diaz, John Lithgow.
2001 - 89 minutes
Rated PG (for mild language).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, May 19, 2001.
A world in which all fairy tale creatures co-habitate with humans, Shrek 
(Mike Myers) is a lonely, green ogre whom everyone fears. Living in a quaint 
cottage by a swamp, he is distressed to discover that the fairy tale 
creatures, including the Big Bad Wolf, the Three Little Pigs, The Three 
Bears, the Three Blind Mice, and Pinocchio, have all been rounded up in his 
backyard, under the direct orders of Lord Farquaad (John Lithgow). In an 
attempt to get his land back, Shrek journeys to the theme park-like castle in 
the town of Duloc to talk to Lord Farquaad, with blabbermouth Donkey (Eddie 
Murphy) in tow. Since Lord Farquaad can't become King until he marries a 
princess, he agrees to give Shrek his land back, in exchange for rescuing the 
feisty Princess Fiona (Cameron Diaz), who is locked away in another castle, 
guarded by a fire-breathing dragon, and bringing her back to him.
The second computer-generated animated film from Dreamworks (with the first 
being the disappointing 1998 movie, "Antz"), "Shrek" is a dazzling display of 
creative artistry and sheer imagination. With animated characters never 
looking so flesh-and-blood before (at least until "Final Fantasy" is released 
later this summer), the movie is nonstop candy for the eyes, with a palette 
of bright colors jumping off the screen, and a round-up of central characters 
who are not only likable, but also memorable and enchanting. 
With a PG rating, for some admittedly racy material for a family film, 
"Shrek" is an ideal viewing experience for both children and grown-ups alike. 
There is humor throughout that kids will be able to thoroughly enjoy, but 
also a constant slew of jokes that will have the adults rolling (if my 
theater of mostly over-15's is any indication). When Lord Farquaad, for 
example, is deciding on a princess to marry, he is presented by the Mirror 
from "Snow White and the Seven Dwarfs" with three contestants, a 'la "The 
Dating Game"--Cinderella, Snow White, and Fiona. About Snow White, the mirror 
says in its best TV-personality voice, "...and although she may live with 
seven men, she's not easy!" Fiona, meanwhile, "enjoys sipping pina colatas 
and taking long walks in the rain." And when Fiona is the lucky winner of the 
contest, the song, "If You Like Pina Colatas," bursts onto the soundtrack. 
"Shrek" is the funniest animated film since Trey Parker's outrageous, R-rated 
1999 feature, "South Park: Bigger, Longer, and Uncut."
Directors Andrew Adamson and Vicky Jenson, and screenwriters Ted Elliott and 
Terry Rossio, based on the children's book by William Steig, delight in 
showing off their fast, zippy, satirical dialogue, and have a lot of fun 
playing with fairy tale conventions. Nearly every fairy tale creature you can 
think of makes some sort of cameo here, as does the actual Disneyland theme 
park, cleverly disguised as Lord Farquaad's living quarter. Another 
rib-tickling moment comes when the Gingerbread Man is being tortured by Lord 
Farquaad, in an attempt to get information out of him. With Lord Farquaad's 
constant taunting and his own leg torn off and lying next to him on the 
baking sheet, the Gingerbread Man sarcastically exclaims, "Eat me!"
The voice work from all four principals is wonderful. Mike Myers develops 
Shrek into a lovable ogre who is tired of being feared, and just a little bit 
lonelier than he outwardly appears. Eddie Murphy is hysterical as Donkey, an 
ass who can't ever seem to shut up, but forms a nice friendship with Shrek. 
Cameron Diaz cleverly gives Princess Fiona a bit of punch by portraying her 
much like her butt-kicking, live-action character in 2000's "Charlie's 
Angels." And John Lithgow also amuses as the very short Lord Farquaad. 
Remarking about the monstrous size of his castle, Donkey proclaims, "A castle 
that big must mean he's compensating for something."
Aside from a ten-minute section at the start of the third act, in which a 
misunderstanding between two characters brings added conflict, and briefly 
turns the movie into a tedious one, "Shrek" is a fabulous, unadulterated 
entertainment, and comes back just in time for a winning finale. Word is that 
there are already plans for a "Shrek 2," and that's fine with me. There is a 
great deal of unchartered territory that this first picture doesn't even 
begin to scrape, and undoubtedly more adventures for Shrek to go on. Whatever 
the case is with the rumored sequel, one thing is for sure: "Shrek" is a 
magical film not to be missed on the big-screen, by anyone. A new animated 
classic has been born.
    - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
      http://www.all-reviews.com/reviewers/DustinPutman.htm
http://us.imdb.com/reviewsby?Dustin+Putman
http://www.atnzone.com

Title
Review for Muppets From Space (1999)
Directed by Tim Hill.
Cast: Gonzo the Great, Kermit the Frog, Miss Piggy, Rizzo the Rat, Fozzie 
Bear, Jeffrey Tambor, Andie MacDowell, Ray Liotta, Rob Schneider, Kathy 
Griffin, F. Murray Abraham, Hollywood Hulk Hogan, David Arquette, Josh 
Charles.
Unbilled: Katie Holmes, Joshua Jackson.
1999 - 87 minutes
Rated G (no objectionable material).
Reviewed July 15, 1999.
In their sixth feature film (beginning with 1979's "The Muppet Movie"), Gonzo 
the Great, Kermit the Frog, Miss Piggy, Fozzie Bear, and the rest of the gang 
have returned for "Muppets From Space." What hasn't returned to the series, 
unfortunately, like 1996's haphazard "Muppet Treasure Island," is a 
screenplay with any palpable charm or memorable moments. Written by Jerry 
Juhl and Joseph Mazzarino, the muppets have been transformed into some fairly 
uninteresting creations, an adjective I never thought I'd use when describing 
these particular cast of characters.
At the start of "Muppets From Space," we find the whole gang living together 
in a cozy-looking suburban home that has decidedly reached its breaking point 
(and horror of all horrors, it contains only one bathroom!). After having a 
dream in which Noah (F. Murray Abraham) would not let him into his ark 
because he wasn't sure what species he was, Gonzo the Great solemnly awakes, 
pondering his place on earth. As he looks at all of the pictures on the 
mantle of his roommates' families, Gonzo realizes that he has never seen 
anyone else like himself. Kermit's a frog, Miss Piggy's...well, a pig, Fozzie 
is a bear, Rizzo is a rat, but what exactly is Gonzo? After receiving 
messages via his alphabet cereal that ask, "R U THERE," Gonzo finally comes 
into contact, briefly, with a UFO and realizes that he is an alien from outer 
space. When an oily government agent (Jeffrey Tambor) catches wind of this, 
he kidnaps Gonzo in order to experiment on him, and it is up to the rest of 
the muppets to save him.
Since the last three "Muppet" pictures, a question has been swirling around 
in my head: Kermit and Miss Piggy are supposed to be the star attractions, 
and yet they are constantly being given disappointingly secondary roles. Not 
only do Kermit and Miss Piggy have a nice rapport with each other, but it is 
truly unlike Miss Piggy to step aside for someone else to come into the 
spotlight. These observations are only further supported by "Muppets From 
Space," in which Miss Piggy, now an assistant on a UFO-tabloid news show, is 
at her radiant best. Spright, fun, energetic, given the best lines and the 
most humorous physical comedy, Miss Piggy is a true star who doesn't deserve 
to be thrown to the wayside. Tellingly, most of the time she was off the 
screen, the film would halt to an abrupt stop until she reappeared.
One of the potentially good ideas that screenwriters Juhl and Mazzarino have 
are to finally place the muppets in today's time with many hip, cultural 
references. The problem is they don't go far enough, and very few of these 
pop-culture jokes are wasted opportunities, including The Mice Girls (a 
take-off on The Spice Girls) and brief cameos by Joshua Jackson and Katie 
Holmes, playing their "Dawson's Creek" characters. Further adding to the 
confusion of this idea is the line-up of '70s funk songs, including "Brick 
House" and "Celebration." Since this particular Muppet chapter is set in the 
present day, why does everyone sing like they are ready to step onto the 
disco floor? Come to think of it, a much-needed muppet rejuvenation may have 
come if the film had been set during the Disco Era; just think of all of the 
fresh ideas that might have come out with this simple time period change.
After a successful opening, in which many of the jokes were surprisingly 
amusing, the comedy evaporated before my eyes (except when Miss Piggy's 
shenanigans arose), and so did the energy. Most of the jokes are terribly 
lame, even for a children's film, and the 87-minute running time overstays 
its welcome by at least ten minutes. Let me make things clear: I still like 
the muppets, and their live-action movies that come out every couple years, 
but an increase in quality is in serious need. Gonzo the Great is a cute 
character, and so is Rizzo the Rat, but when the muppet pictures begin to 
revolve around them, forgetting about the other more distinguished characters 
and not giving anyone else enough time to develop their personalities, 
there's a highly noticable problem.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Say It Isn't So (2001)
Directed by James B. Rogers.
Cast: Chris Klein, Heather Graham, Orlando Jones, Sally Field, Richard 
Jenkins, Eddie Cibrian, John Rothman, Jack Plotnick, Lin Shaye.
2001 - 93 minutes
Rated R (for crude sexual humor, profanity, and mild violence).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, March 23, 2001.
Misleadingly billed as "From the creators of 'There's Something About Mary,'" 
James B. Rogers'  madcap comedy, "Say It Isn't So," was merely produced by 
Bobby and Peter Farrelly, despite offering up a similar brand of their 
outrageous, raunchy humor. There is one subtle, telling difference, 
however--the Farrelly Brothers can be comic geniuses who know how to build up 
a joke, milking it for all its worth as the laughs escalate, while newcomer 
James B. Rogers is clearly an amateur who is never quite sure how to approach 
the would-be raucous material.
Gilly Noble (Chris Klein) is a starry-eyed dogcatcher in the backwater town 
of Shelbyville, Indiana, who becomes instantly smitten with Jo Wingfield 
(Heather Graham) from the moment he first sees her. Working as a very bad 
hairdresser who almost cuts Gilly's entire ear off in a freak accident, Jo 
and Gilly hit it off and share six months of romance and fun. Bad news comes 
in the form of proof that Gilly's long-lost mother happens to also be 
Jo's--the money-grubbing, white-trash Valdine (Sally Field).
Switch forward sixteen months, Jo has fled to Beaver, Colorado and rekindled 
with millionaire ex-boyfriend Jack (Eddie Cibrian), to whom she is planning 
to marry. When news comes of this, followed by the revelation that Gilly and 
Jo aren't siblings, after all, Gilly heads for Beavers, dead-set on telling 
Jo the truth so they can spend their life together, and he can stop the 
wedding with Jack.
Like 1998's "There's Something About Mary" and 2000's "Me, Myself & Irene," 
"Say It Isn't So" is, indeed, outrageous and raunchy, but it is never very 
funny. The incest jokes that arise in the first half are so plentiful and 
nonstop that it became tiresome almost immediately. It is always obvious 
where the supposed humorous parts are to be, but they usually fall flat, no 
doubt because the editing isn't tight enough, the writing isn't sharp enough, 
and the performances aren't focused enough to warrant success. That isn't to 
say director Rogers doesn't try his hardest (after all, what other movie 
could you possibly see in which a character gets his arms stuck in the rectum 
of a cow by accident); he is simply no more than a novice who would have been 
better to try a less physical, ribald comedy his first time at bat.
The film is also maddening in the way that it is so fervently stuck with an 
Idiot Plot, a term coined by Roger Ebert. One thing is for sure: had the 
characters been just a little smarter, and had Gilly just opened his mouth 
and told Jo, "I'm not your brother," from the beginning, the movie could have 
avoided all of its dumbed-down plot developments and been over and done with 
long before its 93 minutes concluded. Nothing, perhaps, is more frustrating 
than watching characters consistently dodge the words they should be 
speaking, just so the plot can run on a little longer and more complications 
can ensue.
What does work, and is fairly funny, is Orlando Jones (2001's "Double Take") 
as the legless aerial pilot, Dig, who befriends Gilly after he is hit by 
Gilly's car, causing his legs to break off and fly through the air. This 
scene is not only the funniest in the whole picture, but Jones does a 
delightful job of developing a distinct likability for his character.
Chris Klein (2000's "Here on Earth") and Heather Graham (1999's "Austin 
Powers 2"), likewise, share a bewitching chemistry together, and their love 
story works primarily because of the pair's charisma. Every scene they share 
together works very well, and with only a few minutes of screen time devoted 
to their romance before they are torn apart for almost the rest of the movie, 
I believed that they loved each other. In the past, Graham's popularity has 
been a little lost on me, but with her career sure to be heating up in the 
next year (with no fewer than three more movies coming out after this one), 
she has finally hit her stride as an actress. She has been good in the past 
(1997's "Boogie Nights"), but never so radiant on-screen as she is here. 
Klein may be the central protagonist, but it is Graham who is the star.
In an out-of-the-ordinary supporting turn, Sally Field (2000's "Where the 
Heart Is") hams it up as the nasty, greedy Valdine. Field has a field day (no 
pun intended) with the low-rent particulars of the role, but Valdine is such 
a mean woman that every scene with her left a sour taste in my mouth. While 
Field has never quite played a character like this one, she is nevertheless 
slumming it, and is far too good an actress to be wasting her time in such 
throwaway parts.
With a hum-worthy pop/rock soundtrack and a generally fast pace, "Say It 
Isn't So" thankfully never overstays its welcome, but also never is able to 
get out of the hole it gradually digs for itself with every big joke that 
causes nothing more than a lot of eye-rolling. Had "Say It Isn't So" 
abandoned its lewd, naughty roots and tried to just be a sweet romance, it 
might have worked better. Klein and Graham prove that they have exactly what 
it takes to hold up a movie on their own, without masturbation, incest, and 
necrophilia jokes getting in the way.
    - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
      http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman
http://www.atnzone.com

Title
Review for Felicia's Journey (1999)
Directed by Atom Egoyan.
Cast: Bob Hoskins, Elaine Cassidy, Arsinee Khanjian, Peter McDonald, Claire 
Benedict, Gerard McSorley, Brid Brennan, Danny Turner, Sheila Reid.
1999 - 116 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for mature themes and mild profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, November 21, 1999.
Writer-director Atom Egoyan has made a fairly prosperous, respected career 
out of making complex, thought-provoking motion pictures that challenge the 
viewer's mind and soul. As of late, most notably with 1995's "Exotica" and 
1997's "The Sweet Hereafter," he also has begun to dabble in stories that 
easily could have been transformed into examples of tiresome, conventional 
filmmaker, but has wisely opted to present them out of chronological order, 
so as to gradually tear off layer after layer until he is able to uncover the 
truths of the characters. The true craftsman that Egoyan is, and aided by 
music composer and recent Egoyan staple Mychael Danna's provocative score 
that effortlessly compliments the actions onscreen, the intricate narrative 
never feels contrived or unnecessary, because in each of his pictures, there 
have been very distinct reasons for why he constructs his films this way. 
In Egoyan's latest, "Felicia's Journey," based on the novel by William 
Trevor, Bob Hoskins stars in a performance of startling psychological depth 
as Joseph Hilditch, a seemingly kindhearted, if suspicious, middle-aged man 
who works as a catering manager in a small England town. Much of his time at 
home is spent preparing extravagant meals as he watches videotapes of his 
late mother's cooking show from the 1950s. In a moment of chance, Hilditch 
meets Felicia (Elaine Cassidy), a sullen Irish teenager who has left her home 
to search for her older boyfriend, Johnny (Peter McDonald), after he 
allegedly went away to work in a lawn mower factory near Birmingham. Walking 
the roads in search of a person who very well might have lied to her, Felicia 
is given directions by Hilditch to a factory, and later, suggests a cozy 
bed-and-breakfast up the street for her to stay at. 
When Hilditch offers to drive Felicia fifty miles to a place where Johnny may 
be, while he goes to the hospital to visit his dying wife Ada, he begins to 
grow a possibly dangerous emotional attachment to Felicia. In a series of 
scenes intercut between one another, we discover Hilditch has secretly taped 
numerous young women whom he has given a lift to in the past--women that have 
deeply trusted and confided in him--only to murder them. The catch is, the 
clearly unhinged Hilditch obviously is unable to process the full range of 
the horrendous crimes he has committed, and views the tapes of them to 
falsely reassure himself that they are still alive. 
It might be a throwaway statement to say that "Felicia's Journey" could be 
looked upon as the thinking person's "The Bone Collector," but it really is 
the complete truth. A serial killer movie in the most unorthodox sense, 
Egoyan trusts his audience as intelligent people fully capable of 
deconstructing the complicated nature of his films, and he is correct in 
doing so. While "Felicia's Journey," like the remarkable "The Sweet 
Hereafter," moves back and forth between the past and present, it never once 
becomes confusing or distractive, but turns into a sort of poetry, flowing 
gently from one scene to the next. Even more striking is the fact that not 
once does the film come right out and state that Hilditch is a cold-blooded 
murderer. Instead, through vitally important, ethereal sequences, it is 
merely implied, and that is greatly more threatening in its implications than 
the entirety of "The Bone Collector," where various scenes of physical 
violence and abuse are shown in detail.
Bob Hoskins strikes all the right notes as Joseph Hilditch, a man we are 
never really sure whether to sympathize with or fear. Growing up with a 
neglectful mother (Arsinee Khanjian) who was the star of her own television 
show, the only times Hilditch received even a fleeting glimpse of attention 
is when she would put him on camera with her. Hoskins efficaciously portrays 
all of the loneliness and confusion one often endures in life from growing up 
in an unstable household.
Newcomer Elaine Cassidy is a real find in the title role of Felicia. You 
could easily visualize someone such as Sarah Polley as the character, and she 
would have been just as good, no doubt, but Cassidy is a fresh face who is 
not only appealing, but truly talented. Felicia is the less flashy role of 
the two central characters, but in a way, she has the trickier one to play. 
On the outset, she has fooled herself into believing Johnny is her soulmate, 
when it is almost certain he doesn't care for her the same way she does for 
him. Through the course of the film, Felicia grows from a naive child into a 
thoughtful adult. 
While "The Sweet Hereafter" was a decidedly richer Egoyan adaptation of a 
book (that one by Russell Banks), with a more cathartic emotional force, 
"Felicia's Journey" is a striking motion picture, nonetheless. It may stray 
towards being a bit too contemplative and deliberately paced at times, but is 
filled with such thoroughly copious details, and leads to such a satisfying 
conclusion, that it remains a fully rewarding experience.

Title
Review for Life (1999)
Directed by Ted Demme.
Cast: Eddie Murphy, Martin Lawrence, Obba Babatunde, Rick James, Brent 
Jennings, Miguel A. Nunez Jr., Bokeem Woodbine, Clarence Williams III, 
Ned Beatty, Lisa Nicole Carson, Nick Cassavetes, Poppy Montgomery.
1999 - 108 minutes
Rated R (for extreme profanity, mild violence, and a brief scene of 
gore).
Reviewed April 17, 1999.
Like several of Eddie Murphy's past films (1998's "Holy Man"), "Life" is 
a perfect example of a film with an identity crisis. Let Murphy loose 
and he can be a dynamite comic (1996's "The Nutty Professor"), but too 
often he is mired in an uncomfortable mixture of comedy and drama. If 
Murphy wants to be treated seriously, why not make a straightforward 
dramatic piece, instead of intermingling it with juvenile comedy, and 
vice versa?
Spanning 60-odd years and beginning in the Prohibition era of 1932, 
Murphy stars as smooth con man Ray Gibson who, along with straight-laced 
banker Claude Banks (Martin Lawrence), finds himself owing a large debt 
to a bootlegger (Rick James). Paired together to travel from their home 
of Manhattan to the deep south of Mississippi on a bootlegging journey, 
they unwittingly witness the death of a black man caused by racism, and 
then are accused of the murder, sentenced to the Mississippi State 
Penitentiary for life. As the decades fly by and they remain locked up, 
Claude and Ray's friendship survives many different hurdles as they 
begin to suspect that they are going to die without ever being free 
again.
Does this sound like a rousing yuk-fest? I think not, and although 
"Life" does boast a few humorous moments (I liked, for example, an early 
scene where they enter into a "No Coloreds" restaurant and the waitress 
tells them that they only have "whites-only pie"), the overall story is 
more depressing than anything else, since we know what we are basically 
watching is two innocent mens' lives being wasted away. In something 
like 1994's "The Shawshank Redemption," this idea worked because the 
subject matter was treated with a realism and intelligence. In "Life," 
it is mostly an excuse to give us one-liners heavily laced with the 
F-word (and worse).
"Life" also has severe pacing problems, as it often has a tendency to be 
marginally entertaining one minute, and then brain-numbingly dull and 
misguided the next. This major problem probably owes itself to the fact 
that there is no story arc to the film, nor is there much of a "story" 
to begin with. Sure, we follow Claude and Ray through an epic 60 years, 
but not much really happens in those years, and, at one point, a whole 
28 years passes by within a two-minute montage! The only good thing 
about that is I knew the sooner Murphy and Lawrence began to get their 
faces more heavily applied with "old man" make up, the sooner it would 
be over.
Eddie Murphy and Martin Lawrence are strong presences throughout, and 
have at least fairly substantial material to work with. Murphy, 
especially, rolls things off his tongue at such a rapid rate that it is 
usually very humorous, and apparent that fellow comic actor Chris Tucker 
is only imitating him. Lawrence, meanwhile, portrays the more touching 
of the two characters as he is most affected by the prison experience 
and sees many of his future plans ultimately shot down, including his 
love relationship with a fetching young woman (Lisa Nicole Carson). Come 
to think of it, maybe the movie should have simply been retitled "Eddie 
and Martin," as written right above the "Life" title on the poster. The 
movie focuses so much on the two that the rest of the many characters 
are either sorely underused or come off as mere afterthoughts.
Aside from the two central actors, also making an impression is the 
music score by Wyclef Jean, making his film scoring debut. It is clear 
that Jean worked very hard on the music to make it effective and put in 
precisely the right place, and it admittedly does work. 
By the time the ending arrived in "Life," without giving too much away, 
Claude and Ray are ninety-years-old, and although everything concludes 
on an upbeat note, it's a little difficult to pass by the reality that 
these two characters are going to be dead soon. Sure, they've hung on to 
each other's friendship, but that's not enough for me to walk out of the 
theater singing a happy tune. Honestly, not only did the film turn out 
to be a downer for me, but as I write this a mere eighty minutes after 
seeing it, much of the film has already exited my long-term-memory. 
After the disasterous "Dr. Dolittle," the well-meaning misfire, "Holy 
Man," and the mediocre, forgettable "Life," perhaps Murphy should begin 
to choose his feature film projects a little more wisely. After all, as 
this movie can certainly attest to, life is short.

Title
Review for Jack Frost (1998)
Directed by Troy Miller.
Cast: Joseph Cross, Michael Keaton, Kelly Preston, Mark Addy, Henry 
Rollins, Andrew Lawrence.
1998 - 95 minutes.
Rated PG (for sexual situations, mild profanity, and mature themes).
Reviewed December 13, 1998.
By Dustin Putman 
Dustin Putman's Film Reviews ">Http://members.aol.com/filmfan16/index.html>
"Jack Frost," is one of those dumb, corny concoctions that attempts to 
be a heartwarming family film, but is too muddled in its own cliches and 
predictability to be the least bit touching. This does not come as a 
surprise, since the studio that made it is Warner Brothers, who is on a 
current streak of one bad film after the other.
Jack Frost (Michael Keaton) is a struggling middle-aged rock musician 
who loves his wife, Gabby (Kelly Preston), and 11-year-old son, Charlie 
(Joseph Cross), but doesn't spend nearly enough time with them. When he 
receives a call from a music label that wants to hear him play, he has 
to cancel his planned family outing up in the mountains for Christmas. 
Halfway there, Jack has second thoughts, but on his way back home, is in 
a car accident and dies. Switch forward a year, Christmas is approaching 
once again, and Charlie and Gabby are still having a difficult time 
coming to terms with Jack's death. When Charlie begins to play the 
harmonica his father gave him the night before he died, the snowman 
outside the house is taken over by Jack's spirit. Jack wants to spend 
some time with his son before the upcoming warm front melts him, but 
Charlie desperately tries to prevent his melting demise.
"Frosty the Snowman," is a classic cartoon, and the idea of a snowman 
that is alive works splendidly when animated, but as a live-action film, 
it doesn't work at all. After a somewhat promising prologue in which the 
Frost family is established, "Jack Frost," quickly goes downhill, 
especially once the snowman comes into play. Since Jack has been 
deceased for a whole year, you would think there would be many questions 
to ask him, such as, "what happens after you die?" or, "how does it feel 
to be a snowman?" but instead, the film focuses on a snowball fight 
subplot and an inevitably oversentimental climax that could be 
telegraphed before I even sat down to watch the movie.
The performances are respectable enough, but no one deserves to be 
punished by appearing in a silly film like this. Michael Keaton at least 
got off easy, since he disappears after the first twenty minutes, but 
what exactly does he think he is doing with his career here? I have 
always liked Kelly Preston. She is clearly a talented, charismatic 
actress, but has never been given a good role in her life, usually 
having to settle for a one-dimensional supporting character, as in, 
1997's, "Nothing to Lose," and, "Addicted to Love." Joseph Cross was 
probably the highlight in the cast, since he believably portrayed a boy 
suffering the loss of a parent. In one of the only subplots that 
actually works, due to its wittiness, Henry Rollins is highly amusing as 
a hockey coach who becomes terrified and paranoid after seeing the live 
snowman.
This brief hint of cleverness is pushed to the side, however, by the 
tried-and-true main plot at hand, which is the sappy story of a father 
and son. Since I knew what was going to happen by the time the 
conclusion came around, I had no choice but to sit there and listen to 
painfully insipid, cringe-inducing lines of dialogue. Some of my 
favorites was an interaction between the son and father: "You da man," 
says Charlie. "No, I da snowman," replies Jack. Or how about this little 
zinger, coming from a school bully that miraculously becomes friendly 
towards Charlie and tries to help him out: "Snowdad is better than no 
dad." Do people really get paid in Hollywood for writing pieces of trash 
like this?
The snowman, created by John Henson's Creature Shop, is more believable 
than the snowman from last year's unintentionally hilarious 
direct-to-video horror flick, also called, "Jack Frost," but it still 
was difficult to tell if it was a person in a suit or computer effects. 
Either way, it was an awful lot of work to go through, just to come up 
with a final product as featherbrained as this project.
As a seasonal Holiday picture, "Jack Frost," is pretty much a clunker. A 
better Christmas film from this year is, "I'll Be Home For Christmas." 
Better yet, my suggestion would be to stay home and watch a quality 
film, such as, "It's a Wonderful Life," "A Christmas Story," or, 
"Prancer." "Jack Frost," is an earnest, but severely misguided film, and 
children, as well as adults, deserve better. I doubt they would want to 
see a movie about the death of a parent, anyway. 

Title
Review for Doug's 1st Movie (1999)
Directed by Maurice Joyce.
Voices: Thomas McHugh, Fred Newman, Constance Shulman, Chris Phillips, 
Frank Welker, Doug Preis, Guy Hadley, Alice Playten.
1999 - 78 minutes
Rated G (nothing objectionable).
Reviewed March 27, 1999.
Because of last year's horrendous, excruciating "The Rugrats Movie," one 
honestly could only expect the worst from this recent animated feature 
film adaptation of the popular children's show, "Doug's 1st Movie." As 
the film played itself out, I noticed one vital difference between the 
two: while "Rugrats" was one of the most boring, junky family films to 
come along in some time, I couldn't help but be swept up in the spell 
that "Doug's 1st Movie" put me under, which was one of great, unexpected 
sweetness. Though I have never seen the television series, I now have a 
reason to actually give it a chance, where it airs on Nickelodeon.
Doug Funnie (vioced by Thomas McHugh) is an average 12-year-old living 
in the small, generally peaceful town of Bluffington, with all of the 
usual ordeals of any pre-teen, as he must constantly fight not only for 
respect from some of the older, more popular kids in his school, but for 
the girl of his heart, Patti Mayonnaise (Constance Shulman), whom he 
wants to ask out to the Valentine's Day Dance. At the same time, Doug, 
along with his friend, Skeeter (Fred Newman), have a chance encounter 
with the legendary monster of the local Lucky Duck Lake, and is 
surprised to find that the creature, named Herman Melville after his 
favorite book, "Moby Dick," is actually friendly, and trying to gain 
solace from the severely polluted lake, due to the company, Bluffco, 
releasing harmful chemicals into the waters. When Doug is encouraged to 
keep the monster a secret so as to protect him from the community, this 
poses a problem with Patti, since she mistakenly believes he is lying to 
her, and starts to hang around with the Doug's bullish nemesis, Guy (Guy 
Hadley).
To be clear about things, "Doug's 1st Movie" is only the second animated 
feature in the last sixteen months that I have enjoyed, the other being 
the spectacular, far superior "The Prince of Egypt." "Doug" is certainly 
more minor and slight fare than "The Prince of Egypt," but that isn't a 
bad thing, as I was pleasantly proven wrong about my low expectations. 
The characters in "Doug's 1st Movie" were all likable and well-written, 
and the complicated relationship between Doug and Patti was genuine and 
far more involving than what is usually seen in a film aimed at the 
young kiddie market. Although this aspect of the story was definately 
the strongest element, the main plot involving the kind-hearted 
creature, a la "E.T.," was also pleasant enough.
The merits of the animation could be debated, but I thought, for this 
film, at least, it worked. The colors were always vibrant and bright, 
and although the drawings were simple, they were also visually 
stimulating, something the recent dreary animated film, "The King and 
I," cannot attest to. Another interesting thing to note is that there 
are several overshot views of the whole town of Bluffington, including a 
shot of a map, and in the film, the locations were actually explored and 
accurate in their placement that we had previously seen them in. 
Bluffington, believe it or not, is a town I'd actually like to visit, if 
it actually existed.
Not only is "Doug's 1st Movie" more mature in its treatment of a 
children's pic (thankfully, there are no potty jokes in sight), but it 
also included an often sly screenplay, as well as some in-jokes that 
only adults might "get." For example, when discussing the town while 
looking at the map, Doug mentions that right behind Lucky Duck Lake is 
Crystal Lake (a reference to the slasher series, "Friday the 13th"). 
While watching the movie, I was also taken aback at how effective the 
voiceovers were, especially Constance Shulman, as Patti Mayonnaise, a 
fetching young girl with a delightful southern accent. Adding several 
laughs was Beebe (voiced by Alice Playten), a wealthy, spoiled friend of 
Doug's who is always commanding her father and servants to do anything 
she asks.
At a scant 78 minutes, "Doug's 1st Movie" is short and entertaining 
enough to never overstay its welcome, and I was in constant enjoyment as 
I watched it. After the end credits appeared, the earth didn't shake, 
but I was in a slight state of shock at how much I really did like it, 
with the wonderful last scene, set on the dock of the lake between Doug 
and Patti, only confirming my enthusiasm. Released by Walt Disney 
Pictures, "Doug's 1st Movie" is one of their lesser efforts in terms of 
how high its profile is, but is actually their best film since 1996's 
"The Hunchback of Notre Dame," which only proves that flashy, stylish 
animation isn't the only key to a successful film: you also need to have 
a diverting, original story and characters you care about. You do not, 
however, need a non-stop string of elaborate, corny musical numbers.

Title
Review for Lost Souls (2000)
Directed by Janusz Kaminski.
Cast: Winona Ryder, Ben Chaplin, John Hurt, Philip Baker Hall, Elias Koteas, 
Sarah Wynter, Alfre Woodard, John Diehl.
2000 - 94 minutes
Rated R (for profanity and violence).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, October 14, 2000.
The "World-In-Jeopardy-By-Satan" genre has gone into overplay in the last 
couple years, offering viewers so many vague variations on the same subject 
that it has long-since grown tiresome. Acquiring a shooting gallery of 
pop-religious mumbo-jumbo, it seems present-day producers who grew up with 
the spooky likes of 1968's "Rosemary's Baby" and 1973's "The Exorcist" have 
no idea how to write a believable, involving story. Look no further than 
1999's "Stigmata," 1999's "End of Days," and 2000's "Bless the Child" to find 
pure rubbish disguised as something more stylized and intellectual.
"Lost Souls," the directorial debut of brilliant cinematographer Janusz 
Kaminski (1999's "Saving Private Ryan"), is the latest entry in the "end of 
the world" cinematic sweepstakes, and, surprisingly enough, it is a stylish 
and purely adult psychological thriller that pays respect, rather than 
tarnishes, its worlds-of-old predecessors. 
Winona Ryder stars as Maya Larkin, a Catholic school teacher who has devoted 
her life to religion and helping others ever since she was possessed by a 
demonic spirit several years before. As the film opens, she is called upon by 
Father Lereaux (John Hurt) to act as an assistant in an exorcism he plans to 
perform on family-man-turned-serial-killer Henry Birdson (John Diehl). 
Although they fail to save Henry, Maya does uncover a series of numbers Henry 
wrote, and after carefully decoding them, discovers the name of Peter Kelson 
(Ben Chaplin), who happens to be a best-selling true-crime novelist living in 
Manhattan with his girlfriend (Sarah Wynter). It seems that the faithless 
Peter is set to become the antichrist on his 33rd-birthday and take over the 
world, even though he doesn't know it yet.
Moving at a deliberately slow pace, and free of any sort of MTV-style film 
cuts or false alarm scare sequences, "Lost Souls" is a refreshing throwback 
to the days when a horror film didn't have to rely on a mad slasher chasing 
teenagers around a house, or a cat jumping out of a closet, in order to be 
scary. That said, "Lost Souls" has its heart in the right place, but still 
isn't very frightening. Disturbing? Yes. The ingenious idea of an innocent 
man who gradually comes to find out that he will soon be transformed into the 
antichrist is cause for several thought-provoking, evocative notions, but the 
movie doesn't gain the momentum to become downright scary. In director Janusz 
Kaminski's attempt at making a horror picture that is somehow "above" all the 
other recent efforts, he has, perhaps, gone too far in the opposite 
direction, causing this film to be too glacial to be completely touching.
At 28-years-old, Winona Ryder (1999's "Girl, Interrupted") is still the same 
captivating presence that she has always been, and the ability she has to 
capture the screen every time she appears is quite remarkable. Ryder is 
earnest and likable as Maya Larkin, even when we, as an audience, are unsure 
if she is possibly going crazy herself, and she holds the film together even 
through its questionable patches. Meanwhile, Ben Chaplin (1998's "The Thin 
Red Line") starts off blandly, but becomes enthralling by the final act, as a 
man who can't quite believe the tragic things Maya tells him, but can't deny 
that some very strange things are occurring to him, as well. All supporting 
roles are filled by powerful veteran actors, none of which are given much 
material to work with: John Hurt (1998's "Love and Death on Long Island") is 
Father Lereaux; the incomparable Philip Baker Hall (1999's "Magnolia") is 
Peter's girlfriend's religious father; and Alfre Woodard appears unbilled as 
a strong-willed worker at the psychiatric ward where the possessed Henry 
Birdson resides.
For the majority of its 94-minute running time, "Lost Souls" left me 
wondering exactly where everything was going, and I feared it wouldn't add up 
to much, joining the rest of the recent ill-fated attempts at a 
religious-themed thriller. Moving slowly throughout and with few truly 
astounding scenes beforehand, the ending blindsided me. Without giving it 
away, what occurs is not at all what you would expect, yet it is really one 
of the few honest ways to conclude the story, downbeat or not. Its final 
scene is challenging and fairly equivocal, casting a whole new light on 
everything that had come before. By taking his times and building to a 
fateful climax, Kaminski has realized that the most riveting films are not 
those with non-stop action and a scare a minute, but the ones that ask for 
its audience to slowly get involved and open up their minds, in exchange for 
an ultimately rewarding experience. Kaminski may not hold a firm grip on the 
picture the whole way through, but he does conclude on an unexpectedly high 
note that questions life, faith, and one's mortality. In other words, fans of 
the recently reissued "The Exorcist" will be impressed. Fans of "Leprechaun 
in the Hood" will decidedly not be.

Title
Review for Atlantis: The Lost Empire (2001)
Directed by Gary Trousdale and Kirk Wise.
Voices: Michael J. Fox, James Garner, Cree Summer, Jim Varney, Corey Burton, 
Claudia Christian, Phil Morris, Don Novello, Jacqueline Obradors, Florence 
Stanley, Leonard Nimoy, John Mahoney, David Ogden Stiers.
2001 - 93 minutes
Rated PG (for action violence).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, June 16, 2001.
"Atlantis: The Lost Empire," Walt Disney Pictures' latest summer animated 
feature, is a step away from their usual cartoon offerings. In place of cute, 
furry, wise-cracking animals and a stream of pop songs is an old-fashioned 
adventure yarn with the only appearance of an animal coming in the form of 
the hero's meowing pet cat. None of the characters break into song, and the 
legend that the story is based on comes from the words of ancient philosopher 
Plato. The film is rated PG, as well, and has one character who chain-smokes 
throughout. It's pretty safe to say that "Atlantis" is most certainly not the 
movie you've grown to expect from the Disney studio, and that isn't 
necessarily a bad thing.
Set in 1914, Lanky Milo Thatcher (Michael J. Fox) is a Washington, D.C. 
native whose linguistic skills have helped him to get a job from the local 
university. Obsessed with the legend of the lost city of Atlantis, which is 
said to have been engulfed into the sea thousands of years ago, Milo is 
delighted to be asked to participate in an expedition in search of the 
underwater ruins. Following a disastrous encounter with a giant sea creature 
that leaves their submarine destroyed and much of the crew dead, the 
remaining members are taken aback to finally reach Atlantis, and just a 
little surprised to find an entire Atlantian society that has mysteriously 
survived after all these years. Striking up a friendship with Princess Kida 
(Cree Summer), who, in turn, tell each other about their separate ways of 
living, Milo is distraught to find that the rest of his crew, most notably 
Commander Rourke (James Garner) and Helga (Claudia Christian), are planning 
to make a ton of money off their discovery, with little regard to the people 
of Atlantis.
While "Atlantis: The Lost Empire," directed by Gary Trousdale and Kirk Wise 
(1991's "Beauty and the Beast"), is a remarkably more mature, adult-minded 
Disney film than the norm, it fails to go down as one of their more 
successful contemporary features. Lacking the pure entertainment value of 
1999's "Tarzan," 1994's "The Lion King," and 1989's "The Little Mermaid," 
"Atlantis" is deliberately paced and not nearly as child-friendly, although 
kids will, no doubt, enjoy it. It's a good movie, to be sure, and one with 
several rousing action scenes, but it lacks that something--that 
finesse--that all of the best Disney movies have attained.
Even if "Atlantis" isn't terribly memorable, it does set up several 
interesting characters and relationships. The gradual romance between Milo 
and Kida is understated and charming, with both Michael J. Fox and Cree 
Summer turning in emotionally involving voice work. It isn't love at first 
sight for this pair, and they don't predictably spend the whole movie making 
goo-goo eyes at each other. Instead, they are intelligent people with their 
own ideas and thoughts. Also standing out are Sweet (Phil Morris), a muscular 
doctor who is a softy at heart (and the first black character to appear in a 
Disney animated movie); Cookie, a very bad cook who means well, and is 
poignantly voiced by the late, great Jim Varney; and the street-smart, 
teenage mechanic, Audrey (Jacqueline Obradors).
The animation style that "Atlantis" uses is fairly conventional, but it works 
within the confines of this particular story. While the majority of what is 
onscreen is hand-drawn, there are occasional lapses into computer-generated 
territory, with just a hint of anime influence. "Atlantis" is not quite as 
bold or redefining as it would like to be, particularly in the shadow of the 
superlative "Shrek," but it does succeed in not seeming like a movie strictly 
made for children. More along the lines of 2000's "Titan A.E." than anything 
else, "Atlantis: The Lost Empire" is a worthwhile venture that may not go 
down as a modern animated classic, but it does expose Disney as a studio more 
than willing to break free of tradition and try something a little different, 
for once. It's about time.
   - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
     http://us.imdb.com/reviewsby?Dustin+Putman
http://www.all-reviews.com/reviewers/dustinputman.htm
http://www.atnzone.com

Title
Review for Generation Ax (1998)
Written and Directed by Tommy Faircloth.
Cast: Marina Morgan, Brian Kelly, Jennifer Peluso, Jason Gambrell, Tim Moran, 
Emmy Stevens, Amy Swaim, Sarah Holloman, Jaime Daugherty, Steve Lee, Tommy 
Faircloth.
1998 - 79 minutes
Not Rated (equivalent of an R for violence, gore, nudity, sex, and profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, June 20, 2001.
"Generation Ax," writer-director Tommy Faircloth's sophomore filmmaking 
effort, lacks much of the memorable dialogue and despicable characters that 
made 1995's "Crinoline Head" such an entertaining, absurdist horror-comedy. 
In the place of these things, however, is a more technically proficient and 
intimate movie that, once again, proves what kind of talent Faircloth has as 
a director. Overall, "Generation Ax" may not be as purely fun as his debut 
film, "Crinoline Head," but it has infinitely more to say, and does it by 
skewering such high school issues as cliques, friends, and teenage pressure, 
with a hard-edged, biting honesty that often times is very funny.
17-year-olds Blair Deal (Marina Morgan) and Leslie Gorden (Jennifer Peluso) 
have been best friends for years. Always standing just outside the popular 
circle at their high school, and perfectly happy with their stance, Blair is 
surprised and a little confused by Leslie's sudden determination to get 
chosen to be on the cheerleading squad. Because Blair would do anything to 
make Leslie happy, and because her psyche is just a little unstable, she 
decides to murder the one person standing in her way to becoming a 
cheerleader--the giddy, more-popular Trix Beasly (Amy Swaim).
With Trix out of the picture and Leslie suddenly hanging out with her fellow 
"Beavers," Blair meets new-boy-in-town Todd Major (Brian Kelly) at an 
underground rave, and falls in love. It clearly was fate that brings them 
together, as Todd has the very same pension as Blair for killing anyone who 
gets in his way, or on his nerves. What escalates between these two 
star-crossed lovers is a bloodbath that leaves anyone who gets under their 
skin dead.
Filmed before 1999's high school satire, "Jawbreaker," but evoking many of 
the same themes and plot devices, "Generation Ax" is an involving, 
low-budget, pitch-black horror-comedy. While not one of the main characters 
even remotely looks young enough to be in high school, the actors are 
well-cast and attractive. Marina Morgan (HBO's "Sex Bytes") is a real find as 
the unhinged Blair, turning what could have been a one-dimensional villainess 
into a likably dangerous individual who means well, even if she goes about 
things the wrong way. Morgan also has wonderful chemistry with Brian Kelly 
("Crinoline Head"), playing super-cool to the hilt as Todd. Rounding out the 
three major characters, Jennifer Peluso (1999's "Hellblock 13") is excellent 
as Leslie. Peluso poignantly injects Leslie with a level of confusion and 
angst that makes the ultimate falling-apart of her friendship with Blair all 
the more adept. In supporting roles, Amy Swaim ("Hellblock 13") is 
delightfully flighty as the ill-fated Trix Beasly, who, at one point, tells 
her fellow chearleaders that her dad will treat them to free abortions if 
they don't feel like using protection. And Emmy Stevens gives a small, 
realistic performance as a 15-year-old girl who is drugged and raped at a 
rave. Aside from Kelly, "Crinoline Head" alum who return for cameos here are 
Steve Lee (as a theater concession stand employee), the always-wonderful 
Cathy Slaminko (seen on television at one point), and Faircloth himself (as 
the theater ticket person).
While "Generation Ax" has a lot going for it, and is most certainly worth 
seeing for enthusiasts of Faircloth, horror movies, and high school-set 
stories, it is a bit uneven, particularly in its opening and closing 
segments. The pre-title sequence, set in jail, is decidedly extraneous, and 
Faircloth has a little trouble finding a satisfying conclusion to what has 
come before. A little less tragedy and irony, and a little more character 
interaction would have been appreciated.
Regardless of the occasional downfall, "Generation Ax" is surprisingly 
thoughtful in its portrayal of high school politics, and--probably 
intentionally--not as mean-spirited as "Crinoline Head." Instead of offering 
up characters whom we love to hate, Faircloth wisely gives us people who may 
not always do good things, but are certainly sympathetic. No doubt with a 
definite comedic edge, he seems to be saying, "Sure, these characters kill 
people, but what do you expect? They are, after all, stuck in the hell known 
as high school." Something tells me they would have straightened up after 
graduation.
   - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
     http://us.imdb.com/reviewsby?Dustin+Putman
http://www.all-reviews.com/reviewers/dustinputman.htm
http://www.atnzone.com

Title
Review for Permanent Midnight (1998)
Directed by David Veloz. 
Cast: Ben Stiller, Elizabeth Hurley, Maria Bello, Owen Wilson, Cheryl 
Ladd, Peter Greene, Janeane Garofalo.
1998 - 92 minutes.
Rated R (for profanity, sex, and drug use).
Reviewed October 25, 1998.
"Permanent Midnight," is based on a true story about television 
screenwriter Jerry Stahl (Ben Stiller), who battled with his extreme 
heroin addiction throughout the 1970's and 80's. Told in flashback to a 
one night fling (Maria Bello) after he has been sober for 50 days, he 
talks about how the drugs pretty much destroyed him, as well as the 
relationship with his British wife (Elizabeth Hurley), whom he married 
so she would be able to get a green card.
"Permanent Midnight," is a none-too-special drama that tells a story 
about drugs that has been done countless times before, and better. 
Although the sequences of the drug taking are occasionally quite graphic 
and realistic, that is the whole movie. There is no attempt to develop 
any of the other characters, and his relationship with Hurley doesn't 
even seem fully written. We also learn next to nothing about Stahl's 
career, so the film isn't even good for learning about him. 
Ben Stiller cannot be faulted, however. He gives a brave, first-rate 
performance, and Maria Bello also is charismatic. Janeane Garofalo may 
very well be the highlight of the film, however, even though she is only 
in two scenes. There is something about her that I always love, and she 
brings something special or funny to every role she takes on.
"Permanent Midnight," is a film filled with good performances, but very 
little else. It's okay to tell a story about drugs, but the filmmakers 
probably should have realized that constant sequences of drug taking, 
one after the other, does not a good film make.

Title
Review for Chicken Run (2000)
Directed by Peter Lord, Nick Parks.
Voices: Julia Sawalha, Mel Gibson, Miranda Richardson, Tony Haygarth, Jane 
Horrocks, Timothy Spall, Phil Daniels, Lynn Ferguson, Benjamin Whitrow.
2000 - 85 minutes
Rated G (no objectionable material).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, June 24, 2000.
"Dinosaur" was depressingly recycled and ineffectual, and "Titan A.E." was 
uneven and forgettable, but "Chicken Run," directed by "Wallace and Gromit" 
alums Nick Park and Peter Lord, is a fresh and entertaining animated film, 
filled with originality, wit, and sharp writing that makes it the ideal 
motion picture of the summer that the whole family can go to and 
unadulteratedly enjoy.
Most are comparing the film to a spin on the POW pictures of the past, like 
"The Great Escape" and "Stalag 17," but striking me as more of a 
chicken-based variation on the Holocaust, "Chicken Run" is set at Mr. and 
Mrs. Tweedy's England-based farm, and centers on the poultry inhabitants who 
are constantly making attempts to escape the fenced-in, barbed-wired 
confinement that they have been restricted to. The head of most of the 
chickens' plans is the resourceful Ginger (voiced by Julia Sawalha, of TV's 
"Absolutely Fabulous"), who dreams of living the rest of her life free to 
roam the world's open spaces without having to worry about laying a certain 
number of eggs in order to survive the clutches of her owners. 
One day, the suave American, Rocky (Mel Gibson), literally drops in on them, 
and billed as "The Amazing Flying Chicken" on a circus poster that was 
attached to him, they view him as their savior. Rocky halfheartedly agrees to 
teach everyone how to fly, but Ginger eventually begins to suspect he is just 
biding his time and doesn't, in fact, know how to fly himself. Their problems 
thicken when the chickens begin to receive overly generous food portions, and 
they soon learn that the evil Mrs. Tweedy (Miranda Richardson) is planning to 
fatten everyone up and turn them into chicken pies. "I don't want to be a 
pie," the alarmed and fairly naive Babs (Jane Horrocks) replies to the 
distressing news. "I don't even like gravy." Babs' words ring throughout the 
group of chickens, and they all realize it is up to them to escape once and 
for all, or die trying. 
In the vein of the recent "Toy Story 2," "Chicken Run" is a marvelous 
children's movie that is smart enough to not talk down to the young ones, or 
the adults, and is stuffed with more than enough sophisticated jokes that the 
kids will think are silly, and the parents will think are truly droll and 
funny. Using the talents of Aardman Animation Studios, the film is an 
extraordinary example of clay animation at its best. Colorful and smoothly 
constructed, the picture rivals 1993's "The Nightmare Before Christmas" as 
the strongest use of basic claymation seen in a feature film.
Like so many animated films with animals, the chickens are humanized to the 
point where they act and speak like people, but screenwriter Karey 
Kirkpatrick goes one step further and allows you to respect and care about 
the likable characters and their plight. Unlike "Titan A.E.," which contained 
some of the most bland voice-over work in recent memory, everyone in the cast 
of "Chicken Run" fits their characters to a tee, and clearly believe in the 
project. Julia Sawalha is charming as the savvy Ginger, and Mel Gibson equips 
himself with all of the cool swagger and self-optimism that characterizes the 
memorable Rocky, Ginger's potential love interest. Finally, Miranda 
Richardson is convincing as the dastardly Mrs. Tweedy, who looks and sounds 
reminiscent of Margaret Hamilton, as the Wicked Witch of the West, in 1939's 
"The Wizard of Oz."
With this year's animated releases, it seems that the tendency to turn every 
film of its type into a Disney-style musical has finally run its course, and 
rightfully so. While there is no doubt that 1989's "The Little Mermaid" and 
1991's "The Beauty and the Beast" are great films, "Chicken Run," just like 
the "Toy Story" movies, excels in its involvement of the story because it 
does not require its characters to break out into song, and, rather, contains 
only background music to simply set the tone.
At a fast 85 minutes (about the norm for a big-screen animated picture), 
"Chicken Run" whizzes right by, and if there is a complaint to be had, it is 
that the film is over just a little too quickly. By tacking on a few extra 
minutes, the supporting chickens could have been developed more strongly. 
This is a small qualm, however, as "Chicken Run" is a family film full of 
wonder and excitement. It may also even have the power to make you think 
twice the next time you run through the drive-thru at your local KFC. 

Title
Review for Red Planet (2000)
Directed by Antony Hoffman.
Cast: Val Kilmer, Carrie-Anne Moss, Tom Sizemore, Simon Baker, Terence Stamp, 
Benjamin Bratt.
2000 - 110 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for violence, profanity, and partial nudity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, November 11, 2000.
Since space movies have grown more than a little tiresome over the years, and 
with another film about Mars released this past March, there was more than a 
few reservations at the onset of "Red Planet." After all, what fresh material 
could director Antony Hoffman and screenwriters Chuck Pfarrer and Jonathan 
Lemkin possibly muster out of such a worn-out premise? Quite surprisingly, 
the answer turns out to be a lot, as "Red Planet" is not only infinitely 
superior to last spring's "Mission to Mars," but also one of the most 
involving and well-made space-set thrillers since Ridley Scott's 1979 opus, 
"Alien."
Set in 2050, when the Earth's polluted atmosphere has quickly made the planet 
nearly unlivable, a six-person crew set off on a six-month voyage to Mars to 
reconfirm that colonization may, in fact, be possible for humans. With Lt. 
Cmdr. Kate Bowman (Carrie-Anne Moss) staying behind with the ship after a 
malfunctioning problem, the other five members--"hotshot" second-in-command 
Ted Santen (Benjamin Bratt), veteran Chief Science Officer Bud Chantilas 
(Terence Stamp), medical systems engineer Gallagher (Val Kilmer), Dr. Quinn 
Burchenal (Tom Sizemore), and Dr. Chip Pettengill (Simon Baker)--make their 
way to the red planet to reach a previously-built station equipped with 
enough oxygen, food, and water to last 26 months. 
Oddly enough, the algae that had been heavily spray upon Mars' surface twenty 
years before has mysteriously disappeared. And what they don't expect is that 
the station has been completely destroyed, leaving them with only seven hours 
until the oxygen in their helmets runs out. Making matters worse is AMEE 
(Autonomous Mapping Evaluation and Evasion), a robot that Kate sends to Mars 
to aid in finding the crew, but whose military instincts go haywire on the 
rough landing, leaving it a murderous force hell-bent on destroying the 
entire group.
Sumptuously photographed by Peter Suschitzky, with the desolate landscapes of 
Wadi Rum, Jordan, and Coober Pedy, Australia standing in for Mars, "Red 
Planet" is a suspense-filled, surprisingly thoughtful drama that plausibly 
tells what could happen if the Earth ever did grow too polluted to live on. 
Deliberately paced, yet never stalling for a minute, the film draws you into 
its setup as we meet and grow to understand the dynamics of the six 
characters, and then lets loose into an unpredictable thrill ride once they 
are unleashed upon the largely unexplored terrain of the foreign planet.
Despite including an excessive, unnecessary narration by Kate Bowman that 
bookends the main attraction, the film rarely steps wrong. One of the major 
pleasures is the way that, despite revealing its main plotline, it is always 
difficult to decipher where the film is going, and what the outcome will be. 
Furthermore, instead of turning into a monster-on-the-loose horror movie, 
director Hoffman wisely aims higher, and makes the dangerous AMEE only a 
subplot to a much larger story about a crew that find themselves fighting to 
survive the perilous planet itself, and using their brains and the expertise 
they hold in their profession to do so.
The actors fit snugly in their roles, with the standouts being lead Val 
Kilmer, who is so charismatic as a performer that he deserves more roles; 
Carrie-Anne Moss, who brings a tough poignancy to her character of Kate; and 
Terence Stamp, who, in the picture's most thought-provoking line, says, "I 
realized science couldn't answer the really interesting questions, so I 
turned to philosophy. I've been searching for God ever since." The dignity 
that Stamp brings to his supporting appearance as aging scientist Bud 
Chantilas is quite extraordinary, and even when he goes AWOL in the second 
hour, his lasting impression has long-since been made. Rounding out the cast 
is the bland Benjamin Bratt, rising Australian actor Simon Baker, and Tom 
Sizemore.
Ultimately, "Red Planet" is such a convincing motion picture because the 
talented actors and the mostly tightly-written script make you believe 
everything that is happening to them. With Mars giving off alternately 
reddish and bluish tints, with its rocky, mountainous vistas, and a violent 
ice storm the size of Montana sweeping through the area at one point, the 
visual effects are also startlingly believable. There is no reason why "Red 
Planet" should be such a successfully entertaining thriller, but almost 
everything falls into place and seems to effortlessly work. Maybe there's 
life yet in the gradually wearisome space genre. Movies like "Red Planet" can 
only help.
   - Copyright 2000 by Dustin Putman
     Reviews by Dustin 
Putman - http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman

Title
Review for Unbreakable (2000)
Directed by M. Night Shyamalan.
Cast: Bruce Willis, Samuel L. Jackson, Spencer Treat Clark, Robin Wright 
Penn, Charlayne Woodard, Leslie Stefanson, Eamonn Walker, James Handy, 
Elizabeth Lawrence.
2000 - 107 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for violence and profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, November 24, 2000.
Writer-director M. Night Shyamalan shot to fame in the summer of 1999 with 
the release of his highly effective "The Sixth Sense," which, due to having 
one of the most extraordinary twist endings in film history, gradually became 
one of the top-grossing motion pictures of all time. "The Sixth Sense" was 
such a powerful stunner, in fact, that it possibly helped and hurt 
Shyamalan's future directing efforts. The film's success proved that he was a 
fresh and exciting new filmmaker, but also put a very large feat over his 
head in attempting to top its predecessor. 
Everyone who sees M. Night Shyamalan's latest endeavor, "Unbreakable," will 
unfairly be comparing it to "The Sixth Sense," which is a shame. In its own 
way, "Unbreakable" is as just as much a one-of-a-kind film, if not quite as 
air-tight in every aspect. Both movies are similar in many stylistic ways, 
and it will always be clear who is at the helm here for anyone whose seen 
"The Sixth Sense." Both movies are moody and foreboding, and their 
intentionally gloomy cinematography stands as a symbol of where the 
characters stand in their lives. There is even a subplot in both concerning 
marital discord. The similarities stop here, as "Unbreakable" is a completely 
different type of movie, with separate goals in mind, and a gratifying payoff 
that isn't quite as shocking as the one in "The Sixth Sense," but every bit 
as necessary in completing Shyamalan's complete intentions.
David Dunne (Bruce Willis) is a Franklin Field security guard in Philadelphia 
who is traveling home from a job interview in New York by train. Following a 
failed attempt to strike up a fling with a pretty fellow passenger (Leslie 
Stefanson), the train is involved in a tragic freak accident leaving 131 
passengers dead, and one survivor: David. Even more mysterious is the fact 
that David is not only alive, but escaped completely unscathed of even a 
minor cut or bruise. Returning home to his young son (Spencer Treat Clark) 
and a lifeless marriage to his wife, Audrey (Robin Wright Penn), David takes 
up where he left off with his job as security guard, but grows intrigued when 
he receives a note on the window shield of his car asking how many days he 
has been sick in his life.
The writer of the note turns out to be comic book art dealer Elijah Price 
(Samuel L. Jackson), who was born with a rare disease leaving his bones 
terribly brittle and particularly apt to injury. When David finally realizes 
that he has never grown ill before, nor has he ever been injured (save for a 
near-drowning as a child), he is aided by Elijah in progressively setting 
into action the true reason why he survived the train crash, and more 
precisely, why he was put on the earth.
It's no secret to say that "Unbreakable" is sort of like a reality-based 
superhero movie, since this plot development is hinted at even before the 
first frame of film and comes into play fifteen minutes in. What is so 
special about the picture, however, is in the way that it follows this story 
thread throughout, unfolding with a deliberate pace that remains intriguing 
due to its great amount of detail and character nuances. To give away any 
more of the movie than has already been mentioned would be criminal, as much 
of the film's satisfaction evolves from not knowing where the story is 
leading.
While the relatively slow pace of "The Sixth Sense" helped to make the 
frightening sequences all the more startling and the ending all the more 
meaningful, the occasionally lethargic tone of "Unbreakable" proves 
problematic. Although never boring or tedious, the movie is nearly devoid of 
anything resembling happiness or humor. The characters remain in depressingly 
downbeat lives free of any sort of joy, and it is difficult to grow close to 
anyone because of this approach. We care about their welfare, even as we wish 
they would show a little more human emotion aside from overwhelming sadness. 
It is Shyamalan's one downfall, but should be noted.
Ever since wisely realizing his career was at a standstill with his endless 
action movie roles, Bruce Willis has found a much-needed resurgence in his 
career, and rightfully so. Willis is very good as the confused protagonist, 
and his low-key performance does nothing but help to convey a character 
filled with insecurities and flaws, who isn't quite sure how to mend the 
damage he has done in his life, particularly with his rocky marriage. Samuel 
L. Jackson, as the elusively kind Elijah, brings added flavor to his role of 
a man who turned to comic books as a child as a way of dealing with his 
health problems.
The supporting cast have less-meaty roles, but some are just as memorable. 
Robin Wright Penn poignantly presents Audrey as a physical therapist who 
spends her time helping others when its her own life that needs the most 
mending. She longs to recapture the spark in her relationship with David, as 
sees his surviving of the crash as a strong sign that the time to do such a 
thing is now. As David and Audrey's pre-teen son, Spencer Treat Clark has got 
the whole brooding-kid act down flat, but doesn't have enough to work with to 
make him entirely sympathetic. And Charlayne Woodard, as Elijah's loving 
mother, projects nothing but sweetness and caring in a movie that is 
otherwise absent of such adjectives.
"Unbreakable" is a mostly spellbinding drama that may not be the spectacular 
achievement of Shyamalan's last film, but why does it--or should it--have to 
be? There is no doubt that he knows exactly how to write and direct 
thought-provoking pieces of work, and he has only confirmed this here. In the 
end, the movie finds the one vital missing link that puts everything that has 
come before into perspective. The conclusion is unpredictable and a little 
surprising, but it's necessary, rather than a simple plot device to one-up 
"The Sixth Sense." Ultimately, "Unbreakable" is a truly impressive rumination 
about the importance of finding meaning in every person's life, and not 
letting that purpose put to waste. 
    - Copyright 2000 by Dustin Putman
      Http://www.young-hollywood.com
      Http://www.atnzone.com
      Reviews by Dustin 
Putman - Http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman 

Title
Review for Enemy of the State (1998)
Directed by Tony Scott.
Cast: Will Smith, Gene Hackman, Regina King, Jon Voight, Loren Dean, 
Lisa Bonet, Gabriel Byrne, Seth Green, Jack Black, Jake Busey, Jamie 
Kennedy, Barry Pepper. 
1998 - 128 minutes.
Rated R (for violence and profanity).
Reviewed November 21, 1998.
By Dustin Putman 
Dustin Putman's Film Reviews >
Well, with "Enemy of the State," the new Jerry Bruckheimer-produced and 
Tony Scott-directed action picture, two things are certain: this film is 
five times better than Bruckheimer's previous embarrassment, 
"Armageddon," and Scott is a much better director than "Armageddon" 
alumni, Michael Bay. Of course, that isn't to say that, "Enemy of the 
State," is actually good. It's just saying that it isn't terrible.
In a refreshing change of pace from usually playing a comedic role, Will 
Smith stars as Robert Dean, a high-pofile lawyer with a loving wife 
(Regina King) and young son (Jascha Washington) living in Georgetown, 
Maryland, who finds his pleasant life quickly start to crumble around 
him. While in a lingerie store buying something for his wife for 
Christmas, a former college friend (Jason Lee) of his bursts in, tries 
to tell him something, and then while Robert isn't looking, drops a 
piece of incriminating evidence into his shopping bag that is proof that 
the National Security Agency murdered a congressman (Jason Robards, who 
appears unbilled) for opposing a Telecommunications Security and Privacy 
Act. Immediately afterwards, the friend is hit by a truck and killed 
while being chased by the NSA. After Robert is linked to the tape that 
shows the murder, his clothes unknowingly are bugged, and he must leave 
his wife and go on the run, even though he does not know what they want, 
at first.
The premise of, "Enemy of the State," is a complex one, to be sure, as 
it also includes a subplot involving Robert and his former girlfriend 
(Lisa Bonet), which I personally found more interesting than the central 
storyline. For the first hour, I was intrigued by, "Enemy of the State," 
and surprised that it wasn't simply a non-stop action movie without any 
character development. The setup for the film was entertaining and 
clever enough, and I liked the relationship set up between Smith and 
Regina King, who is a criminally underrated actress. Meanwhile, Smith 
and Bonet, who I was happy to see again after her absence since the 
cancellation of, "The Cosby Show," had a few nice scenes together. And 
Smith himself, was surprisingly appealing. It is good to see him try a 
more dramatic, challenging role, so he is one step in the right 
direction to being a true breakthrough film star. Gene Hackman has a 
supporting role as Brill, a former agency operative who has been in 
hiding since 1980, who tries to help Robert, but makes very little 
impact.
Unfortunately, the main story, although somewhat thought-provoking when 
dealing with the idea that there is so much high-tech spying equipment 
and cameras nowadays that, for all we know, we might be being watched 
non-stop, the conventional action stuff comes into full-blast in the 
second hour, and to me, it took on a definite "been-there-done-that" 
feeling. This sort of conventional chase picture has been done to death, 
and I think the filmmakers could have thought of something a little more 
original than ending it with a boring shoot-out sequence. It also didn't 
help that the movie could have easily been shortened by at least fifteen 
minutes.
What it all comes down to is that, "Enemy of the State," is a step up 
for Bruckheimer, but is still not very successful, as it still has many 
of his trademarks: a frenetic pace, odd camera angles, and a bunch of 
supporting characters who are only there to sit in chairs and read 
things from monitors. "Enemy of the State," is a sure sign that 
Bruckheimer might one day be able to make a really good film. That is, 
if he learns to focus more on the story, rather than a bunch of 
explosions. 

Title
Review for Fight Club (1999)
Directed by David Fincher.
Cast: Edward Norton, Brad Pitt, Helena Bonham Carter, Meat Loaf Aday, Jared 
Leto.
1999 - 141 minutes
Rated R (for graphic violence, gore, profanity, brief nudity, and sexual 
situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, October 16, 1999.
On one side of the fight ring, we have a motion picture that is a visual 
masterpiece, one that knows exactly what it wants to do, and how it wants to 
look. As a study in style and camera artistry, it is as impressive and 
dizzyingly original as any other film of 1999. On the other side of the fight 
ring, we have a motion picture that runs out of worthwhile material at the 
one-hour mark, becoming repetitive, repugnant, and dull. Its message, about 
living your life the way you want to before the tedious nature of life takes 
over your soul, is severely muddled amid the grisly onslaught of violence, 
and was not only covered far more effectively in "American Beauty," but 
treated its characters with respect, rather than as a joke. Worse yet, the 
final thirty minutes brings a twist that is unpredictable, to be sure, but 
also genuine rubbish. Director David Fincher (whose 1995 psychological 
thriller, "Se7en," is his only successful venture, to date) clearly gets a 
lot of pleasure out of jerking his audiences around, and has come up with a 
sharp plot turn that is as superficial and plainly silly as probably anything 
I've seen since Fincher's very own, "The Game," in 1997. The more you stop to 
think about it, in fact, the less it makes sense, and not at all in the 
playful way David Lynch's best films delight, such as 1986's "Blue Velvet" 
and 1997's "Lost Highway."
Edward Norton stars as a bored office worker with no name, other than the 
Narrator. An insomniac who lives by himself in an apartment filled to 
bursting with consumer furniture and appliances, he starts to spend his 
evenings going to self-help groups for everything from testicular cancer to 
tuberculosis because he finds becoming a person other than himself each night 
adds comfort to his life. As he attends them more and more, he discovers that 
someone else has been doing the same thing as him. Her name is Marla Singer 
(Helena Bonham Carter), a darkly-dressed, hilariously extreme chain-smoker, 
and after he confronts her about it, they decide to work out a schedule so 
that they don't go to the same meetings. On a plane back home after a 
business trip, the Narrator meets Tyler Durden (Brad Pitt), an "oh-so-cool," 
confident, possibly dangerous, thirtysomething who isn't afraid of anything 
or anyone. When his apartment ends up being destroyed in a fire, the Narrator 
shacks up with Tyler at his grimy pad, and they immediately form a sort of 
secret organization called Fight Club, in which a group of men meet each 
night and beat each other to a bloody pulp, in response to the 
dissatisfaction of their pathetic, working-class lives. The club surprisingly 
grows larger and larger with each night, until the Narrator suspects it may 
be getting out of control after Tyler throws acid on his hand one night and 
forces him to keep it there until it has burnt right through his skin. 
Meanwhile, Tyler and Marla have met up and begun a strictly sexual 
relationship.
"Fight Club" is a convoluted, blackly-comic thriller that director Fincher 
has said takes an anti-violence stance, despite its nearly non-stop barrage 
of fights, guns, and blood, and so my question to him is: "What exactly is 
anti-volent about it?" As far as this film's characters are concerned, 
fighting is an especially enjoyable way to spend an evening, and despite a 
few human casualties throughout, Fincher takes no stance on the subject of 
violence, nor does he responsibly handle it. Norton's character goes through 
few changes throughout, aside from becoming more liberated, and is never 
attempted to be developed as an actual person who might actually live on 
Earth, nor is any effort made to make him the least bit likable or 
sympathetic. Since Fincher wastes his chances to give Norton a character arc, 
or to make some sort of point on violence (unlike Oliver Stone's profound 
1994 satire, "Natural Born Killers"), the only recognizable meaning to get 
out of the film is, like I've already mentioned, almost identical to that of 
"American Beauty," minus the underlying themes and three-dimensional 
characters. 
The first hour is spectacularly fascinating, as it draws you into the 
Narrator, his petty life, the self-help groups he meets with, Marla, and the 
early appearances of Tyler Durden. I questioned exactly where everything was 
going because, thus far, the film had intrigued and pulled me in like very 
few film do. That's when the Fight Club starts, and where the picture loses 
its footing and plausability. Merely the idea of an underground club that 
gets its kicks out of hurting others and getting hurt is difficult to 
swallow, because the way that the masochistic group grows so quickly is 
ludicrous. Are there really people in the world who would indulge in a Fight 
Club? Yes, probably so. But it's foolish to believe that so many men would be 
pulled into it so quickly, and actually like doing it. Sorry, I just don't 
buy it.
In a role that requires massive frenticism and energy, Edward Norton is more 
than acceptable to bring the Narrator's personality to life, but has very 
little to do on a character level. Brad Pitt, in his most assured performance 
since 1995's "12 Monkeys," nonetheless remains an enigma, and although this 
is appropriate under the cirmcumstances, I question the reasons for his 
attraction to the thin role. If anyone escapes relatively unscathed, it is 
Helena Bonham Carter, in one of the most memorable supporting performances of 
the year. Her portrayal of Marla is one-of-a-kind, and very few people could 
have pulled it off with such fearless bravado and genuine comic sensibilites. 
In supporting turns, Meat Loaf Aday, as Bob, a man struck with testicular 
cancer whose estrogen level has gone up, forcing him to grow breasts, is 
treated as nothing but a joke, rather than a real person. This is 
unfortunate, considering that Aday gives an otherwise moving performance. The 
big mystery in the actor department is Jared Leto, who is so wasted as one of 
Fight Club's members, I suspect his part was criminally edited down to what 
is now more or a less a cameo.
By the film's last half-hour, I had simply stopped caring. The twist is 
admittedly surprising, but also preposterous. Director Fincher and 
screenwriter Jim-Uhls may believe that they have made something clever and 
slick, a film for the late-'90s generation, but it comes off purely as a 
gimmick, and a frustrating one at that. The final image of "Fight Club" is 
unforgettable and oddly beautiful, but only in the context of the scene 
itself, rather than the film as a whole. And there lies the problem with the 
movie--taking every scene on an individual basis, it is often madly 
brilliant, but put it all together, and it is a pretentious, incoherent mess.

Title
Review for Blue Streak (1999)
Directed by Les Mayfield.
Cast: Martin Lawrence, Luke Wilson, Dave Chappelle, Peter Greene, William 
Forsythe, Nicole Ari Parker, Tamala Jones.
1999 - 96 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and violence).
Reviewed September 19, 1999.
Ever seen "Beverly Hills Cop?" "48 Hours?" "Lethal Weapon?" "Rush Hour?" 
Well, if you have, in fact, seen any one of these films, then there's no 
reason to waste your time and money seeing "Blue Streak," yet another 
action/comedy (that seems strangely very old) that pairs a stock, 
wise-cracking african-american with a buddy of a different race. This 
tried-and-true formula can turn into financial gold, as proven by every one 
of the aformentioned pictures, but basically they are all the same, and "Blue 
Streak" is the most generic one yet. Sure, it is being released the exact 
same weekend that "Rush Hour" came out on last year, but it is almost devoid 
of that film's snappy writing and standout performances (from Chris Tucker 
and Jackie Chan).
Starting off with a typical jewel heist prologue, in which a thief, Miles 
Logan (Martin Lawrence), attempts to steal a $20-million diamond, he is 
ultimately caught when the plan goes awry, but is able to hide the highly 
valuable jewel in the ventilation shafts. Switch to two years later, Miles is 
released from prison, and immediately rebuffed by his old girlfriend (Tamala 
Jones), whom he lied to. "I thought you were a banker," she tells him. "No, a 
bank robber," he corrects her. Making his way to the location where he 
stashed the diamond, he is horrified to discover that the building is now the 
station for the LAPD. Through a sneaky series of misunderstandings on the 
police's part (including a fake badge, stolen ID, and forged paperwork), 
Miles is believed to be his alter ego, Detective Malone, and is almost 
instantly paired up with a partner, Carlson (Luke Wilson), in the robbery 
division. So as Miles must fake his way through being raised to the position 
of lead detective (something he knows nothing about), he also must find a way 
to track down the diamond, which is sure to be still lurking in the 
ventilation ducts.
Even if the basic premise is as old as the Rocky Mountains themselves, it can 
be done well, as long as the screenplay is witty and appropriately humorous, 
and the main actor is likable. Unfortunately, neither of these vital aspects 
hold up here. The screenplay, laughably written by three people, Michael 
Berry, John Blumenthal, amd Steve Carpenter, has nary a memorable line of 
dialogue nor one original thought in its head. Clearly aiming to be a funny 
comedy, the laughs are few and far between, and even then they cause nothing 
more than a brief giggle, only for the joke to be forgotten about five 
seconds later.
One thing these derivative cop comedies usually do get right is its lead 
star, but Martin Lawrence is never given the opportunity to strut his comedic 
talents (as he was in 1997's superior "Nothing to Lose"). It also doesn't 
help that his character of Miles has next to no redeeming qualities, and 
therefore, I didn't like or root for him. Miles is a thief, nothing more, and 
nowhere in the process of the film does he ever grow a conscience or realize 
he is just a low-life criminal. The plot developments in the last scene are 
especially unforgivable, as they make you question just what the point of the 
film was, and why it needed to be made in the first place.
All the other actors are unnecessarily wasted, and given very little to do. 
Faring the best (and a more winning presence than Lawrence) is Luke Wilson as 
his straight-arrow partner, Carlson. Wilson, previously seen in 1998's "Home 
Fries" and "Rushmore," is an up-and-coming performer who hopefully will go on 
to better, more established, film roles, rather than waste his time playing 
second fiddle to the zany likes of Lawrence. The lack of any true female 
characters is also disappointing. Tamala Jones (1997's hilarious "Booty 
Call") disappears after one scene near the beginning, while Nicole Ari Parker 
(1998's "Boogie Nights"), in a throwaway 5-minute role as a public defender, 
could have easily been further developed and have become a possible love 
interest for Lawrence. It sure needed something because, as is, the film has 
only one story (with absolutely no subplots), and is utterly empty and 
unsatisfying because of this.
A comedy without the laughs, and an action film with a non-existent level of 
excitement, "Blue Streak" is an obvious and misguided effort, with an 
inauspicious directing job by Les Mayfield. No technical attributes are worth 
mentioning either, as everything about the film, right down to the smallest 
detail, is nearly as cliched as a "Friday the 13th" movie, and as forgettable 
as an early-afternoon dream. What was the film's title again? Oh yeah, "Blue 
Streak." I better write that down before I forget it.

Title
Review for Legend of Bagger Vance, The (2000)
Directed by Robert Redford.
Cast: Matt Damon, Charlize Theron, Will Smith, J. Michael Moncrief, Joel 
Gretsch, Bruce McGill, Jack Lemmon.
2000 - 127 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for sexual situations, mild war violence, and profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, November 4, 2000.
With a cast that includes Matt Damon (1999's "The Talented Mr. Ripley"), Will 
Smith (1998's "Enemy of the State"), and Charlize Theron (1997's "Devil's 
Advocate"), and the classy Robert Redford (1998's "The Horse Whisperer") at 
the directing helm, "The Legend of Bagger Vance," based upon the novel by 
Steven Pressfield, has all of the pedigree to be a gorgeously photographed, 
thoughtful, low-key character drama. After sifting through all 127 minutes of 
it, however, at least I can still say it is well photographed. Director 
Redford has created a slow-moving, occasionally tedious film set in the Great 
Depression of the early 1930s, and then deals with none of the hardships or 
issues that went along with the time period, instead opting to weave a sort 
of half-hearted fantasy that is rarely ever involving.
Following the untimely death of her father, wealthy Savannah heiress Adele 
Invergordon (Charlize Theron), in an attempt to avoid foreclosure of the 
country club that is owned by her family, creates a huge golf tournament 
between pros Bobby Jones (Joel Gretsch) and Walter Hagen (Bruce McGill) with 
the grand prize being a whopping $10,000. Searching for a third player who 
will stand for the great city of Savannah itself, the town elects the 
services of one Rannulph Junuh (Matt Damon), a once-great golfer and WWI vet 
(not to mention Adele's ex-lover) who has slid into obscurity in the 
backwoods of Savannah, spending his nights drinking his life away with a 
group of poker buddies.
While on the golf course one night mourning the loss of his swing and 
debating whether to accept the offer to compete in the tournament, Rannulph 
meets Bagger Vance (Will Smith), an honest mystery man who becomes his 
personal muse (and caddie). Setting out to help Rannulph find himself once 
again through the game he used to love so much, Bagger seems to be dedicating 
his whole being to aiding in Rannulph's personal redemption, but who exactly 
is he? And where did he come from?
Opening with a silly wraparound sequence (featuring Jack Lemmon), and then 
leading into a neverending narration that resembles a cheesy history lesson 
on WWI and the troubles in the south, it isn't until nearly the twenty-minute 
mark that "The Legend of Bagger Vance" finds its footing. For a director as 
skilled as Robert Redford, whose "The Horse Whisperer" pulled you into its 
story from the very beginning, this noticeable flaw could have easily been 
corrected. Instead, it comes off as sloppy filmmaking.
The potentially intriguing (if overworn) issue of race relations in the 
south, circa 1930, is overlooked, bypassed for a tale that is deeply 
sugarcoated and unconvincing. Whether Redford wanted to make a realistic 
drama or a reality-based fantasy, there is no excuse for not even making a 
mention of the fact that Bagger Vance is a black man. Had he shown up in 
Savannah, Georgia in the midst of the Great Depression, it is a given that he 
wouldn't have exactly been welcomed with open arms by the townspeople, and he 
certainly would not have been allowed to act as a caddie on a ritzy country 
club resort. Furthermore, the subplot about the Great Depression that has 
recently befallen on Savannah acts as a cheap plotting device, instead of a 
thoughtful part of the story.
Lest it seem that there is nothing to recommend in "The Legend of Bagger 
Vance," it should be noted that this is definitely not the case. While the 
characters aren't exactly poster children for three-dimensionality, the 
actors are good enough that they easily overcome the snags. Matt Damon is 
believable as the internally lost Rannulph Junuh, even if we never get a full 
sense of why he has disappeared into a little, black hole, while Will Smith's 
sweet-faced Bagger acts as a fitting partner to Rannulph. Smith's role is 
unchallenging, but he does what he can with it, and it's nice to see him 
appearing in a film void of aliens and shoot-'em-ups. And Charlize Theron, as 
the conflicted Adele, is very good, perhaps the standout in the cast. 
Impassioned, subtly funny, and strong-willed, Theron knows how to light up 
the screen, and deserves a leading role soon.
Also effective is the romantic relationship between Rannulph and Adele. With 
only a small amount of time dedicated to this subplot, Damon and Theron 
successfully convince us of their strong past relationship, and screenwriter 
Jeremy Leven makes every line of his smart dialogue count.
What "The Legend of Bagger Vance" comes down to is its climactic fourth round 
in the golf tournament, with Rannulph pacing just behind his two competitors. 
Manipulative, more than a little implausible, but with beautiful 
cinematography (by Michael Ballhaus), to boot, it sums up the entire film. 
The outcome of the contest may be a little surprising, but getting to that 
point is a battle in itself. 

Title
Review for Bring It On (2000)
Directed by Peyton Reed.
Cast: Kirsten Dunst, Eliza Dushku, Jesse Bradford, Gabrielle Union, Melissa 
George, Nicole Bilderback, Lindsay Slone, Richard Hillman, Ian Roberts, Cody 
McMains.
2000 - 99 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, August 26, 2000.
A fitfully satiric portrait of a California-set high school cheerleading 
squad, Peyton Reed's "Bring It On" is a bubbly, little comedic gem, and 
unexpectedly sharp-witted, to boot. While director Reed and screenwriter 
Jessica Bendinger could have easily made a shallow, annoying bubblegum movie 
about gorgeous, trim pom-pom girls, they have wisely opted to take the high 
road and, not only make a spirited comedy, a sweet romance, and a competitive 
sports flick, but also one which includes a bit of wise social commentary. 
At Rancho Carne High School, the peppy cheerleading squad, the Toros, have 
won the national championships for five years in a row. This year, however, 
things are taking a turn for the new, as previous captain of the squad, 
nicknamed Big Red (Lindsay Sloane), has passed her exclusive reign over to 
Torrance Shipman (Kirsten Dunst), a committed senior who has devoted her high 
school years to becoming the best cheerleader possible. With an unsupportive, 
cheating boyfriend (Richard Hillman) and academics not being her strongest 
suit, cheering has aided Torrance in connecting to her high school 
experience, and helped her to fit in in a place where she otherwise might not 
have. Because she is now the captain of the squad, Torrance feels obligated 
not to let anyone down.
While holding tryouts, Torrance finally finds a person to fill the last 
vacant slot in Missy (Eliza Dushku), a straight-talking new girl in town who 
does a killer backflip and informs everyone right off that, since the school 
doesn't offer gymnastics, cheering was a last resort. When Missy takes one 
look at their routines, however, she realizes that, for the last five years, 
the supposedly inventive Toros have been stealing their routines from the 
inner city school of East Compton High, who have what it takes to go to 
nationals, but have never had the money. When Torrance is taken by Missy to 
witness their own thievery first-hand, she is shocked and disappointed, 
immediately becoming determined not to let this stop her from making things 
right for the East Compton Clovers and their headstrong captain Isis 
(Gabrielle Union), and bouncing back with a fresh routine that is just as 
good, if not better, than their plagiaristic old ones.
"Bring It On" is the latest entry in the increasingly weary "teen" genre, so 
it comes as a surprise to find that, with zippy, highly energetic pacing, and 
a group of talented actors who excel in their potentially two-dimensional 
roles, this is one of the better movies of its type all year. While falling 
into the usual pits of the "teen" movie (its occasional predictability and 
overall cliches), there are several aspects of "Bring It On" that make it 
rise above the average muck:
#1: The Writing. With acerbic, witty dialogue, "Bring It On" holds the 
distinction of having some of the most memorable dialogue in a teen film 
since 1999's sparkling "Election." While funny and usually keeping in tone 
with the generally lighthearted nature of the picture, screenwriter Bendinger 
also stays fairly accurate in her portrayal of the characters, none of whom 
are perfect, and each of which have flaws and a remaining hint of immaturity 
about them, as all 17-year-olds normally do.
#2: The Acting. Ever since her superb acting debut in 1994's "Interview With 
the Vampire," Kirsten Dunst has been a young star on the rise. But not to 
shortchange her by referring to her as merely a "star," Dunst is also a true, 
top-of-the-line actress who chooses smart roles in diverse projects. Dunst's 
Torrance may be a teenage girl (and an unusually realistic one), but she also 
has a firm head on her shoulders, and realizes the difference between right 
and wrong. Extra points must be given for her strong will; Torrance could, in 
fact, pose as a model for feminine empowerment everywhere. All other central 
performances are undoubtedly just as good, from Eliza Dushku (TV's "Buffy"), 
as Missy; to the magnetic Jesse Bradford (1993's "King of the Hill") as 
Missy's alternative brother Cliff, who catches Torrance's eye; to Gabrielle 
Union (1999's "10 Things I Hate About You"), as the no-nonsense Isis.
#3: The Outcome. While most teen flicks can have their whole endings 
telegraphed far in advance, the climax of "Bring It On," set at the nationals 
competition, is not only stunningly choreographed (the actors clearly had to 
learn the routine and perform most of it themselves), but also relatively 
suspenseful, as it is impossible to predict whether the Toros or the Clovers 
will come out on top. For once, we have a pseudo-sports movie that actually 
attempts to be a little different, and doesn't place its bets solely on one 
team.
Joyfully entertaining and brightly filmed with an appropriate palette of 
sunny colors, "Bring It On" is, behind its potentially vapid exterior, a very 
smart movie with a lot of heart. If anything, director Reed knew exactly how 
to sell his film to me, once and for all, by tacking on a musical rendition 
of the '80s pop classic, "Mickey," lip synched by the whole cast, during the 
end credits. How could you possibly go wrong with a slam-bang conclusion like 
that?

Title
Review for Idle Hands (1999)
 Directed by Rodman Flender.
 Cast: Devon Sawa, Seth Green, Elden Henson, Jessica Alba, Vivica A. Fox, 
 Jack Noseworthy, Katie Wright, Connie Ray, Fred Willard.
 1999 - 92 minutes
 Rated R (for violence, gore, profanity, nudity, and sexual situations).
 Reviewed May 1, 1999.
 If "Idle Hands," the new horror-comedy directed with devilish glee by 
 Rodman Flender ("Leprechaun 2"), has it's fair share of problems, which 
 it does, you'll just have to excuse me for not mentioning some of them. 
 First and foremost, this film was an extremely nostalgic experience for 
 me, a fun and twisted throwback to the goofy slasher films of the '80s. 
 Last year's crummy "I Still Know What You Did Last Summer" was also 
 exactly like '80s horror, but was tiresome and had no true entertainment 
 value. In other words, "I Still Know..." took itself way too seriously, 
 and therefore suffered the consequences, while "Idle Hands" knows 
 exactly how to have a good time, be damned. 
 The film gets off to a fabulous start, as a kooky middle-aged married 
 couple (Fred Willard, Connie Ray) have just settled down for the night. 
 Seeing the words, "I'm under the bed," sprawled on the ceiling, they 
 immediately hear a noise downstairs. The husband goes down to check it 
 out, and never returns. Then she goes down to see where he is. You know 
 the procedure, but instead of feeling cliched, the scene is both 
 genuinely suspenseful and had me rolling in the aisles at its already 
 over-the-top, sick humor. 
 The next morning, we meet 17-year-old slacker Anton Tobias (Devon Sawa), 
 a clueless teenager who spends his days loafing on the couch watching 
 television and smoking marijuana. After not seeing his parents for a 
 couple days, he tells his friends, Mick (Seth Green) and Pnub (Elden 
 Henson), but doesn't really think anything of it. After accidentally 
 discovering their bodies (whose location in the house will remain unsaid 
 so the surprise will be kept), Anton quickly discovers that his right 
 hand is possessed by Satan, and is starting to control him, killing 
 anybody in its path, including Mick and Pnub. When Anton confronts him 
 about his unfortunate situation, his dark, brooding neighbor (Jack 
 Noseworthy) remarks that, "Idle hands are the devil's playground. Just 
 keep them busy." Ultimately, the violent proceedings lead up to the 
 school's Halloween dance, in which the now-severed hand goes on a 
 murderous rampage.
 "Idle Hands" is a delirious, no-holds-barred attempt at creating a 
 slasher movie with lots of campy and outrageous humor. While some of it 
 fails (including the whole subplot dealing with Mick and Pnub, who 
 return from the grave), much of it really is funny, and I couldn't help 
 but be reminded of the so-bad-they're-great '80s horror flicks that this 
 film obviously gets its inspiration from. Back in those days, there were 
 very few redeeming qualities, just gory killing after gore killing, 
 intermingled with a helpful dosage of gratuitous nudity. In the '90s, 
 however, things have matured a bit, there isn't quite as much blood to 
 be had in these types of movies, and there is never any t&a. With "Idle 
 Hands," this has all changed, and you would not believe how much 
 enjoyment is to be had at seeing a film like that once again, and on the 
 big screen.
 For one thing, this film does a much better job at portraying Halloween 
 (my favorite holiday) than the self-titled "Halloween: H20," and the 
 very first shot in the film is an instant classic (at least for me), as 
 the camera starts on a brightly-lit pumpkin and then pans through a 
 heavily Halloween-decorated yard, and into an upstairs window. Due to 
 this example and several other impressively-shot scenes, the 
 cinematography is distinctive and well-done, as is the memorable music 
 score by composer Graeme Revell.
 Once Anton's hand is possessed, "Idle Hands" unfortunately begins to 
 meander with an overemphasis on slapstick, but once the hands is cut off 
 and it sets out for the dance in the last thirty minutes, the movie 
 returns to its high-energy mode and is a treat from there on. The rock 
 band, "Offspring," makes an appropriate cameo at the dance as they sing 
 the Ramones songs, "I Wanna Be Sedated," while nubile teens are 
 dispatched of in gruesome ways, and two particular girls, one of which 
 is Anton's new girlfriend, Molly (Jessica Alba), must escape through the 
 ventilation system and crawl through a sharp, spinning fan that has been 
 stopped up (but for how long?) by a shoe. 
 In the central roles, Devon Sawa is an adequate protagonist who is given 
 plenty of opportunity to show off his talent (or lack thereof) of 
 physical comedy. Seth Green and Elden Henson have some fun with their 
 respective roles, especially after they have been killed (with Mick 
 having a beer bottle engouged in his forehead, and Pnub actually 
 carrying around his severed head). Jessica Alba is nice eye candy, in a 
 ditsy female sort of way, but as was so evident in the older slasher 
 movies, is a one-dimensional damsel-in-distress. Finally, Vivica A. Fox 
 is hysterical in the smallish role of Deb, a spicy Druid priestess who 
 sets out to find the possessed hand.
 "Idle Hands" is bloody, violent, dumb, and shallow, but it also boosts 
 some clever ideas amidst the rising body count. It may not be a great 
 movie, but it's one of the most amusing times I've had at the multiplex 
 this whole year.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for 200 Cigarettes (1999)
Paramount; rated R (brief nudity, language, sexual situations); 97 minutes
Cast: Courtney Love, Paul Rudd, Martha Plimpton, Brian McCardie, Gaby Hoffman,
Kate Hudson, Jay Mohr, Christina Ricci, Angela Featherstone, Nicole Parker,
Dave Chappelle, Casey Affleck, Ben Affleck, Catherine Kellner, Janeane
Garofalo, Elvis Costello, Guillermo Diaz.
200 Cigarettes is a charming enough diversion and these days that ain't bad.
The feature directing debut from veteran casting director Risa Bramon Garcia
ably displays her well known talent for casting but is unlikely to help her
reputation much beyond that.
The film follows five interconnecting stories concerning people who are all
about to converge at a New Year's Eve party in New York City, 1981.
Monica (Martha Plimpton) is the worried hostess of the party who tries
desperately to keep her friend Hillary (Catherine Kellner) in her apartment
while they wait for someone, anyone, else to show up.
Monica's ex-boyfriend Eric (Brian McCardie) is about to be dumped by his
girlfriend Bridget (Nicole Parker), who receives moral support from her friend
Caitlyn (Angela Featherstone).
Lucy (Courtney Love) and Kevin (Paul Rudd) are long time friends who are
beginning to discover their attraction to each other after Jack's performance
artist girlfriend Ellie (Janeane Garofalo) dumps him.
Val (Christina Ricci) is desperate to experience the pleasures of the flesh
and sees her cousin Monica's party as a perfect way to do this.  So she
convinces her cautious friend Stephie (Gaby Hoffman) to leave Long Island for
the city with the promise they'll meet up with a band.  They get lost and meet
up with two young roadies (Casey Affleck and Guillermo Diaz).
Finally, there is Cindy (Kate Hudson), a neurotic klutz who has fallen in love
with vain actor Jack (Jay Mohr).  She continually embarrasses herself as the
two of them have a date from hell.
Also involved in various stories are a goofy bartender (Ben Affleck) and a
"disco cabbie" (Dave Chappelle) who sees himself as super fly and dishes out
love advice whether his passengers want it or not.
200 Cigarettes is a light romantic comedy which cruises along on the charm of
its large, and talented, cast and tries to cash in on 80s nostalgia.  There's
really no reason for the film to be set in 1981 and the only real references
made to this are the occasional appearances of Elvis Costello (who plays
himself).  Instead it feels more like a tool to sell a soundtrack full of
retro-hits and draw in the MTV crowd (the film happens to be a MTV production)
who helped make The Wedding Singer (1998) an unexpected smash hit.
The performers are all solid but a few especially stand out.  Love, in her
first film since her acclaimed work in The People Vs. Larry Flynt (1996),
further proves herself a natural screen presence and develops the film's
strongest romantic chemistry with the equally charismatic Rudd.  Ricci is a
comic delight in a small role and Plimpton displays her expert timing.
McCardie and Hudson (who has been generating a lot of press because she is
Goldie Hawn's daughter) make very strong impressions in their first major
screen roles.  McCardie's Eric is faced with a self discovery that is every
man's worst nightmare and the actor gets a lot of mileage out of it, he has
some terrific scenes with Plimpton.  Hudson proves to be an immediately
likable personality and she gets several physical comedy bits which she
handles like a pro.
The ending is a bit of a let down.  Most of the characters break off into
random couples after the party which only shows how little emotional
investment is developed with them.  The filmmakers also choose to show the
party at the end of the film in a series of Polaroids with narration from
Chappelle.  This provides a couple of funny bits but lacks any real impact.
Still, 200 Cigarettes is decent mindless fun that's perfectly appropriate if
you're just looking for some light entertainment.

Title
Review for Battlefield Earth (2000)
Directed by Roger Christian.
Cast: John Travolta, Barry Pepper, Forest Whitaker, Kim Coates, Sabine 
Karsenti, Kelly Preston.
2000 - 117 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for violence).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, May 13, 2000.
Every once in a while, a film comes along that causes me to disregard all of 
my writing skills because, when truth be told, just thinking about it seems 
to notably decrease my IQ. There is no way to be intelligent when discussing 
a movie so repugnantly atrocious and unintelligible as "Battlefield Earth," 
reportedly John Travolta's dream project for ten years and based on the cult 
sci-fi novel by L. Ron Hubbard. Incompetent in every way possible, it is a 
collision course of non-ideas, zero-dimensional characters, shoddy special 
effects, blase performances, and a complete disregard for anything that could 
possibly make any kind of sense to a human being watching such an 
embarrassment. 
The plot is fairly incomprehensible, but it goes something like this: Set in 
the year 3000, when "man is an endangered species" on Earth, a 9-foot-tall 
alien race known as the Psychlos have wiped out almost all human existence, 
with only a minority of earthlings left to do the Psychlos' bidding. Jonny 
Goodboy Tyler (Barry Pepper, and yes, that's his character's real name) is 
captured by the Psychlos, headed by Terl (John Travolta) and his henchman 
(Forest Whitaker), and sent to Ft. Knox to steal all of the gold that has 
been locked up in a vault for the last one-thousand years. I think that's 
some of the plot; I can't be too sure.
Thinking back on "Battlefield Earth," the movie is a giant, 2-hour haze, not 
only because I was struggling to keep focus on the film and not drift into 
slumber for the middle section, but because the picture is a jumble of 
already bad ideas that were made far, far worse when actually translated to 
film, under the phenomenally inauspicious helm of director Roger Christian. 
There are no characters to care about (or even get to know), the villains are 
disposable and unthreatening, and the action sequences about as exciting as 
the entirety of 1982's "My Dinner With Andre." Let's not forget the laughable 
matte paintings, which looked more realistic in 1939's "The Wizard of Oz." Or 
the screen wipes that, without fail, were used as the transition from each 
scene to the next, a 'la "Star Wars," ad nausea.
Prior to its release, John Travolta set off on a countrywide promotional tour 
to support this film, but my question is, had he even seen the finished 
product? Was he really there when filming was underway, or was that his evil 
doppleganger, out to sabotage his career a second time? You'd have to see 
"Battlefield Earth" to believe it, but don't, under any circumstances, see 
it. Some movies have the quality of being so bad they are entertaining. 
"Battlefield Earth," on the other hand, is so bad it's depressing. I would 
never throw around such words lightly, but on the evidence presented here, it 
may very well be one of the worst motion pictures I have ever had the 
misfortune of sitting through. A disaster of epic proportions!

Title
Review for Dick (1999)
Directed by Andrew Fleming.
Cast: Kirsten Dunst, Michelle Williams, Dan Hedaya, Will Ferrell, Bruce 
McCulloch, Devon Gummersall, Harry Shearer, Saul Rubinek, Teri Garr, Ana 
Gasteyer, David Foley, Jim Breuer, French Stewart.
1999 - 95 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity, sexual innuendo, and double entendres).
Reviewed August 5, 1999.
Perhaps the sunniest, most innocently charming comedy since 1997's "Romy and 
Michele's High School Reunion" or 1995's "Clueless," "Dick" is a sly, 
extremely potent political satire, aided by a first-rate cast that hungrily 
dig into their respective roles with a vengeance. Moving from scene to scene 
without a moment's time to spare, the film immediately pulls you into its 
surprisingly believable, if somewhat improbable story, as you follow the two 
lovably ditzy central characters that, nonetheless, are thankfully never 
turned into wild caricatures. The same cannot be said about the non-fictional 
figures, such as Henry Kissinger and Washington Post writers Bob Woodward and 
Carl Bernstein, but who really cares? The movie is just too enjoyably 
innocuous to knock it with any major criticisms.
Set during the spring of 1972 during the President Richard Nixon/Watergate 
scandal, "Dick" is, to put it bluntly, a truly ingenious idea for a comedy 
that both teenagers and adults can appreciate (for different reasons). 
15-year-olds Betsy Jobs (Kirsten Dunst) and Arlene Lorenzo (Michelle 
Williams) are the best of friends who "have less going on upstairs than 
yams." At the start of the picture, Betsy is staying over at Arlene's house 
and, late at night, they sneak out of her mother's Watergate apartment to 
mail a letter to the "Win a Date With Bobby Sherman Contest" from "Tiger 
Beat" magazine. In the midst of this, however, they inadvertently witness the 
infamous Watergate break-in but cheerfully think nothing of it. 
Coincidentally, the following day Arlene and Betsy attend a class field trip 
to the White House where, cautious that they may know something about the 
president's involvement in Watergate, President Nixon (Dan Hedaya, doing a 
fairly impressive impression) appoints the two as the "White House's Official 
Dog Walkers," as well as his "Personal Youth Advisors." This is only the 
start of the film which, in the course of its 95-minute running time, Betsy 
and Arlene often unknowingly become involved in practically every notable 
occurrence in Nixon's last few months before resigning. What was on the 
missing 18 1/2 minutes of Nixon's audio recording? Why, it was Arlene 
confessing her unrequited, devotional love for "Dick," and singing a rousing 
rendition of an Olivia Newton John song. Who was Deep Throat? Again, it was 
the code name for the two girls, who notify journalists Woodward and 
Bernstein about the CREEP document they discovered, as well as all of the 
people around the president who were associated with Watergate. Why did Nixon 
abruptly call off the Vietnam War? Because Betsy and Arlene assuredly told 
him "war is wrong." And where did Nixon get the idea to hold up two peace 
signs with his hands before boarding his plane? Well, duh! It's because the 
teenage duo had previously taught it to him!
"Dick" was directed by the unlikely Andrew Fleming, whose previous credits 
include 1994's college dramedy, "Threesome," and 1996's witch thriller, "The 
Craft." With "Dick," Fleming tests the waters of bright comedy and political 
satire, which it may not be as successful at as this spring's masterful, 
so-accurate-it's-scary, "Election," but is easily more clever with its 
one-of-a-kind, constantly innovative storyline. This film is a delightful 
treat throughout, for several reason. One, of course, is that the way the 
movie incorporates these two fictional girls into the middle of Watergate, 
and makes it fairly plausible, no less, is an example of clearly inventive 
storytelling. Two, the recreation of Washington, D.C., circa 1972, complete 
with stunningly accurate costumes and a perfectly-chosen soundtrack, evokes a 
time and place that isn't often seen this vibrantly, and reminded me 
somewhat, in strictly artificial ways, of Robert Altman's 1975 masterpiece, 
"Nashville," which is near the top of my personal list of the greatest films 
I've ever seen. And three, "Dick," in one liberating moment after the other, 
brings off a sort of pure joyousness that is not found in very many of 
today's films. For all of its knowing, at times biting, references to Nixon 
and Watergate and the rest of the time period, the movie, plain and simple, 
ties the otherwise raunchy "American Pie" as this year's most innocently 
gleeful movie. 
The casting of the two teenage girl characters was one of the most vital 
elements for the film's achievement, and they struck gold with the pairing of 
Kirsten Dunst ("Drop Dead Gorgeous") and Michelle Williams (TV's "Dawson's 
Creek"). As the giggly, slightly geeky Betsy and Arlene, inseperable best 
friends who move right through history in the making and don't look back, 
these two fine actresses work so well together, and seperately, that you fall 
in love with their characters the second you see them. With her two most 
recent films, "Dick" and "Drop Dead Gorgeous," Kirsten Dunst, appearing in 
feature films since around age 7, where she made her debut in 1990's "The 
Bonfire of the Vanities," has become incomparable with any other actress in 
her age group. Dunst has rightfully proven that she can play any sort of role 
in any type of film, and do it well; she can play comedy ("Dick," "Drop Dead 
Gorgeous," "Wag the Dog"), she can play drama ("Interview With the Vampire," 
"The Devil's Arithmetic"), she can play action ("Small Soldiers"), she can 
play intelligent ("Drop Dead Gorgeous"), and she can play dense (that's where 
"Dick" comes in). 
Complimenting her in every way is Michelle Williams, too often overlooked for 
her work in the soapy "Dawson's Creek" as the slutty, misunderstood Jen 
Lindley. I dare anyone to take a look at her in that television series, and 
then see "Dick," and not tell me that this young actress is a character 
chameleon who, if she continues to play her cards right, also has a 
definitely hopeful acting future ahead of her. As Arlene, who grows an 
infatuation for Dick, replacing all of the Bobby Sherman posters on her wall 
with ones of Nixon, until Betsy and she overhear him abusing his dog, 
Checkers, and spitting out curse words and prejudiced epithets about Jews, 
Williams is both funny and appropriately endearing. 
Together, these two girls are irresistible in both their bubbly, kind-hearted 
personalities, as well as the way they get involved in historic events and 
yet, in the first half, their greatest concern is when they will get to play 
with Checkers. If Arlene and Betsy don't come off as the smartest people ever 
to walk the Earth, they also are wisely not portrayed as completely stupid; 
in other words, they are average teenagers who still have a lot of growing up 
to do, but hopefully will never lose that amiable "glow" that they exude.
In the supporting roles as actual historical, political figures, the rest of 
the cast blends in very well. Dan Hedaya is almost uncanny in his portrayal 
of Richard Nixon, and even if Dick does turn out to be both a liar and an 
untrustworthy individual, you still can't help but feel a little sympathetic 
towards him. This has more to do, I think, with the likable Hedaya than it 
does with the late president himself. Also of note are Will Ferrell (a 
"Saturday Night Live" alum) and Bruce McCulloch (a "Kids in the Hall" alum), 
who are excellent in their decidedly comic interpretations of Bob Woodward 
and Carl Bernstein. All other actors could have been used to stronger effect, 
however, including Saul Rubinek, as Henry Kissinger; Harry Shearer, as G. 
Gordon Liddy; Ana Gasteyer (also of "SNL"), as Nixon secretary Rosemary 
Woods; and Teri Garr, as Arlene's single mother.
Being all of 17-years-old myself, I was nowhere to be found back in the days 
when Vietnam was all too close to home, Nixon was in office, and the 
Watergate scandal was the talk of the country, but as long as you know the 
basic outline of what went on in 1972, and are familiar with most of the key 
events and figures, "Dick" is an exuberant, if light and fluffy, motion 
picture that works on two levels: As a humorous account of a certain, 
controversial moment in history, and as an unforced, gentle coming-of-age 
story. The use of popular '70s pop music is also put to often marvelous 
effect, particularly Elton John's "Crocodile Rock" in a lovely scene in which 
Betsy tells Arlene what the term, "Deep Throat," means and they immediately 
go crazy in a moment of childhood giddiness, and also in the 
exceptionally-done last scene, played to the tune of Carly Simon's "You're So 
Vain." Andrew Fleming's "Dick" may not be a deep, meaningful motion picture, 
but it sure is a sweet one.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman.
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Talented Mr. Ripley, The (1999)
Directed by Anthony Minghella.
Cast: Matt Damon, Gwyneth Paltrow, Jude Law, Cate Blanchett, Philip Seymour 
Hoffman, Jack Davenport, James Rebhorn, Philip Baker Hall.
1999 - 135 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, brief nudity, and gore).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, December 28, 1999.
Anthony Minghella's last picture, "The English Patient," was lush and 
visually beautiful, but its attempts at emotional catharsis and intimately 
drawn characters fell flat, due to its ultimate unevenness. Based on the 
first in a series of novels by Patricia Highsmith, in which the protagonist 
(and antagonist) happens to be Thomas Ripley, a sociopath, "The Talented Mr. 
Ripley" dilutes Minghella's past problems to bring us one of the most 
challenging and thought-provoking thrillers in recent memory. A film in which 
we follow a character who just so happens to be mentally unhinged, it also 
holds the ability to genuinely surprise because we grow to, on some level, 
like Tom, and even at times when he does awful things to other people, it 
usually seems perversely just.
The ball gets rolling in New York City in 1958, when a man (James Rebhorn) 
persuades Tom Ripley (Matt Damon), who says he is a Princeton graduate, to 
travel to Europe and persuade his rebellious son, Dickie Greenleaf (Jude 
Law), to return home with him and leave behind his excessively luxurious 
lifestyle. Tom agrees, and is soon in Italy, becoming pals with Dickie, who 
starts hanging out with him and taking him to jazz clubs, even after he 
discovers Tom's true purposes for the trip, and  his girlfriend, Marge 
(Gwyneth Paltrow). Things go well for a while, but Tom gradually becomes more 
and more infatuated with Dickie, to the point where he has the capabilities 
to do anything if he can't have him.
One may read the plot synopsis and think to themselves, "been there, done 
that," but they would be wrong, as I haven't even begun to discuss the many 
further plot developments, all of which come together to create a complex and 
absolutely electrifying motion picture. Unlike most thrillers, which follow a 
rather cliched pattern of rising tension before a "fight to the finish" 
climactic battle, "The Talented Mr. Ripley" soaks you into the story slowly, 
but surely, until you are completely involved in the goings-on. The fact that 
the film's first hour is rather deceptive only aids in the first violent 
outburst being all the more startling, and the death at hand oddly justified. 
Matt Damon, in his first satisfying role since 1997's "Good Will Hunting," is 
perfectly cast as the likable, yet occasionally threatening Tom Ripley. Tom, 
a confused young man who isn't sure where his life is going or who he should 
even be, decides that impersonating others' identities might make more sense, 
as he says, "I always thought it would be better to be a fake somebody than a 
real nobody." Tom is obviously a conflicted person who truthfully believes he 
is a nobody, and we naturally care about his feelings, despite watching him 
commit crime after crime. Damon is a boyishly good-looking actor who, here, 
also believably hints at a darker side behind his winning exterior. This is a 
top-notch character for Damon, and an intelligent career move, as he really 
does need another movie that, like "Good Will Hunting," shows off his refined 
acting skills.
Jude Law is also very good as Dickie Greenleaf, a man that can be kind and 
caring, and the next minute be cold and hateful. "There are those times when 
Dickie makes you feel like you are the only person in the world besides him," 
Marge tells Tom. "He's so good at it. That's why people love him so." Tom is 
drawn to Dickie, even when he isn't being a very nice person, and it is the 
attributes of Law that help to pull this tricky role off. Dickie is so 
constantly alluring and fascinating that one can wholeheartedly understand 
why Tom would be won over so much by him.
The two central female roles are somewhat underwritten, but the actresses 
that Minghella has cast are so extraordinary that they make the characters 
their own. Gwyneth Paltrow, as Marge, is somewhat limited in the confines of 
her role, but is touching and sympathetic, nonetheless. 
Meanwhile, Cate Blanchett, as Meredith Logue, a beautiful American debutante 
who meets Tom at the train station when they first arrive in Italy, and keeps 
bumping into him, adds wonderful flavor to her character. Blanchett may have 
even less screen time than Paltrow, but in many ways, is far more memorable. 
Meredith grows to care for Tom, even though she thinks he is Dickie, based on 
what he told her at the train station, and this confusion causes problems 
later in the picture, especially in a scene of extreme technical beauty and 
calculation, in which she meets Marge and her friend, Peter (Jack Davenport), 
at a restaurant. Each one is waiting for Tom Ripley, but Meredith believes he 
is Dickie, whom Marge has been desperately trying to find since he, more or 
less, disappeared from her life after taking a trip with Tom. This may sound 
more complicated and difficult to understand than it actually is. Not to 
worry; Minghella knows how to toy with the expectations of his audience, and 
succeeds brilliantly in this respect. 
Rounding out the major players are Philip Seymour Hoffman, despicable as 
Dickie's snotty-nosed friend, Freddie; and Jack Davenport, as Marge's friend, 
Peter, who grows a liking to Tom. Davenport, an actor I don't believe I've 
ever seen before, has extraordinary chemistry with Damon in their scenes 
together, and appropriately comes off as a pure romantic as Peter.
Precise and texturally detailed in both its story and the sumptuous 
cinematography of the Italian cities, beaches, and countryside, "The Talented 
Mr. Ripley" is a somewhat old-fashioned suspense film that Alfred Hitchcock 
would have been proud of. Minghella clearly showed how good of a director he 
might be in the right situation with "The English Patient," and with "The 
Talented Mr. Ripley," he has hit his full stride. This a stunner of a 
thriller, both mature in its writing, also by Minghella, and provocative in 
its inclinations and plot twists, which always feel natural, rather than 
manipulative--two refreshing qualities you almost never find in the same film 
nowadays. A winner. 

Title
Review for Soft Toilet Seats (1999)
Directed by Tina Valinsky.
Cast: David Alex Rosen, Alexa Jago, Sammi Davis, Jonathan Aube, Michael 
Greene, Margaret Blye, Terri Hoyos, Jim Golden.
1999 - 107 minutes.
Not Rated (equivalent of an R for nudity, sex, profanity, and mild violence).
Opens 10/99 (limited).
Reviewed July 22, 1999.
The name of the movie is "Soft Toilet Seats." Get your laughs out of the way 
right now from that silly, downright ridiculous title, because you are 
unlikely to get many, if any, laughs out of viewing this so-called 
independent romantic comedy. The romance, er, the relationship centerpiece, 
that holds the film together is just about the only thing that works in the 
movie, as the comedy is almost always obvious and poorly written, the drama 
is as ineffective as could be, and worst of all, the movie makes fun of 
death. Not like 1998's "Very Bad Things," which actually had some 
surprisingly humorous parts, but as in offensively making jokes about a very 
serious and poignant death, only to have the "comedy" make a big, loud SPLAT! 
on the floor.
Arne Steinberg (David Alex Rosen) is a hopelessly single man in his 
late-20's/early-30's whose best friend and real estate agent, Joey (Jonathan 
Aube), talks him into moving out of his pleasant Venice Beach den and into a 
suburban San Fernando Valley home, where families surround him from all 
sides. He doesn't much like the neighborhood, and dislikes it even more when 
he discovers that the previous tenant, a young woman by the name of Annie 
Ashland (Sammi Davis), allegedly committed suicide. Arne isn't in the house 
for a whole day when the beautiful Tilly Rensley (Alexa Jago), a self-assured 
English woman and best friend of Annie, shows up at his doorstep, back from a 
6-month expedition in the Brazilian Rain Forest. After Arne is forced to 
break the bad news to Tilly that Annie died, Tilly mourns (in an 
embarrassingly unfuuny scene that goes on forever as Tilly and Arne cry 
together and throw a roll of toilet paper back and forth as they wipe their 
eyes) and then sets out, with Arne in tow, to get to the bottom of her 
mysterious death, positive that Annie wasn't the type of person to kill 
herself.
"Soft Toilet Seats" is the type of movie in which the actors are so energized 
and spirited that you become convinced these poor souls didn't even realize 
that what they were filming wasn't funny in the least. Not even mildly 
amusing, where you believe something is "funny," but not "funny ha-ha." Nope, 
the screenplay gives them nothing to work with, and is so over overwrought 
and intellectually dead that the experience of watching it becomes more 
depressing than actually boring. First-time writer/director Tina Valinsky 
proves here that she certainly doesn't have a way with words nor does she 
know how to make a compelling mystery. The amateurish dialogue constantly 
cries out for another couple rewrites, and even though the film is supposed 
to make you want to know what really happened to Annie, as Tilly and Arne 
investigate, it doesn't include one intriguing sequence when dealing with 
their detective charades.
At first, Arne has no interest in finding out Annie's possible murderer, but 
initially goes along for the ride just because of his infatuation for Tilly, 
who thinks nothing of walking around in her birthday suit. Soon, however, 
their investigation swirls him in and he also becomes set on finding the 
truth, all the while forming a close bond with the kind, determined Tilly 
that doesn't go beyond friendship until the inevitable first kiss that 
appears during the last scene. We've seen this sort of relationship before in 
much better movies, but it still brings on a certain charm, thanks to the 
performances by David Alex Rosen and Alexa Jago. Obviously not the most 
skillful actors, they nonetheless work well togerher, and Jago in particular 
is someone to watch (she reminded me a lot of Kerri Green, a talented actress 
from the 80's who starred in such films as "The Goonies" and "Lucas," but 
then quit the acting business).
The flashbacks to Annie and Tilly's friendship is the real vacuous area of 
the film, as the scenes do not convince us that they are really friends, even 
though a seemingly endless sex scene between the two women is added to the 
mix. Once the climax arises and we learn how Annie really died, the 
circumstances surrounding them in this particular flashback is lightly 
touching and downbeat, but it is foolishly intercut with present-day scenes 
as the story is being told, in which jokes are made left and right. I'm 
sorry, but I simply don't think it is appropriate to be showing someone 
dramatically breathe their last breath, only for the situation to constantly 
be made light of. Worse of all in these later scenes is Jonathan Aube, as 
Arne's friend, Joey, who gives an almost maddeningly annoying performance. 
I'm convinced he couldn't act if his life depended on it.
So now we come back to the title. "Soft Toilet Seats." What does it mean, you 
ask? Well, Arne's new home, he is horrified to discovered, has soft toilet 
seats ("It feels like you're taking a dump on a trampoline!") in the 
bathrooms, causing him dire discomfort. Is there any significance to them 
though? I'm sure they are supposed to have some sort of idiotic 
double-meaning, but all possible symbolism is lost in the meandering, 
irritating particulars of the story. "Soft Toilet Seats" is billed as a "Tina 
Valinsky...kind of film." "Kind of" is right, because the film never once 
feels at all like a satisfying final product.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Never Been Kissed (1999)
Directed by Raja Gosnell.
Cast: Drew Barrymore, David Arquette, Michael Vartan, Leelee Sobieski, 
John C. Reilly, Molly Shannon, Jeremy Jordan, Garry Marshall, Jessica 
Alba, Marley Shelton.
1999 - 107 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and sexual innuendo).
Reviewed April 10, 1999.
In the last two years, Drew Barrymore has been one of the most 
delightful and winning presences in all of her films, playing 
strong-willed, but innocent and kind souls ("The Wedding Singer," "Ever 
After," "Home Fries"). Her reign as America's cutest, cuddliest young 
actress working today continues in her latest film, "Never Been Kissed," 
which is also her production company, Flower Films' debut film 
(Barrymore also produces). Unfortunately, "Never Been Kissed" is also 
yet another high school movie (one comes every week, it seems), and out 
of the many teenage-oriented comedy-dramas that have been thrust upon us 
recently, this is one of the most weak and sloppily-written.
Josie Geller (Drew Barrymore) is a clumsy and unfashionable, but 
intelligent 25-year-old copy editor for the Chicago Sun-Times, and her 
yearning to become a newspaper reporter comes true when her stern boss 
(Garry Marshall) assigns her to pose as a high school student to write a 
story on the lives of today's teenagers. Although Josie is in a state of 
euphoria since her dream has finally come true, her 23-year-old slacker 
brother, Rob (David Arquette), who really was popular in his adolescent 
days and an aspiring baseball player, reminds her of how nightmarish her 
own high school days were. The butt of every joke, Josie was chubby, 
pimply, had braces, and was given the embarrassing nickname "Josie 
Gross-y." "Sorry about that," Rob says in the present day. "If I had 
known it would stick, I would never have made it up." 
Returning to high school, right on her first day and dressed in a tacky 
white outfit and boa around her neck, Josie finds herself almost 
immediately shunned by all of her classmates once again, befriended only 
by Aldys (Leelee Sobieski), a generous, unconventional "nerd" who 
invites her to join the Denominators, a calculus club. Threatened to be 
fired if she doesn't present a flashy story, and fast, Josie is forced 
to attempt to become popular, with the help of Rob, who also returns to 
high school and gets buddy-buddy with the in-crowd right away by winning 
a cole slaw-eating contest. Regrettably, as Josie begins to hang out 
with a clique of superficial girls, two of which are named Kirsten and 
Kristin (Jessica Alba, Marley Shelton), as well as attract the eye of 
renowned stud Guy Perkins (Jeremy Jordan), she begins to lose sight of 
what is really important, all the while trying to come to terms with her 
own high school experience, and growing close to her young english 
teacher, Sam Coulson (Michael Vartan).
"Never Been Kissed" acquires its title from a scene early on in the film 
when Josie is talking to her friend and co-worker, Anita (Molly 
Shannon), on a lunch break. "I've kissed guys before," she says, "but 
I've never felt that thing." I know exactly what Josie is talking about, 
but I wish I would have also felt that thing while I was watching this 
film, which is an uninspired rush-job. Although 107 minutes, "Never Been 
Kissed" seems to be always moving at such a break-neck pace that it 
rarely ever has time to slow down and develop any of the characters, and 
therefore, they all came off as blatant stereotypes (Comparingly, I was 
reminded of last week's high school entry, "10 Things I Hate About You," 
which didn't talk down to its audience and was wholly intelligent). In 
my four years of high school, not once did I ever come across people who 
acted like the one-dimensional Kristin and Kirstin do, nor have I ever 
seen someone who acted like the geeky Aldys (even though, as played in a 
standout performance by Leelee Sobieski, she is the most effective 
character in sight). On another note, I seriously doubt the real Chicago 
Sun-Times is like its depiction here, but I disgress. If "Never Been 
Kissed" is supposed to be a lightweight fantasy, I still have another 
complaint, which is that Barrymore is supposed to play a 25-year-old who 
goes back to high school and sticks out a little since she looks older, 
but the fact is that she doesn't. Unlike "10 Things...," in which the 
actors really looked like teens, every single central "teen" actor here 
looks just as old, if not older, than Barrymore. Come to think of it, I 
believe I just came up with an infinitely more original storyline, which 
is that every older-looking "teenager" discovers that they all are 
working for feuding newspapers, and in their rush to get their story out 
first, have accidentally enrolled in the same high school!
Since all of the characters were unwisely written as caricatures, there 
is no way I could care about the fates of anyone. Of course, Barrymore 
is as bright and likable as usual, but even concerning her I began to 
long for the days a few years ago when she was a more diverse actress, 
where she could go from playing a sexual predator (1992's "Poison Ivy") 
to a confused manic depressive (1995's "Mad Love") to a terrified victim 
stalked by a masked killer (1996's "Scream"). Don't get me wrong: I love 
Barrymore's sweet image as much as the next person, but I fear she is 
starting to get typecast in these roles. Giving the best performance in 
the film is the aforementioned Sobieski (who was snubbed of an Oscar nom 
for last year's "A Soldier's Daughter Never Cries" and will next be seen 
in the highly awaited Stanley Kubrick thriller, "Eyes Wide Shut"). 
Sobieski's Aldys was so nice to Josie right from the beginning that I 
felt it was a major misstep on Josie's part to begin to snub her as she 
became popular, since she obviously had been in Aldys' shoes eight years 
before. On the other side of the spectrum are Saturday Night Lives' 
Molly Shannon (in her first starring non-SNL feature) and John C. Reilly 
as another of Josie's co-workers, both of which have their comic 
abilities put to no good use. Tellingly, Shannon had more to do (and was 
given the opportunity to be infinitely more funny) on her guest-starring 
role in this week's half-hour episode of "Will & Grace."
Inevitably, everything leads up to a climactic scene at the prom (If my 
mind seves me correctly, I've seen three, count-'em, three, other movies 
this year that also led up to the prom: "She's All That," "Jawbreaker," 
and "10 Things I Hate About You"). I'm not really sure how, or why, 
everything always occurs at the prom in movies since, after all, it's 
only one night of the year. With a major similarity to 1995's 
far-superior "Angus," the dance concludes with Josie standing up for 
Aldys and giving a speech to all of the "misfits" out there. In "Angus," 
it felt more real, while in "Never Been Kissed," just like the rest of 
the movie, I was constantly making note that the film was simply going 
through the well-worn motions.
Ultimately, you feel almost guilty about giving a negative review to a 
movie that stars Barrymore (although I was forced to do it last year 
with "Home Fries"), but this movie just really isn't very good. It lacks 
a tightly-written screenplay, smart characters, or any real honest 
emotions (the movie is mostly steeped in obvious sentimentality). While 
watching "Never Been Kissed," I was reminded of 1997's wonderful comedy, 
"Romy and Michele's High School Reunion," which it is nearly identical 
to in story (aside from the latter set at a reunion). Both movies depict 
a person (or people) that suffered through the four-year hell that was 
high school, both feature almost duplicate flashbacks (even though the 
prom flashback in "Romy" was more heartbreaking and, again, more 
involving), and both allow the central characters to get back at all of 
the people who tormented them in a crowd-pleasing finale. One of the 
points the film wants to make is how ridiculous and cruel some teenagers 
can be to others. Too bad "Never Been Kissed" turned out to be just as 
painfully artificial as they are.
   - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
     Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Roseaux sauvages, Les (1994)
Directed by Andre Techine.
Cast: Gael Morel, Elodie Bouchez, Stephane Rideau, Frederic Gorney, 
Michele Moretti, Jacques Nolot, Eric Kreikenmayer.
1995 - 110 minutes - French - Subtitled.
Unrated; equivalent of an R (for sexual situations, profanity, and 
nudity). 
Reviewed September 1998.
"Wild Reeds" directed by Andre Techine, was the best film of 1995, and 
one of, if not my favorite, foreign-language film I have seen.
This beautifully made French film is set in 1962, and revolves around 
four teenagers. At the center of the story is Francois (Gael Morel), a 
rather shy, introverted young man who is staying at a boarding school. 
When a new student, Serge (Stephane Rideau), who is a much more 
rebellious person, comes to stay at the school, they become friends, and 
to Francois' shock, finds Serge in his bed late one night. After this 
encounter, Serge strays farther away from him, and it is apparent that 
he is not interested in a relationship, but he leaves Francois utterly 
confused about his own sexuality. Also a large part of the story is 
Maite (Elodie Bouchez), Francois' long-time female best friend, who 
obviously has deep feeling for him, and the oldest student at the 
boarding school, Henri (Frederic Gorny), who is about to turn 21, and 
has purposefully failed each year because he is afraid to face the "real 
world." 
Something I have noticed lately is that the characters in American films 
almost always act like immature children, and in most foreign films, the 
characters are infinitely more intelligent and interesting people. "Wild 
Reeds" proves this point to a T, even though these characters are still 
in high school. This motion picture is full of such truth and honesty, 
that it is in another league with most films that are made nowadays. 
Regardless of what the film is about, it is not a "gay" film, and the 
film is far too complex for it to be labeled such a thing. Instead, it 
is about the uncertainties and insecurities of growing up, and the 
picture understands and cares about the characters so much that the 
audience can't help but do the same thing. Also, all of the characters 
are written to be fully-developed, living-and breathing human beings, 
and they are helped even more by the amazingly mature performances from 
its cast, particularly Morel and Bouchez, who have a large future in 
films. Incidentally, Bouchez was awarded the Best Actress prize at this 
year's Cannes Film Festival for a yet-to-be-released French film. There 
are moments within the film that involves these characters that are full 
of such unblinking reality and intelligence that there is no way it 
could be a "mainstream" American picture.
Another highlight of "Wild Reeds" is its music, which is filled with 
several 60's hits, such as "Barbara Anne" and "Runaway." Although this 
may, at first, sound a bit strange, since this film is in subtitles, it 
only adds to the realism since in France in the 1960's American pop 
songs were no doubt popular, and they fit perfectly into the story.
The conclusion of "Wild Reeds" is splendid, as it brings together all of 
these characters and story threads, and all of the predicaments are 
dealt with. And yet...very little is solved, except that, I sense, the 
characters have grown quite a bit as people and have learned about 
themselves. In this sense, it is just like real life, because not 
everything is always resolved and wrapped up within two hours. Instead, 
"Wild Reeds" leaves you thinking and pondering about what lies ahead for 
these four people, even after the end credits. Judging from the film 
itself, their lives will not be a bed of roses, but they will make it 
through everything quite alright, I'm sure. 
   - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
     Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Living Out Loud (1998)
Directed by Richard LaGravenese. 
Cast: Holly Hunter, Danny DeVito, Queen Latifah, Martin Donovan, Elias 
Koteas, Suzanne Shepherd, Eddie Cibrian, Rachael Leigh Cooke, Lin Shaye.
1998 - 94 minutes.
Rated R (for profanity, brief nudity, and sexual situations).
Reviewed November 11, 1998.
By Dustin Putman 
Dustin Putman's Film Reviews >
"Living Out Loud," is the type of motion picture we don't often see: it 
is a film about mature, intelligent adults, instead of the usual 
American film, in which children basically dress up in grown-up clothing 
and parade around acting like immature seven-year-olds.
Judith (Holly Hunter), a fortysomething living in New York City, has 
been having a difficult time with life lately. She is extremely 
depressed about her recent divorce to her husband (Martin Donovan), who 
had been cheating on her. She cannot sleep, haunted by terrible 
memories, often imagines off-the-wall things to try and make the world 
seem like a better place, and the only place she can really go to feel 
happy is to hear one of her favorite singers, Liz Bailey (Queen 
Latifah), perform at a local club. Judith's life does start to brighten 
a little when, one night when she gets home to her apartment late, 
strikes up a conversation with the elevator operator, Pat (Danny 
DeVito), a lonely man in his fifties whom has lost his daughter 
recently. Both of them create a sort of emotional connection with each 
other, seeking comfort with the other person, but while Pat starts to 
form a deep love for her, Judith only wants to remain friends.
"Living Out Loud," which was written by Richard LaGravenese ("The 
Bridges of Madison County"), who is also making his directing debut 
here, is a wonderful film from beginning to end, one that is honest, 
genuinely funny, and poignant. The three central characters, that of 
Judith, Pat, and Liz, are all written to be free-thinking, complex human 
beings, and are all likable, but flawed, people who are constantly 
interesting, as is the film itself.
One highly original element of the film is that Judith occasionally 
imagines things occuring in her mind in the way she wishes they would 
happen. Sometimes it results in comedy, and sometimes it turns out to be 
subtle and truly touching. One sequence that stands out is when Judith 
is at a restaurant by herself, reading a novel. An older woman comes 
over to her, mentions that that is a great book she is reading, and then 
goes over to join her own friends. As the woman sits down, she looks 
over to see Judith by herself, and motions for her to come join them. 
Instantly, we realize this was simply in Judith's mind, as we see the 
same woman just sit down at the table and begin talking to her friends.
Holly Hunter and Danny Devito both give the performances of their 
careers here. Hunter, of course, was brilliant in 1993's "The Piano," 
for which she won an Academy Award, but in this film she is even better, 
I think. She finds the right note for each scene and holds it. And 
DeVito has never had such a humanistic role before, which I was 
surprised about. Usually he is used as the butt of a joke, or as a 
caricature, but in this film, has a living-and-breathing, sympathetic 
person to play. Topping it all off is Latifah, also a singer, who is 
quickly turning into a respectable actress herself, and has a juicy, 
natural supporting role as, in some ways, Judith's role model.
Another joy of the film is that it does not somehow form a contrived, 
"happy" ending, but, in staying with its realistic tone, manages to be 
upbeat, but truthful. The last shot is an especially powerful image. 
Nothing is said, but just the image of someone walking down a sidewalk 
says it all.
The relationship that results between Judith and Pat is true-to-life and 
sincere. As we watch these two people talk, and get to know each other, 
all that we wish for them both is to be happy, even if that does not 
include for them to become romantically involved. And as, "Living Out 
Loud," which is one of the best films of the year, proves, sometimes a 
friendship is the strongest bond anyone could possibly ask for.

Title
Review for For Love of the Game (1999)
Directed by Sam Raimi.
Cast: Kevin Costner, Kelly Preston, Jena Malone, John C. Reilly, Brian Cox.
1999 - 138 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and sexual situations).
Reviewed September 18, 1999.
What can really be said about "For Love of the Game," Kevin Costner's third 
(and most likely final) film in his "Baseball Trilogy," aside from that 
Costner probably should have stopped while he was ahead? Mixing every cliche 
that could possibly have been dreamt up, the film is such a sappy, 
self-important mess that, by the time the supposed-to-be moving climax 
crawled around, I almost felt physically sick by the overpowering syrup that 
had been thrust upon me in the last 138 minutes. Moving at a lugubrious, 
needlessly slow pace, and with characters that couldn't possibly be any less 
underwritten and lifeless, the film is ultilmately a cinematic dead zone, and 
one of the most ineptly-written high-profile pictures of the year. The fact 
that Sam Raimi, director of 1982's cult horror classic, "The Evil Dead," and 
1998's taut thriller, "A Simple Plan," is at the helm here only disheartens 
you to an even greater extent.
"For Love of the Game" is a flashback-laden heart-tugger (read: 
patience-puller) with one of the most drug-out framing devices I have seen. 
Beginning in NYC where 40-year-old pro baseball player for the Detroit 
Tigers, Billy Chapel (Kevin Costner), is set to take on the Yankees, he 
unexpectedly has an early-morning confrontation with his girlfriend of five 
years, Jane Aubrey (Kelly Preston), who tells him that she is taking a job in 
London, and will be on the six o'clock flight out of New York. Later, Billy 
discovers that the Tigers have been sold, and his contract has run out, so 
this impending game with the Yankees quickly is transformed into a 
life-altering moment for him. A lot is riding on him pitching well, and as 
the crowds from the stands yell out to him that his career is over, the first 
of about six or seven elongated flashbacks begin (and this is at least at the 
30-minute mark!). Oh, it almost slipped my mind; while waiting on her delayed 
flight at the airport, Jane can't seem to escape the game that is playing on 
every television in the lobby and cafe, and reluctantly is swept away in it, 
along with just about every other person in the whole airport. Exchanging her 
flight for a later one so she can see the last few innings, Jane begins to 
have doubts if she should even leave, after all. To make a long story short, 
the flashbacks begin five years before, when Billy and Jane first meet and 
hop into bed together that same night. Because of his constant moving-around 
due to his profession, Jane only gets to see him once every few weeks or even 
months, and, truth be told, they don't really seem to ever even like each 
other, but they stick things out--through the good and the bad. All of this 
takes place in the first year or two after they meet; the next three years 
that led up to the present-day story, however, are practically skipped over, 
and the conclusion, which you will be able to predict from the first five 
minutes, includes Billy winning the big game, his own self-worth, and, yep, 
you guessed it, the girl. 
If Kevin Costner really does have a love for the game of baseball, why would 
he agree to make something so shamelessly weepy and manipulative, in which 
not more than one or two scenes are even credible, and the rest is pure 
fantasy-land? The baseball game sequences are overblown and offensively 
exploitative, just in order to get the audience to cry from sympathy, and 
then joy. Instead of giving the viewer the benefit of the doubt that they 
will be able to figure out Billy's inner conflict, screenwriter Dana Stevens 
deserves to be locked in a vault somewhere, as two sport commentators are 
written to say things like, "40-year-old Billy Chapel is pitching against 
time," as the music score swells and the last inning comes to a close. After 
winning, we get shots of Yankees fans who had previously been hounding him, 
say things like, "You pitched alright, Billy Chapel. You did good!" [Insert 
rolling of eyes and smacks to the forehead here]. Do Stevens or director Sam 
Raimi actually believe that they made a worthy film that is truthful to the 
characters and the story? If so, their views are severely distorted from 
reality.
If the sports scene are inanely-portrayed, the romance flashbacks aren't much 
better. Instead of developing the relationship between Billy and Jane, what 
we get is one make-out/mild bed scene right at the start, and in almost every 
other scene between the two, they are either fighting or arguing or the 
subjects of an elaborate music montage that signals the passing of time. 
Since there are no less than five montages in the film, shouldn't Billy and 
Jane have been old, gray-haired fogies by the climax? Scene after scene we 
watch these two attractive stars, but without a trace of any sharp writing to 
support them, aside from conversations that are linked exclusively to the 
plot, what we really have are two attractive stars who have zero chemistry 
and are so dull and uninteresting as individuals that pairing them up means 
only one thing: a motion picture disaster.
Kevin Costner is adequate as Billy Chapel, who has "mid-life crisis" written 
over his forehead like a neon sign, but why should we care about someone with 
no distinguishable qualities or interests, outside of baseball? Kelly 
Preston, an underrated actress whom I have defended several times with her 
last few pictures, finally has a real clunker here. Obviously some of the 
fault must lie in Raimi's first real embarrassing directing job, but Preston 
overacts and whines her way through her non-descript role, and is so annoying 
that I can't believe anyone would be able to stand being around her character 
of Jane for longer than five minutes, let alone five years! Always off on 
trips, when we find that Jane actually has a teenage daughter, Heather (Jena 
Malone), midway through, it comes as somewhat of a surprise. Frantically 
calling Billy up on the phone, Jane tells him that Heather has run away to 
her father's home in Boston. Weighing in all the evidence, I don't blame 
Heather, as her mother obviously doesn't care about her, and is always 
skipping town, leaving her home by herself for long periods of time. 
Additionally, Jane literally only says two lines to Heather, her very own 
daughter, in the whole film: "Don't ever run away again," and, "Would you 
like some spaghetti?" That's it, and I'm not exaggerating. 
As Heather, Jena Malone (1998's "Stepmom") gives the only performance in the 
film that is worth mentioning in a positive manner. At only 13 or 
14-years-old, Malone is believable as she ages in the film from a young teen 
to a college student, and is given the one and only good scene, in which she 
spots Billy while at the University of South Carolina, and has a brief, warm 
exchange of words with him. So strong is Malone, in fact, that it is sorely 
disappointing to find that she is otherwise wasted and thrown to the 
way-side, so that we can instead watch two dim-witted stick figures fall 
(artificially) in love.  
"For Love of the Game" piles on the cheese and corn and honey-sap so thickly 
that the film, at times, seems to be in danger of being smothered to death, 
which would have been fine with me. Without anything smart, witty, exciting, 
or truly romantic to offer, one is left wondering not only who the film was 
made for (only the most undiscriminating viewers could be won over by this 
"product-on-autopilot"), but what exactly the point was. In a late scene in 
which Billy sits on a bed and weeps, we are supposed to feel sorry for him, 
but why? A popular veteran baseball player who has just won the game of his 
life, should we come to the conclusion that he is crying for Jane, and if so, 
why? She has no admirable personality traits, and he would be better off 
without such an uptight priss. Of course, I could also say he has no 
admirable personality traits, and she would be better off without such an 
uptight priss. The only question that "For Love of the Game" left me 
pondering was, how are we supposed to care about two central characters who 
would be far better off joining screenwriter Dana Stevens? You know, locked 
away in that vault I mentioned. 

Title
Review for Best Man, The (1999/I)
Directed by Malcolm D. Lee.
Cast: Taye Diggs, Nia Long, Morris Chestnut, Sanaa Lathan, Terrence Howard, 
Harold Perrineau, Monica Calhoun, Melissa De Sousa, Regina Hall.
1999 - 121 minutes
Rated R (for profanity and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, October 24, 1999.
As "The Best Man" unraveled, it became apparent to me that the large majority 
of films made about African-American characters either (A) involve crime, 
drugs, and violence, or (B) are romantic comedy-dramas about family and/or 
friends who come together for a certain occasion. While the latter is 
certainly more appealing because it deals with that middle-upper-class 
section that is rarely dealt with on film, the results are usually botched by 
stereotypical, often juvenile, characterizations, or exaggerated plotting 
devices. Such is the case with "The Best Man," directed by Spike Lee's 
cousin, Malcolm D. Lee, which has so much going for it at the outset that you 
almost feel cheated when everything begins to revolve squarely around a 
wedding (this subject has been so overdone) and a scandalous, secretly 
autobiographical book that one of the character's has written and the others 
have gotten their hands on. Of course, this premise still easily might have 
worked had the screenplay, also by Lee, been written with more depth and 
intelligence, and not resorted to such frequent immature behavior. 
Taye Diggs toplines the bright cast as Harper Stewart, a writer in his 
late-20's, whom has just left his loving girlfriend Robin (Sanaa Lathan) to 
return to his hometown and act as the best man for his college buddy's 
wedding. Robin will arrive a few days later to attend the wedding, but right 
now Harper is most interested in rekindling his friendships with all of his 
confidants from years gone by. The groom, Lance (Morris Chestnut), is a 
pro-football player who is madly in love with his bride-to-be, the angelic 
Mia (Monica Calhoun), and Harper's other best friends from the past include 
Murch (Harold Perrineau Jr.), a slightly nerdy type who is overrun by his 
domineering, ice queen girlfriend Shelby (Melissa De Sousa), and Quentin 
(Terrence Howard), a playful, wise-cracking musician. The plot is set into 
motion when Harper once again meets his old college flame Jordan (Nia Long), 
and sparks instantly fly. Jordan, a television executive, has gotten her 
hands on Harper's upcoming book, "Unfinished Business," and as it gets passed 
around among the rest of the old gang, they slowly discover that the 
fictional character names are only a cover-up of themselves, with all the 
sordid details intact. The pressure is on for Harper, who is propositioned by 
Jordan to spend the night with her (they never "got together" in school), and 
is suddenly under fire from everyone for writing about their most personal 
details, and even some unknown secrets, including a past rendezvous he had 
with the bride Mia.
With such a minor storyline and characters who are far from 
three-dimensionally written, "The Best Man," as has been noted before, plays 
like a distaff version of 1983's classic, "The Big Chill," but without the 
nostalgic memories, sharp dialogue (the phrase, "You DOG!," has to have been 
used at least a half-dozen times), and smooth narrative flow. While a movie 
about friends coming together is all well and good (and was marvelously done 
in 1996's "Beautiful Girls," in which a 10-year high school reunion was the 
catalyst that set the plot into motion), "The Best Man" ruins things by 
adding the insubstantial book subplot into the mix, and not even using it to 
its fullest capabilities.
While some characters remain stereotypes throughout, without any attempt at 
further development (Melissa De Sousa's Shelby quickly comes to mind), others 
are performed with a true-to-life edge that makes them creditable. Taye Diggs 
is adequate as Harper, the character which everything centers around, but he 
made a more lasting impression in his supporting role in last spring's flashy 
"Go." Who should be especially noted, however, are Nia Long, who is so very 
assured as an actress that I wish she'd break out of this type of role she 
plays over and over; Terrence Howard, who has loads of fun with the most 
comedic character of the piece; and Sanaa Lathan, whose neglected girlfriend 
role of Harper's is the one we most sympathize and identify with. Meanwhile, 
Regina Hall makes a more-than-memorable appearance as a bright-eyed stripper 
who Murch is bewitched by at Lance's bachelor party.
If director Malcolm D. Lee really wanted to make a more sophisticated film 
about a large portion of the population who often times go unnoticed in the 
world of films, why did he insist on making some of the characters act so 
childish? At one point, after a dark secret is uncovered by Lance about 
Harper, instead of having a conversation with him and talking the problem 
out, he resorts to knocking over the table, grabbing Harper by the collar, 
and threatening him. When this occurrence takes place in movies over such a 
petty thing, solely to add some interest and further conflict into the 
dwindling proceedings, I immediately lose all respect for the character. I 
know I wouldn't want to be friends with someone who would act like that.
As with 1997's melodramatic, corny "Soul Food," and last summer's "The Wood," 
which also starred Diggs in a story set around a wedding(!), "The Best Man" 
aspires to be something more than it actually is. Kudos to Lee for trying his 
hand at a more knowledgeable picture that all audiences (not just 
African-Americans) might enjoy, but he also gets more than his share of 
debits for its severely flawed treatment. At over two hours in length, "The 
Best Man" thankfully never overstays its welcome and goes by fairly fast, but 
by the time the Electric Slide was carried out by everyone at the wedding 
reception over the end credits, I realized that the actors deserved far 
better. As is, the conclusion plays like an excuse for each of the cast 
members to give themselves a pat on the back, when they really didn't earn 
that pat to begin with.

Title
Review for Being John Malkovich (1999)
Directed by Spike Jonze.
Cast: John Cusack, Cameron Diaz, Catherine Keener, John Malkovich, Orson 
Bean, Mary Kay Place, Charlie Sheen.
1999 - 112 minutes
Rated R (for profanity and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, December 4, 1999.
When you go see movies on a regular basis, you are bound to become more savvy 
in the calculations of any one story, being able to pinpoint elements that 
have been done just a few too many times in previous films for it to be 
surprising or particularly memorable. Sometimes, you want to see a movie so 
that it will take you on some sort of journey that has never, or rarely, been 
taken before in the world of film. 
Such is the case with director Spike Jonze's "Being John Malkovich," which is 
bound to be one the most unusual motion pictures of 1999. And I don't mean in 
a David Lynchian sort of way, because while it may have hints of that "Twin 
Peaks" helmer's trademark weirdness and peculiarities, it has an overall 
style all its own. Just the thought that someone actually conjured up such an 
inventive tale (screenwriter Charlie Kaufman) gives hope for further 
innovative motion pictures that may be struggling through the pipeline simply 
because they are too "strange" to actually be made. In that respect, "Being 
John Malkovich" is groundbreaking in its sheer abandon of conventional plots, 
and in its embrace of nothing but complete originality.
While the story may seem confusing, it surprisingly makes total sense (well, 
at least as much of it as one can possibly understand). Ultimately, one could 
even see how, in lesser hands, this film could have been disastrous. Its 
tricky tone was, no doubt, difficult to perfect, as it is an out-and-out 
fantasy, but set in a very realistic present day New York City, yet relies on 
its offbeat humor to pull off the act. In fact, the comedy needed to be 
successful because, otherwise, the film would have just been too 
preposterous. One of the delights about "Being John Malkovich" is how very 
funny it is--easily one of the most laugh-inducing I've seen this year--and 
once the viewer settles into its oddball tone, the film entertains, excites, 
and is even thought-provoking in its handling of such issues as identity 
discovery and the manipulation over others.
Craig Schwartz (John Cusack) is a down-on-his-luck master puppeteer without a 
job and much money, living in a Manhattan apartment with his pet store-owning 
and animal-loving wife Lotte (Cameron Diaz). Tired of his life going nowhere, 
Craig finds an ad in the classifieds and answers the position of a filing 
clerk--on the 7 1/2th floor of an office building, where the ceiling is just 
four feet high. The inhabitants of the floor are an unusual bunch, including 
Floris (May Kay Place), the hearing-impaired secretary who misunderstands 
almost everything a person says and, yet, believes it is not she, but them 
that have the handicap; and the 105-year-old boss, Dr. Lester (Orson Bean), 
who is convinced Floris cannot understand him because he has a speech 
impediment (when Craig tells Dr. Lester that he can understand him perfectly 
fine, his reply is, "Flattery will get you nowhere with me."). And then 
there's Maxine (Catherine Keener), an alluring, beautiful woman whom Craig 
instantly falls head over heels for, even though the feeling is clearly not 
mutual.
One day, when Craig accidentally drops a file behind a stack of cabinets in 
his office, he removes them from the wall to find a small doorway, large 
enough to crawl through. Opening it up and venturing inside the seemingly 
never-ending tunnel, a force abruptly blows him through the portal, and he 
suddenly finds himself in the mind of actor John Malkovich, peering through 
his eyes--but only for a 15-minute period--after which he is dumped upon the 
embankment next to the New Jersey Turnpike. It's a bit tricky to say much 
more, in fear of giving away too much (even though, believe me, I haven't 
even scratched the surface), but suffice to say, in a plot to make money, 
Craig and Maxine start their own business where anyone can go into 
Malkovich's mind for $200 a pop. Meanwhile, Craig and Lotte both become 
addicted to being able to take over the identity of another person, sparked 
by their unhappiness in the lives they currently lead.  
One might wonder why John Malkovich, playing a version of himself very well, 
is the celebrity that was chosen as the subject of the film, but it does sort 
of have a symmetry to it, since he is a consistently well-received actor who 
the casual filmgoer most likely has heard of, but knows nothing about. A 
running joke in the film is that the characters can't think of any movies 
he's been in, even though they seem to remember him playing a jewel thief. 
The ingenious idea of being able to get inside the mind of another human 
being is something I do not recall ever being done before, and while 
obviously far-fetched, the film is realistic in its portrayal of people who 
find themselves being swept away by the thought of being someone else, 
someone more successful and respected than they are.
The three central characters are portrayed by a talented crop of actors who 
take every role they play, and run with them. John Cusack is very good as 
Craig, a man with very little self-esteem and bad posturing (he walks slumped 
over, even when not on the 7 1/2th floor). Of the three major roles, however, 
Craig is the least interesting and flashy one, and he doesn't go through as 
much of an internal transformation like the others do. Cusack is flawlessly 
cast and does a fine job with what he is given, but if there is an 
underwritten role here, it is his.
When Cameron Diaz first appeared on the scene in 1994's "The Mask," it's 
difficult to believe anyone could have suspected she was such a stunningly 
diverse talent, not to mention one of the most intelligent actresses of her 
generation. Diaz can star as the likable love interest in a blockbuster film 
(1998's "There's Something About Mary"), but is just as likely to try 
something a little more risky and challenging (a crazed, self-absorbed 
bride-to-be in 1998's "Very Bad Things"). With "Being John Malkovich," Diaz 
gives her most assured performance to date, as the frizzy-haired, frumpy 
Lotte, and is nearly unrecognizable compared to the beauty she really is. In 
a plot development that won't be revealed here, Lotte comes to a 
life-altering realization after her first trip inside John Malkovich's mind. 
While outrageous on first thought, it is also oddly believable and wholly 
makes sense when you think about it in the context of the character.
Catherine Keener, a marvel to behold in every single film she appears in, 
exudes an outer iciness on first appearance, as Maxine, but wisely is 
developed into a confused and lonely three-dimensional character by the 
film's second half. Working in the world of indie films for several years, 
Keener is just now breaking out into bigger roles in more high-profile 
projects, and good for her. She deserves all the attention she is just 
starting to receive.
The writing, by Charlie Kaufman, is full of such intelligent, dry wit and 
appropriately goofy ideas, that the film is a comic goldmine, even among the 
more serious aspects of the story. The opening sections, especially, almost 
had me on the verge of completely breaking down at the thought of its sheer 
hilarity. Director Spike Jonze (who had an impressive acting role as the 
fourth king in "Three Kings") proves here to be one of the most exciting and 
fresh current filmmakers, and kudos to him for obtaining the willpower and 
courage to film such a purely individualistic creation. "Being John 
Malkovich" is a stunner through-and-through, and can safely stand as one of 
the very best motion pictures of the season.

Title
Review for 20 Dates (1998)
"20 Dates" is an often funny, always engaging romantic comedy filmed in a 
documentary format concerning the plight of first-time director Myles 
Berkowitz to find that special someone by going on twenty dates with twenty 
different women. Berkowitz proves to be a likable protagonist, and the 
unexpectedly close relationship that evolves between an aspiring interior 
designer named Elisabeth and he may be one of the most involving, 
warm-hearted romances on film in 1999. Sultry actress Tia Carrere ("Wayne's 
World") briefly appears as Berkowitz's final "date."
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for How the Grinch Stole Christmas (2000)
Directed by Ron Howard.
Cast: Jim Carrey, Taylor Momsen, Jeffrey Tambor, Christine Baranski, Bill 
Irwin, Molly Shannon, Clint Howard, Anne Haney. 
Narration: Anthony Hopkins.
2000 - 98 minutes
Rated PG (for some mature themes).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, November 18, 2000.
It was only a matter of time before the late, great Theodor S. Geisel's 
classic 1957 children's book "How the Grinch Stole Christmas," which later 
was turned into a television special that has become an unforgettable part of 
many people's holiday rituals, would be adapted into a full-length feature 
film. The story is highly visual and pleasing, with a clean-cut premise that 
concludes with an important moral that all children, and adults, can relate 
to and understand. There is a reason, however, why the popular television 
special was only 25 minutes long. In the tradition of all of Dr. Seuss' 
books, the tale is simplistic and just short enough to be read the whole way 
through at bedtime. In turning it into a 98-minute motion picture, the 
"Grinch" that we have all grown to know only comes into effect in the final 
half-hour, with a whole preceding hour of padding that becomes problematic.
Ever since the Grinch (Jim Carrey) was little, he struggled to fit in with 
all of the other Whos down in Whoville, but his offbeat personality and 
green, hairy body worked against him. Now an adult who lives upon the 
mountain that looms over the snow-covered city, the Grinch has become little 
more than a myth to the townspeople, who treat him as if he was the Loch Ness 
Monster or Bigfoot whenever he goes out in public. Furthermore, his attitude 
doesn't help matters--the Grinch is purposefully a dastardly troublemaker who 
seems to hate everything and everybody, with a daily planner that includes 
things such as looking into the abyss and searching "for a way to solve world 
peace--tell no one."
As Christmas looms on the horizon, and the Whos anxiously buy loads of 
presents and work on their decorations, the Grinch becomes all the more 
restless to not let them get away with another holiday gone by without a 
hitch. Enter little Cindy Lou-Who (Taylor Momsen), who is also having a bit 
of Christmas doubt, as she witnesses everyone around her absorbed with 
gift-buying and receiving, yet is determined to reassure herself that the 
holiday should mean more to everyone. Making her way up to the Grinch's lair, 
Cindy Lou is not afraid of him, but amused, as she sees the sweetness just 
screaming to get out behind his cold, yellow eyes and monstrous exterior.
Following a plan of Cindy Lou's that ultimately goes awry and sends the 
Grinch reeling back to his cave with even more anger than before, the movie 
finally takes off where the famed Dr. Seuss story begins. It is also at this 
point that the film picks up its pace and grows truly involving and magical. 
With only a matter of time before the Grinch realizes his mistakes, and the 
Whos inevitably discover that Christmas isn't about what you receive, but who 
you've got in your life, the picture finds its footing and climaxes on a 
warm-hearted and lovely note.
What comes before this point is, unfortunately, flawed. Director Ron Howard 
(1989's "Parenthood") obviously shows an adoration for the story he is 
telling, but it is the screenplay by Jeffrey Price and Peter S. Seaman that 
proves fairly uneven. The first hour, whose purpose is to develop the 
Grinch's backstory and discuss just what made him who he is today, seems like 
unnecessary time-filler and is almost eventless. What is most misguided, 
though, is the treatment of the Whos, who are not at all like they were in 
the original story. Looking as if their original physical chemistry involved 
a mouse and a human breeding, the Whos are so materialistic, and the 
supporting characters so underdeveloped, that it leaves a sense of cold 
disattachment hanging over the proceedings. Where the townspeople should be 
lovable characters, they almost deserve every "bad" thing that the Grinch 
does to them. It is only at the end that the Whos, as well as the Grinch, 
have a life-changing epiphany that almost makes you want to forgive their 
previous actions--but not quite.
In Jim Carrey, "Dr. Seuss' How the Grinch Stole Christmas" has found a star 
attraction who completely runs the show. Carrey, unrecognizable behind mounds 
of green makeup and latex but with the same delightfully manic energy that he 
usually has, evokes a great deal of sympathy from his well-known grinchy 
character, despite his evil deeds. Just as Cindy Lou can see that the Grinch 
is just a misunderstood person who simply wants to be loves, so can the 
viewers, which makes his turnaround in the finale all the more effective. How 
Carrey endured such a daunting makeup process is anyone's guess, but he sure 
does bring life to a character he was born to play.
The heroine of the film, young Cindy Lou-Who, who "was no more than two" in 
the book, has been transformed into a smart 7-year-old who only wishes that 
those around her would realize the true meaning of Christmas. As played by 
newcomer Taylor Momsen, she is a vivid and cute child who may be little, but 
is courageous and free-thinking. Momsen thankfully does not turn in an 
unctuous performance, or strains for cuteness, but is more unaffected and 
assured. The solo song she sings, "Christmas, Where Are You?," is gently 
beautiful, one of the best things about the first half because it isn't going 
for flashiness or bawdy humor.
The rest of the Whos, some supplied by strong performers such as Christine 
Baranski (as Martha May Whovier, who still holds a crush on the Grinch for 
her grade school days), Bill Irwin (Lou Lou-Who, Cindy's father), and Molly 
Shannon (Betty Lou-Who, Cindy's mother), come off as so shallow and 
underscripted that they make nearly no impression at all. The fact that they, 
too, all resemble mice people, is an ill-advised choice that the movie could 
have done without, and been better for it.
If the Whos don't keep up with the enchantment of the holiday itself, the 
lavish production design, by Michael Corinblith, does. While some sets are a 
little too artificial for their own good, Whoville is, nonetheless, a sight 
to behold. With an endless array of mountains surrounding the cozy town that 
remains blanketed in a thick cover of freshly-fallen snow, the movie is a 
dazzler for the eyes.
"Dr. Seuss' How the Grinch Stole Christmas" lacks the life and joy required 
to make this movie a modern-day family classic, but it is mostly 
entertaining. The fact that the thin story had to be stretched out to 90 
minutes to begin with would be quite a daunting task, and director Ron Howard 
has given it his best shot--even if his best shot is not nearly the best the 
film could have been. Visionary filmmaker Tim Burton (1990's "Edward 
Scissorhands"), for example, would have been perfect to take the Dr. Seuss 
yarn on. His specialty in artistically mixing fantasy, sweetness, and the 
darker corners of the human condition might have made "The Grinch" a shade 
scarier, and not for the youngest of kiddies, but think about it. Aren't 
1939's "The Wizard of Oz" and 1971's "Willy Wonka and the Chocolate Factory" 
masterpieces because of the unpredictable wickedness that surrounded their 
stories and characters? "Dr. Seuss' How the Grinch Stole Christmas," while 
fine in its own right, could have certainly benefitted from a little more of 
that mischievous nature.
    - Copyright 2000 by Dustin Putman
      Http://www.atnzone.com
      Http://www.young-hollywood.com
      Reviews by Dustin 
Putman - Http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman

Title
Review for My Name Is Joe (1998)
In 1998, Peter Mullan won the Best Actor award at the Cannes Film Festival 
for "My Name is Joe," and rightfully so. A serious depiction of a recovering 
alcoholic (Mullan) who, aside from coaching soccer games and working as an 
amateur housepainter, has a life that's going nowhere...that is, until he 
meets the community health worker, Sarah (Louise Goodall). Sarah is a lovely, 
but cautious woman who isn't looking for a relationship but nonetheless is 
charmed by Joe. The plot thickens when one of his soccer novices' life is 
threatened for owing money to a group of drug traffikers, and Joe steps in to 
help by illegally transporting drugs to them, unbeknownst to Sarah. "My Name 
is Joe" is a captivating drama with a second stunning performance from Louise 
Goodall, whose Sarah is not simply the thankless "girlfriend" role, but an 
independent woman with her own thoughts and beliefs. Adding to the film's 
clarity are subtitles to help us Americans get over the extremely heavy 
Scottish accents. The film plays well as both a romance (even if this has 
been overdone) and a portrait of a lonely man coming to terms with the 
mistakes in his life.
      - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
        Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Proof of Life (2000)
Directed by Taylor Hackford.
Cast: Russell Crowe, Meg Ryan, David Morse, Pamela Reed, David Caruso, Margo 
Martindale.
2000 - 135 minutes
Rated R (for violence, blood, and profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, December 8, 2000.
Taylor Hackford's new drama, "Proof of Life," bears more than a passing 
resemblance to 1999's Harrison Ford-Kristen Scott-Thomas box-office dud, 
"Random Hearts." Although their storylines are very much different, both 
pictures feature an attractive, mature pair of actors in a movie that 
gradually turns into a romance. The problem with "Proof of Life," however, is 
the same problem that "Random Hearts" had, which is that the movie is just 
not a solid or effective example of successful filmmaking. Frigid and dreary, 
"Proof of Life" yearns to develop a touching romance between two people that 
can't, and probably shouldn't, get together, but we as the audience simply 
don't care about the outcome. The fact that stars Russell Crowe (2000's 
"Gladiator") and Meg Ryan (1998's "You've Got Mail") entered into the 
tabloids while filming due to a real-life romance that blossomed between the 
two, should have at least made the on-screen proceedings charismatic and 
lively, but they are not. The whole movie, ambitious as it may be, 
relentlessly flaps there like a fish suddenly pulled out of the water, 
gasping for its last few breaths.
Based on both a "Vanity Fair" article by William Prochnau, and a book by 
Thomas Hargrove entitled "The Long March to Freedom," Meg Ryan stars as Alice 
Bowman, a woman living in South America with her husband, Peter (David 
Morse), a dam engineer. Alice yearns to return to the U.S. and get back to 
her own life, but Peter keeps them put, as he is too dedicated on his latest 
project to give it up. When Peter is unexpectedly kidnapped by a group of 
guerilla-terrorists, being held for a $3-million ransom, expert hostage 
negotiator Terry Thorne (Russell Crowe) is hired to ensure that he is not 
killed. But first, Terry insists that his newest clients give him and Alice 
proof that Peter is still alive. As the days tick by and Peter grows 
increasingly weak, weary, and bearded, Alice and Terry form a close, platonic 
work relationship that threatens to turn into something more.
That final piece of the premise is actually so inconsequential and 
next-to-non-existent up until the final twenty minutes of the lumbering 
135-minute running time that director Taylor Hackford fails miserably when he 
attempts to inject bittersweet poignancy to the final scene. As played out, 
it is entirely ineffectual and only leaves you wondering what, exactly, the 
point was.
What comes beforehand really isn't much better. While the plot is adequately 
intriguing and could have certainly been made into a genuinely suspenseful 
pot-boiler, the deliberately slow pace evaporates whatever tension might have 
been evoked with a stronger screenplay and tighter editor. The film simply 
sits there, immobile, for ridiculously long stretches that include exposition 
scene after exposition scene so poorly conceived you are akin to forgetting 
what was said by the next sequence.
In an obvious attempt to break free of the cutesy romantic comedies she is 
best known for, the usually reliable Meg Ryan is surprisingly mediocre as the 
grieving Alice. Either overacting to the point of annoyance, striking a 
superficial performance note, or misreading her character's supposed 
motivations, this is not one of Ryan's high points as an actress. It isn't 
entirely her fault, though; the role is so thanklessly two-dimensional that 
she does very little throughout but look upset and hold a cigarette (which, 
oddly enough, she not once is ever shown inhaling).
The supporting roles are stronger and more assured, but equally 
underdeveloped. David Morse (2000's phenomenal "Dancer in the Dark") is put 
through a great ordeal as he is shown being held captive and being put 
through torture from the beginning to end of the movie, but does little else. 
Pamela Reed (1990's "Kindergarten Cop"), as Peter's worried sister, is 
particularly funny and gets most of the good scenes in the first half. 
Finally, David Caruso, as Terry's wisecracking partner, is wasted.
There is one asset of "Proof of Life" that saves it from being an all-out, 
big-budget disaster. Russell Crowe, in his first starring role since the 
critically-acclaimed, audience-favorite "Gladiator," proves yet again why he 
is quickly becoming one of the most popular male actors in showbiz. So 
self-assured and brilliant in every respect, Crowe carries himself with a 
red-hot intensity that cannot be denied, and his work as Terry Thorne is yet 
another masterful turn in his gradually rising and hugely respectable 
filmography. Although his character, like all of the others, gets very little 
help from the thin written page, he is able to flesh out his role immensely 
just by a simple look, or the way he handles his lines. From 1992's "Romper 
Stomper," to 1997's "L.A. Confidential," to 1999's "The Insider," Russell 
Crowe does not play his characters as much as he lives and breathes through 
his personal creation of them. Simply put, he is the most talented actor 
appearing in films today.
Take Russell Crowe away from "Proof of Life" and what you ultimately have is 
a complete failure. Whenever he is onscreen, the film is tolerable and 
occasionally even interesting. Whenever he is absent, the movie threatens to 
drown in its own mustiness. Either way, director Hackford, whose 1997 
thriller "The Devil's Advocate" was far superior, has put a lot of time and 
money into a motion picture that adds up to very little, and practically 
screams out for a reedit. "Proof of Life" is right; without Crowe, the only 
proof of life in this unfortunate misfire would be the physical movements of 
the camera.
   - Copyright 2000 by Dustin Putman
     Http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman 
     Reviews by Dustin Putman 

Title
Review for Heartbreakers (2001)
Directed by David Mirkin.
Cast: Sigourney Weaver, Jennifer Love Hewitt, Gene Hackman, Jason Lee, Ray 
Liotta, Anne Bancroft, Nora Dunn, Jeffrey Jones, Sarah Silverman.
2001 - 123 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and sexual innuendo).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, March 28, 2001.
In a time when the only comedies that seem to be made are of the raunchy, 
Farrelly-esque variety, a funny, sophisticated one is quite rare these days. 
But "Heartbreakers," smartly directed by David Mirkin (1997's "Romy and 
Michele's High School Reunion"), is just that. A movie that does not wallow 
in bathroom or scatological humor, it is involving, biting, heartwarming in a 
refreshingly non-cloying way, and occasionally riotous.
Max (Sigourney Weaver) and Paige (Jennifer Love Hewitt) are a mother and 
daughter con-artist team who scam for Max to marry wealthy, unsuspecting men, 
only for Paige to seduce them in front of her, leading to a swift divorce and 
much cash flow. When their latest conquest seemingly goes off without a 
hitch, they head to Palm Beach, Florida for one last big score before Paige 
goes off on her own. They quickly set their sights on the richest man they 
can find, in the form of multimillionaire tobacco tycoon William Tensy (Gene 
Hackman). Tensy is repulsive, with cancer spots on his forehead, yellowed, 
rotting teeth, and a constant cigarette in his mouth. Max, posing as a 
beautiful Russian immigrant named Olga, bewitches him, all the while Paige 
gets a job as his new housekeeper, setting into play the type of scam that 
they are pros at. Things, however, do not go as planned for the relational, 
naturally bickering duo, threatening to expose their criminal acts.
Reminiscent of a female version of 1988's "Dirty Rotten Scoundrels," mixed 
with a comedic redux of 1990's dramatic "The Grifters," "Heartbreakers" is a 
hugely successful entertainment that plays out its story in a surprisingly 
unrushed manner that leaves the film running just over two hours (especially 
long for a comedy), but does not grow tedious once. Instead, its length aids 
in adding depth to both the characters and the different relationships, 
particularly that of the central figures, Max and Paige. A mother-daughter 
who do not always get along, but respect and stand up for one another when it 
counts, their interactions and dynamic are dead-on realistic. Best of all, 
despite some not-so-admirable things that they do throughout, Max and Paige 
remain likable and accessible to the audience. This is key in getting the 
movie to work; two nasty, annoying women would get old very fast.
As the alluring, sexy Max and the equally sultry Paige, Sigourney Weaver 
(1999's "A Map of the World") and Jennifer Love Hewitt (1998's "I Still Know 
What You Did Last Summer") have never, or rarely, been better. At 53, Weaver 
is not only physically stunning and gorgeous, but really proves to have a 
knack for the comedy genre. Her Max is an outwardly self-assured, inwardly 
insecure siren who fears the day when the only consistent person in her life, 
Paige, is gone. Their bond is obviously close, even when they argue, and in a 
life when they intentionally train themselves to stay at arm's length from 
caring about others, Paige is the only one whom Max is allowed to love. 
Holding up her half of the story just as well, Jennifer Love Hewitt has 
finally thrown her squeaky-clean, "teen" movie image out the window, acting 
as a young adult for the first time in a movie that has not a doe-eyed high 
school senior pining for her, or a hook-wielding fisherman out to kill her, 
in sight. Hewitt has surrounded herself with top-flight talent here, in a 
film that gives her ample opportunity to test out her acting chops, and she 
succeeds every step of the way.
While Max sets into motion the scam involving Tensy, Paige, out to prove to 
herself that she isn't still an amateur, targets handsome, single bartender 
Jack (Jason Lee), whose bar he owns himself is worth upwards of $3-million. 
With Jack irresistibly drawn to the sometimes difficult Paige, she grows 
scared when she finds herself guilty of doing the one thing con artists are 
never supposed to do: start to truly care about the person they are playing. 
The offbeat romance that blossoms between Paige and Jack is unforced and 
subtle, and its payoff is one of surprising emotional depth. A climactic 
sequence between the two is especially touching and well-played by both 
Hewitt and the appealing Jason Lee (1998's "Chasing Amy").
On the other hand, Max is faced with a moral dilemma that she isn't sure how 
to deal with. Realizing that Paige may very well be falling for Jack, Max 
questions whether or not she should continue to lead her daughter into a life 
of crime, or get out while there is still time to make something better for 
each of their lives. These thoughts are put into play even more when her 
previous husband, Dean (Ray Liotta), whom she conned and actually felt guilty 
about because of her own attraction to him, comes looking for her. Dean knows 
that Max swindled him out of money, but he still can't help but half-like 
her, and he's not giving up without a fight. Ray Liotta (2001's "Hannibal") 
gets another meaty role here in a picture that is graced with a superb 
ensemble cast.
It is Gene Hackman (1998's "Enemy of the State"), however, who steals the 
show. As the repugnant, if not bad guy, Tensy, Hackman hacks and coughs his 
way through a scene-stealing part that deserves Oscar consideration come next 
year. Never has Hackman been so outrageously funny, as Tensy's outlook is 
that smoking is something to be proud of, something that children should be 
started on at a very young age, and something that turns him on like nothing 
else. One of the great moments comes when Tensy proclaims, "There is nothing 
more attractive than a heavy stream of smoke billowing proudly out of a 
woman's fiery, enflared nostrils." "That image," replies Max, "will haunt me 
forever."
Max and Paige may be in an illegal profession that asks them to be cold and 
generally emotionless, but "Heartbreakers" manages to be neither of these 
things. There are enough nuances and energy in each of the actors' 
performances, and enough humanity in the screenplay, by Robert Dunn, Paul 
Guay, and Stephen Mazur, to ensure that the movie will leave you liking the 
people you've me, and feeling good. And despite one misstep in the final 
scene that almost contradicts what I thought the meaning of the film was, 
"Heartbreakers" is a sparkling comedy. It is one of the best films, thus far, 
in a year that seems to be short on quality filmmaking.
    - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
      http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman
http://www.atnzone.com

Title
Review for Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me (1999)
Directed by Jay Roach.
Cast: Mike Myers, Heather Graham, Michael York, Mindy Sterling, Seth Green, 
Verne J. Troyer, Rob Lowe, Robert Wagner, Kristen Johnston, Will Ferrell, Gia 
Carides, Elizabeth Hurley, Clint Howard, Willie Nelson, Woody Harrelson, Tim 
Robbins, Jerry Springer.
1999 - 95 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for scatalogical, gross-out humor, profanity, and sexual 
situations).
Reviewed June 12, 1999.
When the original "Austin Powers" was released in 1997, it didn't make that 
great deal of an impression and was never really expected to, but it garnered 
many positive reviews, had low drop-off box-office rates each week, and 
became a pop-culture phenomenon once it hit video stores. Now we have "Austin 
Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me," which will be sure to go down as one of the 
few sequels to do better financially than its predecessor (if the sold-out 
crowd I saw it with is any indication). The terms, "Yeah, baby, yeah!" and 
"let's shag, baby," have been ingrained in most moviegoers' minds due to the 
original, and when was the last time a movie created its own vernacular, and 
audiences followed?
Getting off to a brisk, but disappointing start, this film continues where 
the first left off, with Austin Powers (Mike Myers) and Vanessa Kensington 
(Elizabeth Hurley) on their romantic honeymoon. Within five minutes time, it 
is discovered that Vanessa was a dreaded fembot all along, a henchman of Dr 
Evil's (Myers). Realizing he's a single man again, Austin doesn't take too 
much time grieving before he learns that Dr. Evil has created a time machine, 
gone back to 1969 when Austin was cryogenically frozen, and stolen his 
"mojo." In hot pursuit, Austin time travels back to the swingin' '60s 
himself, meets up with beautiful and "randy" CIA agent Felicity Shagwell 
(Heather Graham), and together they set out to get his "mojo" back. But 
that's not all, as Dr. Evil also is plotting to destroy Washington, D.C. if 
his demands (several billion dollars) aren't met.
"Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me" has, thankfully, created the same 
atmosphere that the mildly successful first one set up. From the first frame 
to the last, it is apparent that we've stepped back into the world of Austin 
Powers, but that doesn't mean that the new movie is as good, and it isn't. 
For one thing, the whole prologue is a gigantic betrayal of both Austin 
Powers fans and Elizabeth Hurley. Making her turn out to be a fembot will, 
from now on, seriously put a damper on the way people watch the original, 
because now we know that she didn't even actually care about him at all, but 
was on the "evil side." It also creates a noticably large plot hole: If 
Vanessa Kensington was a fembot, then her mother, Mrs. Kensington (played by 
Mimi Rogers in the original), also had to have been, and this little fact is 
not dealt with at all in the uneven screenplay, by Mike Myers and Michael 
McCullers. If Hurley didn't want to appear for more than a brief cameo, the 
filmmakers surely could have thought of a stronger way for her to go out.
Just watching "Austin Powers" right before I saw its sequel, I noticed 
another downfall. While the first one was not hilarious, it was light, 
charming, and occasionally funny. In "The Spy Who Shagged Me," there might be 
some bigger laughs (the sure-to-be-classic "tent scene" comes to mind), but 
there are also just as many jokes that fall astoundingly flat, and others 
that are merely recycled. The film has opted for the 
"everything-but-the-kitchen-sink" approach, and in doing so, has forgotten 
about all of the returning characters who, in essence, are nothing more than 
extended cameos. Seth Green, as Dr. Evil's misunderstood son, Scott, comes 
close to breaking out into his own person (especially when he appears on a 
Jerry Springer episode, entitled "My Father is Evil and Wants to Take Over 
the World"), but there is no payoff. Robert Wagner, as another of Dr. Evil's 
henchmen, Number 2, has all of one scene, until Dr. Evil goes back in time 
and the role is taken over by the younger Rob Lowe (who does a killer 
impression of Wagner). Mindy Sterling has a few nice moments as assistant 
Frau Farbissina who, midway through, has a steamy affair with Dr. Evil, and 
later shares an uncomfortable moment with him by the coffee machine. 
The new characters are a memorable, if underused, bunch. Taking over the 
romantic interest role from Hurley, Heather Graham is energetic and has 
proven to be a fine actress (see 1997's "Boogie Nights" or 1989's "Drugstore 
Cowboy" for proof), but here doesn't get to stretch her acting muscles, and 
her relationship with Austin feels a little more forced than that of Vanessa 
and he. The bright spot in the film is Mini Me (Verne J. Troyer), a clone of 
Dr. Evil, only 1/8 his size. Troyer is often hysterical and even cute, and 
his relationship with Dr. Evil is actually a sweet one. Going for a "Nutty 
Professor"/Eddie Murphy type of deal, Myers has given himself a third role, 
as Fat Bastard, a repugnant Scot who weighs a "metric ton" and, at one point, 
has a disgusting roll in the hay with one of the female characters. In the 
wasted department are the two femme fatales, Ivana Humpalot (Kristen 
Johnston) and Robin "maiden-name's-Spits" Swallows (Gia Carides), who show 
up, do their thang, and quickly disappear.
Of course, in the forefront of the whole operation is Mike Myers, who is 
comic dynamite and doesn't disappoint. Much of the joy that comes from 
watching Myers (whether it be as Austin or Wayne) is actually watching him. 
He clearly has a great love for performing, and especially for his Powers 
character, and his talent only shines through more when considering all of 
the different roles he plays here. You know going in that Dr. Evil is also 
played by Myers, but while watching him, it's easy to forget such a thing 
because of how utterly convincing he is.
With "Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me," what you see is what you get. 
There is certainly no deep meanings behind anything that occurs within the 
95-minute running time, and it has a fast pace so your mind won't wander too 
much. The fact that a third "Austin Powers" movie will probably be coming out 
at this time in 2001 is a given, but after seeing his second adventure, you 
have to wonder how many times the same jokes can be played out before they 
start to overstay their welcome. Having Austin say "yeah, baby, yeah!" was 
amusing the first time around, but it isn't here. And judging from this 
not-bad, but lackluster first sequel, Myers should start brainstorming his 
ideas now for the next installment. A little bit of variety and originality 
may very well come in handy in the future.
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Two Girls and a Guy (1997)
Directed by James Toback.
Cast: Heather Graham, Robert Downey Jr., Natasha Gregson Wagner, 
Frederique Van Der Wal, Angel David.
1998 - 85 minutes.
Rated R (for profanity and sex).
By Dustin Putman 
Dustin Putman's Film Reviews ">Http://members.aol.com/filmfan16/index.html>
"Two Girls and a Guy," directed by James Toback (1987's "The Pick-Up 
Artist"), is a three-character drama that is set entirely in the New 
York apartment of a struggling actor (Robert Downey Jr.), who comes home 
from a long trip to find that both of his girlfriends, Carla (Heather 
Graham) and Lou (Natasha Gregson Wagner), are there and have discovered 
that they both have been being played by him for the last ten months.
It is very difficult to make films like "Two Girls and Guy," in which 
there only a few characters and all they do is talk. It can be done 
(1995's "Before Sunrise"), but more often than not it comes off as being 
more appropriate as a play than an actual motion picture (1995's 
"Oleanna"). The successfulness of such a film usually depends on the 
quality of the dialogue and performances, which is unfortunate since 
"Two Girls and a Guy" rarely has intelligent and provocative dialogue, 
and the performances are far from impressive.
One of the main problems with "Two Girls and a Guy" is that it is 
constantly confused by what type of genre it wants to fall in. Mostly it 
is a comedy, which is somewhat of a predicament considering the fact 
that the subject matter is very serious. And then in the end, nothing is 
really resolved, and the picture makes a sharp u-turn towards melodrama, 
which isn't touching, but just seems out of place.
Another flaw is in its characters, which are the type of people you are 
glad you don't know in real life, since they are both unpleasant and 
downright annoying. Like "Oleanna," which equally grated on your nerves, 
it seemed like all of the dialogue was shouted at each other to the 
point of nausea, and I walked away from the movie with a literal 
headache. After seeing this film, I made a rule that in order to like a 
movie, it shouldn't be physically painful to watch.
"Two Girls and a Guy" is overdone in almost all senses of the word, and 
it is very messy. By not liking any of the characters, I didn't care 
about their problems or the outcome of them. I just wanted them to leave 
me alone.

Title
Review for Sweet November (2001)
Directed by Pat O'Connor.
Cast: Keanu Reeves, Charlize Theron, Jason Isaacs, Liam Aiken, Greg Germann, 
Michael Rosenbaum, Frank Langella, Lauren Graham.
2001 - 117 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for mild profanity and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, February 17, 2001.
A cold workaholic. A free spirit who gradually helps him to loosen up and 
care about others. An unforeseen passion between the two unlikely souls. A 
tragic secret that threatens to tear them apart. Had "Sweet November," 
directed by Pat O'Connor (1998's "Dancing at Lughnasa"), been handled with 
less care, it would have surely seemed like little else than a weepy NBC 
"movie-of-the-week." Its offbeat, somewhat far-fetched premise gradually 
makes way for the type of conventional romantic drama that could only end 
with a tearjerker ending. In raising the material slightly above the norm for 
this indisputable, somewhat shameless genre, screenwriter Kurt Voelker has 
offered a subtle hand in making everything come together without as much sap 
as there could have been. Ultimately, the movie is far from perfect, and the 
running time is about fifteen minutes past its prime, but it genuinely 
surprises by saving itself with the gently done, powerful conclusion.
Nelson Moss (Keanu Reeves) is a hard-working, emotionless San Francisco ad 
executive who is so dedicated to his work, he has lost track of the other 
things in life that make it worth living. He lives so much by the clock, in 
fact, that when his alarm goes off while he is in the middle of having sex 
with his neglected girlfriend, Anjelica (Lauren Graham), he immediately stops 
to get ready for work.
While renewing his license at the local DMV, Nelson has a chance meeting with 
Sara Deever (Charlize Theron), who is thrown out of the testing center for 
responding to a question that Nelson whispers to her. Without a license, she 
persuades Nelson to act as her chauffeur one night, only to break into an 
animal shelter and save two puppies from being put to death. A joyous, 
beautiful, young woman who has learned to not take life for granted for even 
a second, Sara presents Nelson with a proposition: for the entire month of 
November, she will invite him to move in with her, and spend every minute 
with him. Nelson thinks she's crazy.
After a failed meeting the next day and a nasty confrontation with his boss, 
Nelson finds himself fired from his job. To make matters worse, Anjelica 
leaves him. With nothing to lose, Nelson finally accepts Sara's offer. Her 
goal, of course, is to make him wake up and smell the coffee--that is, become 
a better, more well-rounded and humane, person. As Nelson gradually falls for 
her, Sara is frightened to find herself attracted to him in a way she never 
has before. The answer to why Sara casually chooses a man every month to mold 
and enlighten is one that Nelson is unsure of, although it is sure to be 
uncovered by the time November comes to a close.
A remake of the same-titled 1968 film starring Sandy Dennis and Anthony 
Newley, "Sweet November" meanders for much of its length, yet never so much 
that it doesn't have time to recover for an excellent final half-hour. The 
success of the climax comes as something of a shock, considering that it is 
this potentially asinine section that seemed most likely to fail. What comes 
before isn't so much bad as it is merely shopworn. The machinations of the 
generic plot work overtime to offer little in the way of original material, 
and many sequences feel repetitive, as if they are just repeating what has 
already been established in the budding romance between Nelson and Sara.
Increasing the classiness of "Sweet November" and making its developments 
credible is the exquisite Charlize Theron (2000's "The Legend of Bagger 
Vance"). In a role that somehow feels made precisely for her, as a showcase 
for both her beauty and talent, Theron creates a character that is as lovable 
and alluring as she is unconventional in her way of life. Having Nelson fall 
hopelessly in love with Sara seems like a nonexistent stretch with someone 
like Theron playing her, and we grow to care about her in a way that is not 
immediately palpable.
In his second film with Theron (after 1997's superior, scary "The Devil's 
Advocate"), Keanu Reeves makes for a believably close-vested, frigid 
businessman in the first half, and a progressively softer human being who 
realizes the artificiality of his day-to-day existence in the latter. 
Criticized in the past for his less-than-naturalistic performances, there is 
no doubt that Reeves has matured as an actor in recent years, plausibly 
playing a serial killer (2000's "The Watcher"), an abusive, backwoods husband 
(2000's "The Gift"), an unsuspecting computer programmer/action hero (1999's 
"The Matrix"), and a football player (2000's "The Replacements").
The supporting cast is almost uniformly good, if not necessarily 
well-developed. Jason Isaacs (the villainous Col. Tavington in 2000's "The 
Patriot") is a standout as Chaz, the best friend/neighbor of Sara's, offering 
up a strong amount of wisdom and sweetness, while Michael Rosenbaum (1998's 
"Urban Legend") shows much promise in the small role of his caring boyfriend. 
Greg Germann (TV's "Ally McBeal") serviceably plays Reeves' snooty 
coworker-partner, but remains one-dimensional throughout. And Liam Aiken 
(1998's "Stepmom") poses as only a cursory annoyance as a fatherless child 
who takes a liking to Nelson.
The dreamy cinematography by Edward Lachman successfully present the 
surroundings with the appropriate amount of beauty Sara so passionately sees 
in the world, while the music score, by Christopher Young, thankfully does 
not overpower the actors' emotions or spell out what we are supposed to feel 
in any given scene. Meanwhile, the recurring song in the picture, "Only You," 
by Enya, is perfect in setting up its "Love Story" angle, as well as the 
character of Sara.
For the middle forty-five minutes, the energy in "Sweet November" admittedly 
begins to flag. With Sara and Nelson now in love, the story slows to a crawl 
and starts to repeat itself, all the while setting up the tragic plot twist 
that everything predictably leads up to. While this turn doesn't fully 
succeed and isn't exactly necessarily, credit director Pat O'Connor for 
playing it out with a generally light touch and (spoiler alert ahead) sparing 
us a deathbed scene. "Sweet November" is flawed, to be sure, but its heart 
sure is in the right place.
   - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
     http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman
http://www.atnzone.com

Title
Review for Varsity Blues (1999)
Directed by Brian Robbins.
Cast: James Van Der Beek, Jon Voight, Paul Walker, Ron Lester, Amy 
Smart, Ali Larter, Scott Caan.
1999 - 104 minutes.
Rated R (for profanity, sexual situations, and nudity).
Reviewed January 9, 1999.
"Varsity Blues" is the best film of 1999 thus far. Unfortunately, it is 
also the first film I have seen from 1999. It is another one of those 
small-town sports movies that involves a flawed, but good-heartedfrom 
1999. It is another one of those small-town sports movies that involves 
a flawed, but good-hearted protagonist; a rough and meanspirited coach; 
and the "big game." By the end, will the underdog overcome great odds 
and triumph? Will everyone in the town turn against the coach? Will the team
win the climactic game? Do cats bathe themselves regularly?
The so-called "hero" in question is John Moxin (James Van Der Beek), a 
senior at West Canaan High School who plays for the varsity football 
team, but is really just hoping to get a scholarship at Brown University 
so that he can get out of the dead-end town. At least he's got the right 
idea, since West Canaan, Texas is portrayed in the film as, frankly, 
pathetic, with the whole town treating the weekly football games as the 
Second Coming. Heck, in one scene, the front page of the town's 
newspaper is proclaiming about the West Canaan Badgers' big win the 
night before. When the team's star quarterback is severely injured, 
tearing the ligaments in his leg, John finds himself taking over as the 
team's leader, but his few minutes of glory do not last long, as he 
begins to have problems with his girlfriend (Amy Smart) when she 
discovers he spent an evening with another girl (Ali Larter). And after 
staying out all night with his drinking buddies at a strip joint (all of 
the teenagers in the film are portrayed as raging alcoholics), the team 
loses their second-to-last game, putting John at feuds with the coach 
(Jon Voight who, like Gary Oldman, is overstaying his welcome in the 
typecasted role as the "bad guy"). Worse yet, the coach is threatening 
to ruin John's scholarship chances if the Badgers don't win their final 
game.
The plotting of "Varsity Blues" is as old as the hills, and contains 
every cliche in the book. Admittedly, I was never exactly bored while I 
was watching it, but I hasten to add that I was rarely ever entertained. 
Throughout, all I could really think of is how virtually the same exact 
story had been filmed with a great deal more thoughtfulness and maturity 
in 1983's "All the Right Moves."
One of the biggest problems I had with the film is how little of 
interest any of the characters actually were, least of all certainly not 
John, who, played by Van Der Beek (of TV's "Dawson's Creek"), is pretty 
much a bore without any engaging qualities. While I probably shouldn't 
blame this on Van Der Beek, since the inauspicious and "by-the-numbers" 
screenplay by W. Peter Iliff isn't of any help, he is still certainly 
not in the league of Tom Cruise in "All the Right Moves." The story 
revolving around John, meanwhile, is extemely thin throughout, 
particularly for its 104-minute running time, and it alternates between 
uninspired comic relief (as in when the students see their sex education 
teacher working as a stripper at the club) and heavy-handed melodrama. 
The romance between John and his girlfriend had the potential to be an 
adequate subplot, but we also learned very little about her, which is 
unfortunate since Amy Smart, whom I don't think I've seen before in past 
films, is probably the only character written with any sort of 
intelligence. Smart does not allow her character to become the "passive 
girlfriend," instead coming off as a young woman with her own ideas and 
opinions. It's too bad the camera didn't linger on her long enough so we 
could hear some of those thoughts.
The adult characters probably fare the worse of any, since they all must 
play residents of a dim-witted town that cares about nothing but 
football. John's relationship with his parents can also be telegraphed 
far in advance. His father is set on him becoming a football player at a 
university, but John doesn't want any part of that. His mother stands 
beside her "big, strong husband" and is a passive female. Finally, Jon 
Voight plays the stock bully coach character and he does nothing to make 
the thankless role any more than one-dimensional.
Saving "Varsity Blues" from being a total washout are a few amusing 
sequences, including one set in the sex education class, which did get a 
laugh out of me. The scenes of playing football were well-shot and 
thankfully didn't overstay their welcome, as many sports films fall 
victim to. But leaving the theater, the question I had in my mind was 
why did this film need to be made? I seem to be asking this question 
quite a lot lately, since the same old stories seem to be cranking out 
of Hollywood. Do we really need another high-school sports film? No, we 
don't, and certainly not one of this low-caliber, which felt like a 
cut-and-paste job of spare parts from much better, but similar, films. 
"Varsity Blues," no doubt is the first one, however, to include an 
earnest scene in which one of the characters is only wearing whipped 
cream on their private parts.
       - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
         Dustin
Putman's Film Haven >

Title
Review for Three Kings (1999)
Directed by David O. Russell.
Cast: George Clooney, Mark Wahlberg, Ice Cube, Spike Jonze, Nora Dunn, Jamie 
Kennedy, Mykelti Williamson, Cliff Curtis, Said Taghmaoui, Liz Stauber, Judy 
Greer.
1999 - 111 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, sex, and gore).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, October 4, 1999.
Since the Gulf War ended in 1991, only two major films have been made about 
it. The first, 1996's "Courage Under Fire," starred Denzel Washington as a 
discharged Lieutenant investigating the worth of the first woman (Meg Ryan) 
ever to be given a Medal of Honor posthumously. Now comes "Three Kings," 
fashionably-directed by acclaimed indie filmmaker David O. Russell (1994's 
"Spanking the Monkey," 1996's "Flirting With Disaster"), which is not your 
usual war picture, and about as far as could be from something akin to Steven 
Spielberg's "Saving Private Ryan."
Set immediately following the end of the Gulf War in March 1991, when the 
infantry is planning to return home to their families, Major Archie Gates 
(George Clooney), on the eve of retiring from the military, discovers a 
document that points the way to a stash of Kuwaiti gold that is worth 
hundreds of millions. The map, originally found by Sgt. Troy Barlow (Mark 
Wahlberg), a young, married man who has a one-month-old baby at home; Sgt. 
Chief Elgin (Ice Cube), a former airport baggage tranferrer; and Pvt. Conrad 
Vig (Spike Jonze), a happy-go-lucky southern redneck, sticking out of the 
backside of an Iraqi soldier, holds the key to bright, wealthy futures for 
all four of the men. Continuously followed by pushy news reporter Adriana 
Cruz (Nora Dunn), who is determined to get exclusive first rights to the 
story, the four are faced by many other hurdles in their way, including not 
letting their superiors know about the illegal operation, and storming the 
bunkers, still overrun by the enemies.
With a highly inventive, no-holds-barred style that plays itself out like a 
"how-to" class on evoking freneticism, "Three Kings" is such an 
invigoratingly energized motion picture that it's almost difficult not to get 
caught up in the goings-on. Not your typical war film by any stretch of the 
imagination, and more unconventional than your average $50-million studio 
picture, the film is a graceful mixture of several different genres, 
including comedy, drama, and action, with a few minor war battles thrown in 
for good measure. Cinematographer Newton Thomas Sigel wisely has chosen to 
give the film an over-developed look as if the film has been sitting out in 
the sun too long, so as to emphasize the gritty nature of the characters and 
dire situations, and the eclectic soundtrack is also cause for praise, which 
features such pop icons as The Beach Boys, and easy-listening rock, thanks to 
The Eagles. The conflicting elements that cause the tone to waver from dark 
to comedic gives the film a constant air of unpredicatability, as the viewer 
is never exactly sure where the film is headed from moment to moment. 
The characters, although thinly-written, are inhabited by a cast of 
first-rate actors that take their roles and improve upon their limited 
development in the writing department. George Clooney, as in last year's "Out 
of Sight," has more than proven his previously questionable leading-man 
status and can surefootedly carry a picture (just as long as it doesn't have 
'Batman' in the title). Cool, calm, and determined, Clooney occupies his 
character with such ease (similar to 1996's "From Dusk Till Dawn") that it 
often seems like he doesn't even have to try. 
Mark Wahlberg, in his first impressive turn since 1997's "Boogie Nights," is 
absolutely fabulous as the conflicted Sgt. Barlow, a man who, at first, shows 
very little compassion to the fates of the people around him, until he puts 
the death and destruction around him into context with his own life back 
home, where his sweet wife (Liz Stauber) is eagerly awaiting his arrival. 
Equipped with the most powerful, humane character in the whole film, Wahlberg 
fits the role perfectly, and goes even further with it. 
In slighter roles, Ice Cube is fine as Sgt. Elgin, but not given nearly as 
much chance to satisfactorily develop a character, while Spike Jonze 
(arguably the fourth king) is on hand basically for comic relief. Luckily, 
Jonze is often quite amusing, and likable enough that his antics never fully 
wear out their welcome. 
Jamie Kennedy, who seems to always get stuck with the supporting roles (aside 
from the first two "Scream" films), is more memorable here than in the recent 
"Bowfinger," and has a few hysterically funny scenes in which he acts 
alongside Nora Dunn. In a film inundated with male performers, it is Dunn who 
is, by far, the standout. Sassy, high-spirited, and portrayed with 
pitch-perfect professionalism, it is the foul-mouthed, but wisely 
uncaricaturized character of news reporter Adriana Cruz that is the most 
noteworthy, and it would be criminal for the Academy to forget Dunn when the 
nominations are announced next February.
"Three Kings" might have been nothing more than a passable diversion had the 
film not be handled with such technical creativity and skill. The major 
plotline, about four men attempting to possess Kuwaiti gold, is not very 
important or interesting on its own, but interweaved with writer-director 
David O. Russell's underlying themes concerning human compassion and 
kindness, the film really does have a reason for being. Although imperfect, 
"Three Kings" has enough vigor and intelligence to satisfy both audiences 
that prefer action, and those that enjoy more thought-provoking fare.

Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)
Directed by Eduardo Sanchez and Daniel Myrick.
Cast: Heather Donahue, Michael Williams, Joshua Leonard.
1999 - 87 minutes (opens July 16, 1999 in limited release; July 30 
wider)
Rated R (for profanity and intensity).
Reviewed April 5, 1999.
"On October 21, 1994, Heather Donahue, Joshua Leonard, and Michael 
Williams hiked into the Black Hills Forest to shoot a documentary film 
on a local legend called 'The Blair Witch,' and were never seen again. 
One year later, their footage was found."
This is the title card that appears at the start of "The Blair Witch 
Project," a film made on a microscopic budget by first-time 
writer-directors Eduardo Sanchez and Daniel Myrick that probably caused 
more of a stir with audiences than any other motion picture that was 
showcased at this year's Sundance Film Festival.
What follows is that footage that was ultimately found in the forest, 
meticulously edited together from the 16mm and video formats they used 
to shoot it on. Set up as a sort of pseudo-documentary, "The Blair Witch 
Project" begins with the three aforementioned Montgomery College 
students preparing for their trip to Burkittsville, Maryland, home of 
the legendary Blair Witch who, as the people they interview in the town 
tell it, lives within the Black Hills Forest and murdered a string of 
children in the 1940's. Playfully shrugging off such horrific stories, 
the headstrong Heather, constantly with a Hi-8 video camera in her hand 
and using a map and compass, leads Joshua (who is filming with a grainy 
black-and-white 16mm camera) and Michael (who is there to pick up the 
sound) deep into the woods for what is supposed to be a simple 2-day 
excursion. It doesn't turn out that way, however, as they ultimately 
never make it back to their car on the second day and are forced to set 
up camp another night. Faint footsteps are heard, and the next day, they 
discover voodoo dolls and eerie symbols hanging over the trees. As the 
days pass by, their food begins to dwindle, the pitch black, freezing 
nights grow more and more intense and threatening as increasingly loud 
cackling noises and screams are heard, and they become hopelessly lost 
within the mouth of the forest, the three students are forced to come to 
terms with themselves and reconstruct their vision of what raw, 
unadulterated horror really is.
When was the last time you've been scared by a movie? No, strike that. 
When was the last time you have been so completely and utterly horrified
 by a motion picture that, when the end credits began to roll, you were 
left curled up in your chair, literally shaking, and filled with so many 
strong emotions that you weren't quite sure how to decipher it all? If 
your answer was never (which it most likely was), look no further than 
"The Blair Witch Project," which is a horror film like no other. It is 
not another manufactured and slick "Scream"-style flick, but a true 
horror movie, one drenched in such a thick, smothering veil of 
hopelessness and dread, not to mention utter realism, that it finally 
stops becoming merely a "movie" and is transformed into something that 
means more, as if you are watching a true-to-life documentation of the 
terror three students fell face-to-face upon on that fateful, chilly 
October week before they disappeared without a trace.
Also, unlike any other film I have ever seen, "The Blair Witch Project" 
is constantly shown from the point-of-view of one of the characters, 
since the movie is made up of the footage they filmed. This cinema 
verite style of filmmaking adds to the constant feeling that what you 
are watching is not fiction, but genuinely authentic, as it puts the 
viewer smack dab in the middle of the absolute nightmare. Jittery, 
shaky, and hand-held, the camera ultimately takes on a life all its own, 
used as a sort of metaphor for the off-kilter frame-of-mind the 
characters are forced to obtain as their spirits diminish and they start 
to question whether they will survive their dire, to say the least, 
ordeal.
To put it bluntly, there is no acting in "The Blair Witch Project." 
There is, since Heather Donahue, Michael Williams, and Joshua Leonard 
are playing characters (despite have the same names), but what I mean is 
that there isn't a minute, a second, or even a frame where you can ever 
catch the actors "acting." Their entirely believable performances which, 
for the most part, were improvised for the eight days they spent in the 
woods, are mindblowing, to say the least. As the character of Heather 
starts off as a confidant young woman, and the leader of the group, she 
gradually finds that this feeling of always being right is only a facade 
to hide her own weaknesses and fears for the future. As Heather, as well 
as Michael and Joshua, slowly break down, becoming vulnerable and beyond 
frightened, they have nothing to do but pray that they will make their 
way out of the seemingly endless wilderness before whatever really is 
out there gets them. In a late scene, filled more power and truthfulness 
than I can remember in any other film I've ever seen, Heather, centering 
the camera directly on her right eye and nose, pours all of her emotions 
out, confessing to the faults of her own life, apologizing to her 
family, her comrades' families, her friends, and finally, making peace 
with herself. 
To see "The Blair Witch Project" is not to simply watch it, but to 
experience it. No film in recent memory has shocked me, petrified me, 
unsettled my spirits, and left me so enthusiastic afterwards, making me 
want to discuss and share the picture with others. After rustling 
through so many recent turkeys, "The Blair Witch Project" has reminded 
me why I love the sacred medium of film, and why I want to dedicate my 
life to it. Writer-directors Sanchez and Myrick have thrust upon the 
world a motion picture with more promise, originality, and excitement 
than I can remember, and as a horror film, without any actually physical 
gore or even violence, it is more unsettling, atmospheric, devastating, 
and unforgettable than I ever, in my wildest imagination, expected a 
film could possibly be.
Note: This review will appear soon on 
Dustin Putman's Film 
Haven.

Title
Review for What Planet Are You From? (2000)
Directed by Mike Nichols.
Cast: Garry Shandling, Annette Bening, John Goodman, Greg Kinnear, Ben 
Kingsley, Linda Fiorentino, Judy Greer, Caroline Aaron, Nora Dunn, Camryn 
Manheim, Ann Cusack, Janeane Garofalo.
2000 - 107 minutes
Rated R (for profanity, sex, nudity, and much sex-related humor).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, March 4, 2000.
The premise of "What Planet Are You From?" is one of great convolution and 
foolishness, the type that, more often than not, would simply be written off 
as a dimwitted movie without any value or merit. Who could possibly take a 
film seriously in which an alien (Garry Shandling) from a planet "way the 
hell out there" is sent to Earth for one mission, and one mission only: to 
mate with a woman and have a child? Sounds like the usual low-rent junk that 
is released in theaters in the spring,  or sent direct-to-video, eh? 
Certainly not, if it aims directly for laughs, and is in the hands of 
acclaimed director Mike Nichols (1983's "Silkwood," 1988's "Working Girl," 
1998's "Primary Colors"), and stars, among others, Garry Shandling (TV's "The 
Larry Sanders Show"), Annette Bening (1999's "American Beauty"), and John 
Goodman (TV's "Roseanne"). 
Following a prologue on the distant planet, where the human-looking aliens 
(who otherwise exhibit no ability to have feelings or emotions) are 
misdirected in their teachings on how to treat the opposite sex, one such 
alien, who is given the name Harold, is chosen to make his way down to Earth. 
Locating himself in Seattle, Washington, he gets himself a job at a bank and 
makes friends with his womanizing, married coworker, Perry (Greg Kinnear), 
who begins to help him in his quest to meet a woman. Harold, who firmly 
believes he can have sex with a woman if only he compliments her on her shoes 
or hair, has another problem, which is the brunt of a great many jokes, 
almost all of which are a devilish hoot: when aroused, his penis vibrates and 
makes a buzzing sound.
One evening, Perry takes Harold to an AA meeting (a prime place, Perry 
believes, to pick up conflicted and vulnerable females), where Harold is 
instantly smitten with Susan Hart (Annette Bening), a recovering 
alcoholic/real estate agent whose biological clock is ticking very loudly, 
but who has sworn to herself she will only sleep with someone again when she 
has married. After just one date, in which Harold and Susan hit it off, 
Harold proposes marriage to Susan, and in a moment of haste, she accepts. 
Their relationship soon grows problematic, however, when Harold becomes very 
distant and unloving towards Susan after she has gotten pregnant. What she 
doesn't know is that he isn't purposefully being emotionally cold to her: he 
just doesn't know how to love.
Meanwhile, following a mysterious blast on an airplane that allegedly was 
Harold's entrance to Earth, a Federal Aviation Administration agent (John 
Goodman) begins to investigate the strange occurrence, and gradually catches 
on to the true identity of Harold, causing stress on his own marriage to a 
fed-up housewife (Caroline Aaron) who believes he is having an affair.
"What Planet Are You From?" may very well be the trickiest motion picture of 
the year, thus far, because its admittedly ludicrous nature only adds to the 
delicate balancing act that must constantly be obtained by director Nichols 
and screenwriters Garry Shandling, Michael Leeson, Ed Solomon, and Peter 
Tolan. One prominent misstep, and the whole film would be in danger of 
crumbling to the ground, making the movie be a complete embarrassment for all 
involved.
It's a stroke of luck (and an obvious boatload of comedic talent), then, that 
the film is, overall, the most laugh-out-loud funny comedy in ages. For the 
first hour, it is genuinely perfect, a masterwork in which literally almost 
every attempt at a laugh works, so much so that I often was still laughing at 
one part, when the next would arise and make me laugh even more. Suffice to 
say, I wasn't able to inhale much oxygen during that sixty-minute time span. 
Everything, even right down to the use of a particular musical chord that 
echoes the raising of a character's eyebrows, is an example of comic 
brilliance, the way all comedies should work. Refreshing, too, that a movie 
with countless sex and penis jokes manages to avoid being overly juvenile, 
and is aimed squarely at teenagers and adults. It may be silly, and it may 
sometimes be even graphic in its sexual innuendo, but it is also an 
undeniable riot.
The second hour of "What Planet Are You From?" shifts tones, and while still 
effective, much of its comedy is put on the back burner for a more somber, 
poignant look at love relationships that may involve an alien in this case, 
but stands for a great deal of marriages, in general. Changing from something 
that is so highly entertaining and relatively breezy to something that delves 
a little deeper into the characters and story comes as a marginal 
disappointment on the outset, but in another way, the latter half is vital to 
what the whole picture has been setting itself up for. By getting more 
serious, but never totally abandoning its comedy, director Nichols wants us 
to invest our feelings into the fate of Harold and Susan's relationship, and 
we are surprised to realize that, while the opening had been wavering along 
the lines of even being considered a spoof, a 'la "The Naked Gun," we have, 
indeed, grown to care about them.
Only the climax, which briefly takes us back to Harold's planet for a rather 
saccharine speech on the importance of compassion and human emotions, does 
the film stumble for more than a fleeting moment, but, fortunately, it 
recoups itself by the finale.
Garry Shandling, in his first starring film role, is outstanding as Harold, 
the very important and flawless comedic center of the film. While being 
unable to feel things inside, Shandling, nonetheless, is able to gain our 
sympathies, and the eccentric romance that blossoms between he and Susan is 
sweet-natured and involving. Susan, as played with energy and appropriate 
pinnache by Annette Bening, is Harold's total match because, although she 
gradually becomes dissatisfied with his uncaring ways, makes it clear that 
she had meaningless sex with so many men in her life that she has forgotten 
herself how to love, or what it even is. Only after meeting the one-of-a-kind 
Harold does she start to rebuild her life and understand what it means to 
feel love, even when it isn't outwardly being returned to her.
As the slimy Perry, this is Greg Kinnear's most memorable role to date. 
Usually an extremely bland actor, Kinnear jumps off the screen here and makes 
his, albeit unlikable, character come alive. Judy Greer (1999's 
"Jawbreaker"), as a flight attendant turned off by Harold's advances until 
she meets him at the AA meeting, is entertaining and gets a great big laugh 
in the last second of her final scene due to the aforementioned musical chord 
that strikes at just the right time. And although just an unbilled cameo, 
Janeane Garofalo brings her usual sparkling presence to the role of a nervous 
flier whom Harold hits on, even in her horrified state. Meanwhile, Linda 
Fiorentino (1997's "Men in Black") is severely wasted as Perry's wife, who 
Harold considers having an affair with after he is married.
Whatever you do, do not be turned off by the premise, or the title itself, of 
"What Planet Are You From?" Rated R, and rightfully so, this film will 
delight adult viewers who are in the mood for a feel-good comedy that turns 
out to not only be about the punchline of jokes, but also, within the 
context, takes its characters and their situations seriously. In fact, 
perhaps the most gratifying thing of all is that director Mike Nichols and 
his cast of high-profile actors took a big risk on making this offbeat movie, 
and do not embarrass themselves. Not one little bit.

Title
Review for 15 Minutes (2001)
Directed by John Herzfeld.
Cast: Robert De Niro, Edward Burns, Karel Roden, Oleg Taktarov, Kelsey 
Grammer, Melina Kanakaredes, Vera Farmiga, Avery Brooks, John DiResta, Darius 
McCrary, James Handy, Charlize Theron, Bruce Cullen, David Alan Grier, Kim 
Cattrall.
2001 - 120 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, gore, sexual situations, and nudity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, March 10, 2001.
In today's day and age, when it seems like a progressive amount of people are 
committing extreme criminal acts in order to, at least in part, become famous 
(i.e. last week's San Diego high school shooting), writer-director John 
Herzfeld's "15 Minutes" stands as a timely, thoughtful motion picture. Taking 
a satirical, if on-the-mark, look at the outrageous lengths some people will 
go to get their fifteen minutes of fame (a term coined by Andy Warhol), as 
well as their learned savviness thanks to the media around them, the film is 
an intense, well-written thriller that, for once, has more of a purpose than 
to simply entertain. It actually has a brain in its head, and a sharply 
observed '70s-era sensibility that recalls such classic films as "The 
Parallax View," "The French Connection," and "Dog Day Afternoon."
The second that the scummy Czech immigrant Emil (Karel Roden) and Russian 
movie-lover Oleg (Oleg Taktarov) step foot into America, hell starts to break 
loose. Equipped with a snazzy video camera that Oleg steals, he and Emil set 
out on a precisely-planned, murderous rampage throughout Manhattan that 
includes stabbings, beatings, shootings, and arson to anyone they feel like 
doing it to. Their purpose is very simple: to commit enough murders to 
catapult them to the top of every media outlet in the world, intentionally 
get caught, plead that they were the subjects of physical abuse growing up, 
get acquitted, and reap in loads of money on movie and book deals.
After a fatal building fire, arson investigator Jordy Warsaw (Edward Burns) 
meets famed homicide detective Eddie Flemming (Robert De Niro), who has been 
assigned to the case. They soon team up together to investigate the string of 
killings that have begun to escalate in the city, with Eddie not knowing Oleg 
and Emil already are familiar with his celebrity, and have plans of their own 
for him.
Always involving and often exciting and downright unsettling, "15 Minutes" is 
a bravura police/media drama that has been written and directed by John 
Herzfeld (1996's "2 Days in the Valley") with a clear precision that offers 
up more than the usual glossy, mainstream grab-bag of senseless action and 
pointless violence. The picture is clever and knowing in its attitudes about 
violence in the U.S., and the effects their outcome have on the criminals 
themselves. It also has plot developments that, for once, are not easily 
predicted (including a twist at the beginning of the second half that is 
absolutely shocking), and the strengths of these, as well as the 
thought-provoking material dealt with, are able to overcome many of the 
weaknesses found in the uneven character development.
While Robert De Niro (2000's "Men of Honor") and Edward Burns (1998's "Saving 
Private Ryan") both start off with a somewhat shaky, unfocused grasp on their 
roles of Ed Flemming and Jordy Warsaw, respectively, they manage to 
strengthen the evolution of both personalities by the film's latter half. 
Burns, especially, starts off with a noticeable blandness, but somehow 
transforms along the way to the conclusion into a striking, memorable 
character. 
The stars of the film, however, are Eastern European newcomers Karel Roden 
and Oleg Taktarov, whose frightening, unhinged bad guys turn out to be the 
center of the movie. Arresting every second they are onscreen, Roden and 
Taktarov are utterly talented finds that will hopefully find more film work 
based on what they have accomplished here.
In supporting roles, Melina Kanakaredes (TV's "Providence") shows much 
promise as news reporter Nicolette Karas, who is also carrying on a romance 
with Eddie. Nicolette is not given an overly generous amount of screen time, 
but Kanakaredes makes the best of it, fleshing out her character into a 
sympathetic, realistic individual. Kelsey Grammer is okay as tabloid show 
anchor Robert Hawkins, successfully getting rid of his "Frasier" image, but 
is so one-dimensional that he spends his time making little to no impression, 
or going over-the-top. Meanwhile, Charlize Theron (2001's "Sweet November") 
makes a splashy cameo as the black-wigged worker of an escort service.
What ultimately makes "15 Minutes" such a success is its willingness to try 
novel techniques not seen in many years that throw the viewer off balance, 
making them unsure, and sometimes even a bit nervous, of what is to come 
next. Not only that, but it is one of those rare recent thrillers that 
doesn't go the easy route, nor does it present a nonsensical and exploitative 
storyline for mainstream mass consumption. "15 Minutes" actually has 
something to say, and it says it remarkably well.
   - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
     http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Dustin+Putman
http://www.atnzone.com

Title
Review for Dogme 1 - Festen (1998)
Directed by Thomas Vinterberg.
Cast: Ulrich Thomsen, Henning Moritzen, Thomas Bo Larsen, Paprika Steen, 
Birthe Neumann, Trine Dyrholm, Helle Dolleris, Gbatokai Dakinah, Therese 
Glahn, Klaus Bondam, John Boas, Erna Boas.
1998 - 101 minutes - Danish with English subtitles.
Rated R (for violence, profanity, sex, and nudity).
Reviewed December 10, 1998.
By Dustin Putman 
Dustin Putman's Film Reviews ">Http://members.aol.com/filmfan16/index.html>
The characters in the Danish director Thomas Vinterberg's remarkable 
film, "The Celebration," are so full of hate, resentment, and 
unhappiness, that it sometimes grew nearly unbearable to watch them 
anymore. And yet, the film is such an emotional powerhouse without going 
for cheap dramatics that I couldn't turn my back on it.
"The Celebration," is set during a 24-hour period, in which an extended 
family has gathered at a country estate to celebrate the 60th-birthday 
of the family patriarch, Helge (Henning Moritzen). Right from the very 
first scene, in which, on his way to the party, Michael (Thomas Bo 
Larsen) spots his older brother, Christian (Ulrich Thomsen), travelling 
by foot, and subsequently throws his own wife and three children out of 
the car, we get a taste of how dysfunctional this family is. Early on, 
we also meet Helene (Paprika Steen), Michael and Christian's sister, and 
Pia (Trine Dyrholm), who has loved Christian ever since chilhood, but 
has not been able to connect with him since his twin sister committed 
suicide two months ago. All of these characters and story threads 
finally come together at the actual birthday celebration that night, in 
which everything begins to unravel and fall apart when Christian, giving 
a speech at dinner, unexpectedly reveals some brutal hidden secrets that 
he has kept bottled up for years about his father, Helge.
"The Celebration," is the first film to be released under Dogme 95, a 
Danish film agreement established in Copenhagen, which requires the 
director to make the film with a hand-held camera using natural light, 
and without any sort of special-effects or music score. The purpose is 
to give the Dogme 95 films a realism and aspect of spontaneity that 
could not be captured otherwise. Considering this, "The Celebration," is 
an interesting first experiment, but also an, overall, exceptional 
motion picture that, truth be told, gives off an air of instinctivity 
and nauralism that has never been caught in a fictional film before.
Aside from this truly unique aspect, "The Celebration," is a brutal, 
unbelievably stark motion picture about family wounds and secrets. It 
would be criminal to spoil the surprises within, but once Christian 
reveals his past to the whole family, I was in a state of shock and 
dread throughout the rest of the film. Prior to this fateful moment, I 
had pretty much decided what I thought of all of the characters---I 
liked Christian and Helge, but found Michael to be a despicable, abusive 
human being---but once that turning point came, the film forced me to 
question and judge the family again, as individuals and as a whole. And 
even as more and more striking plot developments occurred, I had a 
difficult time deciphering the good from the bad, and the truth from 
what could very well be dirty, unforgivable lies. 
The actors, most of which appeared in Vinterberg's first, and lesser 
known film, "The Greatest Heroes," are all meticulous and unforgettable, 
from Ulrich Thomsen, as Christian, who feels it is time to get his 
miserable childhood out in the open, to Thomas Bo Larsen as the edgy 
Michael, to Paprika Steen, as Helene, who turns out to be hiding secrets 
of her own. Henning Moritzen was perfect as the father, Helge, who 
drifts throughout the film as being both touching and helpless, even 
though we sense he is capable of some very terrible things. Also making 
an impact is Gbatokai Dakinah, as Helene's black boyfriend who shows up 
unnanouced at the party, much to the disgrace of the rest of the family.
The camerawork and cinematography by Birgitte Hald, as in the Dogme 
rules, was done with a hand-held camera, which was a smart choice, since 
the shaky, unsettling movements reflect the family's gradually crumbling 
relationship in the film. The picture was also filmed in drab, 
yellow-brownish colors which also telegraphed the idea of a family 
off-balance. 
Watching the picture, it felt more like a cerebral experience, than a 
normal film. In a decidedly weak year for movies, "The Celebration," is 
certainly one of the year's very best. It made me feel things deep 
inside myself, which caught me by an even greater surprise, when 
compared to the trivialities of most of the films being made in today's 
times. There was never a false moment to be had; not with the 
characters, or the writing, which is superb, or with the deep truths of 
the story. When, "The Celebration," ended, it left me with conflicting 
emotions about what had gone on between the family. On the one hand, I 
had the suspicion that maybe the family would be able to work things 
out, but that was only my own ideal thoughts. In actuality, I knew that 
when one person simply told the other, "you can go now," that was the 
definitive end to the family, and yet, the start of happiness and relief 
from some of the characters. Funny, how a harmless get-together between 
loved-ones can start out as a rejoicing of togetherness, and end as a 
rejoicing of separation between those who now hate each other. 

Title
Review for Shiloh 2: Shiloh Season (1999)
The original 1997 film, "Shiloh," was a small family movie that went 
undetected in theaters but became a hit on video and was praised by several 
notable critics. It remains unseen by me, and after viewing the 
well-intentioned, but painfully sappy sequel, "Shiloh 2: Shiloh Season," it 
probably will remain just that way: unseen. Practically a carbon-copy of most 
other "dog" movies, the film tells the story of 12-year-old Marty (Zachary 
Browne), who loves his faithful dog, Shiloh, just about as much as anyone 
could love a pet, but he finds their happiness put in jeopardy when the 
alcoholic, bitter Judd (Scott Wilson), Shiloh's abusive former owner, demands 
for him back. "Shiloh 2" may be acceptable for undiscriminating young 
viewers, and is certainly a few steps up from the awful "Inspector Gadget," 
but the movie has not an ounce of originality and mostly plays like a corny 
episode of the old television show, "Lassie." If only families were as 
perfect and happy as the one shown in this film, the world would be a better 
place, indeed.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for General's Daughter, The (1999)
 Directed by Simon West.
 Cast: John Travolta, Madeleine Stowe, James Woods, James Cromwell, Timothy   
 Hutton, Clarence Williams III, Leslie Stefanson, Boyd Kestner.
 1999 - 118 minutes
 Rated R (for violence, nudity, profanity, and a strong scene of rape).
 Reviewed June 20, 1999.
 Director Simon West's "The General's Daughter," based on a popular novel by 
Nelson DeMille, is an absorbing crime investigation drama, albeit one with 
some unexpected dialogue zingers. West, who last made one of 1997's most 
insultingly bad action movies, "Con Air," has greatly improved with this 
effort, but the film still cannot completely dissolve a heavy feeling of deja 
vu that hangs over the proceedings. 
 Paul Brenner (John Travolta) is a top investigator at the Army Criminal 
Investigation Division, currently going undercover as a military warrant 
officer in Georgia to arrest a criminal, complete with a thick southern 
accent. After almost getting himself filled with bullets from the suspect, he 
kills him in self-defense and thinks his work is done there. But not so fast, 
since at the same exact time this fight was going on, highly respected 
Captain Elisabeth Campbell (Leslie Stefanson), whom Brenner met twice before, 
was found on the military grounds, spread-eagle naked and strangled to death. 
Brenner is assigned the case, but only has 36 hours before the police step 
in, and is partnered with rape investigator and ex-girlfriend Sarah Sunhill 
(Madeleine Stowe). Things get decidedly seedier when Brenner and Sunhill find 
a secret room in the basement of Campbell's home that includes S&M tools and 
home-made porno tapes, and her mentor, Colonel Moore (James Woods), is 
immediately suspected of having something to do with her death, which Moore 
himself does not deny.
 One of the key comments, and criticisms, that has been made thus far about 
"The General's Daughter" is that a particular rape sequence is gratuitous and 
needlessly exploitive. I don't think so; like last spring's underrated "8mm," 
which was even more graphic, the film takes a serious, unflinching look at 
the subject at hand--a rape and a murder, and its purpose, in no way, is to 
excite or titillate. Whoever may get off at the monstrosity that is presented 
here is nothing but a sick, unstable person. Kudos, at least, to director 
West for being serious-minded when the material calls for it.
 The downfall that results from "The General's Daughter" is in the basic 
story arc; there have been so many films concerning a crime investigation 
that it is long since grown tiresome if not done with a visual or 
invigorating flare. The questionable murderer that is, indeed, involved in 
Campbell's death is fairly easy to pinpoint--it's the only central cast 
member that doesn't really have any other purpose. However, a surprise 
revelation that comes in the second half leads to several thought-provoking 
ideas, and an exceptional scene near the end between Brenner and Campbell's 
stern General father (James Cromwell), in which Travolta and Cromwell get to 
delightfully play off of one another and prove their true acting colors.
 The relationship between Brenner and Sunhill is one of the film's finer 
points, subtle and light, but also consistently pleasurable. Unfortunately, 
their past failed romance is obviously only created to give Brenner some 
much-needed character development, and somewhat comes off as contrived. 
Still, due to the snappy screenplay, by Christopher Bertolini and William 
Goldman, it is this subplot and several other sequences that are brought 
instantly to life. Aided by Madeleine Stowe's superb performance, she and 
Travolta are given a lot of chances for some witty dialogue exchanges.
 A second standout is James Woods, who hasn't made much of an impression on 
me lately (save for, perhaps, "Another Day in Paradise"), but is back in top 
form. Even when his innocence is seriously questioned, his character of 
Colonel Moore remains three-dimensional and even likable, as we somehow can 
relate to his kinship with the late Campbell, whom he clearly loved and 
respected.
 "The General's Daughter" may follow a familiar pattern that we've seen 
before, and there's no denying its many flaws (including a few noticable plot 
holes), but the film is never boring. In her brief scenes as the tragic 
Campbell, Leslie Stefanson brings a fortuitous humanity to her role, and we 
can gradually sympathize with her, particularly when her secretive background 
is revealed. Convoluted as some of the developments may be, the movie never 
loses its interest or atmosphere within the swampy, backwater Georgia town, 
and as summer popcorn-fare, it is unusually intelligent.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Brokedown Palace (1999)
Directed by Jonathan Kaplan.
Cast: Claire Danes, Kate Beckinsale, Bill Pullman, Jacquelyn Kim, Daniel 
Lapaine, Lou Diamond Phillips, Aimee Graham.
1999 - 101 minutes.
Rated PG-13 (for profanity, drug use, and violence).
Reviewed August 14, 1999.
Jonathan Kaplan's "Brokedown Palace" feels throughout like an outline for a 
movie--one that has been scrupulously planned out, to be sure--rather than 
one that has an actual screenplay. Far too reminiscent of 1998's "Return to 
Paradise" to feel the least bit fresh, the film is often uninvolving and 
needlessly simplistic, with the characters' motivations severely muddled. As 
opposed to "Return to Paradise," which was a thought-provoking, complex 
drama, "Brokedown Palace" never really allows you to satisfactorily connect 
with the two central characters, and their harsh surroundings are portrayed 
in such a bare-bones light, that when the somewhat unpredictable ending 
arrives, you come out feeling a tad more indifferent to the whole ordeal than 
the filmmakers probably wanted you to.
Recent high school graduates and lifelong best friends Alice (Claire Danes) 
and Darlene (Kate Beckinsale) are planning to take a trip to Hawaii together, 
but while at a party, they catch word on the more-appealing Third World 
country of Thailand, which is so cheap that the hotel rooms cost only six 
dollars a night. "Besides," says the more rebellious Alice, in narration, 
"Thai means freedom, which was the exact thing we were looking for." At first 
enjoying themselves in Bangkok, they soon have a chance encounter with the 
engaging, handsome Australian, Nick Parks (Daniel Lapaine), after almost 
getting caught sneaking into a ritzy hotel and hanging out at the swimming 
pool, putting their drinks on other peoples' tabs. Inviting both Alice and 
Darlene to fly to Hong Kong and meet him a day after he leaves for there on 
business, they agree to, but while at the airport awaiting to board the 
plane, are abruptly accosted by the police, who find bags of narcotics in 
Alice's bag. Thrown into a dehumanizing, roach-infested prison, both girls 
firmly claim that they have no idea how the drugs got into her backpack, and 
after receiving a bogus sentence of 33 years each, they enlist the aid of 
supposed-to-be-fabulous lawyer "Yankee" Hank Green (Bill Pullman), an 
American himself who knows all about the strict Thai laws, to help get them a 
second hearing.
"Brokedown Palace" would have what it takes to be highly-charged, moving 
motion picture if not for two setbacks: the release of the superior "Return 
to Paradise" last year, and the lackluster screenplay by David Arata. 
Particularly in the first half-hour, the dialogue between the two best 
friends, which is a vital relationship that is not developed nearly enough, 
seems to have been cut to a minimum, with their few-and-far-between lines 
improvised--none to well--on the spot. Whether this is the case or not, the 
script could have benefitted from an extensive rewrite in order to strengthen 
the characters and depict the prison experience in a more raw, gritty light. 
As is, the film is akin to a tablet of cliffs notes, rather than getting us 
involved in the full experience. The brutality of the Thai prisons does not 
give us a large enough taste of its harshness, nor are Alice and Darlene 
instructed to react in a fully believable manner, considering that they are 
facing almost their whole lives in prison for something they were not even 
involved in.
The sympathy that we do develop for Alice and Darlene mostly owes itself to 
the young, talented actress' performances. Claire Danes, in my mind, has been 
someone to look out for ever since her star-making turn on the best 
television series of the decade, "My So-Called Life," but with her 
involvement in this film and last spring's "The Mod Squad," she needs to be 
more choicy on the projects she makes. Equalling Danes in every way is the 
British Kate Beckinsale who, with 1998's sparkler, "The Last Days of Disco" 
and here, is able to pull off a near-perfect American accent, and seems to 
fully embody every one of her characters, even when they are as underwritten 
as this picture.
Holding no such close scrutiny is the subplot involving Hank Green and his 
transformation from a determined lawyer in it for the money, into a more 
compassionate soul. Hank's cause for inner change is never really vindicated, 
and his relationship with his wife, Yon (Jacquelyn Kim), couldn't have 
possibly been any more thinly-written. Bill Pullman makes no impression in 
this other major role in the film, as he simply goes through the well-worn 
paces without any distinguishable character traits. 
If too flawed to be recommended, "Brokedown Palace" still is not without its 
merits. Aside from the performances by Danes and Beckinsale, the one powerful 
sequence in the film arrives midway through, when Darlene's father arrives at 
the prison, along with all of the other visitors, and we watch as the 
prisoners and their free family and friends must yell back and forth amidst a 
wire fence and a long space in between them. The scene jumps out at the 
viewer because it is the one moment that feels completely authentic, and is 
emotionally devastating just from the thought that that space in between the 
imprisoned and the visitors is their path to freedom, if only they could 
reach it.
Attempting to have its cake and eat it too, director Kaplan has devised an 
infuriating ending that is both downbeat and upbeat at the same time, which, 
no doubt, left a sour taste in my mouth. Being very vague about the 
particulars of the conclusion, the last image we are shown is of someone 
smiling, which, sorry to say, is an outrageous strain for a falsely happy 
ending and doesn't even make much sense when you stop to think about it. What 
one of the characters does in this final act is a courageous act, but it also 
doesn't sit well with what we already know about the character, and the fact 
that this person smiles is ludicrous. "Brokedown Palace" yearns to be a 
meaningful morality tale about two teenagers who don't realize what they've 
got until it's gone, but what it really is is a glossy Hollywoodization of a 
serious subject that is as far from the bright lights of Hollywood as could 
possibly be.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman.
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Message in a Bottle (1999)
Directed by Luis Mandoki.
Cast: Robin Wright Penn, Kevin Costner, Paul Newman, Jesse James, 
Illeana Douglas, John Savage, Robbie Coltrane, Viveka Davis.
1999 - 126 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity, mild violence, and sexual situations).
Reviewed February 13, 1999.
Director Luis Mandoki's last film was the superb, serious 1994 drama 
"When a Man Loves a Woman," but his luck has ultimately run out with his 
latest picture, "Message in a Bottle," which is the worst type of 
romance, a movie that tugs so relentlessly and violently at the 
heartstrings that it miraculously manages to dry out your eyes rather 
than tear them up. Everything that occurs can be telegraphed way in 
advance since this same type of story has been done many times 
before---and much better---so there's an absence of suspense, and the 
film ultimately moves at such a very, very deliberate pace, as if it is 
trying to make great, "meaningful" statements and plot developments, 
that it just becomes a tedious bore to sit through. 
"Message in a Bottle" begins with Theresa Osborne (Robin Wright Penn), a 
single mother and researcher at the Chicago Tribune, whom finds a bottle 
washed up on shore as she is jogging one day. Inside the bottle is an 
anonymous love letter addressed to a mystery woman named Catherine, and 
Theresa is so taken aback by its honesty and sweetness that she shows it 
around at her work and, to her objection, finds that her editor has 
placed the letter in the newspaper. Soon, a heavy research is conducted 
to find out who wrote the letter based on the type of bottle and a ship 
logo on the top of the typed message, and after it is traced to a man 
named Garrett Blake, Theresa finds herself traveling to the Outer Banks, 
a boating town in North Carolina, to find out the specifics of the 
message. Of course, Garrett turns out to be a handsome, rugged man 
around Theresa's age and played by Kevin Costner. She is immediately 
charmed by him, but hesitant to unveil the truth of why she is there, 
and finds that Catherine was Garrett's late wife who died a few years 
earlier. Do you think you know where this is headed? Most likely you do, 
and I wouldn't call it giving away anything to say that by the picture's 
end, the movie has fallen into deep, artificial melodrama that I didn't 
buy for a second.
If there are any positive things to say about "Message in a Bottle," it 
is that the performances by Robin Wright Penn and Paul Newman, as 
Garrett's stubborn, but loving father, are far above par to be in such a 
wasteful, "Shaggy Dog" love story, and that the cinematography by Caleb 
Deschanel takes great advantage of the beautiful eastern coast, and 
paints Chicago as an equally alluring city. Meanwhile, Costner has yet 
to redeem himself for some of the less-than-stellar films that he has 
made recently. It seems that with such bad luck, he wouldn't want to 
make another movie set near water, but here he is again with one of the 
main, and most ridiculous, centerpieces set on a storm-swept sea. The 
other actors are all, sadly, wasted, including Illeana Douglas, an 
underused actress who seems to always get stuck with the "friend" roles, 
here playing Penn's confidante and co-worker at the Tribune.
The first half of "Message in a Bottle" plays like a hum-drum, trite 
television movie for the Lifetime channel, as Theresa spends a great 
deal of time "getting to know" Garrett, with dialogue that is not the 
least bit stimulating or entertaining. Usually, I am the type of person 
to practically salivate over dialogue-laden sequences since the film is 
no doubt trying to develop the characters and their relationships, but 
here it all rang with a resounding falseness since the dialogue felt 
"written," and not as if people were really "talking." When the main 
characters of a film have very little of interest to say to each other, 
and are not particularly interesting themselves, you know immediately 
that you are in trouble. 
I swear that while watching "Message in a Bottle," I felt as if I had 
just read the screenplay in its entirety before arriving at the theater 
(heck, in actuality I'm not even familiar to the novel this is based on, 
by Nicholas Sparks). Always one step ahead of the characters, the movie 
ran so closely and tightly to the constraints of the tried-and-true 
Hollywood melodrama, the film strip often seemed to almost be in danger 
of tearing. Nobody wins prizes for guessing that Garrett will eventually 
find out Theresa's secret, and that several obstacles will come within 
their ways of living happily ever after. This same exact problem 
occurred in last year's very, very similar (watch this, and you will 
realize just how similar I mean) Meg Ryan-Nicolas Cage romantic drama, 
"City of Angels."
Although Theresa is deeply touched by the "heartfelt" letter that she 
finds in the bottle, perhaps the filmakers might have been better off 
finding a message in a bottle of their own, preferably before filming 
began. It should have read, "Memo to screenwriters: Use you brain!"
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Title
Review for Wonder Boys (2000)
Directed by Curtis Hanson.
Cast: Michael Douglas, Tobey Maguire, Robert Downey Jr., Frances McDormand, 
Katie Holmes, Michael Cavaias, Richard Thomas, Rip Torn, Jane Adams, Richard 
Knox, Philip Bosco. 
2000 - 112 minutes
Rated R (for profanity and mild violence).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, February 26, 2000.
The life of Grady Tripp (Michael Douglas) is at a standstill, never pushing 
forward because he is afraid to commit to everything in his life. A English 
professor at a college in Pittsburgh, Grady wrote one acclaimed novel seven 
years ago, but has since kept his readers waiting for a sophomore effort. He 
has been writing a second novel, all right, but he still hasn't completed it, 
and is currently on page 2611. Grady smokes marijuana almost continuously, 
and when not in school, is rarely seen without wearing his bathrobe. 
Recently, he has been carrying on an affair with the school's chancellor, 
Sara Gaskell (Frances McDormand), despite them both being married to other 
people. Such behavior is used, in essence, because he is always attempting to 
shield himself from the world, and from the reality that he is a 50-year-old 
who still hasn't come-of-age.
That compelling, if not terribly fresh, idea is at the center of "Wonder 
Boys," directed by Curtis Hanson (1997's "L.A. Confidential"), and written by 
Steve Kloves with a surprising literacy and intelligence that is rarely 
conspicuous in today's Hollywood-made features. Set over an eventful weekend 
in which an annual literature festival is in full swing at the campus, 
Grady's life seems to be unraveling more and more by the second. At the 
start, his wife leaves him, and although she has walked out on Grady before, 
she always came back. Taking time to be alone for a few fleeting seconds 
during her party, Sara tells Grady that she is positive she is pregnant, and 
it has to be his child. Sara, an independent, fair-minded woman, makes it 
clear that she loves him, but isn't going to let her whole life pass her by 
as she waits for him to make up his mind on what he wants.
Things grow more complicated with the appearance of Terry Crabtree (Robert 
Downey Jr.), his editor, eager to get ahold of his latest writing opus, who 
is in town for the weekend and has a thing for picking up various people, the 
latest of which is the alluring Antonia Sloviak (Michael Cavaias), whom 
everyone but Terry realizes is a transvestite. Stepping outside for a smoke 
at the party, Grady discovers his unusual, but highly gifted student James 
Leer (Tobey Maguire) with what he says is a cap gun in his hand. James, whose 
writing is ten times better than all of his fellow students' will ever be, is 
constantly put down by his classmates (who are obviously jealous), yet takes 
their comments to heart and has settled into a depression. That is only the 
beginning of an unconventional bond that forms between Grady and James, both 
of whom need someone to wake them up to their realities, and a string of 
eccentric plot threads that involve a murdered pooch; the coat Marilyn Monroe 
wore the day she was married; the scholarly Hannah Green (Katie Holmes), one 
of Grady's students, who rents a room in his house and unmistakably has a 
crush on him; and the erratic Vernon Hardapple (Richard Knox), who 
mysteriously is stalking Grady, with his fresh-faced, pregnant girlfriend, 
Oola (Jane Adams), in tow.
Structurally, a very laid-back bittersweet comedy, one is never quite sure 
where "Wonder Boys," based on the novel by Michael Chabon, is headed because, 
ultimately, there is nowhere for it to go. This is not necessarily meant as a 
criticism, although it does give the picture an occasionally uneven tone, but 
rather a distinct observation, because the film has little to do with "plot," 
and almost everything to do with Grady Tripp, an insecure man without a clue 
to what he wants from anything. Wandering around rather aimlessly from one 
scene, and character, to the next, what remains the focus is Grady, as 
everyone around him acts as little more than instigators biding their time 
until he discovers within himself what he wants to make out of the rest of 
his days.
Almost everything is dependent on Michael Douglas' central performance, and 
he genuinely impresses. Getting rid of all of his previous characters' 
somewhat similar pretensions, Douglas has crafted a memorably vivid film 
character in Grady Tripp, and always makes him completely likable and 
understanding to those around him, a refreshing twist that keeps his role 
from becoming a cliche.
Tobey Maguire, who has made a career, thus far, in playing young, understated 
everybodys, takes a giant step forward this time with his most eccentric 
role, to date. His James Leer is a peculiar individual, a college student who 
loves writing and has a sort of obsession for trivia about deceased movie 
stars. One never gets a complete sense of who James is, but that is 
appropriate because James is clearly unsure himself, although there is no 
doubt in anyone's mind that, with his writing expertise, he is destined to 
become a published author soon down the road.
In supporting roles, Robert Downey Jr. is a standout, even more so than 
usual, and it is performances like this that make you wish he would lay off 
the drugs and get his own life together, not unlike Grady. His portrayal of 
the dedicated and loyal, if perverse, Terry Crabtree is right on the money, 
and the gentle, if slight, relationship that forms between him and James, who 
begin to sleep with each other, is one that isn't given much screen time, but 
has a sort of oddball affection about it. After all, like everyone, Terry is 
only looking for love, but by pursuing one fling after the next, he simply 
has a strange way of searching.
It is nice to see Frances McDormand in a high-profile movie once again, and 
she proves that she is so very good, it doesn't matter that Sara is 
underwritten. McDormand single-handedly pulls the viewer into the character 
and gets them to care about what happens to her, and the fate of her 
relationship with Grady. The same holds true for Katie Holmes, as Hannah, who 
is only given a handful of substantial scenes, but is excellent in each one. 
With 1997's "The Ice Storm" (also starring Maguire), 1999's "Go," and now 
"Wonder Boys," Holmes is sure to stick around for a very long time, choosing 
interesting projects and notable supporting roles that wisely distances her 
from her "Dawson's Creek" character. Last, Michael Cavaias, as Antonia/Tony, 
makes a brief, but nonetheless exceptional, turn that, in each one of his 
scenes early on, steals the attention away from even Douglas and Downey Jr.
Technical attributes that should be pointed out include cinematographer Dante 
Spinotti, who paints the film with gorgeous visual strokes of the bleak, 
wintry Pittsburgh landscapes, while the soundtrack, which features such great 
artists as Bob Dylan, Neil Young, John Lennon, and Van Morrison, is perfectly 
realized.
"Wonder Boys" may not be perfect (for example, I wish the ending had led up 
to a little more than there is with some of the characters), but director 
Curtis Hanson has crafted an assured, well-made piece of work that shows just 
how smart a studio picture can be. And in Grady Tripp, he and screenwriter 
Kloves have created an unforgettable screen character. Grady may not be a 
faultless human being, but in his gradual emotional transformation from a 
child into an adult, and in his willingness to live the way he wants to at 
any given moment, he is remarkable. Like his pupil James Leer, he is a wonder 
boy, indeed.

Title
Review for Dr. T & the Women (2000)
Directed by Robert Altman.
Cast: Richard Gere, Helen Hunt, Kate Hudson, Tara Reid, Laura Dern, Shelley 
Long, Farrah Fawcett, Liv Tyler, Robert Hays, Matt Malloy, Andy Richter, 
Janine Turner.
2000 - 122 minutes
Rated R (for profanity and nudity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, October 14, 2000.
After several years of making less-successful motion pictures (1999's 
"Cookie's Fortune," 1996's "Kansas City") that lacked the memorable nature of 
his earlier work, it was with a slight sense of pause that made me question 
if director Robert Altman was possibly losing his surefire touch. Although 
never losing his loose stylishness and quirkily realistic characters, 
Altman's last great film was 1993's "Short Cuts," which, in fact, beared a 
close resemblance to his most masterful achievement, 1975's "Nashville," a 
multi-layered expose of a week in the lives of twenty-four characters in the 
title city of country music. 
With the aid of Anne Rapp's precise, accurately drawn screenplay, Altman's 
latest film, "Dr. T and the Women," is not only a thoroughly enjoyable and 
satisfying piece of work, but one of the better, more thought-provoking 
movies he has made. Richard Gere exquisitely stars as princely Dallas 
gynecologist Sullivan Travis ("Dr. T"), who, for as long as he can remember, 
has dedicated himself to the many, many females in his life. Women to him, 
you see, are all alluring and unique in their own special ways, and feels as 
if they should be treated like such. Because of his studly looks, intermixed 
with his kind, purely professional demeanor, Dr. T's office is constantly 
swarming each day with patients, primarily wealthy debutantes from Dallas' 
upper crust of society.
Tragedy hits close to home when his beloved wife, Kate (Farrah Fawcett), 
somehow snaps and acquires a rare mental disorder known as the Hestia 
Complex, in which the sufferer resorts to a virginal, child-like state. Also 
on his already full plate is the upcoming wedding of his cheerleader daughter 
Dee Dee (Kate Hudson), who may or may not be hiding her true feelings for old 
college friend and maid-of-honor Marilyn (Liv Tyler), much to the concern of 
Dee Dee's conspiracy buff sister Connie (Tara Reid). Also in Dr. T's life is 
daffy sister-in-law Peggy (Laura Dern), who can't go much longer than a 
minute without a swig of booze, and who has just moved back into his mansion 
with her three little daughters; sprightly office assistant Carolyn (Shelley 
Long), who secretly pines for Dr. T from afar; and Bree (Helen Hunt), the new 
golf pro in town who proves to not only be sexually-charged, but also a good 
listener, and whose very independence deeply attracts Dr. T to her.
"Dr. T and the Women" is an extraordinarily assured comedy-drama about a man 
whose very love for women has made him want to spend his entire life 
satisfying and making them happy. While many of his patients are overly 
materialistic, Dr. T's very nature is to be non-critical of each and every 
one of them, and to really listen to what they have to say. Additionally, his 
extended family, composed solely of the opposite sex, all love, trust, and 
rely on him, and this very fact makes him utterly satisfied. One of the best 
things about the writing, by Anne Rapp, is not only the way she truthfully 
portrays the female characters, but, like Dr. T, holds no preconceived 
judgments of the people that comprise the title character's entire being.
In what has become a token trademark of his, Altman paints his story and 
characters with enough shading and layers that something is almost always 
going on in the background, as well as the foreground, whether it be a subtle 
character idiosyncrasy, or an uneventful, superfluous string of dialogue that 
permeates through everyday interactions. Whatever it may be, this distinct 
filmmaking choice helps to develop and get the viewer to somehow come to know 
the characters better, even when they aren't given too much to work with on 
the scripted page.
The cast in "Dr. T and the Women" couldn't possibly get any better. Aside 
from veteran Richard Gere's star-making (yes, you heard that right) 
performance that makes you feel as if you are glimpsing him as an actor for 
the first time, the rest of the actors are no less impressive. In standout 
turns, Laura Dern (1996's "Citizen Ruth") is exceptionally funny and 
entertaining as joyful alcoholic Peggy; Helen Hunt (1997's "As Good As It 
Gets) thoughtfully underplays her complicated role as the idealistic woman 
Dr. T falls for; and Tara Reid (1999's "American Pie") is extremely likable 
and brightly cast as Dr. T's faithful daughter Connie. It should be quickly 
added that singling out the best performances in the picture is almost a 
pointless task, since everyone fits right into the proceedings, including 
Kate Hudson (2000's "Almost Famous"), touching as confused bride-to-be Dee 
Dee, Shelley Long (1995's The Brady Bunch Movie"), and Liv Tyler (1999's 
"Plunkett and McLeane").
Nearly flawless until its final minutes, in which Altman weaves a highly 
ambiguous surprise conclusion that could be interpreted any number of ways, 
but feels mildly disappointing in relation to everything that has come 
before, "Dr. T and the Women" is the best type of comedy--one that not only 
makes you laugh, but that makes you deeply care, too. Above everything else, 
this is a one-of-a-kind motion picture that treats all of its characters with 
respect and dignity, whether they fully deserve it or not, and never once 
attempts to pick sides. Too often, female roles in Hollywood are underwritten 
or unfairly looked over, but director Altman has always fondly treated them 
as intelligent individuals with thoughts, ideas, and a whole lot of heart. 
With "Dr. T and the Women," he has adoringly created a love letter especially 
for them, and in the process, made one of the very best films of the year. 
Way to go, Bob. Way to go.

Title
Review for Animal, The (2001)
Directed by Luke Greenfield.
Cast: Rob Schneider, Colleen Haskell, John C. McGingley, Michael Caton, Guy 
Torry, Louis Lombardi, Edward Asner.
2001 - 83 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for violence and bathroom humor).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, June 2, 2001.
Rob Schneider's last starring vehicle, 1999's "Deuce Bigalow: Male Gigolo," 
was an at times uproarious, sunny comedy that proved his talents could easily 
rival that of Jim Carrey and Adam Sandler. In contrast, Luke Greenfield's 
"The Animal" is just plain lame. While the overall premise has definite comic 
possibilities, everything about the finished product screams, "tiresome!" 
The aptly-named Marvin Mange (Rob Schneider) is a crime evidence protector 
who dreams of becoming a police officer, if only he could pass the obstacle 
course section of the test. Following a freak car accident that leaves his 
body mangled, he is saved by mad scientist Dr. Wilder (Michael Caton) by 
being replaced with spare internal animal parts. Returning to his daily life 
without any memories of what has happened to him, his newfound keen sense of 
smell helps him to peg a man at the airport carrying a bag full of heroin. 
Marvin soon finds himself becoming a cop, but his extreme animal urges are 
beginning to get the best of him.
No matter how hard screenwriters Tom Brady and Rob Schneider try to extract 
constant gags out of "The Animal," it just isn't very funny. Excessively 
juvenile and with only one witty ongoing joke, involving "reverse racism," a 
theory which Marvin's black friend, Miles (Guy Torry), creates, the film is a 
by-the-numbers effort from start to finish. At only 83 minutes, at least it 
is short.
Rob Schneider remains a likable personality, sort of a kinder, gentler Adam 
Sandler. He's a capable actor, and as "Deuce Bigalow" proved, can be quite 
funny when the material is strong. As his inevitable love interest, 
"Survivor" contestant Colleen Haskell plays Rianna, a feisty animal-lover who 
finds Marvin's similarities with her beloved animals endearing. It's 
difficult to say whether Haskell is a good actor; her thin role only requires 
that she smile a whole lot, and she does that well.
There isn't much else to say about "The Animal." I sat there for the duration 
of its running time unimpressed and without much to find amusing. Hopefully, 
Schneider will try a little harder his next time at bat, because with another 
movie as bad as "The Animal," he may be in danger of turning into Pauly 
Shore. And we all know what he's doing now. Or, on second thought, we don't.
    - Copyright 2001 by Dustin Putman
      http://www.all-reviews.com/reviewers/dustinputman.htm
http://us.imdb.com/reviewsby?Dustin+Putman
http://www.atnzone.com

Title
Review for Ghost World (2001)
Directed by Terry Zwigoff. 
Cast: Thora Birch, Scarlett Johansson, Steve Buscemi, Illeana Douglas, Bob 
Balaban, Stacey Travis, Brad Renfro, Teri Garr, Ashley Peldon. 
2001 - 111 minutes 
Rated R (for profanity). 
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, August 5, 2001. 
When you graduate from high school and have absolutely no intention of going 
to college, and little interest in getting a nine-to-five job, where do you 
go from there? 18-year-old Enid (Thora Birch) isn't quite sure. An offbeat, 
"tell-it-like-it-is" kind of girl with a best friend in Rebecca (Scarlett 
Johansson), they leave their graduation ceremony by stomping on their caps 
and giving the school the middle finger, never looking back. But there's a 
little sadness on Enid's part in leaving a place where, although she realizes 
she wasted her time at, at least had a sense of security in knowing what she 
was supposed to be doing with her time. 
"Ghost World," directed by Terry Zwigoff (1995's award-winning documentary, 
"Crumb"), is a bleak comedy filled with both humor and deep-seeded 
insecurities. Based on the cult comic book by Daniel Clowes, the movie is a 
perceptive and darkly funny look at post-adolescent bewilderment, a time 
between being a child and an adult when you simply don't know where you 
should be going, and what your goals should be. Capturing this stage of 
development with just the right amount of pathos and thoughtfulness, director 
Zwigoff has created a rich, one-of-a-kind character study that proves 
difficult to shake. 
Enid and Rebecca do have some sort of future goal, which is to move into an 
apartment together. Rebecca diligently garners a job at a local Starbucks 
(she realizes money is a necessity in moving out on your own), while Enid 
doesn't seem to have the gumption to do much of anything but while away her 
hours on her own terms. Required to take a summer art class with an 
unconventional feminist teacher (Illeana Douglas) in order to officially 
receive her diploma, Enid spends the rest of her time running around with 
Rebecca, stopping at coffee shops to "people-watch," and dropping by a 
convenience store to bug one of their classmates, Josh (Brad Renfro). 
Just for kicks, Enid and Rebecca jokingly answer a personals ad, only to spy 
on the terribly shy and dorky Seymour (Steve Buscemi) waiting listlessly for 
a woman who is not going to show up. Enid is surprised to find herself 
sympathizing with Seymour all of a sudden, and ends up striking up a 
friendship with him when she starts drifting away from the more ambitious 
Rebecca. 
"Ghost World" is the type of motion picture that isn't as much concerned 
about its eventual destination as it is about the path that our heroine, 
Enid, will take in order to get there. Enid can be a little cruel and 
stubborn at times, but she does have a good heart, and as her life progresses 
throughout the summer, she finds what little plans she used to have slowly 
drift away. Enid is one of the most purely original character creations in 
years, and turns out to also be one of the most likable. She may be overly 
honest and opinionated, but that is just more reason to fall in love with 
her--a young woman who plays by her own rules, other people, be damned! 
As the unorthodox Enid, Thora Birch (1999's "American Beauty") is a 
revelation. Having to more or less carry the entire film on her shoulders, 
Birch jumps at the chance of making Enid her own, and doesn't shy away from 
presenting her as an occasionally difficult and admittedly flawed human 
being. Birch strikes every note to perfection, and manages to be both 
astoundingly funny and accurately heartbreaking in her quest to find her true 
self. 
The other roles in the picture are filled by an ensemble of marvelous 
character actors, each of which could not have been better. Scarlett 
Johansson (1998's "The Horse Whisperer") has the less showy of the two 
central roles, but in many ways, her Rebecca is every bit as poignant as that 
of Enid. Johansson auspiciously paints Rebecca as a girl who feels both 
obligated and frustrated by her friendship with Enid, as what their looking 
for in life eventually becomes quite different. As the hopelessly nerdy 
Seymour, Steve Buscemi (2000's "28 Days") is equally touching. Buscemi has 
decided not to make Seymour someone to be pitied, but to almost admire for 
both his kindness and his unadulterated love for music and records, and this 
was definitely the correct choice. Finally, Illeana Douglas (1999's "Stir of 
Echoes") is a downright hoot as the groovy art teacher who encourages her 
students to express themselves in any way they know how. 
"Ghost World" is uncompromisingly dark, to be sure, but much natural humor 
that comes out of the characters and situations allows it to also stand as a 
comic delight. When Enid finally does get a job, for example, it is to work 
at a movie theater, but she is fired on the first day. When one customer asks 
if they serve alcohol at the concession stand, Enid's response is, "I wish! 
Actually, you should wish, because after seeing this movie you're gonna wish 
you had ten beers!" And when another customer orders a buttered popcorn, Enid 
presents it to her by saying, "Here's your yellow chemical sludge." 
The ending of "Ghost World" does not wrap things up in any conventional way, 
but that is in staying with the spirit of Enid, who wishes to be different in 
every way from other people sucked into manipulative commercialism. The final 
scene is thought-provoking and open-ended, to say the least, but it lacks 
that final close-up of our heroine that would have given it all the closure 
it needed. As is, the finale isn't entirely successful, but it is undoubtedly 
appropriate. 
In a summer filled with the usual, countless explosions and special effects, 
here is a remarkably assured, "smaller" feature that is a far more satisfying 
experience than, say, "Planet of the Apes." With "Ghost World," 
writer-director Terry Zwigoff has crafted one of the best films of the year, 
a movie that takes a painstakingly realistic look at the difficulties of 
growing up. 

Title
Review for Chill Factor (1999)
`Been there, done that.' Despite the, albeit malnutritious, entertainment 
value of the new action-comedy, `Chill Factor,' directed by Hugh Johnson, 
making his feature-film debut, those four words constantly were ringing into 
my ears. Cliched, far-fetched, and basically `Speed 3' with a twist, the 
kicker this time isn't a bus or cruise ship that can't slow down below a 
certain speed, but a deadly biological weapon that must stay below fifty 
degrees, or else it will mean the end of the whole state of Montana. Where 
the original 1994 `Speed' rose above its overbaked genre, thanks to non-stop, 
expertly-shot action scenes that kept audiences on the edge of their seats 
throughout, `Chill Factor' unfortunately only includes a twenty-minute 
set-piece right in the middle of the film that even remotely equals up to its 
birth mother, and then it stops in its tracks for the remainder of the 
102-minute running time. Luckily, it doesn't overstay its welcome, and 
remains a solidly diverting, if generic, way to spend a few hours.
Jumping right off with a frighteningly realistic prologue in which the 
malicious Major
Andrew Brynner (Peter Firth) is the cause of the destruction of a whole 
military island, and deservedly is shipped off to prison, the picture 
fast-forwards ten years, when Brynner is released and immediately sets a plot 
into motion that includes selling the lethal chemical for $100 million to 
some international baddies. Stalking the scientist/creator (David Paymer) at 
his lab and shooting him, they discover that he has escaped with the 
chemical, nicknamed `Elvis.' To make a long story short, `Elvis' falls into 
the hands of Tim (Skeet Ulrich), a short-order cook, and Arlo (Cuba Gooding 
Jr.), an ice cream delivery man, who are instructed to transport it to Fort 
McGruder before Brynner and his nasty henchmen can catch up to them. And, oh 
yeah, Tim and Arlo have no choice but to keep "Elvis" below the magic 
temperature of 50 degrees, or KABLOOM!
`Chill Factor' is the exact type of film that, like clockwork, is always 
released on the first weekend of September each year. Last year, we were 
blessed with the godawful
Jean-Claude Van Damme no-brainer, `Knock Off,' and in September of 1997 was 
the
mediocre, if better-than-expected, Steven Seagal film, `Fire Down Below.' At 
least
sparing us with the overall badness of `Knock Off,' `Chill Factor' is still 
nothing more
than an unoriginal, professionally-done action movie. No attempt is made to 
raise above this sub-par level, and that is part of its slight charm. It's 
doubtful director Johnson or screenwriters Drew Gitlin and Mike Cheda 
expected greatness to come from this film and, therefore, it gains a sort of 
innocent quality whose only purpose is to entertain the viewer for the 
remainder of its running time. Sure, more suspense could have been injected 
into the pacing in order for it to really take off, but you can't expect 
everything when you're dealing with such an obvious studio effort.
The question remains, though. Why has Cuba Gooding Jr. fallen on such 
blatantly
desperate hard times? A Best Supporting Actor Academy Award Winner for 1996's
`Jerry Maguire,' Gooding Jr. has followed this career high point up with last 
year's
thought-provoking `What Dreams May Come,' which stuck him in a minor role, 
and this past summer's cinematic snooze-fest, `Instinct.' Now, with `Chill 
Factor,' he has
resorted to playing the type of stock jokester black man role that is often 
seen with rising stars (Eddie Murphy in 1984's `Beverly Hills Cop,' Chris 
Tucker in 1998's `Rush Hour'), rather than someone who long-since established 
his talent and wide-range with 1991's gritty, touching, `Boyz N the Hood.' 
Gooding Jr. too often appears on autopilot here, and you can't help but feel 
bad for him, since he clearly is capable of doing far more challenging work. 
Together, with Skeet Ulrich, they make a reasonably likable heroic duo, and 
are fun to watch most of the time. Ulrich alone, however, is as bland as 
could be, nowhere near as effective as he was in 1996's `Scream,' and only 
sells a single one-liner for maximum laughs: When Brynner comes into 
Darlene's Diner, Tim's place of employment, he asks him if he owns the 
restaurant. `Yeah,' replies Tim, `everyone calls me Darlene.'
`Chill Factor' sets up its basic premise in the first half-hour, which is the 
most
well-written section of the film, then turns into an adrenaline-pumping 
actioner for the
middle thirty minutes, and then drags itself out in the final one-third 
simply to qualify as a full-length feature. From beginning to end, we watch 
the characters, story, and screenplay go strictly through the conventions of 
an ordinary action film, hoping for the moment when a twist or abrupt spark 
of intelligence will occur. They ultimately never come, but those fans of 
mindless action movies won't be disappointed. After all, you could do a lot 
worse in the early-September movie season. You could also do a lot better.

Title
Review for Stigmata (1999)
Directed by Rupert Wainwright.
Cast: Patricia Arquette, Gabriel Byrne, Jonathan Pryce, Nia Long, Rade 
Sherbedgia, Portia De Rossi, Jack Donner.
1999 - 102 minutes
Rated R (for violence, gore, profanity, and sexual situations).
Reviewed September 11, 1999.
Not knowing any better, I would have guessed that "Stigmata," the new 
religious-themed possession tale, is just a fancy name for "Exorcist IV," and 
I may be right. Let's look at the evidence: a young woman possessed; a priest 
struggling with his own beliefs and feelings; mysteriously-inflicted slash 
marks; a climactic possession sequence; and pea soup. Well, okay, pea soup 
maybe be an exaggeration, but it might as well have been included, for, as 
directed by Rupert Wainwright, the film's only major differences to the 
classic 1973 horror film, "The Exorcist," are a quick-cut style for those 
whose attention span has been depleted by MTV, and a disappointing lack of 
any believable human story. On second thought, perhaps "Stigmata" is actually 
"Beyond the Door IV," in disguise.
In a prologue set in a dusty, Catholic region of Brazil, an American woman 
purchases a rosary that once belonged to Father Paulo Alameida (Jack Donner), 
who is now lying in a coffin in a nearby church, the statue of Mary beside 
him bleeding human blood from its eyes. Switch to the city of Pittsburgh, 
23-year-old Frankie Paige (Patricia Arquette), a talented beautician who, at 
night, likes to go club (and man)-hopping with her best friend (Nia Long), 
receives a gift from her mother that has arrived at her front door. Among the 
small presents is the rosary she bought in Brazil, and soon after, Frankie is 
attacked in her bath tub by an unknown force that causes her wrists to bleed 
straight through, as if large pegs had been nailed into her. At the hospital, 
the wounds are suspected to be self-inflicted, despite Frankie's argument 
that she loves herself and has no stress ("I cut hair!"). Before long, she 
also is tortured with slash marks across her body while on an out-of-control 
subway cart, thorn cuts on her face, and occasionally is being possessed and 
forced to recite the Aramaic language, which hasn't been used in thousands of 
years. Enter Father Andrew Kiernan (Gabriel Byrne), a part priest/part 
scientist from the Vatican, who travels to Pittsburgh to try and help 
Frankie. His guess is that she has the curse of the stigmata, the inflicted 
wounds of christ, and since she has had four of the five major wounds, she is 
in grave danger of dying if it occurs again. There's just one catch: 
Stigmatics are always highly religious individuals, while Frankie is an 
atheist who is quickly starting to believe in otherwordly forces.
"Stigmata" is a relentless and thoroughly unpleasant horror film that is so 
fast-paced and stylized, with loud alternative music and quick cuts popping 
up at every chance it gets, that the whole experience of watching it 
gradually became an ordeal. In one scene after the next, we watch Frankie 
being graphically mutilated by something we cannot see, and while it 
sometimes is powerful and unsettling, that mostly results from all of the 
bloodletting. In between, there are painfully few exposition scenes in which 
we get to know the characters because, every time some dialogue enters in, 
Frankie abruptly is pierced through her feet or various other body parts. A 
major flaw this is, because in order to care about this woman who is in a 
dire situation in which any moment could be her last, we have to be able to 
sympathize with her plight. According to screenwriters Tom Lazarus and Rick 
Ramage, their idea of satisfying character development is showing Frankie 
smoking and drinking at clubs, and then bringing men home with her. Patricia 
Arquette, who, at 31, admittedly looks a little long in the tooth to be 
playing a 23-year-old, tries her best in an unlikable role that helps none in 
displaying her considerable, but usually wasted, acting chops. 
Gabriel Byrne fares better, as a priest who is dedicated to his profession, 
but not enough to turn away from a romantic subplot that forms between 
Frankie and himself. And why the heck not? Byrne may very well be one of the 
better-looking priest characters in any movie I've seen (certainly more so 
than the various Fathers in "The Exorcist"), and aside from this casting 
flaw, he really is a strong presence in his more challenging moments 
on-screen.
At times, the repititious violence that fills the screen throughout grows 
overly tedious (I mean, how many near-fatal wounds can a normal person get 
without dying?), and the supporting characters may have helped break up the 
grisliness of the proceedings. They, too, are severely wasted, particularly 
Nia Long (a fine actress in her own right), who is stuck playing the 
"concerned friend" character. Unlike most, though, the film doesn't even 
follow through with her, as she disappears midway through and is never seen 
again.
As "Stigmata" plays out its bag of tricks, continuously growing more and more 
ludicrous with each passing moment until it completely collapses in its 
fire-and-brimstone climactic exorcism, one is led to wonder exactly how 
anyone would like the film. The story developments and character interactions 
are especially unrewarding, particularly the ending, which is supposed to be 
a greatly touching moment, but only comes off as cornball. The film 
ultimately leaves a bitter taste in your mouth, mostly from its lack of 
emotion, and comes off feeling overblown rather than the least bit scary. I 
think I've changed my mind about "Stigmata" being the third sequel in the 
famous possession series; on second thought, it's more akin to "Exorcist II: 
The Heretic."
 - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
    NZone Magazine

Title
Review for Bicentennial Man (1999)
Directed by Chris Columbus.
Cast: Robin Williams, Embeth Davidtz, Sam Neill, Wendy Crewson, Oliver Platt, 
Hallie Kate Eisenberg, Lindz Letherman, Stephen Root, Kiersten Warren, Lynne 
Thigpen, Bradley Whitford, John Michael Higgins, George D. Wallace.
1999 - 131 minutes
Rated PG (for mild profanity and sexual dialogue).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, December 20, 1999.
If you saw 1998's "Patch Adams" and heard that Robin Williams' latest attempt 
at an earnest comedy-drama, "Bicentennial Man," is overly schmaltzy, as well, 
there may be cause for hesitation. Williams is a fine actor--he always has 
been--but in recent years, especially since his Academy Award winning turn in 
1997's "Good Will Hunting," he hasn't, to my recollection, made a 
straightforward comedy since. If Williams wants to get a little more serious 
in his film projects, that is exclusively his prerogative, but the problem 
is, he usually seems to try just a little too hard, to the point where his 
dramatic work isn't effective, only melodramatic, corny, and groan-inducing. 
With that being said, "Bicentennial Man," based on the novel, "The Positronic 
Man," by Isaac Asimov and Robert Silverberg, is easily Williams' best film 
(in a starring role) since 1993's "Mrs. Doubtfire," both of which, 
coincidentally, were directed by Chris Columbus (who also made one of my 
personal '80s favorites, "Adventures in Babysitting"). "Bicentennial Man" is 
manipulative in its emotions, to be sure, but it almost always convinces and 
involves the viewer. And, yeah, there was one scene midway through that very 
slightly got my eyes watery (although it may have just been that I was having 
a horrible day to begin with, and the meaning of the scene got under my skin 
a little more deeply because of this).
Opening in San Francisco, circa 2005, and spanning 200 years in total, a 
well-off family has a life-sized robot (Robin Williams, in a metallic-looking 
plastic suit) shipped to their door, programmed to obey all orders and act as 
a sort of housekeeper. With a bit more internal emotions than the average 
robot, he is named Andrew by the youngest daughter, whom he calls Little Miss 
(Hallie Kate Eisenberg), and becomes friends with the parents, Sir (Sam 
Neill) and Ma'am (Wendy Crewson). 
As time passes by and the family gets older, Andrew holds a special place in 
his heart for Little Miss (now played by Embeth Davidtz), and the feeling is 
mutual, but because he is just a robot, they know in their minds nothing 
could possibly come from their relationship. Seeking the help of Rupert Burns 
(Oliver Platt), a scientist who created his robotic model, Andrew, little by 
little, begins his quest to become a human, first acquiring skin, and later a 
central nervous system. By this time, his past family has all passed away, 
leaving him to care deeply for Little Miss' granddaughter, Portia (also 
played by Davidtz). However, because his brain is still mechanical and, thus, 
he remains immortal and considered inhuman, chances of Portia and Andrew 
being able to marry grow more and more slim. Meanwhile, she herself is 
getting older and Andrew realizes she won't be around forever, either.
While not without its intermittent humorous moments, "Bicentennial Man" is, 
no doubt about it, a dramatic motion picture about the passing of time and 
life. Occasionally devastating to watch, as Andrew witnesses everyone he has 
ever loved and cared about die around him, the film does not utterly depress 
and seem as much of a betrayal as the conclusion to the otherwise very good 
"The Green Mile," because this film holds a deeper meaning, and the subject 
of death is more natural to the story. Every once in a while, you can see a 
glimmer of Williams' token maudlin ways beginning to shine through, but it 
almost always disappears quickly, reminiscent in ways of 1998's "Meet Joe 
Black."
Passing through a 200-year time span, the picture appreciatively avoids an 
episodic feel, thanks to the 131-minute running time, which may seem 
excessively long, but really is the appropriate length to tell this story. 
Robin Williams, who breaks outside of his robotic costume by the 75-minute 
mark, is endearing and believable as Andrew, a character always balancing on 
the line between acting like a human, while still acquiring robotic traits. 
Matching him in his charm and likability is the underrated Embeth Davidtz, 
who has two roles (as the adult Little Miss and, later, as Portia), both of 
which capture Andrew's heart. Williams and Davidtz especially work well 
together, as they bring an urgency and spark to their unconventional romantic 
scenes. In notable supporting roles, Sam Neill turns in a quietly touching 
performance as Sir, who sees how quickly his life is passing before his eyes; 
Kiersten Warren, as Galatea, the only other functional robot of Andrew's 
model, has a bright comic sense; and young Hallie Kate Eisenberg (star of the 
popular Pepsi commercials) is cute, but in an unchallenging role.
The only noticeably major flaw with "Bicentennial Man" is related to the 
advertising, not the film itself. Being promoted in its trailers as a zany 
Robin Williams comedy for the whole family, the film is really an 
occasionally dark parable on the process of life, and the fact that almost 
all of the characters die at one point through the story is enough to cause, 
perhaps, a little distress and confusion for younger viewers. "Bicentennial 
Man" is an accessible, yet appropriately serious, film that most audiences 
over a certain age of about 8 or 9 have the capability of appreciating. It's 
just too bad the studio, Buena Vista, has insisted on dishonoring its 
thoughtful themes and messages with a misleading ad campaign. 

Title
Review for Music From Another Room (1998)
Directed by Charlie Peters.
Cast: Jude Law, Gretchen Mol, Jennifer Tilly, Brenda Blethyn, Jon 
Tenney, Martha Plimpton, Jeremy Piven, Jane Adams, Vincent Laresca.
1998 - 104 minutes.
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and sexual situations).
Reviewed November 30, 1998.
"Music From Another Room," a drama written and directed by Charlie 
Peters, assembled an astonishing cast of gifted actors and then, alas, 
chose to do very little with them.
The prologue introduces us to Danny, a young boy visiting his father's 
friends for Thanksgiving, who helps Grace Swan (Brenda Blethyn), the 
mother of the household, give birth after she suddenly goes into labor. 
The baby is named Anna, and once she is born, Danny, all of five years 
old, takes one look at her and pronounces that he is going to marry her. 
Switch forward 25 years, Danny (Jude Law) returns to his home after 
being away in London for his childhood, only to meet up with the Swan 
family once again. Anna (Gretchen Mol), now a beautiful, but uptight 
young woman, is engaged to marry Eric (Jon Tenney), and she pretty much 
spends her time taking care of her family, particularly Grace, who is 
now very ill, and her older sister, Nina (Jennifer Tilly), who is blind 
and apprehensive about going outside. To get close to the family again, 
Danny agrees to read the novel, Anna Karenina, to Nina for her, all the 
while trying to win Anna's heart, even though she believes it isn't fate 
that once again brought them together.
"Music From Another Room," had such a brief run in theaters that if you 
blinked, you missed it, and I can somewhat understand why it was snubbed 
by its studio, Orion. It is an extremely bland romance between two 
characters who aren't the least bit interesting, and whom have no 
notably good scenes together. Luckily, almost all of the supporting 
characters are appealing, which really does lead you to wonder why the 
romance had not been scrapped and the rest of the characters be the 
focus. Nina, by far, is the most complex character, and is given the 
most delicate, sweet subplot, as a blind woman who doesn't like to get 
close to people she doesn't know, until one night she does meet her soul 
mate, a devoted, kind man named Jesus (Vincent Laresca). Jennifer Tilly 
is an effervescent as always here, and maybe even a little bit more, 
because, for once, she was not playing a dense, flighty bimbo, but a 
more fully-realized person. Martha Plimpton is also a standout, and 
given precious little screentime, as Karen, another one of Anna's 
sisters, who is a feminist involved in an amateur acting troupe called, 
"Actors Without Dicks." Finally, Jane Adams, currently starring in Todd 
Solondz's art-house hit, "Happiness," made an impact as Irene, the wife 
of the Swan family's son (Jeremy Piven), who is constantly going to 
therapy.
What do all of these fascinating supporting characters tell us? Well, it 
tells us that director Peters must have been on autopilot not to 
discover what a potentially good film he had, only to ruin it with the 
central storyline, which just clangs of sappiness and cliches. Both Jude 
Law and Gretchen Mol are not bad actors, and it is not their faults that 
their roles were inadequately written. 
What ultimately saves, "Music From Another Room," from being a total 
washout, aside from the supporting players, were several very nice 
scenes, many of which came at the end. One truthful moment that might, 
perhaps, be the best scene that I have ever seen Tilly in, has her 
character of Nina telling Anna, the sister she has always heavily relied 
on, that she doesn't need her anymore. 
What makes, "Music From Another Room," so frustrating is how, with its 
impressive cast, a worthwhile film could have very, very easily been 
made. All that the director would had to have done was to let the classy 
actors show their stuff, instead of placing them in such a lame story. 
To me, this is the worst thing that can be done by a director, 
especially with all of the promise it clearly holds. In fact, it's 
nearly downright criminal.

Title
Review for Light It Up (1999)
Directed by Craig Bolotin.
Cast: Usher Raymond, Forest Whitaker, Rosario Dawson, Robert Ri'chard, Sara 
Gilbert, Fredro Starr, Clifton Collins Jr., Judd Nelson, Glynn Turman, 
Vanessa L. Williams, Vic Polizos.
1999 - 98 minutes
Rated R (for violence and profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, November 13, 1999.
An attempt at a teen movie, a 'la "The Breakfast Club," mixed with social 
commentary on inner-city schools, the media, and misunderstood youth, "Light 
It Up" goes wrong in so many ways that it quickly grows annoying. Swiftly 
moving from one scene to the next, there is barely any time to get to know 
the characters (and we don't), and before you know it, the film is over and 
you're left wondering why the movie didn't go through a few rewrites before 
filming commenced.
Set almost exclusively over a 24-hour period at Lincoln High School, a 
broken-down, scummy building in Queens, NY, the day begins disastrously and 
only gets worse. While teaching one of his classes, the window in his 
classroom breaks, letting in the unbearably cold winter air, and a well-liked 
professor, Ken Knowles (Judd Nelson), must find a warm place to teach. The 
library is taken, as is the gym, auditorium, and cafeteria, and after the 
frustratingly one-sided Principal Armstrong (Glynn Turman) tells him to take 
the kids anywhere, Mr. Knowles and the students go out to a nearby 
restaurant. Upon returning, Principal Armstrong is outraged Mr. Knowles would 
lead them off campus, and fires him. Outraged at this unfair act since 
Knowles was one of the few faculty members who cared about them, aspiring 
doctor Stephanie (Rosario Dawson), the determined Lester (Usher Raymond), and 
the innocent Ziggy (Robert Ri'chard), protest and are quickly threatened with 
suspension. 
Through a chain of events, Ziggy accidentally shoots NYPD Officer Jackson 
(Forest Whitaker), Lester grabs the gun, pulls the fire alarm, and instructs 
everyone to leave the school. Soon, the police and media have surrounded the 
school, leaving the six students, which also include Lynn (Sara Gilbert), who 
just found out she was pregnant by a guy who wants nothing to do with her; 
the subtly rebellious Rivers (Clifton Collins Jr.); and troublesome Rodney 
(Fredro Starr), alone with Jackson, who is gradually losing a lot of blood. 
Persistent in taking a stand, the kids decide that in order to cooperate, 
they want certain demands met, all pertaining to fixing up the school. It 
soon becomes clear, however, that hostage negotiator Audrey McDonald (Vanessa 
L. Williams) is doing nothing to meet their requests, and with the police 
moving in, Lester, Stephanie, and the gang realize their time is running out.
"Light It Up," directed in strict television-drama mode by Craig Bolotin, 
stumbles within the first five minutes, due to shamefully and blatantly 
ripping off the opening of 1998's "The Faculty," in which the teen characters 
were introduced one at a time and their names were flashed upon the screen. 
The only relation to the two films is the appearance of R&B star Usher 
Raymond, and without the involvement of "The Faculty" director Robert 
Rodriguez or screenwriter Kevin Williamson, this is a storytelling device 
that only acts to uncover the film's utter imitativeness.
Furthermore, films about troubled schools (1995's "Dangerous Minds," 1996's 
"The Substitute") and hostage negotiations (1975's "Dog Day Afternoon," 
1991's "Toy Soldiers") are a dime a dozen, and this one doesn't offer one 
original or insightful moment in its whole running time. We already knew that 
the media often distorts the truth, and that the problematic inner-city 
schools are in great danger; now tell me something I didn't know.
A well-meaning, yet derivative, film of this sort is basically made or broken 
by the writing and portrayals of the characters, and both aspects are 
unsatisfactorily handled. The screenplay, also by Bolotin, devotes very 
little time to the central six characters, or to Jackson, and what is offered 
is little more than the Cliffs Notes version of who each person is. Compared 
to 1985's classic "The Breakfast Club" in its press notes, "Light It Up" 
isn't even in the same ballpark. While "The Breakfast Club" thoughtfully 
examined each character, and how the high school years really are, "Light It 
Up" is in too mad of a rush to do anything of the sort. Maybe Bolotin should 
have been reminded that the viewer will not care about this story if they 
aren't given the credit of knowing the faces that litter the screen. 
Even if the screenplay had been up to speed, the film would had to have been 
recast, as these lot of young actors are certainly not going to win any 
acting awards. In his first starring role, Usher Raymond switches from being 
understated to overacting, and rarely ever hits the right notes. Worse is 
Fredro Starr, whose character of Rodney is so vexatious and irredeemable that 
I cringed every time he was on screen. Narrating the picture, Robert 
Ri'chard, as Ziggy, leaves no impression at all, nor does Clifton Collins 
Jr.'s role of Rivers. Meanwhile, Rosario Dawson (1998's "He Got Game") is 
fetching and passionate as A-student Stephanie, and Sara Gilbert (TV's 
"Roseanne") handles her sparse character-defining moments with reasonable 
aplomb. The adult roles are all empty-headed and forgettable, from the 
usually reliable Forest Whitaker, to Vanessa L. Williams' 
"take-the-paycheck-and-run" cameo, to Judd Nelson's earnest Mr. Knowles.
Following a stringently straight line, "Light It Up" never wanders off its 
thoroughly cliched path, nor does it even attempt to. Its as if 
writer-director Bolotin was so enthusiastic about actually making a movie 
that he forgot to concentrate and make one that was actually rewarding. The 
film would like to be a meaningful slice-of-life, but it says nothing 
advantageous at all about the world we live in, and even climaxes with that 
old, reliable standby, in which a dying character sputters out words of 
wisdom right before drawing his last breath. How can a film be perceived as 
realistic when it is rarely ever convincing? Bolotin attempts this amazing 
trick, and let's just say the rabbit never turns up in his top hat.

Title
Review for Beach, The (2000)
Directed by Danny Boyle.
Cast: Leonardo DiCaprio, Virginie Ledoyen, Tilda Swinton, Guillaume Canet, 
Robert Carlyle.
2000 - 116 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, sex, brief nudity, and gore).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, February 12, 2000.
If the sole purpose of movies was to offer up gorgeous scenery and 
camerawork, intermixed with astoundingly memorable and quirky music 
(including a score by David Lynch regular Angelo Badalamenti), then "The 
Beach," directed by Danny Boyle (1996's "Trainspotting"), would be an instant 
modern-day classic. It is a shame, then, that viewers usually look for 
something extra when they watch a film. Generally, they search for substance, 
well-written characters, or, at the very least, a fresh story that doesn't 
hold its audience in contempt. Guess what movie would like you to believe it 
has these things, but fails miserably at success on all three accounts?
Leonardo DiCaprio (in his first starring role since the unintentional 1998 
laugh-riot, "The Man in the Iron Mask") stars as Richard, a young man 
traveling through Thailand who, through narration, tells us that his name is 
the only thing we need to know about him. He is in a new country, after all, 
and he's starting over--in other words, he should be looked upon as a tabula 
rasa. Checking into a relatively scuzzy hotel room positioned between a 
French couple, the alluringly beautiful Francoise (Virginie Ledoyen) and her 
boyfriend Etienne (Guillaume Canet), and a crazed Scot named Daffy (Robert 
Carlyle), Richard learns from Daffy that there is an island of sheer 
perfection and beauty hidden deep within the Gulf of Thailand. Very few 
people know about it, and even fewer have been able to find and reach it. The 
next day, Richard discovers Daffy has committed suicide in his room, but not 
before leaving him a map to the island.
Richard wastes no time in inviting Francoise and Etienne on his journey to 
the island, and they quickly accept. Before long, they have set off to find 
it with the map in hand, and by the 30-minute-mark, have reached the 
rapturous paradise, where a small community lives and works together in peace 
and harmony, free of the noise and problems of the outside world. Richard, 
Francoise, and Etienne instantly move in with the inhabitants, but it is 
obvious Richard has been pining for Francoise throughout the whole trip. 
Meanwhile, the leader of the island, Sal (Tilda Swinton), has her eye on 
Richard, despite having a boyfriend of her own. 
If "The Beach" wants to partially be a romance, it is one of the most 
uncharismatic love stories possibly ever made. While Richard is an intriguing 
character, we know little about him aside from his aforementioned name, the 
fact that he enjoys smoking pot, and his occasional scaredy-cat mentality. 
Leonardo DiCaprio, despite being a wildly popular mega-star due to 1997's 
"Titanic," really is a fine actor, and he does everything he possibly can to 
bring his character alive and equipped with more dimension than is written on 
the page. Richard can be a highly annoying presence whose mouth you would 
love to tape shut every now and again, but that is an appropriate trait to 
the figure he plays, a basically care-free free spirit enjoying his youth 
while it lasts. 
Francoise, in comparison, is a completely disposable character without any 
sort of charm or personality, and we learn literally nothing about her, 
outside of her physical appearance. It is difficult to say if young French 
actress Virginie Ledoyen, making her American film debut here, has any 
thespian talents, but my suspicions point to a resounding "no." Even if the 
role is severely underwritten, any good actress would be able to turn 
Francoise into someone who, at least, is likable or kind-natured. Ledoyen 
plays her like a mannequin--lifeless and without the ability to show 
emotions.  
Richard and Francoise have zero chemistry together, and it is tough to say 
what Richard sees in someone who might as well be placed in a living room 
around the holidays and have ornaments and lights hung around her body. Their 
relationship is haphazardly written, by John Hodge, and executed, by Boyle, 
and there is no way any audience member could care enough about them to 
invest their emotions into the fate of their romance.
In the other two notable roles are Guillaume Canet, as Etienne, and Tilda 
Swinton (1993's "Orlando"), as Sal. Canet is unextraordinary, and his 
character is surprisingly written to be wimpy in the second half, when he 
does not even care either way that Richard stole Francoise from him. After a 
very brief exchange of words, this possible love triangle evaporates and 
another pseudo one comes to the forefront. On a trip to the mainland to get 
supplies, Richard and Sal engage in sexual activity, and Sal tells him 
afterwards that she already has a boyfriend and is uninterested in beginning 
a relationship; she just wanted the sex. Swinton, an excellent actress who 
isn't used nearly enough, is able to develop a character, to a degree, and 
portrays Sal as a strong-willed, determined woman who only wishes for their 
sacred beach to remain undiscovered.
Approximately fifteen minutes into the film's second hour, "The Beach" makes 
a U-turn and becomes a thriller, as four travelers whom Richard mistakenly 
gave a map to, are seen across the water preparing to cross to the island. 
When Sal finds this out, she demands that he stay in the woods until they 
reach the other side, and then turn them away somehow. Forced into solitude 
and without food or Francoise, Richard gradually begins to lose his mind, 
turning into a prowler of the island's forests. But why? The details into 
Richard's startling transformation are kept under wraps, only, I suppose, for 
the filmmakers to know the answer to.
It is unfortunate that the screenplay lets the cast and plot developments 
down, because "The Beach" is a towering technical achievement. The 
cinematography, by Darius Khondji (who blessed us with the haunting and 
unforgettable look of 1999's "In Dreams"), does not disappoint in capturing a 
beach that is supposedly one of the most pure and beautiful patches of land 
on the Earth. The choice of music (by such bands as New Order, Sugar Ray, All 
Saints, and Moby) is perfectly realized and compliments the pretty pictures 
with a dream-like quality, while the score, by Badalamenti, is resplendent.
"The Beach" is based on a novel by Alex Garland, and like most film 
adaptations, has allegedly taken great liberties in telling the story. How 
the picture might have been if more closely related to the book remains to be 
known (since I have never read it), but something tells me much of it has 
been chopped up due to the studio (20th-Century Fox) seeking a more 
mainstream product for DiCaprio's teenybopper fans to enjoy. They might as 
well have not even attempted it, as the film will leave DiCaprio's younger 
followers in the dark, or away from the theater, based on its rightful 
R-rating. 
Director Boyle would love to think he has made a motion picture with powerful 
pro-ecological undercurrents about the deflowering of a nation and the 
possible purity a hidden world might have the ability to hold, but this 
statement is about as subtle as a neon sign, and about as thought-provoking 
as a piece of grilled chicken. "The Beach" is not at all a bad film--simply a 
misguided one that is ruined by an amateurish screenplay that is missing 
three important elements: a heart, a brain, and the nerve to be courageous in 
its storytelling. Wow, I suddenly feel like I just entered into an alternate 
world of "The Wizard of Oz"--one in which the Emerald City is devoid of any 
sense of magic, wonder, or human compassion.

Title
Review for Planet of the Apes (2001)
Directed by Tim Burton. 
Cast: Mark Wahlberg, Helena Bonham Carter, Tim Roth, Estella Warren, Michael 
Clarke Duncan, Kris Kristofferson, Paul Giamatti, Cary-Hiroyuki Tagawa, David 
Warner, Lisa Marie, Charlton Heston, Linda Harrison. 
2001 - 119 minutes 
Rated PG-13 (for violence). 
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, July 27, 2001. 
One of the most visionary filmmakers working today is, unquestionably, Tim 
Burton. Interested in telling strange and unusual tales with a grand helping 
of imagination and wonder to spare, Burton is a groundbreaking director whose 
stamp seems to be all over his films, from 1985's "Pee Wee's Big Adventure," 
to 1988's "Beetlejuice," to 1989's "Batman," to 1990's "Edward Scissorhands," 
to 1996's "Mars Attacks!," to 1999's "Sleepy Hollow." In each of his movies, 
he is equipped with startlingly innovative production designs and haunting 
music scores from Burton regular Danny Elfman. In a nutshell, when one goes 
to see "A Tim Burton Film," one is sure to walk out having seen something 
they have never seen before. 
That being said, "Planet of the Apes," a re-imagining of the cult 1968 hit 
that spawned four sequels, is the most uneven motion picture Tim Burton has 
ever had the misfortune of directing. In fact, it doesn't particularly even 
seem like something that should go on his filmography next to everything else 
he has been involved with. Elfman's signature excellent score is still here, 
to be sure, but the movie is nearly devoid of inventive thought or human 
connection (whether it involve actual homosapiens or apes). Although nowhere 
near as badly handled or haphazardly constructed, "Planet of the Apes" 
remains Tim Burton's version of "Battlefield Earth." 
Set in 2029, astronaut Leo Davidson (Mark Wahlberg) crash-lands his 
one-person space pod on an unidentified planet where apes are the superior 
life form over human beings, who are treated as slaves and animals. 
Immediately captured by General Thade (Tim Roth) and his gang of human-hating 
apes, Leo manages to promptly escape, along with a few of the other captured 
people, including the beautiful Daena (Estella Warren). Aided by ape-woman 
Ari (Helena Bonham Carter), who believes humans and primates should coexist 
as equals, the escapees begin their journey to a place called the "Forbidden 
Zone," where they hope to reach salvation. 
Murkily plotted and slightly written, by William Broyles Jr., Lawrence 
Konner, and Mark D. Rosenthal, "Planet of the Apes" is a marginally ambitious 
sci-fi adventure that feels like it could have used another rewrite. Very 
little seems to happen in its 119-minute running time, and what does is 
merely passable--unexciting, frequently uninvolving, and just sort of there. 
Also desperately lacking in character development, the film never allows you 
to grow attached to anyone onscreen (with one exception), and so you stop 
caring and become impatient. The talent roster is certainly impressive, 
especially for such a big-budget film, but not much is done with any one of 
them. Mark Wahlberg (2000's "The Perfect Storm") is an arresting actor who 
is, nonetheless, vapid as Leo Davidson. Nothing is learned about Leo in the 
course of the film, and Wahlberg's performance seems akin to a mirage--he 
just doesn't seem to be playing at the usual top of his game. Tim Roth 
(2000's "Lucky Numbers") disappears behind layers of Rick Baker's flawless 
ape makeup, as the villainous Thade, and with his human identity also goes a 
memorable presence. As for the sultry Estella Warren (2001's "Driven"), she 
is horribly put to waste as the human Daena, who says very little, and seems 
to be thinking even less. At the climax, we are led to believe that she has 
fallen for Leo, and it is one of the most laughably unwarranted film romances 
to come around the pike in some time. Had as much work been done in giving 
the people a little more personality as was spent on the Oscar-bound makeup, 
there might have been a little more material to chew on. 
Thank goodness for small favors. Helena Bonham Carter (1999's "Fight Club") 
is the aforementioned one exception to the character problems, and she is a 
standout. As the determined, earnest Ari, Carter paints her role with just 
the right shading of emotion, longing, and hopefulness, and the results are 
dynamite. When all is said and done, it is Carter's sparkling turn that 
should get the much-earned credit. 
Feeling obligated to one-up its 1968 predecessor, "Planet of the Apes" has 
two separate plot twists at the end. The first one is more or less 
predictable, and anyone with a sharp eye will be able to spot the setup 
during the early scene where Leo crashes his pod on the planet. The second 
twist appears at the very end, and it is almost enraging in how little sense 
it actually makes. While the undiscriminating viewer may think it is "cool" 
and move on, put up to a split second of closer scrutiny unveils it to not 
only be illogical, but also pointless. Tim Burton may have reimagined the 
older "Planet of the Apes" for his current version, but the outcome was not 
necessarily for the better. 

Title
Review for Here on Earth (2000)
Directed by Mark Piznarski.
Cast: Chris Klein, Leelee Sobieski, Josh Hartnett, Michael Rooker, Annette 
O'Toole, Bruce Greenwood, Annie Corley, Elaine Hendrix, Stuart Wilson.
2000 - 96 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for mild profanity and sexual situations).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, March 25, 2000.
"Here on Earth" may be a cliched melodrama, the same, or similar, to any 
umpteenth movie about romance and tragedy, but give it points for having its 
characters be fairly intelligent teenagers, rather than caricatures starring 
in the next high school comedy. As someone who cannot stand sappy movies, or 
anything that overly strains for tears from either happiness or heartbreak, 
the verdict on "Here on Earth" comes fairly as a surprise, considering that 
the cheese admittedly does grow rather overwhelmingly in the finale. But 
maybe it is the good type of cheese--Velveeta or Helluvagood, rather than a 
generic store brand--because, for once, its obvious manipulations really did 
work on an emotional level.
When Kelley Morse (Chris Klein), a rich and snobbish senior at Rallston 
Academy, an exclusive boys' prep school in Massachusetts, receives a sleek 
new car as a compensation gift from his father (Stuart Wilson), who will be 
away on business during his graduation, missing his valedictorian speech, he 
decides to take a ride with two buddies into a nearby rural community. After 
saying a few patronizing things to the waitress at the local diner, 
17-year-old Samantha (Leelee Sobieski), Kelley ends up getting in a drag race 
with her boyfriend, Jasper (Josh Hartnett), which ends with them crashing and 
the diner, owned by Sam's family, burning to the ground.
As punishment for the crime, Kelley is sentenced to spend the summer at 
Jasper's family's home, where the two boys will fulfill their community 
service by aiding in the reconstruction of the diner. At first, sulking and 
refusing to eat with the residents of the town, Sam eavesdrops on him one day 
in the woods, as he is giving the speech that he ultimately will not be able 
to give at his graduation. When he quotes Robert Frost's poem "Birches," 
Sam's favorite, she suspects there's more to Kelley than meets the eye, and 
maybe--just maybe--behind that hot-shot exterior is a warm, caring heart. 
Even as she starts to fall in love for the first time in her life, Sam cannot 
shake off the memories of her childhood and teenage best friend Jasper, whose 
romantic relationship with Sam just sort of happened, as if it was to be 
expected.
The ads for "Here on Earth" downplay the picture's tragic last half-hour, and 
that is a smart move. Once audiences--its target being teenage girls between 
13-18, but that could easily stretch out to other demographics--get into the 
theater to see a sumptuously photographed, idyllic romance, there will be no 
escaping its downbeat final act, which, if my theater-packed, sobbing 
audience is any indication, has the power to truly touch you, even as the 
characters may sometimes be saying things that are so clearly from a 
screenplay, rather than realistically coming out of their mouths. If my 
assumptions are correct, "Here on Earth" could easily become the big sleeper 
of the spring movie season, and since it may be the most successful film of 
its teen tragedy formula since 1970's classic weepy, "Love Story," it 
deserves recognition.
If the dialogue occasionally wanders into the sap, cheese, and corn 
factories, it not once is shameless, and the performances are easily the 
element that pushes the film up an extra notch or two. First and foremost, 
Leelee Sobieski, a wonderful and fresh find who has starred in such films as 
1998's "Deep Impact" and "A Soldier's Daughter Never Cries," and had a small 
role in Stanley Kubrick's 1999 opus, "Eyes Wide Shut," brings true depth and 
sharp-wittedness to her role as Samantha. You care about her, and the 
decisions she makes, because she is the type of teenager who favors reading, 
intellect, and true love, over meaningless sex and drugs, and has an amiable, 
kind presence. 
Her romantic counterpart, Chris Klein, has wisely chosen a serious role over 
his first two comedic ones in "Election" and "American Pie," and although he 
unavoidably has that goofy sort of look about him, it isn't his fault and he 
shouldn't be criticized merely for that. Klein tries his hardest and makes 
very few missteps, while the two of them (Sobieski and Klein) are well-cast 
together, and have perfectly tasteful chemistry. One look at them, and you 
just know there is nothing naughty at all going on in their minds. All they 
are interested in is finding someone who cares about and loves them as much 
as they likewise do.
The third, and last, central role is that of Jasper, played with a surprising 
poignant maturity by Josh Hartnett, who was unable to show off the full range 
of his acting abilities in 1998's "The Faculty" and "Halloween: H20," but who 
proves here that he is a truly talented young actor with an undoubtedly 
bright future ahead of him. Jasper is smartly written in Michael Seitzman's 
screenplay, not as a jerk who fights for his girl when she inevitably chooses 
to be with Kelley, but as an understanding young man who cares too much for 
Sam to not respect her choices in life. 
Added credit must go to Seitzman's script, not for its intermittent schmaltz, 
but for not resorting to easy teen stereotypes and a story whose suspense 
comes from whether two certain characters will end up together. We know for 
the majority of "Here on Earth" that Kelley and Sam will be together because 
their romance has begun by the 30-minute mark. Instead, we wonder what else 
the story has to offer, and although its late plot development can be easily 
telegraphed if you watch closely enough throughout, at least it seriously 
deals with tough life decisions and the mending, or closure, of loving 
relationships.
Directed by Mark Piznarski, "Here on Earth" has the ability to sometimes be 
too obvious, but if there is ever a genre for really good melodramas, ones 
that don't come around very often, that work despite their downfalls, then 
this is one of the prime candidates. Adding validity to the project, 
Sobieski, Klein, and Hartnett are a strong thespian team, and are aided by 
earnest supporting roles from the likes of Annette O'Toole and Bruce 
Greenwood (as Sam's parents), Elaine Hendrix (as Sam's older sister), and 
Annie Corley (as Jasper's mother). It may not be an earthshaking cinematic 
experience, but it does have its heart in the right place, here on earth.

Title
Review for Big Daddy (1999)
Directed by Dennis Dugan.
Cast: Adam Sandler, Cole Sprouse, Dylan Sprouse, Joey Lauren Adams, Rob 
Schneider, Leslie Mann, Jon Stewart, Allen Covert, Kristy Swanson, Josh 
Mostel, Steve Buscemi.
1999 - 91 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and bathroom-style humor).
Reviewed June 26, 1999.
Who would have thought that when Adam Sandler first appeared in a starring 
role on the big screen in 1995's inane "Billy Madison," I would be saying 
that Sandler is maturing as an actor four years later. Since that lowpoint in 
his feature film career, indeed Sandler has grown on me. 1996's "Happy 
Gilmore" was at least funny, and 1998's sleeper smash hit, "The Waterboy," 
was mediocre but passable (thanks mostly to the supporting performances from 
Kathy Bates and Fairuza Balk). It wasn't until February of '98, however, that 
I actually found a Sandler film that I could wholeheartedly say that, yes, I 
loved that movie. Its name was "The Wedding Singer," and with Sandler not 
constantly being a doofus and aided by the sparkling Drew Barrymore, it was 
one of the most entertaining films of the whole year. "Big Daddy," Adam 
Sandler's latest comedy, has attempted to mix his token bathroom humor for 
the hormonal teenage male audience with the lighthearted and sweet tone of 
"The Wedding Singer." The result is a film that is merely good, quite flawed, 
but, yes, Sandler is maturing as an actor.
Sonny Koufax (Adam Sandler) is a 32-year-old guy living in NYC who went to 
college to become a lawyer, but never became one because he refused to take 
the bar exam. Working only one day a week as a tollbooth operater, his 
girlfriend, Vanessa (Kristy Swanson), is becoming frustrated because, as she 
tells him, "you refuse to move on to the next phase of your life." Right 
after his best friend and roommate, Kevin (Jon Stewart), has left to work in 
China, the 5-year-old, cute-as-a-button Julian (twins Cole and Dylan Sprouse) 
is literally left at his doorstep with a note that says Kevin is his 
biological father. All alone in the world, Sonny kindly takes Julian into his 
home, and before long, Vanessa is out of the picture too, leaving him for an 
old man with "a 5-year plan." Until a foster family is found, Sonny (posing 
as Kevin) convinces the social worker to let him keep Julian, as opposed to 
staying in an orphanage. But a funny thing happens on the way through the 
adoption process, as Sonny grows deeply attached to Julian and sees it as a 
way to finally grow up himself.
"Big Daddy" is a spirited, very funny heartwarmer that actually, like "The 
Wedding Singer," turns out to be a lot more humorous than Sandler's more 
straightforward comedies. The film especially gains laughs from the 
observations of watching Sonny's decidedly easy-going, "loose" parenting 
style and from the supporting characters, including a Russian delivery man 
(Rob Schneider) and a wacky homeless guy (Steve Buscemi). The movie also has 
its fair share of peeing jokes and physical pratfalls to satisfy any juvenile 
fan, but they are kept more discreet than the majority of Sandler's past 
excursions.
What many might be surprised about concerning "Big Daddy," however, is that 
the film also works as a bittersweet, comedy-laced drama, and also as a sweet 
little romance. The drama becomes more apparent during the climax, which 
inevitably takes place in court, with Sonny in a custody battle. 
Unfortunately, this is the film's weakest link, as the sappiness starts to 
grow a bit thick by this point, but saves itself with a wrap-up that might 
not be quite as predictable as you'd expect.
The romance, although slightly underwritten and more effective in "The 
Wedding Singer" (then again, that movie revolved around the love story), 
actually turns out to work very well, thanks mostly to Joey Lauren Adams 
(1997's marvelous "Chasing Amy"), as Layla, a beautiful, young lawyer and the 
sister of Kevin's fiancee, Corinne (Leslie Mann), a former Hooters waitress 
who despises Sonny. Adams is a radiant, natural actress who can brighten up 
any scene in any movie she appears in (whether it be "Chasing Amy," 1993's 
nostalgic "Dazed and Confused," or this year's criminally overlooked "A Cool, 
Dry Place," opposite Vince Vaughn). Adams and Sandler share an especially 
charming scene that left me with a huge, dorky smile plastered across my 
face, in which they tell Julian a bedtime store, replacing their own budding 
relationship with that of a rabbit and a squirrel. Come to think of it, that 
grin returned onto my face every time Adams appeared.
And finally, in the limelight of everything, is Adam Sandler, who has finally 
become a movie actor that I really, really enjoy. Here he replaces any sort 
of grating personality with that of an affectionate one, and still never 
loses sight of his own comic talents. Watching Comedy Central's recent 
"Canned Ham" episode on the making of "Big Daddy," in which we meet and talk 
with Sandler's own family, I learned that Sandler is a normal, caring man, 
and one with a lot of love to give his family, friends, and relatives. With 
that said, Sandler's Sonny is probably the closest he has come to portraying 
himself, and works wonders with Cole and Dylan Sprouse, adorable twins who 
play Julian and escape without becoming unctuous and annoying like most kid 
actors.
For all of the charm "Big Daddy" has, the film is pretty light stuff, not 
deep or meaningful or even that memorable. It's also hard to believe, for 
example, that Sonny could keep such a nice, roomy loft by only working one 
day a week. The aforementioned courtroom scene is corny as only mainstream 
films can be, but I surprisingly didn't mind that much, in spite of myself. 
If anything, the movie is funny, plain and simple, and due to the several 
noted performances that are far above this slight material, I found I was 
enjoying "Big Daddy" quite a lot. Probably more than I had any right to.
      - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
        Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html
